New York, session 2025-2026, S9004.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. a) The several amounts specified in this chapter for capi- 2 tal projects, or so much thereof as shall be necessary to accomplish the 3 purpose of the appropriations, are appropriated by comprehensive 4 construction programs (hereinafter referred to by the abbreviation CCP), 5 purposes, and projects designated by the appropriations, and authorized 6 to be made available as hereinafter provided to the respective public 7 officers; such appropriations shall be deemed to provide all costs 8 necessary and pertinent to accomplish the intent of the appropriations EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12654-09-6 2 12654-09-6 1 and are appropriated in accordance with the provisions of section 93 of 2 the state finance law. 3 b) Any amounts specified in this chapter for advances for capital 4 projects, or so much thereof as shall be necessary to accomplish the 5 purpose of the appropriations, are appropriated by comprehensive 6 construction programs (hereinafter referred to by the abbreviation CCP), 7 purposes and projects designated by the appropriations as advances from 8 the capital projects fund in accordance with the provisions of sections 9 40-a and 93 of the state finance law, and are authorized to be paid as 10 hereinafter provided as an advance for a share, part or whole of the 11 cost for such programs, purposes and projects hereinafter specified. 12 c) The several amounts specified in this chapter as capital projects - 13 reappropriations, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accom- 14 plish the purpose of the appropriations, as appropriated by comprehen- 15 sive construction programs (hereinafter referred to by the abbreviation 16 CCP), purposes, and projects, being the undisbursed and/or unexpended 17 balances of the prior year's appropriations, are reappropriated and 18 unless otherwise amended or repealed in part or total in this chapter 19 shall continue to be available for the same purposes as the prior appro- 20 priations or as otherwise amended for the fiscal year beginning April 1, 21 2026. 22 The capital projects reappropriations contained in this chapter may be 23 amended by repealing the items set forth in brackets and by adding ther- 24 eto the underscored material. Certain reappropriations in this chapter 25 are shown using abbreviated text, with three leader dots (an ellipsis) 26 followed by three spaces (... ) used to indicate where existing law 27 that is being continued is not shown. However, unless a change is clear- 28 ly indicated by the use of brackets [ ] for deletions and underscores 29 for additions, the purpose, amounts, funding source and all other 30 aspects pertinent to each item of appropriation shall be as last appro- 31 priated. 32 For the purpose of complying with section 25 of the state finance law, 33 the year, chapter and section of the last act reappropriating a former 34 original appropriation or any part thereof is, unless otherwise indi- 35 cated, chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025. 36 d) No moneys appropriated by this chapter shall be available for 37 payment until a certificate of approval has been issued by the director 38 of the budget, who shall file such certificate with the department of 39 audit and control, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and 40 the chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee. 41 e) Notwithstanding any provision contained herein or any other law to 42 the contrary, if, on a cash basis of accounting, a general fund imbal- 43 ance has or is expected to occur in fiscal year 2026-27, the budget 44 director is hereby authorized to withhold all or some of the amounts 45 appropriated herein, including amounts that are to be paid on specific 46 dates prescribed in law or regulation. Prior to withholding any amounts, 47 the director shall consider whether other means are available for accom- 48 plishing the purposes of this provision. Provided further, the director 49 shall consider the impact of any such amounts to be withheld. To the 50 extent the state is obligated to make payment to any individual or enti- 51 ty pursuant to any appropriation contained herein, such obligation shall 52 be reduced commensurate with such payments withheld by the director of 53 the budget. 54 The following types of appropriations shall be exempt from such with- 55 holds pursuant to this provision: (a) public assistance payments for 56 families and individuals and payments for eligible aged, blind and disa- 3 12654-09-6 1 bled persons related to supplemental social security; (b) any reductions 2 that would violate federal law; (c) payments of debt service and related 3 expenses for which the state is constitutionally obligated to pay debt 4 service or is contractually obligated to pay debt service, subject to an 5 appropriation, including where the state has a contingent contractual 6 obligation; and (d) payments the state is obligated to make pursuant to 7 court orders or judgments. 8 For purposes of this provision, a general fund imbalance shall occur 9 if any state fiscal year 2026-27 quarterly financial plan update 10 required by subdivision 4 of section 23 of the state finance law 11 reflects, or if at any point during the final quarter of state fiscal 12 year 2026-27 the budget director projects, that estimated general fund 13 receipts and/or estimated general fund disbursements have or will vary 14 from the estimates included in the state fiscal year 2026-27 enacted 15 budget financial plan required by sections 22 and 23 of the state 16 finance law results in a cumulative budget imbalance of $2,000,000,000 17 or more. Provided however, that such $2,000,000,000 must be calculated 18 without considering any payments withheld in accordance with this 19 provision or any depletion of the state fiscal year 2026-27 transaction 20 risk reserve accounting mechanism. 21 "Estimated general fund receipts" shall mean general fund tax 22 receipts, after payment of debt service and miscellaneous receipts esti- 23 mated by the budget director to be received during state fiscal year 24 2026-27. 25 "Estimated general funds disbursements" shall mean general funds 26 disbursements, including transfers, estimated by the budget director to 27 be made during state fiscal year 2026-27. 28 No later than ten business days following the issuance of any state 29 fiscal year 2026-27 quarterly financial plan update that includes a 30 determination, and/or the date in the final quarter of the state fiscal 31 year 2026-27 upon which the budget director determines, that a general 32 fund imbalance exists, the budget director shall provide notification of 33 payments that will be withheld pursuant to this provision to the presi- 34 dent pro tempore of the senate and the speaker of the assembly. 35 Provided, however, the aggregate amount of payments withheld pursuant to 36 this provision shall at no point be in an amount greater than the deter- 37 mined cumulative general fund imbalance. Provided further however, 38 before any payments may be withheld pursuant to this provision, the 39 budget director shall first deplete the $2,000,000,000 transaction risk 40 reserve accounting mechanism to resolve the determined general fund 41 imbalance, as practicable. Such notification will also identify any 42 other means the budget director intends to use to resolve any portion of 43 the general fund imbalance, including but not limited to the aforemen- 44 tioned depletion of the transaction risk reserve and/or any other 45 resources. 46 Following such budget director notification, the legislature shall 47 have ten business days to prepare and adopt by concurrent resolution its 48 own withhold plan which conforms with the requirements of this 49 provision, and which achieves the same aggregate of payment withholds as 50 the budget director's withhold plan. If after ten business days follow- 51 ing the budget director's notification the legislature fails to prepare 52 and adopt its own withhold plan, or if the budget director determines 53 that the withhold plan prepared and adopted by the legislature does not 54 conform with the requirements of this provision, the withholds identi- 55 fied in the budget director's withhold plan will immediately take 56 effect. 4 12654-09-6 1 Notwithstanding any other provision contained herein or any other 2 provision of law to the contrary, any payments withheld pursuant to this 3 section may be paid in full or in part if a subsequent general fund 4 surplus materializes in state fiscal year 2026-27. 5 f) The appropriations contained in this chapter shall be available for 6 the fiscal year beginning on April 1, 2026 except as otherwise noted. 5 12654-09-6 ADIRONDACK PARK AGENCY CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 40,000,000 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 0 1,500,000 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 0 41,500,000 9 ================ ================ 10 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 15 For services and expenses related to the rehabilitation and 16 construction of facilities, including but not limited to design and 17 construction, consultation, inspection and engineering, and personal 18 service, fringe and indirect costs (13AB2503) (81010) .............. 19 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 For services and expenses related to the rehabilitation and 22 construction of facilities, including but not limited to design and 23 construction, consultation, inspection and engineering, and personal 24 service, fringe and indirect costs (13AB2203) (81010) .............. 25 29,000,000 ....................................... (re. $29,000,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 27 For alterations, rehabilitations and other improvements to facilities, 28 including but not limited to design and construction, consultation, 29 inspection and engineering costs (13AB2003) (81010) ................ 30 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 31 Special Revenue Funds - Other 32 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 33 Miscellaneous Gifts Account - 20100 34 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 36 For alterations, rehabilitations and improvements of various facili- 37 ties, including personal service and payment of liabilities incurred 38 prior to April 1, 2012 (13GI1203) (81010) .......................... 39 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 41 For alterations, rehabilitations and improvements of various facili- 42 ties, including personal service and payment of liabilities incurred 6 12654-09-6 ADIRONDACK PARK AGENCY CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 prior to April 1, 2011 (13GI1103) (81010) .......................... 2 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 3 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 4 For alterations, rehabilitations and improvements of various facili- 5 ties, including personal service and payment of liabilities incurred 6 prior to April 1, 2010 (13GI1003) (81010) .......................... 7 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 7 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other...... 66,615,000 272,250,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 66,615,000 272,250,000 8 ================ ================ 9 NEW FACILITIES PURPOSE (CCP) ................................ 43,200,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 New Facilities Purpose 14 For grants to municipal and incorporated 15 not-for-profit pounds, shelters, humane 16 societies, and rescue facilities, exclud- 17 ing rescues operating from a residence. 18 Use of the grant funds is restricted to 19 the costs of capital projects including, 20 but not limited to, construction, reno- 21 vation, rehabilitation, installation, 22 acquisition, or expansion of buildings, 23 equipment, or facilities necessary for the 24 secure containment, health, and adequate 25 care of sheltered dogs and cats. These 26 grants shall be allocated by the commis- 27 sioner on a competitive basis until such 28 funds are extinguished in an amount not 29 less than $20,000 and not more than 30 $500,000, not to exceed ninety percent of 31 the total project cost. Not less than 32 $500,000 for projects in underserved muni- 33 cipalities or regions, for such pounds, 34 shelters, humane societies, or rescue 35 facilities, excluding rescues operating 36 from a residence, that are not operated by 37 or under contract with one or more munici- 38 palities for the provision of pound or 39 shelter services but that are registered 40 with the department and can demonstrate 41 providing similar pound or shelter 42 services. Up to five percent of the total 43 appropriation amount may be made available 44 for the services and expenses of the 45 department in relation to these grants, 46 including personal service, nonpersonal 8 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 service, fringe benefits, and indirect 2 costs (60AS2603) (11433) ..................... 5,000,000 3 For additional grants to municipal and 4 incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 5 ters, humane societies, and rescue facili- 6 ties, excluding rescues operating from a 7 residence. Use of the grant funds is 8 restricted to the costs of capital 9 projects including, but not limited to, 10 construction, renovation, rehabilitation, 11 installation, acquisition, or expansion of 12 buildings, equipment, or facilities neces- 13 sary for the secure containment, health, 14 and adequate care of sheltered dogs and 15 cats. These grants shall be allocated by 16 the commissioner on a competitive basis 17 until such funds are extinguished in an 18 amount not less than $20,000 and not more 19 than $500,000, not to exceed ninety 20 percent of the total project cost. Not 21 less than $500,000 for projects in under- 22 served municipalities or regions, for such 23 pounds, shelters, humane societies, or 24 rescue facilities, excluding rescues oper- 25 ating from a residence, that are not oper- 26 ated by or under contract with one or more 27 municipalities for the provision of pound 28 or shelter services but that are regis- 29 tered with the department and can demon- 30 strate providing similar pound or shelter 31 services. Up to five percent of the total 32 appropriation amount may be made available 33 for the services and expenses of the 34 department in relation to these grants, 35 including personal service, nonpersonal 36 service, fringe benefits, and indirect 37 costs (60CA2603) (11399) ..................... 5,000,000 38 For services, expenses, and grants for the 39 cost of construction, renovation, alter- 40 ation, rehabilitation, improvements, 41 installation, acquisition, repair or 42 replacement of buildings, equipment, or 43 permanent or temporary facilities for the 44 development of facilities to support the 45 preparation and distribution of New York 46 focused meals for regional school infras- 47 tructure, such as aggregation, storage 48 hubs and/or commissary-type kitchens 49 (60SK2607) (11345) .......................... 10,000,000 50 For services and expenses related to 51 projects for alterations, rehabilitation, 9 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 improvements, or acquisition for New York 2 federation of growers and processors agri- 3 business child development centers 4 (60AB2607)(11326) ............................ 3,200,000 5 For services and expenses of the New York 6 State dairy farm modernization grant 7 program, for Farm and Food Growth Fund, 8 Inc. to provide grants to farms and agri- 9 cultural marketing cooperatives to be used 10 for the services and expenses to expand 11 on-farm milk storage capacity, improve 12 efficiencies, invest in milk transfer 13 systems and milking systems, cooling tech- 14 nologies, or other purposes deemed neces- 15 sary to further opportunities for dairy 16 farmers to collect, transport or store 17 their products. Up to fifteen percent of 18 the total appropriation amount may be made 19 available for the services and expenses of 20 Farm and Food Growth Fund, Inc. directly 21 related to the administration and delivery 22 of the grant program (60122609) (11360) ..... 15,000,000 23 For payment to agricultural or horticultural 24 corporations and county extension service 25 associations that are eligible to receive 26 premium reimbursement pursuant to section 27 286 of the agriculture and markets law 28 for: the costs of construction, reno- 29 vation, alteration, rehabilitation, 30 improvements, installation, acquisition, 31 repair or replacement of fairground build- 32 ings, equipment or permanent or temporary 33 facilities used to house or promote agri- 34 culture, or expand the year-round use of 35 fairground facilities, excluding parking 36 facilities and signage; or for the costs 37 of construction, renovation, alteration, 38 rehabilitation, improvements, installa- 39 tion, acquisition, repair, or replacement 40 of water systems, restrooms, septic 41 systems, storm water management systems, 42 and/or security-related infrastructure and 43 equipment on fairgrounds or in fairground 44 buildings to be allocated by the commis- 45 sioner in amounts not to exceed $200,000 46 to such eligible agricultural and horti- 47 cultural corporations or county extension 48 services on a noncompetitive basis until 49 such funds are exhausted. Up to five 50 percent of the total appropriation amount 51 may be made available for the services and 10 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 expenses of the department in relation to 2 these grants, including personal service, 3 nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, and 4 indirect costs (60622603) (11340) ............ 5,000,000 5 NEW YORK WORKS (CCP) ........................................ 19,715,000 6 -------------- 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 9 Administrative Services Purpose 10 For the purchase and replacement of vehicles 11 and equipment (60VS26AS) (11420) ............... 600,000 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 purchase or replacement of laboratory 14 equipment (60ES26AS) (11421) ................... 115,000 15 Capital Projects Funds - Other 16 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 17 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 18 For services and expenses related to New 19 York Works Infrastructure projects for 20 alterations, rehabilitation, improvements, 21 and land acquisition at the state fair, 22 including personal service and the payment 23 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 24 2026. All or a portion of the funds appro- 25 priated hereby may be suballocated or 26 transferred to any department, agency or 27 public authority (60NY2603) (10300) .......... 5,000,000 28 For services and expenses of state fair 29 projects, such costs may include but not 30 be limited to personal services, nonper- 31 sonal services, fringe benefits and indi- 32 rect costs, such projects may include but 33 shall not be limited to alterations, reha- 34 bilitation, improvements, preventive main- 35 tenance, replacement, refurbishment, and 36 construction including the payment of 37 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 38 2026 and notwithstanding any law to the 39 contrary, up to $2,500,000 for alter- 40 ations, rehabilitation, preventative main- 41 tenance, field and farm equipment, and 42 improvements to various facilities at the 43 Cornell University College of Agriculture 44 and Life Sciences. All or a portion of the 45 $2,500,000 may be suballocated to the 46 State University Construction Fund 47 (60SF2603) (11422) .......................... 14,000,000 11 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 STATE FAIR (CCP) ............................................. 3,700,000 2 -------------- 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 5 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 6 For payment of the costs including personal 7 services, nonpersonal services, fringe 8 benefits and indirect costs, of alter- 9 ations, rehabilitation and improvements 10 including preventive maintenance, replace- 11 ment, refurbishment and energy conserva- 12 tion of various facilities, including the 13 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 14 April 1, 2026 (60MN2603) (11493) ............. 1,700,000 15 Capital Projects Funds - Other 16 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 17 State Fair Capital Improvement Account - 32208 18 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 19 For payment of the costs including personal 20 services, nonpersonal services, fringe 21 benefits and indirect costs, of alter- 22 ations, rehabilitation and improvements 23 including preventive maintenance, replace- 24 ment, refurbishment and energy conserva- 25 tion of various facilities, including the 26 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 27 April 1, 2026(60RI2603) (11493) .............. 2,000,000 12 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 NEW FACILITIES PURPOSE (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 New Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 7 ters, humane societies, and rescue facilities, excluding rescues 8 operating from a residence. Use of the grant funds is restricted to 9 the costs of capital projects including, but not limited to, 10 construction, renovation, rehabilitation, installation, acquisition, 11 or expansion of buildings, equipment, or facilities necessary for 12 the secure containment, health, and adequate care of sheltered dogs 13 and cats. These grants shall be allocated by the commissioner on a 14 competitive basis until such funds are extinguished in an amount not 15 less than $20,000 and not more than $500,000, not to exceed ninety 16 percent of the total project cost. Not less than $500,000 for 17 projects in underserved municipalities or regions, for such pounds, 18 shelters, humane societies, or rescue facilities, excluding rescues 19 operating from a residence, that are not operated by or under 20 contract with one or more municipalities for the provision of pound 21 or shelter services but that are registered with the department and 22 can demonstrate providing similar pound or shelter services. Up to 23 five percent of the total appropriation amount may be made available 24 for the services and expenses of the department in relation to these 25 grants, including personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe 26 benefits, and indirect costs (60AS2503) (11433) .................... 27 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 28 For additional grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit 29 pounds, shelters, humane societies, and rescue facilities, excluding 30 rescues operating from a residence. Use of the grant funds is 31 restricted to the costs of capital projects including, but not 32 limited to, construction, renovation, rehabilitation, installation, 33 acquisition, or expansion of buildings, equipment, or facilities 34 necessary for the secure containment, health, and adequate care of 35 sheltered dogs and cats. These grants shall be allocated by the 36 commissioner on a competitive basis until such funds are extin- 37 guished in an amount not less than $20,000 and not more than 38 $500,000, not to exceed ninety percent of the total project cost. 39 Not less than $500,000 for projects in underserved municipalities or 40 regions, for such pounds, shelters, humane societies, or rescue 41 facilities, excluding rescues operating from a residence, that are 42 not operated by or under contract with one or more municipalities 43 for the provision of pound or shelter services but that are regis- 44 tered with the department and can demonstrate providing similar 45 pound or shelter services. Up to five percent of the total appropri- 46 ation amount may be made available for the services and expenses of 47 the department in relation to these grants, including personal 48 service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, and indirect costs 49 [(60CA2503)] (60CA2507) (11399) .................................... 50 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 13 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services, expenses, and grants for the cost of construction, reno- 2 vation, alteration, rehabilitation, improvements, installation, 3 acquisition, repair or replacement of buildings, equipment, or 4 permanent or temporary facilities for the development of facilities 5 to support the preparation and distribution of New York focused 6 meals for regional school infrastructure, such as aggregation, stor- 7 age hubs and/or commissary-type kitchens (60SK2507) (11345) ........ 8 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 9 For services and expenses related to projects for alterations, reha- 10 bilitation, and improvements at the New York federation of growers 11 and processors agribusiness child development centers (60AB2507) 12 (11326) ... 3,200,000 ............................. (re. $3,200,000) 13 For services and expenses of the New York State dairy farm moderniza- 14 tion grant program, for Farm and Food Growth Fund, Inc. to provide 15 grants to farms and agricultural marketing cooperatives to be used 16 for the services and expenses to expand on-farm milk storage capaci- 17 ty, improve efficiencies, invest in milk transfer systems, cooling 18 technologies, or other purposes deemed necessary to further opportu- 19 nities for dairy farmers to transport or store their products. Up to 20 fifteen percent of the total appropriation amount may be made avail- 21 able for the services and expenses of Farm and Food Growth Fund, 22 Inc. directly related to the administration and delivery of the 23 grant program (60BD2509) (11360) ................................... 24 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 27 ters, humane societies, and rescue facilities, excluding rescues 28 operating from a residence. Use of the grant funds is restricted to 29 the costs of capital projects including, but not limited to, 30 construction, renovation, rehabilitation, installation, acquisition, 31 or expansion of buildings, equipment, or facilities necessary for 32 the secure containment, health, and adequate care of sheltered dogs 33 and cats. These grants shall be allocated by the commissioner on a 34 competitive basis until such funds are extinguished in an amount not 35 less than $20,000 and not more than $500,000, not to exceed ninety 36 percent of the total project cost. Not less than $500,000 for 37 projects in underserved municipalities or regions, for such pounds, 38 shelters, humane societies, or rescue facilities, excluding rescues 39 operating from a residence, that are not operated by or under 40 contract with one or more municipalities for the provision of pound 41 or shelter services but that are registered with the department and 42 can demonstrate providing similar pound or shelter services. Up to 43 five percent of the total appropriation amount may be made available 44 for the services and expenses of the department in relation to these 45 grants, including personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe 46 benefits, and indirect costs (60AS2403) (11433) .................... 47 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 48 For services, expenses, and grants for the cost of construction, reno- 49 vation, alteration, rehabilitation, improvements, installation, 50 acquisition, repair or replacement of buildings, equipment, or 51 permanent or temporary facilities for the development of facilities 14 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 to support the preparation and distribution of New York focused 2 meals for regional school infrastructure, such as aggregation, stor- 3 age hubs and/or commissary-type kitchens (60SK2407) (11345) ........ 4 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 5 For services and expenses related to projects for alterations, reha- 6 bilitation, and improvements at the New York federation of growers 7 and processors agribusiness child development centers (60AB2407) 8 (11326) ... 3,200,000 ............................. (re. $3,200,000) 9 For services and expenses of the New York State dairy farm moderniza- 10 tion grant program, for Farm and Food Growth Fund, Inc. to provide 11 grants to farms and agricultural marketing cooperatives to be used 12 for the services and expenses to expand on-farm milk storage capaci- 13 ty, improve efficiencies, invest in milk transfer systems, cooling 14 technologies, or other purposes deemed necessary to further opportu- 15 nities for dairy farmers to transport or store their products. Up 16 to ten percent of the total appropriation amount may be made avail- 17 able for the services and expenses of Farm and Food Growth Fund, 18 Inc. directly related to the administration and delivery of the 19 grant program (60BD2409) (11360) ................................... 20 24,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,642,000) 21 For services and expenses of the Statewide Cornell University Indus- 22 trial Hemp program for innovation and commercialization of biomater- 23 ial processing (60BE2407) (11361) .................................. 24 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 54, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 27 For services and expenses of the administration of a grant program for 28 the cost of construction, renovation, alteration, rehabilitation, 29 improvements, installation, acquisition, repair or replacement of 30 buildings, docks, equipment, or permanent or temporary facilities to 31 support the preparation, packaging, and distribution of Long Island 32 shellfish and other aquaculture products. Notwithstanding any other 33 provision of law, the director of the budget is hereby authorized to 34 transfer up to $50,000 to state operations for a Long Island seafood 35 processing feasibility study. Up to fifteen percent of the total 36 appropriation amount may be made available for the services and 37 expenses of such organization directly related to the administration 38 of the grant program (60BF2409) (11362) ............................ 39 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,755,000) 40 For services and expenses related to the expansion or rehabilitation 41 of the New York state veterinary diagnostic laboratory and the 42 animal health diagnostic center at Cornell University, including but 43 not limited to alterations, improvements, preventive maintenance, 44 replacement, refurbishment, and construction. All or a portion of 45 this appropriation may be suballocated to any department, agency, or 46 public authority. (60CV2407) (11366) ............................... 47 19,500,000 ....................................... (re. $19,500,000) 48 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 54, 49 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 15 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 2 ters, humane societies, and rescue facilities, excluding rescues 3 operating from a residence. Use of the grant funds is restricted to 4 the costs of capital projects including, but not limited to, 5 construction, renovation, rehabilitation, installation, acquisition, 6 or expansion of buildings, equipment, or facilities necessary for 7 the secure containment, health, and adequate care of sheltered dogs 8 and cats. These grants shall be allocated by the commissioner on a 9 competitive basis until such funds are extinguished as follows: (a) 10 In municipalities with a population of less than two million, for 11 such pounds, shelters, humane societies, or rescue facilities, 12 excluding rescues operating from a residence, that are operated by 13 or under contract for the provision of pound or shelter services 14 with one or more municipalities: projects serving an individual 15 municipality, grants in amounts not less than $50,000 and not more 16 than $200,000, not to exceed ninety percent of the total project 17 cost; and for projects serving two or more municipalities, grants in 18 amounts not less than $100,000 and not more than $500,000, not to 19 exceed ninety percent of the total project cost; (b) In munici- 20 palities with a population of more than two million, for such 21 pounds, shelters, humane societies, or rescue facilities, excluding 22 rescues operating from a residence, that are operated by or under 23 contract for the provision of pound or shelter services with one or 24 more municipalities, grants in amounts not less than $100,000 and 25 not more than $500,000, not to exceed ninety percent of the total 26 project cost; and (c) not less than $500,000 for projects in under- 27 served municipalities or regions, for such pounds, shelters, humane 28 societies, or rescue facilities, excluding rescues operating from a 29 residence, that are not operated by or under contract with one or 30 more municipalities for the provision of pound or shelter services 31 but that are registered with the department and can demonstrate 32 providing similar pound or shelter services, grants in amounts not 33 less than $50,000, and not more than $200,000, not to exceed ninety 34 percent of the total project cost. Up to five percent of the total 35 appropriation amount may be made available for the services and 36 expenses of the department in relation to these grants, including 37 personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, and indirect 38 costs. 39 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 40 ters, humane societies, and rescue facilities, excluding rescues 41 operating from a residence, awarded after April 1, 2024. Use of the 42 grant funds is restricted to the costs of capital projects includ- 43 ing, but not limited to, construction, renovation, rehabilitation, 44 installation, acquisition, or expansion of buildings, equipment, or 45 facilities necessary for the secure containment, health, and 46 adequate care of sheltered dogs and cats. These grants shall be 47 allocated by the commissioner on a competitive basis until such 48 funds are extinguished in an amount not less than $20,000 and not 49 more than $500,000, not to exceed ninety percent of the total 50 project cost. Not less than $500,000 for projects in underserved 51 municipalities or regions, for such pounds, shelters, humane socie- 52 ties, or rescue facilities, excluding rescues operating from a resi- 16 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 dence, that are not operated by or under contract with one or more 2 municipalities for the provision of pound or shelter services but 3 that are registered with the department and can demonstrate provid- 4 ing similar pound or shelter services. Up to five percent of the 5 total appropriation amount may be made available for the services 6 and expenses of the department in relation to these grants, includ- 7 ing personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, and 8 indirect costs (60AS2303) (11433) .................................. 9 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,826,000) 10 For the food access expansion grant program, to provide grants to 11 support and establish food access infrastructure in underserved 12 communities. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may 13 be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency or public 14 authority (60CO2307) (11344) ... 10,000,000 ...... (re. $10,000,000) 15 For services, expenses, and grants for the cost of construction, reno- 16 vation, alteration, rehabilitation, improvements, installation, 17 acquisition, repair or replacement of buildings, equipment, or 18 permanent or temporary facilities for the development of facilities 19 to support the preparation and distribution of New York focused 20 meals for regional school infrastructure, such as aggregation, stor- 21 age hubs and/or commissary-type kitchens (60SK2307) (11345) ........ 22 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,250,000) 23 For services and expenses related to projects for alterations, reha- 24 bilitation, and improvements at the New York federation of growers 25 and processors agribusiness child development centers (60AB2307) 26 (11326) ... 3,200,000 ............................. (re. $2,379,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 28 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 29 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 30 ters and humane societies. Use of the grant funds is restricted to 31 the costs of capital projects including, but not limited to, 32 construction, renovation, rehabilitation, installation, acquisition, 33 or expansion of buildings, equipment, or facilities necessary for 34 the secure containment, health, and adequate care of sheltered dogs 35 and cats. These grants shall be allocated by the commissioner on a 36 competitive basis until such funds are extinguished as follows: (a) 37 In municipalities with a population of less than two million, for 38 such pounds, shelters or humane societies that are operated by or 39 under contract for the provision of pound or shelter services with 40 one or more municipalities: projects serving an individual munici- 41 pality, grants in amounts not less than $50,000 and not more than 42 $200,000, not to exceed fifty percent of the total project cost; and 43 for projects serving two or more municipalities, grants in amounts 44 not less than $100,000 and not more than $500,000, not to exceed 45 seventy-five percent of the total project cost; (b) In munici- 46 palities with a population of more than two million, for such 47 pounds, shelters or humane societies that are operated by or under 48 contract for the provision of pound or shelter services with one or 49 more municipalities, grants in amounts not less than $100,000 and 50 not more than $500,000, not to exceed seventy-five percent of the 51 total project cost; and (c) not less than $500,000 for projects in 17 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 underserved municipalities or regions, for such pounds, shelters or 2 humane societies that are not operated by or under contract with one 3 or more municipalities for the provision of pound or shelter 4 services but that are registered with the department and can demon- 5 strate providing similar pound or shelter services, grants in 6 amounts not less than $50,000, and not more than $200,000, not to 7 exceed fifty percent of the total project cost. Up to five percent 8 of the total appropriation amount may be made available for the 9 services and expenses of the department in relation to these grants, 10 including personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, 11 and indirect costs. 12 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 13 ters, humane societies, and rescue facilities, excluding rescues 14 operating from a residence, awarded after April 1, 2024. Use of the 15 grant funds is restricted to the costs of capital projects includ- 16 ing, but not limited to, construction, renovation, rehabilitation, 17 installation, acquisition, or expansion of buildings, equipment, or 18 facilities necessary for the secure containment, health, and 19 adequate care of sheltered dogs and cats. These grants shall be 20 allocated by the commissioner on a competitive basis until such 21 funds are extinguished in an amount not less than $20,000 and not 22 more than $500,000, not to exceed ninety percent of the total 23 project cost. Not less than $500,000 for projects in underserved 24 municipalities or regions, for such pounds, shelters, humane socie- 25 ties, or rescue facilities, excluding rescues operating from a resi- 26 dence, that are not operated by or under contract with one or more 27 municipalities for the provision of pound or shelter services but 28 that are registered with the department and can demonstrate provid- 29 ing similar pound or shelter services. Up to five percent of the 30 total appropriation amount may be made available for the services 31 and expenses of the department in relation to these grants, includ- 32 ing personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, and 33 indirect costs (60AS2203) (11433) .................................. 34 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,017,000) 35 For additional grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit 36 pounds, shelters and humane societies. Use of the grant funds is 37 restricted to the costs of capital projects including, but not 38 limited to, construction, renovation, rehabilitation, installation, 39 acquisition, or expansion of buildings, equipment, or facilities 40 necessary for the secure containment, health, and adequate care of 41 sheltered dogs and cats. These grants shall be allocated by the 42 commissioner on a competitive basis until such funds are extin- 43 guished as follows: (a) In municipalities with a population of less 44 than two million, for such pounds, shelters or humane societies that 45 are operated by or under contract for the provision of pound or 46 shelter services with one or more municipalities: projects serving 47 an individual municipality, grants in amounts not less than $50,000 48 and not more than $200,000, not to exceed fifty percent of the total 49 project cost; and for projects serving two or more municipalities, 50 grants in amounts not less than $100,000 and not more than $500,000, 51 not to exceed seventy-five percent of the total project cost; (b) In 52 municipalities with a population of more than two million, for such 18 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 pounds, shelters or humane societies that are operated by or under 2 contract for the provision of pound or shelter services with one or 3 more municipalities, grants in amounts not less than $100,000 and 4 not more than $500,000, not to exceed seventy-five percent of the 5 total project cost; and (c) not less than $500,000 for projects in 6 underserved municipalities or regions, for such pounds, shelters or 7 humane societies that are not operated by or under contract with one 8 or more municipalities for the provision of pound or shelter 9 services but that are registered with the department and can demon- 10 strate providing similar pound or shelter services, grants in 11 amounts not less than $50,000, and not more than $200,000, not to 12 exceed fifty percent of the total project cost. Up to five percent 13 of the total appropriation amount may be made available for the 14 services and expenses of the department in relation to these grants, 15 including personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, 16 and indirect costs. 17 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 18 ters, humane societies, and rescue facilities, excluding rescues 19 operating from a residence, awarded after April 1, 2024. Use of the 20 grant funds is restricted to the costs of capital projects includ- 21 ing, but not limited to, construction, renovation, rehabilitation, 22 installation, acquisition, or expansion of buildings, equipment, or 23 facilities necessary for the secure containment, health, and 24 adequate care of sheltered dogs and cats. These grants shall be 25 allocated by the commissioner on a competitive basis until such 26 funds are extinguished in an amount not less than $20,000 and not 27 more than $500,000, not to exceed ninety percent of the total 28 project cost. Not less than $500,000 for projects in underserved 29 municipalities or regions, for such pounds, shelters, humane socie- 30 ties, or rescue facilities, excluding rescues operating from a resi- 31 dence, that are not operated by or under contract with one or more 32 municipalities for the provision of pound or shelter services but 33 that are registered with the department and can demonstrate provid- 34 ing similar pound or shelter services. Up to five percent of the 35 total appropriation amount may be made available for the services 36 and expenses of the department in relation to these grants, includ- 37 ing personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, and 38 indirect costs (60CA2203) (11339) .................................. 39 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 40 For services and expenses related to projects for alterations, reha- 41 bilitation, and improvements at the New York federation of growers 42 and processors agribusiness child development centers (60AB2207) 43 (11326) ... 3,200,000 ............................. (re. $1,932,000) 44 For payment to agricultural or horticultural corporations and county 45 extension service associations that are eligible to receive premium 46 reimbursement pursuant to section 286 of the agriculture and markets 47 law for: the costs of construction, renovation, alteration, rehabil- 48 itation, improvements, installation, acquisition, repair or replace- 49 ment of fairground buildings, equipment or permanent or temporary 50 facilities used to house or promote agriculture, excluding parking 51 facilities and signage; or for the costs of construction, reno- 52 vation, alteration, rehabilitation, improvements, installation, 19 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 acquisition, repair, or replacement of water systems, restrooms, 2 septic systems, and/or storm water management systems on fairgrounds 3 or in fairground buildings to be allocated by the commissioner in 4 amounts not to exceed $200,000 to such eligible agricultural and 5 horticultural corporations or county extension services on a noncom- 6 petitive basis until such funds are exhausted. Up to five percent of 7 the total appropriation amount may be made available for the 8 services and expenses of the department in relation to these grants, 9 including personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, 10 and indirect costs (60LF2203) (11340) .............................. 11 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 12 For services and expenses of GrowNYC related to the Bronx Food Hub. 13 All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo- 14 cated or transferred to any department, agency or public authority 15 (60GN2203) (11341) ... 4,000,000 .................... (re. $869,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 54, 17 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 18 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 19 ters and humane societies. Use of the grant funds is restricted to 20 the costs of capital projects including, but not limited to, 21 construction, renovation, rehabilitation, installation, acquisition, 22 or expansion of buildings, equipment, or facilities necessary for 23 the secure containment, health, and adequate care of sheltered dogs 24 and cats. These grants shall be allocated by the commissioner on a 25 competitive basis until such funds are extinguished as follows: (a) 26 In municipalities with a population of less than two million, for 27 such pounds, shelters or humane societies that are operated by or 28 under contract for the provision of pound or shelter services with 29 one or more municipalities: projects serving an individual munici- 30 pality, grants in amounts not less than $50,000 and not more than 31 $200,000, not to exceed fifty percent of the total project cost; and 32 for projects serving two or more municipalities, grants in amounts 33 not less than $100,000 and not more than $500,000, not to exceed 34 seventy-five percent of the total project cost; (b) In munici- 35 palities with a population of more than two million, for such 36 pounds, shelters or humane societies that are operated by or under 37 contract for the provision of pound or shelter services with one or 38 more municipalities, grants in amounts not less than $100,000 and 39 not more than $500,000, not to exceed seventy-five percent of the 40 total project cost; and (c) not less than $500,000 for projects in 41 underserved municipalities or regions, for such pounds, shelters or 42 humane societies that are not operated by or under contract with one 43 or more municipalities for the provision of pound or shelter 44 services but that are registered with the department and can demon- 45 strate providing similar pound or shelter services, grants in 46 amounts not less than $50,000, and not more than $200,000, not to 47 exceed fifty percent of the total project cost. Up to five percent 48 of the total appropriation amount may be made available for the 49 services and expenses of the department in relation to these grants, 50 including personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, 51 and indirect costs. 20 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 2 ters, humane societies, and rescue facilities, excluding rescues 3 operating from a residence, awarded after April 1, 2024. Use of the 4 grant funds is restricted to the costs of capital projects includ- 5 ing, but not limited to, construction, renovation, rehabilitation, 6 installation, acquisition, or expansion of buildings, equipment, or 7 facilities necessary for the secure containment, health, and 8 adequate care of sheltered dogs and cats. These grants shall be 9 allocated by the commissioner on a competitive basis until such 10 funds are extinguished in an amount not less than $20,000 and not 11 more than $500,000, not to exceed ninety percent of the total 12 project cost. Not less than $500,000 for projects in underserved 13 municipalities or regions, for such pounds, shelters, humane socie- 14 ties, or rescue facilities, excluding rescues operating from a resi- 15 dence, that are not operated by or under contract with one or more 16 municipalities for the provision of pound or shelter services but 17 that are registered with the department and can demonstrate provid- 18 ing similar pound or shelter services. Up to five percent of the 19 total appropriation amount may be made available for the services 20 and expenses of the department in relation to these grants, includ- 21 ing personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, and 22 indirect costs (60AS2103) (11433) .................................. 23 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,511,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 54, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For payment to agricultural or horticultural corporations and county 27 extension service associations that are eligible to receive premium 28 reimbursement pursuant to section 286 of the agriculture and markets 29 law for: the costs of construction, renovation, alteration, rehabil- 30 itation, improvements, installation, acquisition, repair or replace- 31 ment of fairground buildings, equipment or permanent or temporary 32 facilities used to house or promote agriculture, excluding parking 33 facilities and signage; or for the costs of construction, reno- 34 vation, alteration, rehabilitation, improvements, installation, 35 acquisition, repair or replacement of water systems, restrooms, 36 septic systems, and/or storm water management systems on fairgrounds 37 or in fairground buildings to be allocated by the commissioner in 38 amounts not to exceed $200,000 to such eligible agricultural and 39 horticultural corporations or county extension services on a noncom- 40 petitive basis until such funds are exhausted (60LF1907) (11414) ... 41 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,867,000) 42 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 43 ters and humane societies. Use of the grant funds is restricted to 44 the costs of capital projects including, but not limited to, 45 construction, renovation, rehabilitation, installation, acquisition, 46 or expansion of buildings, equipment, or facilities necessary for 47 the secure containment, health, and adequate care of sheltered dogs 48 and cats. These grants shall be allocated by the commissioner on a 49 competitive basis until such funds are extinguished as follows: (a) 50 In municipalities with a population of less than two million, for 51 such pounds, shelters or humane societies that are operated by or 21 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 under contract for the provision of pound or shelter services with 2 one or more municipalities: projects serving an individual munici- 3 pality, grants in amounts not less than $50,000 and not more than 4 $200,000, not to exceed fifty percent of the total project cost; and 5 for projects serving two or more municipalities, grants in amounts 6 not less than $100,000 and not more than $500,000, not to exceed 7 seventy-five percent of the total project cost; (b) In munici- 8 palities with a population of more than two million, for such 9 pounds, shelters or humane societies that are operated by or under 10 contract for the provision of pound or shelter services with one or 11 more municipalities, grants in amounts not less than $100,000 and 12 not more than $500,000, not to exceed seventy-five percent of the 13 total project cost; and (c) to the extent such funds have not been 14 extinguished, for projects in underserved municipalities or regions, 15 for such pounds, shelters or humane societies that are not operated 16 by or under contract with one or more municipalities for the 17 provision of pound or shelter services, grants in amounts not more 18 than $50,000, not to exceed fifty percent of the total project cost. 19 Up to five percent of the total appropriation amount may be made 20 available for the services and expenses of the department in 21 relation to these grants, including personal service, non-personal 22 service, fringe benefits, and indirect costs. 23 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 24 ters, humane societies, and rescue facilities, excluding rescues 25 operating from a residence, awarded after April 1, 2024. Use of the 26 grant funds is restricted to the costs of capital projects includ- 27 ing, but not limited to, construction, renovation, rehabilitation, 28 installation, acquisition, or expansion of buildings, equipment, or 29 facilities necessary for the secure containment, health, and 30 adequate care of sheltered dogs and cats. These grants shall be 31 allocated by the commissioner on a competitive basis until such 32 funds are extinguished in an amount not less than $20,000 and not 33 more than $500,000, not to exceed ninety percent of the total 34 project cost. Not less than $500,000 for projects in underserved 35 municipalities or regions, for such pounds, shelters, humane socie- 36 ties, or rescue facilities, excluding rescues operating from a resi- 37 dence, that are not operated by or under contract with one or more 38 municipalities for the provision of pound or shelter services but 39 that are registered with the department and can demonstrate provid- 40 ing similar pound or shelter services. Up to five percent of the 41 total appropriation amount may be made available for the services 42 and expenses of the department in relation to these grants, includ- 43 ing personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, and 44 indirect costs (60AS1907) (11433) .................................. 45 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,859,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 47 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 48 For payment to agricultural or horticultural corporations and county 49 extension service associations that are eligible to receive premium 50 reimbursement pursuant to section 286 of the agriculture and markets 51 law for: the costs of construction, renovation, alteration, rehabil- 22 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 itation, improvements, installation, acquisition, repair or replace- 2 ment of fairground buildings, equipment or permanent or temporary 3 facilities used to house or promote agriculture, excluding parking 4 facilities and signage; or for the costs of construction, reno- 5 vation, alteration, rehabilitation, improvements, installation, 6 acquisition, repair or replacement of water systems, restrooms, 7 septic systems, and/or storm water management systems on fairgrounds 8 or in fairground buildings to be allocated by the commissioner in 9 amounts not to exceed $200,000 to such eligible agricultural and 10 horticultural corporations or county extension services on a noncom- 11 petitive basis until such funds are exhausted (60LF1807) (11414) ... 12 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,587,000) 13 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 14 ters and humane societies. Use of the grant funds is restricted to 15 the costs of capital projects including, but not limited to, 16 construction, renovation, rehabilitation, installation, acquisition, 17 or expansion of buildings, equipment, or facilities necessary for 18 the secure containment, health, and adequate care of sheltered dogs 19 and cats. These grants shall be allocated by the commissioner on a 20 competitive basis until such funds are extinguished as follows: (a) 21 In municipalities with a population of less than two million, for 22 such pounds, shelters or humane societies that are operated by or 23 under contract for the provision of pound or shelter services with 24 one or more municipalities: projects serving an individual munici- 25 pality, grants in amounts not less than $50,000 and not more than 26 $200,000, not to exceed fifty percent of the total project cost; and 27 for projects serving two or more municipalities, grants in amounts 28 not less than $100,000 and not more than $500,000, not to exceed 29 seventy-five percent of the total project cost; (b) In munici- 30 palities with a population of more than two million, for such 31 pounds, shelters or humane societies that are operated by or under 32 contract for the provision of pound or shelter services with one or 33 more municipalities, grants in amounts not less than $100,000 and 34 not more than $500,000, not to exceed seventy-five percent of the 35 total project cost; and (c) to the extent such funds have not been 36 extinguished, for projects in underserved municipalities or regions, 37 for such pounds, shelters or humane societies that are not operated 38 by or under contract with one or more municipalities for the 39 provision of pound or shelter services, grants in amounts not more 40 than $50,000, not to exceed fifty percent of the total project cost. 41 Up to five percent of the total appropriation amount may be made 42 available for the services and expenses of the department in 43 relation to these grants, including personal service, non-personal 44 service, fringe benefits, and indirect costs. 45 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 46 ters, humane societies, and rescue facilities, excluding rescues 47 operating from a residence, awarded after April 1, 2024. Use of the 48 grant funds is restricted to the costs of capital projects includ- 49 ing, but not limited to, construction, renovation, rehabilitation, 50 installation, acquisition, or expansion of buildings, equipment, or 51 facilities necessary for the secure containment, health, and 52 adequate care of sheltered dogs and cats. These grants shall be 23 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 allocated by the commissioner on a competitive basis until such 2 funds are extinguished in an amount not less than $20,000 and not 3 more than $500,000, not to exceed ninety percent of the total 4 project cost. Not less than $500,000 for projects in underserved 5 municipalities or regions, for such pounds, shelters, humane socie- 6 ties, or rescue facilities, excluding rescues operating from a resi- 7 dence, that are not operated by or under contract with one or more 8 municipalities for the provision of pound or shelter services but 9 that are registered with the department and can demonstrate provid- 10 ing similar pound or shelter services. Up to five percent of the 11 total appropriation amount may be made available for the services 12 and expenses of the department in relation to these grants, includ- 13 ing personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, and 14 indirect costs (60AS1807) (11433) .................................. 15 5,000,000 ........................................... (re. $389,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 17 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 18 For payment to agricultural or horticultural corporations and county 19 extension service associations that are eligible to receive premium 20 reimbursement pursuant to section 286 of the agriculture and markets 21 law for the costs of construction, renovation, alteration, rehabili- 22 tation, improvements, installation, acquisition, repair or replace- 23 ment of fairground buildings, equipment or permanent or temporary 24 facilities used to house or promote agriculture, excluding parking 25 facilities and signage, to be allocated by the commissioner in 26 amounts not to exceed $200,000 to such eligible agricultural and 27 horticultural corporations or county extension services on a noncom- 28 petitive basis until such funds are exhausted (60LF1707) (11414) ... 29 5,000,000 ........................................... (re. $406,000) 30 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 31 ters and humane societies. Use of the grant funds is restricted to 32 the costs of capital projects including, but not limited to, 33 construction, renovation, rehabilitation, installation, acquisition, 34 or expansion of buildings, equipment, or facilities necessary for 35 the secure containment, health, and adequate care of sheltered dogs 36 and cats. These grants shall be allocated by the commissioner on a 37 competitive basis until such funds are extinguished as follows: (a) 38 In municipalities with a population of less than two million, for 39 such pounds, shelters or humane societies that are operated by or 40 under contract for the provision of pound or shelter services with 41 one or more municipalities: projects serving an individual munici- 42 pality, grants in amounts not less than $50,000 and not more than 43 $200,000, not to exceed fifty percent of the total project cost; and 44 for projects serving two or more municipalities, grants in amounts 45 not less than $100,000 and not more than $500,000, not to exceed 46 seventy-five percent of the total project cost; (b) In munici- 47 palities with a population of more than two million, for such 48 pounds, shelters or humane societies that are operated by or under 49 contract for the provision of pound or shelter services with one or 50 more municipalities, grants in amounts not less than $100,000 and 51 not more than $500,000, not to exceed seventy-five percent of the 24 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 total project cost; and (c) to the extent such funds have not been 2 extinguished, for projects in underserved municipalities or regions, 3 for such pounds, shelters or humane societies that are not operated 4 by or under contract with one or more municipalities for the 5 provision of pound or shelter services, grants in amounts not more 6 than $50,000, not to exceed fifty percent of the total project cost. 7 Up to five percent of the total appropriation amount may be made 8 available for the services and expenses of the Department in 9 relation to these grants, including personal service, non-personal 10 service, fringe benefits, and indirect costs. 11 For grants to municipal and incorporated not-for-profit pounds, shel- 12 ters, humane societies, and rescue facilities, excluding rescues 13 operating from a residence, awarded after April 1, 2024. Use of the 14 grant funds is restricted to the costs of capital projects includ- 15 ing, but not limited to, construction, renovation, rehabilitation, 16 installation, acquisition, or expansion of buildings, equipment, or 17 facilities necessary for the secure containment, health, and 18 adequate care of sheltered dogs and cats. These grants shall be 19 allocated by the commissioner on a competitive basis until such 20 funds are extinguished in an amount not less than $20,000 and not 21 more than $500,000, not to exceed ninety percent of the total 22 project cost. Not less than $500,000 for projects in underserved 23 municipalities or regions, for such pounds, shelters, humane socie- 24 ties, or rescue facilities, excluding rescues operating from a resi- 25 dence, that are not operated by or under contract with one or more 26 municipalities for the provision of pound or shelter services but 27 that are registered with the department and can demonstrate provid- 28 ing similar pound or shelter services. Up to five percent of the 29 total appropriation amount may be made available for the services 30 and expenses of the department in relation to these grants, includ- 31 ing personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, and 32 indirect costs (60AS1707) (11433) .................................. 33 5,000,000 ........................................... (re. $221,000) 34 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 35 For payment to agricultural or horticultural corporations and county 36 extension service associations that are eligible to receive premium 37 reimbursement pursuant to section 286 of the agriculture and markets 38 law for the costs of construction, renovation, alteration, rehabili- 39 tation, improvements, installation, acquisition, repair or replace- 40 ment of fairground buildings, equipment or permanent or temporary 41 facilities used to house or promote agriculture, excluding parking 42 facilities and signage, to be allocated by the commissioner in 43 amounts not to exceed $200,000 to such eligible agricultural and 44 horticultural corporations or county extension services on a noncom- 45 petitive basis until such funds are exhausted (60LF1607) (11414) ... 46 5,000,000 ........................................... (re. $100,000) 47 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 53, 48 section 3, of the laws of 2006: 49 For services and expenses related to the Fredonia Vineyard Laboratory 50 (60030607) (11491) ... 2,000,000 ..................... (re. $28,000) 25 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 5 For services and expenses of Cornell University College of Agriculture 6 and Life Sciences climate adaptive research farms for applied 7 infrastructure and demonstration projects (60CR2203) (11342) ....... 8 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,450,000) 9 For the New York State meat processing expansion grant program, to 10 provide grants of at least $50,000 to be used for the expansion of 11 existing plants, creation of new plants, job training, safety 12 upgrades, or other purposes deemed necessary to further opportu- 13 nities for beef, pork and other meat farmers to process their meat 14 within the state. Up to five percent of the total appropriation 15 amount may be made available for the services and expenses of the 16 department in relation to these grants, including personal service, 17 nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, and indirect costs (60MP2207) 18 (11343) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $2,336,000) 19 NEW YORK WORKS (CCP) 20 Capital Projects Funds - Other 21 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 22 Administrative Services Purpose 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 24 For the purchase and replacement of vehicles and equipment (60VS25AS) 25 (11420) ... 600,000 ................................. (re. $600,000) 26 For services and expenses related to the purchase or replacement of 27 laboratory equipment (60ES25AS) (11421) ............................ 28 115,000 ............................................. (re. $115,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 30 For the purchase and replacement of vehicles and equipment (60VS24AS) 31 (11420) ... 600,000 ................................. (re. $600,000) 32 For services and expenses related to the purchase or replacement of 33 laboratory equipment (60ES24AS) (11421) ............................ 34 115,000 ............................................. (re. $115,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 36 For the purchase and replacement of vehicles and equipment (60VS23AS) 37 (11420) ... 600,000 ................................. (re. $565,000) 38 For services and expenses related to the purchase or replacement of 39 laboratory equipment (60ES23AS) (11421) ............................ 40 115,000 ............................................. (re. $115,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 42 For the purchase and replacement of vehicles and equipment (60VS22AS) 43 (11420) ... 600,000 ................................. (re. $600,000) 26 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses related to the purchase or replacement of 2 laboratory equipment (60ES22AS) (11421) ............................ 3 115,000 .............................................. (re. $82,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 5 For the purchase and replacement of vehicles and equipment (60VS21AS) 6 (11420) ... 600,000 ................................... (re. $7,000) 7 For services and expenses related to the purchase or replacement of 8 laboratory equipment (60ES21AS) (11421) ............................ 9 115,000 ............................................. (re. $115,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 11 For the purchase and replacement of vehicles and equipment (60VS20AS) 12 (11420) ... 600,000 ................................... (re. $3,000) 13 For services and expenses related to the purchase or replacement of 14 laboratory equipment (60ES20AS) (11421) ............................ 15 115,000 .............................................. (re. $62,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 17 For the purchase and replacement of vehicles and equipment (60VS19AS) 18 (11420) ... 600,000 ................................... (re. $1,000) 19 For services and expenses related to the purchase or replacement of 20 laboratory equipment (60ES19AS) (11421) ... 115,000 ... (re. $5,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 22 For the purchase and replacement of vehicles and equipment (60VS18AS) 23 (11420) ... 600,000 ................................... (re. $1,000) 24 Capital Projects Funds - Other 25 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 26 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 28 For services and expenses related to New York Works Infrastructure 29 projects for alterations, rehabilitation, improvements, and land 30 acquisition at the state fair, including personal service and the 31 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025. All or a 32 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 33 transferred to any department, agency or public authority (60NY2503) 34 (10300) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $4,979,000) 35 For services and expenses of state fair projects, including but not 36 limited to: projects at the Suburban Park, Chevy Court, and Expo 37 Center facilities, personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe 38 benefits and indirect costs, such projects may include but shall not 39 be limited to alterations, rehabilitation, improvements, preventive 40 maintenance, replacement, refurbishment, and construction including 41 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 42 (60SF2503) (11422) ... 44,000,000 ................ (re. $44,000,000) 43 For the New York State meat processing expansion grant program, to 44 provide grants of at least $50,000 to be used for the expansion of 45 existing plants, creation of new plants, job training, safety 46 upgrades, or other purposes deemed necessary to further opportu- 27 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 nities for beef, pork and other meat farmers to process their meat 2 within the state. Up to five percent of the total appropriation 3 amount may be made available for the services and expenses of the 4 department in relation to these grants, including personal service, 5 nonpersonal service, fringe benefits, and indirect costs (60MP2507) 6 (11343) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,000,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 8 For services and expenses related to New York Works Infrastructure 9 projects for alterations, rehabilitation, improvements, and land 10 acquisition at the state fair, including personal service and the 11 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024. All or a 12 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 13 transferred to any department, agency or public authority (60NY2403) 14 (10300) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,762,000) 15 For services and expenses of state fair projects, such costs may 16 include but shall not be limited to personal services, nonpersonal 17 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs, such projects may 18 include but shall not be limited to alterations, rehabilitation, 19 improvements, preventive maintenance, replacement, refurbishment, 20 and construction including the payment of liabilities incurred prior 21 to April 1, 2024 (60SF2403) (11422) ................................ 22 9,000,000 ......................................... (re. $8,968,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 24 For services and expenses related to New York Works Infrastructure 25 projects for alterations, rehabilitation, improvements, and land 26 acquisition at the state fair, including personal service and the 27 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023. All or a 28 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 29 transferred to any department, agency or public authority (60NY2303) 30 (10300) ... 5,000,000 ................................ (re. $66,000) 31 For services and expenses of state fair projects, such costs may 32 include but shall not be limited to personal services, nonpersonal 33 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs, such projects may 34 include but shall not be limited to alterations, rehabilitation, 35 improvements, preventive maintenance, replacement, refurbishment, 36 and construction including the payment of liabilities incurred prior 37 to April 1, 2023 (60SF2303) (11422) ................................ 38 9,000,000 ......................................... (re. $8,881,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 40 For services and expenses related to New York Works Infrastructure 41 projects for alterations, rehabilitation, improvements, and land 42 acquisition at the state fair, including personal service and the 43 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022. All or a 44 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 45 transferred to any department, agency or public authority (60NY2203) 46 (10300) ... 5,000,000 ............................... (re. $139,000) 47 For services and expenses of state fair projects, such costs may 48 include but shall not be limited to personal services, nonpersonal 49 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs, such projects may 28 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 include but shall not be limited to alterations, rehabilitation, 2 improvements, preventive maintenance, replacement, refurbishment, 3 construction and energy conservation of various facilities, includ- 4 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 5 (60SF2203) (11422) ... 28,000,000 ................ (re. $16,672,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 54, 7 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 8 For services and expenses related to New York Works Infrastructure 9 projects for alterations, rehabilitation, improvements, and land 10 acquisition at the state fair, including personal service and the 11 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021. All or a 12 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 13 transferred to any department, agency or public authority (60NY2103) 14 (10300) ... 5,007,000 ............................... (re. $167,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 16 For services and expenses related to New York Works Infrastructure 17 projects for alterations, rehabilitation, improvements, and land 18 acquisition at the state fair, including personal service and the 19 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020. All or a 20 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 21 transferred to any department, agency or public authority (60NY2003) 22 (10300) ... 15,000,000 ............................ (re. $9,722,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 24 For services and expenses related to New York Works Infrastructure 25 projects for alterations, rehabilitation, improvements, and land 26 acquisition at the state fair, including personal service and the 27 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019. All or a 28 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 29 transferred to any department, agency or public authority (60NY1903) 30 (10300) ... 5,000,000 ................................. (re. $2,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 32 For services and expenses related to New York Works Infrastructure 33 projects for alterations, rehabilitation and improvements to modern- 34 ize the state fair, including personal service and the payment of 35 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017. All or a portion of the 36 funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 37 department, agency or public authority (60SF1703) (11422) .......... 38 50,000,000 .......................................... (re. $212,000) 39 STATE FAIR (CCP) 40 Capital Projects Fund - Other 41 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 42 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 44 For payment of the costs including personal services, nonpersonal 45 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs, of alterations, reha- 29 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 bilitation and improvements including preventive maintenance, 2 replacement, refurbishment and energy conservation of various facil- 3 ities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 4 1, 2025 (60MN2503) (11493) ... 1,700,000 ............ (re. $883,000) 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other 6 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 7 State Fair Capital Improvement Account - 32208 8 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 10 For payment of the costs including personal services, nonpersonal 11 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs, of alterations, reha- 12 bilitation and improvements including preventive maintenance, 13 replacement, refurbishment and energy conservation of various facil- 14 ities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 15 1, 2025(60RI2503) (11493) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $2,000,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 17 For payment of the costs including personal services, nonpersonal 18 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs, of alterations, reha- 19 bilitation and improvements including preventive maintenance, 20 replacement, refurbishment and energy conservation of various facil- 21 ities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 22 1, 2024 (60RI2403) (11493) ... 2,000,000 .......... (re. $2,000,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 24 For payment of the costs including personal services, nonpersonal 25 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs, of alterations, reha- 26 bilitation and improvements including preventive maintenance, 27 replacement, refurbishment and energy conservation of various facil- 28 ities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 29 1, 2023 (60RI2303) (11493) ... 2,000,000 .......... (re. $2,000,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 31 For payment of the costs including personal services, nonpersonal 32 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs, of alterations, reha- 33 bilitation and improvements including preventive maintenance, 34 replacement, refurbishment and energy conservation of various facil- 35 ities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 36 1, 2022 (60RI2203) (11493) ... 2,000,000 .......... (re. $1,421,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 38 For payment of the costs including personal services, nonpersonal 39 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs, of alterations, reha- 40 bilitation and improvements including preventive maintenance, 41 replacement, refurbishment and energy conservation of various facil- 42 ities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 43 1, 2021 (60RI2103) (11493) ... 2,000,000 .......... (re. $2,000,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 30 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of the costs including personal services, nonpersonal 2 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs, of alterations, reha- 3 bilitation and improvements including preventive maintenance, 4 replacement, refurbishment and energy conservation of various facil- 5 ities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 6 1, 2020 (60RI2003) (11493) ... 2,000,000 .......... (re. $2,000,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 8 For payment of the costs including personal services, nonpersonal 9 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs, of alterations, reha- 10 bilitation and improvements including preventive maintenance, 11 replacement, refurbishment and energy conservation of various facil- 12 ities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 13 1, 2019 (60RI1903) (11493) ... 2,000,000 .......... (re. $2,000,000) 31 12654-09-6 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 17,000,000 0 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 17,000,000 0 8 ================ ================ 9 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM (CCP) ........................ 17,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 13 Cannabis IT Subfund 14 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 acquisition and development of technology, 17 including but not limited to equipment, 18 software and services ....................... 17,000,000 32 12654-09-6 COUNCIL ON THE ARTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 9,283,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 0 9,283,000 8 ================ ================ 9 REGIONAL ARTS AND CULTURAL COUNCILS PROGRAM 10 Capital Projects Fund - Other 11 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 12 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 14 For construction and rehabilitation projects for Regional Arts and 15 Cultural Councils outside of New York City (61RA2208) (12125) ...... 16 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,283,000) 33 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AUDIT AND CONTROL CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 14,200,000 22,223,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 14,200,000 22,223,000 8 ================ ================ 9 IT INITIATIVE PROGRAM (CCP) ................................. 14,200,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 redesign and expansion of Rensselaer Tech- 16 nology Park Data Center (OS012603) ........... 2,200,000 17 For services and expenses related to the 18 acquisition and development of technology, 19 including but not limited to equipment, 20 software and services (OS012608) (51919) .... 12,000,000 34 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF AUDIT AND CONTROL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 IT INITIATIVE PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 6 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 7 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 8 services (OS012308) (51919) ... 2,836,000 ......... (re. $2,836,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 10 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 11 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 12 services (OS012208) (51919) ... 30,112,000 ....... (re. $16,647,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 14 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 15 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 16 services (OS012008) (51919) ... 10,100,000 ........ (re. $2,740,000) 35 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 650,190,000 4,499,174,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 650,190,000 4,499,174,000 8 ================ ================ 9 GENERAL MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS (CCP) ................. 514,222,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 14 For services and expenses related to alter- 15 ations and improvements to existing facil- 16 ities for capital maintenance, including 17 but not limited to capital design, 18 construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 19 tation, and equipment; for in-kind 20 replacement of buildings and facilities 21 upon demonstration, through multi-factor 22 benefit-cost analysis of capital costs and 23 life-cycle operating costs comparing 24 existing facility, renovated facility, and 25 new construction, that replacement is more 26 cost-effective and energy-efficient than 27 full renovation and does not exceed exist- 28 ing square footage except incidentally 29 where necessary to provide accessibility, 30 mechanical efficiency, or required acces- 31 sory and minor support structures; for 32 health and safety, enhancement to campus 33 security and security infrastructure, 34 preservation of facilities, program 35 improvement or program change, environ- 36 mental protection, energy conservation, 37 accreditation, facilities for the phys- 38 ically disabled, preventative maintenance 39 and related projects, including costs 40 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 and 41 subject to a plan developed and submitted 42 annually by the city university of New 43 York and approved by the director of the 44 budget, and which may include, but not be 45 limited to, projects in the following 36 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to 2 the contrary, all or a portion of the 3 amounts hereby appropriated may be subal- 4 located or transferred to the dormitory 5 authority of the state of New York for 6 such purpose (30032603) (15420) ............ 314,222,000 7 Project Schedule 8 PROJECT AMOUNT 9 ---------------------------------------------------------- 10 (thousands of dollars) 11 Baruch College 12 Campus-wide maintenance to 13 various facilities ............................. 3,736 14 Brooklyn College 15 Campus-wide maintenance to 16 various facilities ............................. 8,444 17 City College 18 Campus-wide maintenance to 19 various facilities ............................. 7,008 20 CUNY School of Medicine 21 Campus-wide maintenance to 22 various facilities ............................... 416 23 Graduate School and University Center 24 Campus-wide maintenance to 25 various facilities ............................... 984 26 Honors college 27 Campus-wide maintenance to 28 various facilities ................................ 98 29 Hunter College 30 Campus-wide maintenance to 31 various facilities ............................. 6,999 32 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 33 Campus-wide maintenance to 34 various facilities ............................. 1,502 35 Lehman College 36 Campus-wide maintenance to 37 various facilities ............................. 4,197 38 Medgar Evers College 39 Campus-wide maintenance to 40 various facilities ............................. 1,606 41 New York City College of Technology 42 Campus-wide maintenance to 43 various facilities ............................. 2,072 44 Queens College 45 Campus-wide maintenance to 46 various facilities ............................. 6,772 47 College of Staten Island 48 Campus-wide maintenance to 37 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 various facilities ............................. 5,657 2 York College 3 Campus-wide maintenance to 4 various facilities ............................. 2,321 5 For university-wide maintenance or 6 capital improvement costs at senior 7 colleges attributable to the findings of 8 condition surveys for health and safety 9 needs ........................................... 10,193 10 For university-wide maintenance or 11 capital improvement costs at senior 12 colleges attributable to the findings of 13 condition surveys for preservation of 14 facilities needs ................................ 13,704 15 For university-wide maintenance or 16 capital improvement costs at senior 17 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 6,796 18 For university-wide maintenance or 19 capital improvement costs at senior 20 colleges attributable to mechanical and 21 infrastructure needs ............................. 7,928 22 For university-wide maintenance or 23 capital improvement costs at senior 24 colleges attributable to science and 25 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,550 26 For university-wide maintenance or 27 capital improvement costs at senior 28 colleges attributable to certificate of 29 occupancy/public assembly needs .................. 2,265 30 For university-wide maintenance or 31 capital improvement costs at senior 32 colleges attributable to energy 33 conservation needs ............................... 4,531 34 For university-wide maintenance or 35 capital improvement costs at senior 36 colleges attributable to science lab 37 upgrade needs .................................... 2,265 38 For university-wide maintenance or 39 capital improvement costs at senior 40 colleges attributable to educational 41 technology initiative needs ...................... 7,362 42 For university-wide maintenance or 43 capital improvement costs at senior 44 colleges attributable to bathroom 45 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,134 46 For university-wide maintenance or 47 capital improvement costs at senior 48 colleges attributable to CUNY TV 49 renovation needs ................................... 332 50 For university-wide priority capital 38 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 maintenance or capital improvement 2 projects to support the preservation 3 of facilities .................................. 200,350 4 -------------- 5 Total ........................................ 314,222 6 ============== 7 For additional services and expenses related 8 to alterations and improvements to exist- 9 ing facilities for capital maintenance, 10 including but not limited to capital 11 design, construction, reconstruction, 12 rehabilitation, and equipment; for in-kind 13 replacement of buildings and facilities 14 upon demonstration, through multi-factor 15 benefit-cost analysis of capital costs and 16 life-cycle operating costs comparing 17 existing facility, renovated facility, and 18 new construction, that replacement is more 19 cost-effective and energy-efficient than 20 full renovation and does not exceed exist- 21 ing square footage except incidentally 22 where necessary to provide accessibility, 23 mechanical efficiency, or required acces- 24 sory and minor support structures; for 25 health and safety, enhancement to campus 26 security and security infrastructure, 27 preservation of facilities, program 28 improvement or program change, environ- 29 mental protection, energy conservation, 30 accreditation, facilities for the phys- 31 ically disabled, preventative maintenance 32 and related projects, including costs 33 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 and 34 subject to a plan developed and submitted 35 annually by the city university of New 36 York and approved by the director of the 37 budget. Notwithstanding any other law to 38 the contrary, all or a portion of the 39 amounts hereby appropriated may be subal- 40 located or transferred to the dormitory 41 authority of the state of New York for 42 such purpose (30A22608) (40802) ............ 200,000,000 43 PROJECT ADMINISTRATION (CCP) ................................ 49,581,000 44 -------------- 45 Capital Projects Funds - Other 46 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 47 Administration Purpose 39 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For payment to the dormitory authority of 2 the state of New York, for services and 3 expenses of the authority related to 4 construction activities administered by 5 the authority for the state share of capi- 6 tal projects of the city university of New 7 York which are appropriated by the state 8 and otherwise authorized by law (30DA2650) 9 (15528) ..................................... 30,649,000 10 For payment to the city university 11 construction fund, for services and 12 expenses of the city university 13 construction fund related to construction 14 activities administered by the city 15 university construction fund for the state 16 share of capital projects of the city 17 university of New York which are appropri- 18 ated by the state and otherwise authorized 19 by law (30CF2650) (40800) ................... 18,932,000 40 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, 2 purposes and projects as herein specified 3 in accordance with the following: 4 GENERAL MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS (CCP) .................. 86,387,000 5 -------------- 6 Capital Projects Funds - Other 7 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 8 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 9 For services and expenses for the state 10 share of financial assistance to community 11 colleges for alterations and improvements 12 to various facilities, including services 13 and expenses, capital design, 14 construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 15 tation and equipment; for health and safe- 16 ty, preservation of facilities, new facil- 17 ities, program improvement or program 18 change, environmental protection, energy 19 conservation, accreditation, facilities 20 for the physically disabled, and related 21 projects, including costs incurred prior 22 to April 1, 2026 subject to an annual plan 23 developed by the city university and 24 approved by the state director of the 25 budget. Notwithstanding any other law to 26 the contrary, all or a portion of the 27 amounts hereby appropriated may be subal- 28 located or transferred to the dormitory 29 authority of the state of New York for 30 such purpose (30CC2603) (81067) ............. 57,314,000 31 For additional services and expenses for the 32 state share of financial assistance to 33 community colleges for alterations and 34 improvements to various facilities, 35 including services and expenses, capital 36 design, construction, reconstruction, 37 rehabilitation and equipment; for health 38 and safety, preservation of facilities, 39 new facilities, program improvement or 40 program change, environmental protection, 41 energy conservation, accreditation, facil- 42 ities for the physically disabled, and 43 related projects, including costs incurred 44 prior to April 1, 2026 subject to an annu- 45 al plan developed by the city university 46 of New York and approved by the state 47 director of the budget. Notwithstanding 41 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 any other law to the contrary, all or a 2 portion of the amounts hereby appropriated 3 may be suballocated or transferred to the 4 dormitory authority of the state of New 5 York for such purpose (30C22603) ............ 29,073,000 42 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 GENERAL MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Administration Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 8 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 9 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 10 tation, and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facil- 11 ities, program improvement or program change, environmental 12 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 13 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 14 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2017 and subject to a 15 plan developed and submitted annually by the city university of New 16 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 17 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. 18 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 19 the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred 20 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 21 (30031750) (15420) ... 224,222,000 ............... (re. $33,596,000) 22 Project Schedule 23 PROJECT AMOUNT 24 ---------------------------------------------------------- 25 (thousands of dollars) 26 Baruch College 27 Campus-wide maintenance to 28 various facilities ............................. 2,511 29 Brooklyn College 30 Campus-wide maintenance to 31 various facilities ............................. 5,433 32 City College 33 Campus-wide maintenance to 34 various facilities ............................. 8,136 35 Graduate School and University Center 36 Campus-wide maintenance to 37 various facilities ................................ 25 38 Honors college 39 Campus-wide maintenance to 40 various facilities ................................ 25 41 Hunter College 42 Campus-wide maintenance to 43 various facilities ............................. 5,799 44 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 45 Campus-wide maintenance to 46 various facilities ............................. 3,193 47 Lehman College 43 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance to 2 various facilities ............................. 2,438 3 Medgar Evers College 4 Campus-wide maintenance to 5 various facilities ............................. 3,096 6 New York City College of Technology 7 Campus-wide maintenance to 8 various facilities ............................. 3,485 9 Queens College 10 Campus-wide maintenance to 11 various facilities ............................. 5,433 12 College of Staten Island 13 Campus-wide maintenance to 14 various facilities ............................. 2,877 15 York College 16 Campus-wide maintenance to 17 various facilities ............................. 3,899 18 For university-wide maintenance or 19 capital improvement costs at senior 20 colleges attributable to the findings of 21 condition surveys for health and safety 22 needs ............................................ 9,270 23 For university-wide maintenance or 24 capital improvement costs at senior 25 colleges attributable to the findings of 26 condition surveys for preservation of 27 facilities needs ................................ 12,463 28 For university-wide maintenance or 29 capital improvement costs at senior 30 colleges attributable to mechanical and 31 infrastructure needs ............................. 7,210 32 For university-wide maintenance or 33 capital improvement costs at senior 34 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 6,180 35 For university-wide maintenance or 36 capital improvement costs at senior 37 colleges attributable to certificate of 38 occupancy/public assembly needs .................. 2,060 39 For university-wide maintenance or 40 capital improvement costs at senior 41 colleges attributable to energy 42 conservation needs ............................... 4,120 43 For university-wide maintenance or 44 capital improvement costs at senior 45 colleges attributable to science lab 46 upgrade needs .................................... 2,060 47 For university-wide maintenance or 48 capital improvement costs at senior 49 colleges attributable to bathroom 44 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,030 2 For university-wide maintenance or 3 capital improvement costs at senior 4 colleges attributable to educational 5 technology initiative needs ...................... 6,695 6 For university-wide maintenance or 7 capital improvement costs at senior 8 colleges attributable to science and 9 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,047 10 For university-wide maintenance or 11 capital improvement costs at senior 12 colleges attributable to CUNY TV 13 renovation needs ................................... 515 14 For university-wide priority capital 15 maintenance or capital improvement 16 projects to support the preservation 17 of facilities .................................. 121,222 18 -------------- 19 Total ........................................ 224,222 20 ============== 21 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 22 various facilities including but not limited to capital design, 23 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 24 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 25 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 26 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 27 maintenance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 28 April 1, 2017 and subject to a plan developed and submitted annually 29 by the city university of New York and approved by the director of 30 the budget, and which may include, but not be limited to, projects 31 in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to the 32 contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be 33 suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state 34 of New York for such purpose (30051750) (40804) .................... 35 60,000,000 ....................................... (re. $19,123,000) 36 Project Schedule 37 PROJECT AMOUNT 38 ---------------------------------------------------------- 39 (thousands of dollars) 40 Baruch College 41 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,260 42 Brooklyn College 43 Campus-wide projects ............................. 8,460 44 City College 45 Campus-wide projects ............................ 15,120 46 Graduate School and University Center 47 Campus-wide projects ................................ 60 48 Honors college 45 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide projects ................................ 60 2 Hunter College 3 Campus-wide projects ............................. 9,360 4 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 5 Campus-wide projects ............................. 2,940 6 Lehman College 7 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,080 8 Medgar Evers College 9 Campus-wide projects ............................. 2,700 10 New York City College of Technology 11 Campus-wide projects ............................. 3,660 12 Queens College 13 Campus-wide projects ............................. 8,460 14 College of Staten Island 15 Campus-wide projects ............................. 2,160 16 York College 17 Campus-wide projects ............................. 4,680 18 -------------- 19 Total ......................................... 60,000 20 ============== 21 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 22 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 23 For additional services and expenses related to alterations and 24 improvements to existing facilities for capital maintenance, includ- 25 ing but not limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, 26 rehabilitation, and equipment; for health and safety, preservation 27 of facilities, program improvement or program change, environmental 28 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 29 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 30 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2016 and subject to a 31 plan developed and submitted annually by the city university of New 32 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 33 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. 34 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 35 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 36 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 37 (30041650) (40802) ... 40,000,000 ................ (re. $40,000,000) 38 Project Schedule 39 PROJECT AMOUNT 40 ---------------------------------------------------------- 41 (thousands of dollars) 42 Baruch College 43 Campus-wide maintenance to 44 various facilities ............................... 378 45 Brooklyn College 46 Campus-wide maintenance to 47 various facilities ............................. 2,538 48 City College 46 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance to 2 various facilities ............................. 4,536 3 Graduate School and University Center 4 Campus-wide maintenance to 5 various facilities ................................ 18 6 Honors college 7 Campus-wide maintenance to 8 various facilities ................................ 18 9 Hunter College 10 Campus-wide maintenance to 11 various facilities ............................. 2,808 12 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 13 Campus-wide maintenance to 14 various facilities ............................... 882 15 Lehman College 16 Campus-wide maintenance to 17 various facilities ............................... 324 18 Medgar Evers College 19 Campus-wide maintenance to 20 various facilities ............................... 810 21 New York City College of Technology 22 Campus-wide maintenance to 23 various facilities ............................. 1,098 24 Queens College 25 Campus-wide maintenance to 26 various facilities ............................. 2,538 27 College of Staten Island 28 Campus-wide maintenance to 29 various facilities ............................... 648 30 York College 31 Campus-wide maintenance to 32 various facilities ............................. 1,404 33 For university-wide maintenance or 34 capital improvement costs at senior 35 colleges attributable to the findings of 36 condition surveys for health and safety 37 needs ............................................ 3,600 38 For university-wide maintenance or 39 capital improvement costs at senior 40 colleges attributable to the findings of 41 condition surveys for preservation of 42 facilities needs ................................. 4,840 43 For university-wide maintenance or 44 capital improvement costs at senior 45 colleges attributable to mechanical and 46 infrastructure needs ............................. 2,800 47 For university-wide maintenance or 48 capital improvement costs at senior 49 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 2,400 50 For university-wide maintenance or 47 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 capital improvement costs at senior 2 colleges attributable to certificate of 3 occupancy/public assembly needs .................... 800 4 For university-wide maintenance or 5 capital improvement costs at senior 6 colleges attributable to energy 7 conservation needs ............................... 1,600 8 For university-wide maintenance or 9 capital improvement costs at senior 10 colleges attributable to science lab 11 upgrade needs ...................................... 800 12 For university-wide maintenance or 13 capital improvement costs at senior 14 colleges attributable to bathroom 15 facilities upgrade needs ........................... 400 16 For university-wide maintenance or 17 capital improvement costs at senior 18 colleges attributable to educational 19 technology initiative needs ...................... 2,600 20 For university-wide maintenance or 21 capital improvement costs at senior 22 colleges attributable to science and 23 technology equipment needs ....................... 1,960 24 For university-wide maintenance or 25 capital improvement costs at senior 26 colleges attributable to CUNY TV 27 renovation needs ................................... 200 28 -------------- 29 Total ......................................... 40,000 30 ============== 31 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 32 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 33 For additional services and expenses related to alterations and 34 improvements to various facilities for capital projects, including 35 but not limited to capital design, construction, acquisition, recon- 36 struction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for health and safety, 37 preservation of facilities, program improvement or program change, 38 environmental protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facil- 39 ities for the physically disabled, preventative maintenance and 40 related projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2016 41 and subject to a plan developed and submitted by the city university 42 of New York board of trustees and approved by the director of the 43 budget. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a 44 portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or 45 transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 46 such purpose (30051650) (40803) ... 20,000,000 .... (re. $4,539,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 48 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 48 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 2 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 3 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 4 tation, and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facil- 5 ities, program improvement or program change, environmental 6 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 7 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 8 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2015 and subject to a 9 plan developed and submitted annually by the city university of New 10 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 11 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. 12 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 13 the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred 14 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 15 (30031550) (15420) ... 103,000,000 ................ (re. $5,906,000) 16 Project Schedule 17 PROJECT AMOUNT 18 ---------------------------------------------------------- 19 (thousands of dollars) 20 Baruch College 21 Campus-wide maintenance to 22 various facilities ............................. 4,635 23 Brooklyn College 24 Campus-wide maintenance to 25 various facilities ............................. 3,811 26 City College 27 Campus-wide maintenance to 28 various facilities ............................. 5,665 29 Graduate School and University Center 30 Campus-wide maintenance to 31 various facilities ............................. 1,030 32 Honors college 33 Campus-wide maintenance to 34 various facilities ............................... 412 35 Hunter College 36 Campus-wide maintenance to 37 various facilities ............................. 3,914 38 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 39 Campus-wide maintenance to 40 various facilities ............................. 2,163 41 Lehman College 42 Campus-wide maintenance to 43 various facilities ............................. 3,811 44 Medgar Evers College 45 Campus-wide maintenance to 46 various facilities ............................. 3,811 47 New York City College of Technology 48 Campus-wide maintenance to 49 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 various facilities ............................. 3,811 2 Queens College 3 Campus-wide maintenance to 4 various facilities ............................. 5,665 5 College of Staten Island 6 Campus-wide maintenance to 7 various facilities ............................. 3,811 8 York College 9 Campus-wide maintenance to 10 various facilities ............................. 3,811 11 For university-wide maintenance or 12 capital improvement costs at senior 13 colleges attributable to the findings of 14 condition surveys for health and safety 15 needs ............................................ 8,755 16 For university-wide maintenance or 17 capital improvement costs at senior 18 colleges attributable to the findings of 19 condition surveys for preservation of 20 facilities needs ................................ 10,815 21 For university-wide maintenance or 22 capital improvement costs at senior 23 colleges attributable to mechanical and 24 infrastructure needs ............................. 6,695 25 For university-wide maintenance or 26 capital improvement costs at senior 27 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 5,150 28 For university-wide maintenance or 29 capital improvement costs at senior 30 colleges attributable to certificate of 31 occupancy/public assembly needs .................. 2,060 32 For university-wide maintenance or 33 capital improvement costs at senior 34 colleges attributable to energy 35 conservation needs ............................... 4,120 36 For university-wide maintenance or 37 capital improvement costs at senior 38 colleges attributable to science lab 39 upgrade needs .................................... 2,060 40 For university-wide maintenance or 41 capital improvement costs at senior 42 colleges attributable to bathroom 43 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,030 44 For university-wide maintenance or 45 capital improvement costs at senior 46 colleges attributable to asbestos 47 abatement needs .................................. 1,030 48 For university-wide maintenance or 49 capital improvement costs at senior 50 colleges attributable to educational 50 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 technology initiative needs ...................... 6,695 2 For university-wide maintenance or 3 capital improvement costs at senior 4 colleges attributable to science and 5 technology equipment needs ....................... 7,210 6 For university-wide maintenance or 7 capital improvement costs at senior 8 colleges attributable CUNY TV 9 renovation needs ................................. 1,030 10 -------------- 11 Total ........................................ 103,000 12 ============== 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 14 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 15 Advances for alterations and improvements to existing facilities for 16 capital critical maintenance, including but not limited to capital 17 design, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; 18 for health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improve- 19 ment or program change, environmental protection, energy conserva- 20 tion, accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preven- 21 tative maintenance and related projects, including costs incurred 22 prior to April 1, 2014, and subject to a plan developed and submit- 23 ted annually by the city university of New York and approved by the 24 director of the budget, and which may include, but not be limited 25 to, projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any other 26 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 27 priated may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authori- 28 ty of the state of New York for such purpose (30031450) (15420) .... 29 206,000,000 ...................................... (re. $73,572,000) 30 Project Schedule 31 PROJECT AMOUNT 32 ---------------------------------------------------------- 33 (thousands of dollars) 34 Baruch College 35 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 36 various facilities .............................. 14,000 37 Brooklyn College 38 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 39 various facilities .............................. 12,500 40 City College 41 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 42 various facilities .............................. 17,000 43 Graduate School and University Center 44 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 45 various facilities ............................... 2,000 46 Honors college 47 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 51 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 various facilities ............................... 1,000 2 Hunter College 3 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 4 various facilities ............................... 1,000 5 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 6 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 7 various facilities ............................... 5,000 8 Lehman College 9 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 10 various facilities .............................. 10,000 11 Medgar Evers College 12 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 13 various facilities .............................. 10,000 14 New York City College of Technology 15 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 16 various facilities ............................... 8,000 17 Queens College 18 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 19 various facilities .............................. 17,000 20 College of Staten Island 21 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 22 various facilities .............................. 10,000 23 York College 24 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 25 various facilities .............................. 12,000 26 For university-wide critical maintenance or 27 capital improvement costs at senior 28 colleges attributable to the findings of 29 condition surveys for health and safety 30 needs ........................................... 27,000 31 For university-wide critical maintenance or 32 capital improvement costs at senior 33 colleges attributable to the findings of 34 condition surveys for preservation of 35 facilities needs ................................ 30,000 36 For university-wide critical maintenance or 37 capital improvement costs at senior 38 colleges attributable to mechanical and 39 infrastructure needs ............................ 20,500 40 For university-wide critical maintenance or 41 capital improvement costs at senior 42 colleges attributable to ADA needs .............. 10,000 43 For university-wide critical maintenance or 44 capital improvement costs at senior 45 colleges attributable to certificate of 46 occupancy/public assembly needs .................. 5,000 47 For university-wide critical maintenance or 48 capital improvement costs at senior 49 colleges attributable to energy 52 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 conservation needs .............................. 12,000 2 For university-wide critical maintenance or 3 capital improvement costs at senior 4 colleges attributable to science lab 5 upgrade needs .................................... 8,000 6 For university-wide critical maintenance or 7 capital improvement costs at senior 8 colleges attributable to bathroom 9 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 3,000 10 For university-wide critical maintenance or 11 capital improvement costs at senior 12 colleges attributable to asbestos 13 abatement needs .................................. 1,500 14 For university-wide critical maintenance or 15 capital improvement costs at senior 16 colleges attributable to educational 17 technology initiative needs ..................... 15,000 18 For university-wide critical maintenance or 19 capital improvement costs at senior 20 colleges attributable to science and 21 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,000 22 For university-wide critical maintenance or 23 capital improvement costs at senior 24 colleges attributable CUNY TV 25 renovation needs ................................. 1,500 26 Less an amount to be allocated by the board 27 of trustees ................................... (52,000) 28 -------------- 29 Total ........................................ 206,000 30 ============== 31 Advances for alterations and improvements to various facilities for 32 capital strategic initiatives, including but not limited to capital 33 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 34 and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 35 new facilities, program improvement or program change, environmental 36 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 37 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 38 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2014, and subject to a 39 plan developed and submitted annually by the city university of New 40 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 41 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. 42 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 43 the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred 44 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 45 (30041450) (15511) ... 127,000,000 ............... (re. $83,681,000) 46 Project Schedule 47 PROJECT AMOUNT 48 ---------------------------------------------------------- 53 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 (thousands of dollars) 2 Baruch College 3 17 Lex. Ave Building ............................ 30,000 4 Brooklyn College 5 Roosevelt Hall .................................. 35,000 6 College of Staten Island 7 Interdisciplinary High Performance 8 Computational Center ............................ 10,000 9 Lehman College 10 Nursing Education ............................... 22,000 11 York College 12 Academic Village/Conference Center .............. 30,000 13 -------------- 14 Total ........................................ 127,000 15 ============== 16 Notwithstanding any provision of law this appropriation shall be allo- 17 cated only pursuant to a plan setting forth an itemized list of 18 projects with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology 19 for allocating such appropriation. Such plan shall be subject to 20 theapproval of the temporary president of the senate and the direc- 21 tor of the budget and thereafter shall be included in a resolution 22 calling for the expenditure of such monies, which resolution must be 23 approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the senate 24 upon a roll call vote. 25 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 26 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 27 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 28 (30051450) (15529) ... 67,000,000 ................ (re. $48,094,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 30 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 31 Advances for alterations and improvements to various facilities for 32 capital critical maintenance, including but not limited to capital 33 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 34 and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 35 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 36 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 37 disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, including 38 costs incurred prior to April 1, 2012, and subject to a plan devel- 39 oped and submitted annually by the city university of New York and 40 approved by the director of the budget, and which may include, but 41 not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwith- 42 standing any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 43 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 44 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 45 (30031250) (15420) ... 284,222,000 ............... (re. $71,339,000) 54 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Project Schedule 2 PROJECT AMOUNT 3 ---------------------------------------------------------- 4 (thousands of dollars) 5 Baruch College 6 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 7 various facilities .............................. 12,000 8 Brooklyn College 9 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 10 various facilities .............................. 15,000 11 City College 12 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 13 various facilities .............................. 12,000 14 Graduate School and University Center 15 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 16 various facilities ............................... 3,000 17 Hunter College 18 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 19 various facilities .............................. 10,000 20 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 21 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 22 various facilities ............................... 9,922 23 Lehman College 24 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 25 various facilities .............................. 10,000 26 Medgar Evers College 27 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 28 various facilities ............................... 6,000 29 New York City College of Technology 30 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 31 various facilities .............................. 15,000 32 Queens College 33 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 34 various facilities .............................. 17,000 35 College of Staten Island 36 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 37 various facilities ............................... 9,000 38 York College 39 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 40 various facilities .............................. 10,000 41 For university-wide critical maintenance or 42 capital improvement costs at senior 43 colleges attributable to the findings of 44 condition surveys for health and safety 45 needs ........................................... 36,000 46 For university-wide critical maintenance or 47 capital improvement costs at senior 48 colleges attributable to the findings of 49 condition surveys for preservation of 55 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 facilities needs ................................ 36,000 2 For university-wide critical maintenance or 3 capital improvement costs at senior 4 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 3,000 5 For university-wide critical maintenance or 6 capital improvement costs at senior 7 colleges attributable to certificate of 8 occupancy/public assembly needs ................. 10,000 9 For university-wide critical maintenance or 10 capital improvement costs at senior 11 colleges attributable to energy 12 conservation needs .............................. 10,000 13 For university-wide critical maintenance or 14 capital improvement costs at senior 15 colleges attributable to science and 16 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,000 17 For university-wide critical maintenance or 18 capital improvement costs at senior 19 colleges attributable to educational 20 technology initiative needs ..................... 15,000 21 For university-wide critical maintenance or 22 capital improvement costs at senior 23 colleges attributable to science lab 24 upgrade needs ................................... 10,000 25 For university-wide critical maintenance or 26 capital improvement costs at senior 27 colleges attributable to bathroom 28 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 3,300 29 For university-wide critical maintenance or 30 capital improvement costs at senior 31 colleges attributable to asbestos 32 abatement needs .................................. 1,500 33 For university-wide critical maintenance or 34 capital improvement costs at senior 35 colleges attributable to athletic 36 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,000 37 For university-wide critical maintenance or 38 capital improvement costs at senior 39 colleges attributable CUNY TV 40 renovation needs ................................. 1,500 41 For university-wide critical maintenance or 42 capital improvement costs at senior 43 colleges attributable to mechanical and 44 infrastructure needs ............................ 23,000 45 -------------- 46 Total ........................................ 284,222 47 ============== 48 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 49 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 56 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Advances for alterations and improvements to various facilities for 2 capital critical maintenance, including but not limited to capital 3 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 4 and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 5 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 6 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 7 disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, including 8 costs incurred prior to April 1, 2011, and subject to a plan devel- 9 oped and submitted annually by the city university of New York and 10 approved by the director of the budget, and which may include, but 11 not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwith- 12 standing any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 13 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 14 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 15 (30031150) (15420) ... 284,222,000 ............... (re. $21,250,000) 16 Project Schedule 17 PROJECT AMOUNT 18 ---------------------------------------------------------- 19 (thousands of dollars) 20 Baruch College 21 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 22 various facilities ............................... 5,000 23 Brooklyn College 24 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 25 various facilities ............................... 7,500 26 City College 27 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 28 various facilities ............................... 6,000 29 Hunter College 30 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 31 various facilities ............................... 7,000 32 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 33 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 34 various facilities ............................... 3,500 35 Lehman College 36 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 37 various facilities ............................... 3,500 38 Medgar Evers College 39 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 40 various facilities ............................... 8,000 41 New York City College of Technology 42 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 43 various facilities .............................. 10,000 44 Queens College 45 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 46 various facilities .............................. 12,500 47 College of Staten Island 48 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 57 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 various facilities ............................... 5,000 2 York College 3 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 4 various facilities ............................... 5,000 5 For university-wide critical maintenance or 6 capital improvement costs at senior 7 colleges attributable to the findings of 8 condition surveys for health and safety 9 needs ........................................... 56,000 10 For university-wide critical maintenance or 11 capital improvement costs at senior 12 colleges attributable to the findings of 13 condition surveys for preservation of 14 facilities needs ................................ 60,000 15 For university-wide critical maintenance or 16 capital improvement costs at senior 17 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 1,800 18 For university-wide critical maintenance or 19 capital improvement costs at senior 20 colleges attributable to certificate of 21 occupancy/public assembly needs ................. 10,000 22 For university-wide critical maintenance or 23 capital improvement costs at senior 24 colleges attributable to energy 25 conservation needs .............................. 10,000 26 For university-wide critical maintenance or 27 capital improvement costs at senior 28 colleges attributable to science and 29 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,000 30 For university-wide critical maintenance or 31 capital improvement costs at senior 32 colleges attributable to educational 33 technology initiative needs ..................... 12,000 34 For university-wide critical maintenance or 35 capital improvement costs at senior 36 colleges attributable to science lab 37 upgrade needs .................................... 8,600 38 For university-wide critical maintenance or 39 capital improvement costs at senior 40 colleges attributable to bathroom 41 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,700 42 For university-wide critical maintenance or 43 capital improvement costs at senior 44 colleges attributable to asbestos 45 abatement needs .................................. 1,700 46 For university-wide critical maintenance or 47 capital improvement costs at senior 48 colleges attributable to athletic 49 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 2,000 50 For university-wide critical maintenance or 58 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 capital improvement costs at senior 2 colleges attributable CUNY TV 3 renovation needs ................................. 2,422 4 For university-wide critical maintenance or 5 capital improvement costs at senior 6 colleges attributable to mechanical and 7 infrastructure needs ............................ 40,000 8 -------------- 9 Total ........................................ 284,222 10 ============== 11 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 12 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 13 Advances for alterations and improvements to various facilities for 14 capital critical maintenance, including but not limited to capital 15 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 16 and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 17 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 18 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 19 disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, including 20 costs incurred prior to April 1, 2010, and subject to a plan devel- 21 oped and submitted annually by the city university of New York and 22 approved by the director of the budget, and which may include, but 23 not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwith- 24 standing any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 25 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 26 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 27 (30031050) (15420) ... 284,222,000 ............... (re. $15,496,000) 28 Project Schedule 29 PROJECT AMOUNT 30 ---------------------------------------------------------- 31 (thousands of dollars) 32 Baruch College 33 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 34 various facilities ............................... 9,400 35 Brooklyn College 36 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 37 various facilities .............................. 14,542 38 City College 39 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 40 various facilities .............................. 22,900 41 Graduate School and University Center 42 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 43 various facilities ............................... 1,500 44 Hunter College 45 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 46 various facilities .............................. 18,000 47 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 48 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 59 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 various facilities .............................. 11,000 2 Lehman College 3 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 4 various facilities ............................... 7,000 5 Medgar Evers College 6 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 7 various facilities .............................. 14,630 8 New York City College of Technology 9 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 10 various facilities .............................. 19,800 11 Queens College 12 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 13 various facilities .............................. 11,550 14 College of Staten Island 15 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 16 various facilities ............................... 8,100 17 York College 18 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 19 various facilities ............................... 6,500 20 For university-wide critical maintenance or 21 capital improvement costs at senior 22 colleges attributable to the findings of 23 condition surveys for health and safety 24 needs ........................................... 35,000 25 For university-wide critical maintenance or 26 capital improvement costs at senior 27 colleges attributable to the findings of 28 condition surveys for preservation of 29 facilities needs ................................ 30,000 30 For university-wide critical maintenance or 31 capital improvement costs at senior 32 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 1,800 33 For university-wide critical maintenance or 34 capital improvement costs at senior 35 colleges attributable to certificate of 36 occupancy/public assembly needs ................. 10,000 37 For university-wide critical maintenance or 38 capital improvement costs at senior 39 colleges attributable to energy 40 conservation needs .............................. 17,000 41 For university-wide critical maintenance or 42 capital improvement costs at senior 43 colleges attributable to science and 44 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,000 45 For university-wide critical maintenance or 46 capital improvement costs at senior 47 colleges attributable to educational 48 technology initiative needs ...................... 5,000 49 For university-wide critical maintenance or 50 capital improvement costs at senior 60 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 colleges attributable to science lab 2 upgrade needs .................................... 8,600 3 For university-wide critical maintenance or 4 capital improvement costs at senior 5 colleges attributable to bathroom 6 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,700 7 For university-wide critical maintenance or 8 capital improvement costs at senior 9 colleges attributable to asbestos 10 abatement needs .................................. 1,700 11 For university-wide critical maintenance or 12 capital improvement costs at senior 13 colleges attributable to athletic 14 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 2,000 15 For university-wide critical maintenance or 16 capital improvement costs at senior 17 colleges attributable CUNY TV 18 renovation needs ................................. 1,500 19 For university-wide critical maintenance or 20 capital improvement costs at senior 21 colleges attributable to mechanical and 22 infrastructure needs ............................ 20,000 23 -------------- 24 Total ........................................ 284,222 25 ============== 26 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 28 Advances for alterations and improvements to various facilities for 29 capital critical maintenance, including but not limited to capital 30 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 31 and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 32 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 33 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 34 disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, including 35 costs incurred prior to April 1, 2009, and subject to a plan devel- 36 oped and submitted annually by the city university of New York and 37 approved by the director of the budget, and which may include, but 38 not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwith- 39 standing any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 40 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 41 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 42 (30020950) (15420) ... 284,222,000 ............... (re. $12,198,000) 43 Project Schedule 44 PROJECT AMOUNT 45 ---------------------------------------------------------- 46 (thousands of dollars) 47 Baruch College 48 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 61 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 various facilities ............................. 2,705 2 Brooklyn College 3 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 4 various facilities ............................. 3,661 5 City College 6 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 7 various facilities ............................ 27,407 8 Hunter College 9 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 10 various facilities ............................ 14,482 11 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 12 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 13 various facilities ............................. 5,681 14 Lehman College 15 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 16 various facilities ............................ 30,000 17 New York City College of Technology 18 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 19 various facilities ............................. 9,400 20 Queens College 21 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 22 various facilities ............................ 35,567 23 College of Staten Island 24 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 25 various facilities ............................. 9,565 26 York College 27 Campus-wide critical maintenance to 28 various facilities ............................. 7,954 29 For university-wide critical maintenance or 30 capital improvement costs at senior 31 colleges attributable to the findings of 32 condition surveys for health and safety 33 needs ........................................... 35,000 34 For university-wide critical maintenance or 35 capital improvement costs at senior 36 colleges attributable to the findings of 37 condition surveys for preservation of 38 facilities needs ................................ 30,000 39 For university-wide critical maintenance or 40 capital improvement costs at senior 41 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 1,800 42 For university-wide critical maintenance or 43 capital improvement costs at senior 44 colleges attributable to certificate of 45 occupancy/public assembly needs ................. 10,000 46 For university-wide critical maintenance or 47 capital improvement costs at senior 48 colleges attributable to energy 49 conservation needs .............................. 17,000 50 For university-wide critical maintenance or 62 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 capital improvement costs at senior 2 colleges attributable to science and 3 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,000 4 For university-wide critical maintenance or 5 capital improvement costs at senior 6 colleges attributable to educational 7 technology initiative needs ...................... 5,000 8 For university-wide critical maintenance or 9 capital improvement costs at senior 10 colleges attributable to science lab 11 upgrade needs .................................... 8,600 12 For university-wide critical maintenance or 13 capital improvement costs at senior 14 colleges attributable to bathroom 15 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,700 16 For university-wide critical maintenance or 17 capital improvement costs at senior 18 colleges attributable to asbestos 19 abatement needs .................................. 1,700 20 For university-wide critical maintenance or 21 capital improvement costs at senior 22 colleges attributable to athletic 23 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 2,000 24 For university-wide critical maintenance or 25 capital improvement costs at senior 26 colleges attributable to mechanical and 27 infrastructure needs ............................ 20,000 28 -------------- 29 Total ........................................ 284,222 30 ============== 31 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 32 Alterations and improvements to various facilities for minor rehabili- 33 tation, including but not limited to capital design, construction, 34 acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 35 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 36 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 37 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 38 maintenance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 39 April 1, 2008, and subject to a plan submitted annually by the city 40 university of New York and approved by the director of the budget 41 (30080850) (15502) ... 23,232,000 ................. (re. $2,732,000) 42 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 43 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 44 Advances for alterations and improvements to various facilities for 45 capital strategic initiatives, including but not limited to capital 46 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 47 and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 48 new facilities, program improvement or program change, environmental 63 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 2 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 3 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2008, and subject to a 4 plan developed and submitted annually by the city university of New 5 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 6 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. 7 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 8 the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred 9 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 10 (30060850) (15511) ... 1,311,732,000 ............. (re. $17,368,000) 11 Project Schedule 12 PROJECT AMOUNT 13 -------------------------------------------- 14 (thousands of dollars) 15 Baruch College 16 17 Lexington Ave. Building 17 Renovation/Field Building 18 Renovation ........................ 40,000 19 Brooklyn College 20 West Quad Building ................ 22,782 21 Roosevelt Hall Science 22 Facility .......................... 52,000 23 Performing Arts Center ............ 29,000 24 Fire Alarm and Security 25 Project ............................ 9,834 26 City College 27 New Science Facility .............. 70,334 28 Marshak Building Interior ......... 10,000 29 School of Architecture 30 Renovation ........................ 10,000 31 Central Plant Expansion and 32 Distribution ...................... 37,727 33 Hunter College 34 School of Social Work ............. 84,318 35 New Science Lab Building, 36 Phase I ........................... 74,682 37 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 38 John Jay College Building 39 Expansion ........................ 125,000 40 CUNY School of Law 41 New Facility ...................... 50,000 42 Lehman College 43 New Science Facility, 44 Phase II .......................... 20,000 45 Swing Space for New Science 46 Facility .......................... 20,000 47 Media Production Center & Virtual 48 Small Business Assistance Center ... 2,217 49 New York City College of Technology 64 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Academic Building I .............. 100,000 2 Educational Technology Initiative .... 250 3 Queens College 4 Louis Armstrong Center ............. 5,000 5 Tennis Courts ...................... 1,500 6 College of Staten Island 7 Center for Computational 8 Science ............................ 6,500 9 Sports and Recreation Center 10 Upgrades ........................... 1,000 11 Campus-wide Site Security & Lighting, 12 Phase II .......................... 12,988 13 York College 14 Student Services Center/Classroom 15 Building ........................... 5,000 16 University-wide 17 CUNY ERP (CUNY FIRST) ............ 142,000 18 Advanced Science Research Center, 19 Phase I, and CCNY New Science 20 Facility ......................... 207,878 21 Project Administration ............ 61,722 22 Operational Changes .............. 110,000 23 -------------- 24 Total ........................ 1,311,732 25 ============== 26 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 28 An advance for alterations and improvements to various facilities 29 including services and expenses, capital design, construction, 30 acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; including 31 but not limited to health and safety, preservation of facilities, 32 new facilities, program improvement or program change, environmental 33 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 34 physically disabled, preventive maintenance and related projects, 35 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2007, and subject to a 36 plan to be developed and submitted annually by the city university 37 of New York and approved by the state director of the budget, and 38 which may include, but not be limited to, projects in the following 39 schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a 40 portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or 41 transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 42 such purpose (30670750) (15529) .................................... 43 225,000,000 ...................................... (re. $27,342,000) 44 Project Schedule 45 AMOUNT 46 ---------------------------------------------------------- 47 (thousands of dollars) 48 For the City College Marshak Building, 65 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 provided however that subdivision (b) of 2 section 6281 of the education law, as 3 amended by chapter 1081 of the laws of 4 1969, shall apply to the dormitory author- 5 ity and/or the city university 6 construction fund, as the letting agency, 7 unless, in its discretion, it determines 8 to utilize a project labor agreement for 9 all work performed in the renovation of 10 the Marshak science building, the city 11 college science facility and the new 12 science research center at city college, 13 which means a prehire collective bargain- 14 ing agreement between the agency and a 15 labor organization establishing the labor 16 organization as the collective bargaining 17 representative for all persons who will 18 perform work pursuant to all contracts for 19 the construction, reconstruction, rehabil- 20 itation or improvement of facilities, and 21 which provides that only contractors and 22 subcontractors who sign a prenegotiated 23 agreement with the labor organization can 24 perform project work, when the record 25 supporting the decision to enter into such 26 an agreement establishes that it is justi- 27 fied by the interests underlying the 28 competitive bidding laws ........................ 30,000 29 For the City College Science Facility, 30 provided however that subdivision (b) of 31 section 6281 of the education law, as 32 amended by chapter 1081 of the laws of 33 1969, shall apply to the dormitory author- 34 ity and/or the city university 35 construction fund, as the letting agency, 36 unless, in its discretion, it determines 37 to utilize a project labor agreement for 38 all work performed in the renovation of 39 the Marshak science building, the city 40 college science facility and the new 41 science research center at city college, 42 which means a prehire collective bargain- 43 ing agreement between the agency and a 44 labor organization establishing the labor 45 organization as the collective bargaining 46 representative for all persons who will 47 perform work pursuant to all contracts for 48 the construction, reconstruction, rehabil- 49 itation or improvement of facilities, and 50 which provides that only contractors and 66 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 subcontractors who sign a prenegotiated 2 agreement with the labor organization can 3 perform project work, when the record 4 supporting the decision to enter into such 5 an agreement establishes that it is justi- 6 fied by the interests underlying the 7 competitive bidding laws ........................ 55,300 8 For the Advanced Science Research Center at 9 City College .................................... 14,500 10 For Central Utilities Plan Expansion at 11 Lehman College .................................. 11,100 12 For the Voorhees Building facade at New York 13 City College of Technology ...................... 14,100 14 For structural repairs at the Pearl Street 15 Building at New York City College of Tech- 16 nology ........................................... 5,000 17 For expansion of the Central Plant at City 18 College ......................................... 30,000 19 For university-wide critical maintenance or 20 capital improvement costs at senior 21 colleges attributable to the findings of 22 condition surveys for health and safety 23 needs ........................................... 20,000 24 For university-wide critical maintenance or 25 capital improvement costs at senior 26 colleges attributable to the findings of 27 condition surveys for preservation of 28 facilities needs ................................ 30,000 29 For university-wide critical maintenance or 30 capital improvement costs at senior 31 colleges to correct deficiencies in the 32 mechanical, electrical and plumbing 33 infrastructure .................................. 15,000 34 -------------- 35 Total .......................................... 225,000 36 ============== 37 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 39 An advance for alterations and improvements to various facilities 40 including services and expenses, capital design, construction, 41 acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; including 42 but not limited to health and safety, preservation of facilities, 43 new facilities, program improvement or program change, environmental 44 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 45 physically disabled, preventive maintenance and related projects, 46 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2005, and subject to a 47 plan to be developed and submitted annually by the city university 48 of New York and approved by the state director of the budget, and 49 which may include, but not be limited to, projects in the following 67 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a 2 portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or 3 transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 4 such purpose (30560550) (15529) ... 69,000,000 ...... (re. $444,000) 5 Project Schedule 6 AMOUNT 7 -------------------------------------------- 8 (thousands of dollars) 9 For preliminary planning for 10 the renovation of Brooklyn 11 College's Roosevelt Hall ........... 2,500 12 For the City College Marshak 13 Building, provided however 14 that subdivision (b) of 15 section 6281 of the education 16 law, as amended by chapter 17 1081 of the laws of 1969, 18 shall apply to the dormitory 19 authority and/or the city 20 university construction fund, 21 as the letting agency, unless, 22 in its discretion, it deter- 23 mines to utilize a project 24 labor agreement for all work 25 performed in the renovation of 26 the Marshak science building, 27 the city college science 28 facility and the new science 29 research center at City 30 College, which means a prehire 31 collective bargaining agree- 32 ment between the agency and a 33 labor organization establish- 34 ing the labor organization as 35 the collective bargaining 36 representative for all persons 37 who will perform work pursuant 38 to all contracts for the 39 construction, reconstruction, 40 rehabilitation or improvement 41 of facilities, and which 42 provides that only contractors 43 and subcontractors who sign a 44 prenegotiated agreement with 45 the labor organization can 46 perform project work, when the 47 record supporting the decision 48 to enter into such an agree- 49 ment establishes that it is 68 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 justified by the interests 2 underlying the competitive 3 bidding laws ...................... 10,000 4 For matching grants for 5 Governors Island .................. 15,000 6 For university-wide critical 7 maintenance or capital 8 improvement costs at senior 9 and community colleges includ- 10 ing but not limited to: costs 11 attributable to the findings 12 of condition surveys for 13 health and safety; preserva- 14 tion of facilities and access 15 for the physically disabled; 16 code compliance; emergencies; 17 asbestos removal; energy 18 conservation; fire alarms, 19 sprinklers, electrical 20 distribution and heating and 21 cooling system requirements; 22 and other similar campus-wide 23 and systemwide needs, provided 24 however that subdivision (b) 25 of section 6281 of the educa- 26 tion law, as amended by chap- 27 ter 1081 of the laws of 1969, 28 shall apply to the dormitory 29 authority and/or the city 30 university construction fund, 31 as the letting agency, unless, 32 in its discretion, it deter- 33 mines to utilize a project 34 labor agreement for all work 35 performed in the renovation of 36 the Marshak science building, 37 the city college science 38 facility and the new science 39 research center at City 40 College, which means a prehire 41 collective bargaining agree- 42 ment between the agency and a 43 labor organization establish- 44 ing the labor organization as 45 the collective bargaining 46 representative for all persons 47 who will perform work pursuant 48 to all contracts for the 49 construction, reconstruction, 50 rehabilitation or improvement 69 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of facilities, and which 2 provides that only contractors 3 and subcontractors who sign a 4 prenegotiated agreement with 5 the labor organization can 6 perform project work, when the 7 record supporting the decision 8 to enter into such an agree- 9 ment establishes that it is 10 justified by the interests 11 underlying the competitive 12 bidding laws ...................... 41,500 13 -------------- 14 Total ............................. 69,000 15 ============== 16 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as added by chapter 55, 17 section 4, of the laws of 2004: 18 Alterations and improvements to various facilities including services 19 and expenses, capital design, construction, acquisition, recon- 20 struction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 21 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 22 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 23 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventive 24 maintenance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 25 April 1, 2004, and subject to a plan submitted annually by the city 26 university of New York and approved by the director of the budget 27 (30060450) (15502) ... 20,000,000 ................. (re. $3,012,000) 28 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 54, 29 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 30 An advance for alterations and improvements to various facilities 31 including services and expenses, capital design, construction, 32 acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for 33 health and safety, preservation of facilities, new facilities, 34 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 35 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 36 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 37 April 1, 2004, and which may include, but not be limited to, 38 projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to 39 the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated 40 may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the 41 state of New York for such purpose (30030450) (15529) .............. 42 1,095,000,000 .................................... (re. $24,665,000) 43 Project Schedule 44 AMOUNT 45 -------------------------------------------- 46 (thousands of dollars) 47 Brooklyn College .................... 23,600 70 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 -West Quad Building 2 City College ....................... 108,000 3 -Science Facility, provided 4 however that subdivision 5 (b) of section 6281 of the 6 education law, as amended 7 by chapter 1081 of the 8 laws of 1969, shall apply 9 to the dormitory authority 10 and/or the city university 11 construction fund, as the 12 letting agency, unless, in 13 its discretion, it deter- 14 mines to utilize a project 15 labor agreement for all 16 work performed in the 17 renovation of the Marshak 18 science building, the city 19 college science facility 20 and the new science 21 research center at City 22 College, which means a 23 prehire collective 24 bargaining agreement 25 between the agency and a 26 labor organization estab- 27 lishing the labor organ- 28 ization as the collective 29 bargaining representative 30 for all persons who will 31 perform work pursuant to 32 all contracts for the 33 construction, recon- 34 struction, rehabilitation 35 or improvement of facili- 36 ties, and which provides 37 that only contractors and 38 subcontractors who sign a 39 prenegotiated agreement 40 with the labor organiza- 41 tion can perform project 42 work, when the record 43 supporting the decision to 44 enter into such an agree- 45 ment establishes that it 46 is justified by the inter- 47 ests underlying the 48 competitive bidding laws 49 -School of Architecture (Phase I) 50 Hunter College ...................... 95,000 71 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 -Science Lab Building (Phase I) 2 -Roosevelt House Rehabilitation 3 -Visual and Performing Arts Complex 4 John Jay College ................... 130,000 5 -Academic Facility (Phase II) 6 Lehman College ...................... 60,000 7 -Science Facility 8 New York City College 9 of Technology ................... 86,000 10 -Academic Complex I 11 Queens College ...................... 30,000 12 -Science Upgrades (Phase I), 13 including $15 million in 14 bond proceeds issued 15 pursuant to a capital 16 appropriation for Queens 17 College in chapter 53 of 18 the laws of 1998 19 Universitywide 20 -For a science research 21 center, excluding furni- 22 ture and equipment which 23 shall be secured from 24 private or other non- 25 state sources, provided 26 however that subdivision 27 (b) of section 6281 of the 28 education law, as amended 29 by chapter 1081 of the 30 laws of 1969, shall apply 31 to the dormitory authority 32 and/or the city university 33 construction fund, as the 34 letting agency, unless, in 35 its discretion, it deter- 36 mines to utilize a project 37 labor agreement for all 38 work performed in the 39 renovation of the Marshak 40 science building, the city 41 college science facility 42 and the new science 43 research center at City 44 College, which means a 45 prehire collective 46 bargaining agreement 47 between the agency and a 48 labor organization estab- 49 lishing the labor organ- 50 ization as the collective 72 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 bargaining representative 2 for all persons who will 3 perform work pursuant to 4 all contracts for the 5 construction, recon- 6 struction, rehabilitation 7 or improvement of facili- 8 ties, and which provides 9 that only contractors and 10 subcontractors who sign a 11 prenegotiated agreement 12 with the labor organiza- 13 tion can perform project 14 work, when the record 15 supporting the decision to 16 enter into such an agree- 17 ment establishes that it 18 is justified by the inter- 19 ests underlying the 20 competitive bidding laws ....... 176,000 21 -For science laboratory 22 upgrades ......................... 7,000 23 -For condition survey- 24 related health and safety 25 projects ........................ 75,000 26 -For condition survey- 27 related preservation of 28 facilities projects ............. 60,000 29 -For condition survey- 30 related projects related 31 to the americans with dis- 32 abilities act ................... 13,000 33 -For asbestos abatement ............ 7,000 34 -For capital staff .............. 41,400 35 -For network infrastructure 36 and telecommunications .......... 40,000 37 -For universitywide critical 38 maintenance or capital im- 39 provement costs for code 40 compliance; emergencies; 41 energy conservation; fire 42 alarms, sprinklers, elec- 43 trical distribution and 44 heating and cooling system 45 requirements; and other 46 similar campuswide and 47 systemwide needs, includ- 48 ing Governors Island ........... 143,000 49 -------------- 50 Total ........................ 1,095,000 73 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ============== 2 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as amended by chapter 53, 3 section 1, of the laws of 1999, for: 4 Alterations and improvements to provide a parent resource/day care 5 facility in the 17 Lexington Avenue Building at Baruch College 6 (302198C1) (15503) ... 1,000,000 .................... (re. $796,000) 7 Alterations and improvements to CUNY Libraries (302198C1) (15504) .... 8 10,800,000 ........................................ (re. $4,190,000) 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 11 Facilities for the Physically Disabled Purpose 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1995, for: 13 Alterations and improvements to make facilities accessible to the 14 physically disabled (30149504) (15507) ............................. 15 1,257,000 ........................................... (re. $577,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1987, as amended by chapter 54, 17 section 3, of the laws of 1992, for: 18 Alterations and improvements to make facilities accessible to the 19 physically disabled (30048704) (15507) ............................. 20 1,206,000 ............................................. (re. $1,000) 21 Capital Projects Funds - Other 22 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 23 Health and Safety Purpose 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1993, for: 25 Alterations and improvements for health and safety pursuant to a plan, 26 based on the results of building condition surveys, to be submitted 27 for approval to the director of the budget on or before July 1, 28 1993. No funds shall be made available until such plan is approved 29 by the director of the budget (30029301) (15505) ................... 30 2,750,000 ........................................... (re. $853,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1992, for: 32 Alterations and improvements for facilities for the physically disa- 33 bled (30A29201) (15523) ... 1,128,000 ................ (re. $43,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1987, as amended by chapter 54, 35 section 3, of the laws of 1995, for: 36 Alterations and improvements for health and safety (30018701) (15505) 37 ... 8,507,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000) 38 Capital Projects Funds - Other 39 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 40 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 74 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 2 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 3 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 4 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 5 tation, and equipment; for in-kind replacement of buildings and 6 facilities upon demonstration, through multi-factor benefit-cost 7 analysis of capital costs and life-cycle operating costs comparing 8 existing facility, renovated facility, and new construction, that 9 replacement is more cost-effective and energy-efficient than full 10 renovation and does not exceed existing square footage except inci- 11 dentally where necessary to provide accessibility, mechanical effi- 12 ciency, or required accessory and minor support structures; for 13 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 14 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 15 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 16 maintenance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 17 April 1, 2025 and subject to a plan developed and submitted annually 18 by the city university of New York and approved by the director of 19 the budget, and which may include, but not be limited to, projects 20 in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to the 21 contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be 22 suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state 23 of New York for such purpose (30032503) (15420) .................... 24 284,222,000 ..................................... (re. $284,222,000) 25 Project Schedule 26 PROJECT AMOUNT 27 ---------------------------------------------------------- 28 (thousands of dollars) 29 Baruch College 30 Campus-wide maintenance to 31 various facilities ............................. 3,379 32 Brooklyn College 33 Campus-wide maintenance to 34 various facilities ............................. 7,638 35 City College 36 Campus-wide maintenance to 37 various facilities ............................. 6,339 38 CUNY School of Medicine 39 Campus-wide maintenance to 40 various facilities ............................... 376 41 Graduate School and University Center 42 Campus-wide maintenance to 43 various facilities ............................... 890 44 Honors college 45 Campus-wide maintenance to 46 various facilities ................................ 89 47 Hunter College 48 Campus-wide maintenance to 75 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 various facilities ............................. 6,331 2 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 3 Campus-wide maintenance to 4 various facilities ............................. 1,359 5 Lehman College 6 Campus-wide maintenance to 7 various facilities ............................. 3,796 8 Medgar Evers College 9 Campus-wide maintenance to 10 various facilities ............................. 1,453 11 New York City College of Technology 12 Campus-wide maintenance to 13 various facilities ............................. 1,874 14 Queens College 15 Campus-wide maintenance to 16 various facilities ............................. 6,125 17 College of Staten Island 18 Campus-wide maintenance to 19 various facilities ............................. 5,117 20 York College 21 Campus-wide maintenance to 22 various facilities ............................. 2,099 23 For university-wide maintenance or 24 capital improvement costs at senior 25 colleges attributable to the findings of 26 condition surveys for health and safety 27 needs ............................................ 9,220 28 For university-wide maintenance or 29 capital improvement costs at senior 30 colleges attributable to the findings of 31 condition surveys for preservation of 32 facilities needs ................................ 12,396 33 For university-wide maintenance or 34 capital improvement costs at senior 35 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 6,147 36 For university-wide maintenance or 37 capital improvement costs at senior 38 colleges attributable to mechanical and 39 infrastructure needs ............................. 7,171 40 For university-wide maintenance or 41 capital improvement costs at senior 42 colleges attributable to science and 43 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,020 44 For university-wide maintenance or 45 capital improvement costs at senior 46 colleges attributable to certificate of 47 occupancy/public assembly needs .................. 2,049 48 For university-wide maintenance or 49 capital improvement costs at senior 50 colleges attributable to energy 76 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 conservation needs ............................... 4,098 2 For university-wide maintenance or 3 capital improvement costs at senior 4 colleges attributable to science lab 5 upgrade needs .................................... 2,049 6 For university-wide maintenance or 7 capital improvement costs at senior 8 colleges attributable to educational 9 technology initiative needs ...................... 6,659 10 For university-wide maintenance or 11 capital improvement costs at senior 12 colleges attributable to bathroom 13 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,026 14 For university-wide maintenance or 15 capital improvement costs at senior 16 colleges attributable to CUNY TV 17 renovation needs ................................... 300 18 For university-wide priority capital 19 maintenance or capital improvement 20 projects to support the preservation 21 of facilities .................................. 181,222 22 -------------- 23 Total ........................................ 284,222 24 ============== 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 27 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 28 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 29 tation, and equipment; for in-kind replacement of buildings and 30 facilities upon demonstration, through multi-factor benefit-cost 31 analysis of capital costs and life-cycle operating costs comparing 32 existing facility, renovated facility, and new construction, that 33 replacement is more cost-effective and energy-efficient than full 34 renovation and does not exceed existing square footage except inci- 35 dentally where necessary to provide accessibility, mechanical effi- 36 ciency, or required accessory and minor support structures; for 37 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 38 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 39 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 40 maintenance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 41 April 1, 2024 and subject to a plan developed and submitted annually 42 by the city university of New York and approved by the director of 43 the budget, and which may include, but not be limited to, projects 44 in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to the 45 contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be 46 suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state 47 of New York for such purpose (30032403) (15420) .................... 48 284,222,000 ..................................... (re. $283,500,000) 77 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Project Schedule 2 PROJECT AMOUNT 3 ---------------------------------------------------------- 4 (thousands of dollars) 5 Baruch College 6 Campus-wide maintenance to 7 various facilities ............................. 3,379 8 Brooklyn College 9 Campus-wide maintenance to 10 various facilities ............................. 7,638 11 City College 12 Campus-wide maintenance to 13 various facilities ............................. 6,715 14 Graduate School and University Center 15 Campus-wide maintenance to 16 various facilities ............................... 890 17 Honors college 18 Campus-wide maintenance to 19 various facilities ................................ 89 20 Hunter College 21 Campus-wide maintenance to 22 various facilities ............................. 6,331 23 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 24 Campus-wide maintenance to 25 various facilities ............................. 1,359 26 Lehman College 27 Campus-wide maintenance to 28 various facilities ............................. 3,796 29 Medgar Evers College 30 Campus-wide maintenance to 31 various facilities ............................. 1,453 32 New York City College of Technology 33 Campus-wide maintenance to 34 various facilities ............................. 1,874 35 Queens College 36 Campus-wide maintenance to 37 various facilities ............................. 6,125 38 College of Staten Island 39 Campus-wide maintenance to 40 various facilities ............................. 5,117 41 York College 42 Campus-wide maintenance to 43 various facilities ............................. 2,099 44 For university-wide maintenance or 45 capital improvement costs at senior 46 colleges attributable to the findings of 47 condition surveys for health and safety 48 needs ............................................ 9,220 49 For university-wide maintenance or 50 capital improvement costs at senior 78 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 colleges attributable to the findings of 2 condition surveys for preservation of 3 facilities needs ................................ 12,396 4 For university-wide maintenance or 5 capital improvement costs at senior 6 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 6,147 7 For university-wide maintenance or 8 capital improvement costs at senior 9 colleges attributable to mechanical and 10 infrastructure needs ............................. 7,171 11 For university-wide maintenance or 12 capital improvement costs at senior 13 colleges attributable to science and 14 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,020 15 For university-wide maintenance or 16 capital improvement costs at senior 17 colleges attributable to certificate of 18 occupancy/public assembly needs .................. 2,049 19 For university-wide maintenance or 20 capital improvement costs at senior 21 colleges attributable to energy 22 conservation needs ............................... 4,098 23 For university-wide maintenance or 24 capital improvement costs at senior 25 colleges attributable to science lab 26 upgrade needs .................................... 2,049 27 For university-wide maintenance or 28 capital improvement costs at senior 29 colleges attributable to educational 30 technology initiative needs ...................... 6,659 31 For university-wide maintenance or 32 capital improvement costs at senior 33 colleges attributable to bathroom 34 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,026 35 For university-wide maintenance or 36 capital improvement costs at senior 37 colleges attributable to CUNY TV 38 renovation needs ................................... 300 39 For university-wide priority capital 40 maintenance or capital improvement 41 projects to support the preservation 42 of facilities .................................. 181,222 43 -------------- 44 Total ....................................... 284,222 45 ============== 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 54, 47 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 48 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 49 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 79 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 2 tation, and equipment; for in-kind replacement of buildings and 3 facilities upon demonstration, through multi-factor benefit-cost 4 analysis of capital costs and life-cycle operating costs comparing 5 existing facility, renovated facility, and new construction, that 6 replacement is more cost-effective and energy-efficient than full 7 renovation and does not exceed existing square footage except inci- 8 dentally where necessary to provide accessibility, mechanical effi- 9 ciency, or required accessory and minor support structures; for 10 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 11 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 12 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 13 maintenance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 14 April 1, 2023 and subject to a plan developed and submitted annually 15 by the city university of New York and approved by the director of 16 the budget, and which may include, but not be limited to, projects 17 in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to the 18 contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be 19 suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state 20 of New York for such purpose (30032303) (15420) .................... 21 384,222,000 ..................................... (re. $356,050,000) 22 Project Schedule 23 PROJECT AMOUNT 24 ---------------------------------------------------------- 25 (thousands of dollars) 26 Baruch College 27 Campus-wide maintenance to 28 various facilities ............................. 4,568 29 Brooklyn College 30 Campus-wide maintenance to 31 various facilities ............................ 10,325 32 City College 33 Campus-wide maintenance to 34 various facilities ............................. 9,078 35 Graduate School and University Center 36 Campus-wide maintenance to 37 various facilities ............................. 1,203 38 Honors college 39 Campus-wide maintenance to 40 various facilities ............................... 120 41 Hunter College 42 Campus-wide maintenance to 43 various facilities ............................. 8,558 44 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 45 Campus-wide maintenance to 46 various facilities ............................. 1,837 47 Lehman College 48 Campus-wide maintenance to 80 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 various facilities ............................. 5,132 2 Medgar Evers College 3 Campus-wide maintenance to 4 various facilities ............................. 1,964 5 New York City College of Technology 6 Campus-wide maintenance to 7 various facilities ............................. 2,533 8 Queens College 9 Campus-wide maintenance to 10 various facilities ............................. 8,280 11 College of Staten Island 12 Campus-wide maintenance to 13 various facilities ............................. 6,917 14 York College 15 Campus-wide maintenance to 16 various facilities ............................. 2,838 17 For university-wide maintenance or 18 capital improvement costs at senior 19 colleges attributable to the findings of 20 condition surveys for health and safety 21 needs ........................................... 12,464 22 For university-wide maintenance or 23 capital improvement costs at senior 24 colleges attributable to the findings of 25 condition surveys for preservation of 26 facilities needs ................................ 16,757 27 For university-wide maintenance or 28 capital improvement costs at senior 29 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 8,310 30 For university-wide maintenance or 31 capital improvement costs at senior 32 colleges attributable to mechanical and 33 infrastructure needs ............................. 9,694 34 For university-wide maintenance or 35 capital improvement costs at senior 36 colleges attributable to science and 37 technology equipment needs ....................... 6,786 38 For university-wide maintenance or 39 capital improvement costs at senior 40 colleges attributable to certificate of 41 occupancy/public assembly needs .................. 2,770 42 For university-wide maintenance or 43 capital improvement costs at senior 44 colleges attributable to energy 45 conservation needs ............................... 5,540 46 For university-wide maintenance or 47 capital improvement costs at senior 48 colleges attributable to science lab 49 upgrade needs .................................... 2,770 50 For university-wide maintenance or 81 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 capital improvement costs at senior 2 colleges attributable to educational 3 technology initiative needs ...................... 9,002 4 For university-wide maintenance or 5 capital improvement costs at senior 6 colleges attributable to bathroom 7 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,387 8 For university-wide maintenance or 9 capital improvement costs at senior 10 colleges attributable to CUNY TV 11 renovation needs ................................... 406 12 For university-wide priority capital 13 maintenance or capital improvement 14 projects to support the preservation 15 of facilities .................................. 244,983 16 -------------- 17 Total ........................................ 384,222 18 ============== 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 20 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 21 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 22 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 23 tation, and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facil- 24 ities, program improvement or program change, environmental 25 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 26 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 27 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2022 and subject to a 28 plan developed and submitted annually by the city university of New 29 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 30 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. 31 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 32 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 33 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 34 (30032203) (15420) ... 284,222,000 .............. (re. $255,449,000) 35 Project Schedule 36 PROJECT AMOUNT 37 ---------------------------------------------------------- 38 (thousands of dollars) 39 Baruch College 40 Campus-wide maintenance to 41 various facilities ............................. 3,379 42 Brooklyn College 43 Campus-wide maintenance to 44 various facilities ............................. 7,638 45 City College 46 Campus-wide maintenance to 47 various facilities ............................. 6,715 48 Graduate School and University Center 82 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance to 2 various facilities ............................... 890 3 Honors college 4 Campus-wide maintenance to 5 various facilities ................................ 89 6 Hunter College 7 Campus-wide maintenance to 8 various facilities ............................. 6,331 9 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 10 Campus-wide maintenance to 11 various facilities ............................. 1,359 12 Lehman College 13 Campus-wide maintenance to 14 various facilities ............................. 3,796 15 Medgar Evers College 16 Campus-wide maintenance to 17 various facilities ............................. 1,453 18 New York City College of Technology 19 Campus-wide maintenance to 20 various facilities ............................. 1,874 21 Queens College 22 Campus-wide maintenance to 23 various facilities ............................. 6,125 24 College of Staten Island 25 Campus-wide maintenance to 26 various facilities ............................. 5,117 27 York College 28 Campus-wide maintenance to 29 various facilities ............................. 2,099 30 For university-wide maintenance or 31 capital improvement costs at senior 32 colleges attributable to the findings of 33 condition surveys for health and safety 34 needs ............................................ 9,220 35 For university-wide maintenance or 36 capital improvement costs at senior 37 colleges attributable to the findings of 38 condition surveys for preservation of 39 facilities needs ................................ 12,396 40 For university-wide maintenance or 41 capital improvement costs at senior 42 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 6,147 43 For university-wide maintenance or 44 capital improvement costs at senior 45 colleges attributable to mechanical and 46 infrastructure needs ............................. 7,171 47 For university-wide maintenance or 48 capital improvement costs at senior 49 colleges attributable to science and 83 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,020 2 For university-wide maintenance or 3 capital improvement costs at senior 4 colleges attributable to certificate of 5 occupancy/public assembly needs .................. 2,049 6 For university-wide maintenance or 7 capital improvement costs at senior 8 colleges attributable to energy 9 conservation needs ............................... 4,098 10 For university-wide maintenance or 11 capital improvement costs at senior 12 colleges attributable to science lab 13 upgrade needs .................................... 2,049 14 For university-wide maintenance or 15 capital improvement costs at senior 16 colleges attributable to educational 17 technology initiative needs ...................... 6,659 18 For university-wide maintenance or 19 capital improvement costs at senior 20 colleges attributable to bathroom 21 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,026 22 For university-wide maintenance or 23 capital improvement costs at senior 24 colleges attributable to CUNY TV 25 renovation needs ................................... 300 26 For university-wide priority capital 27 maintenance or capital improvement 28 projects to support the preservation 29 of facilities .................................. 181,222 30 -------------- 31 Total ....................................... 284,222 32 ============== 33 For additional services and expenses related to alterations and 34 improvements to existing facilities for capital maintenance, includ- 35 ing but not limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, 36 rehabilitation, and equipment; for health and safety, preservation 37 of facilities, program improvement or program change, environmental 38 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 39 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 40 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2022 and subject to a 41 plan developed and submitted annually by the city university of New 42 York and approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any 43 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 44 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 45 authority of the state of New York for such purpose (30A22208) 46 (40802) ... 60,000,000 ........................... (re. $60,000,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 84 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 2 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 3 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 4 tation, and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facil- 5 ities, program improvement or program change, environmental 6 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 7 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 8 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2021 and subject to a 9 plan developed and submitted annually by the city university of New 10 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 11 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. 12 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 13 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 14 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 15 (30032103) (15420) ... 284,222,000 .............. (re. $186,931,000) 16 Project Schedule 17 PROJECT AMOUNT 18 ---------------------------------------------------------- 19 (thousands of dollars) 20 Baruch College 21 Campus-wide maintenance to 22 various facilities ............................. 3,379 23 Brooklyn College 24 Campus-wide maintenance to 25 various facilities ............................. 7,638 26 City College 27 Campus-wide maintenance to 28 various facilities ............................. 6,715 29 Graduate School and University Center 30 Campus-wide maintenance to 31 various facilities ............................... 890 32 Honors college 33 Campus-wide maintenance to 34 various facilities ................................ 89 35 Hunter College 36 Campus-wide maintenance to 37 various facilities ............................. 6,331 38 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 39 Campus-wide maintenance to 40 various facilities ............................. 1,359 41 Lehman College 42 Campus-wide maintenance to 43 various facilities ............................. 3,796 44 Medgar Evers College 45 Campus-wide maintenance to 46 various facilities ............................. 1,453 47 New York City College of Technology 48 Campus-wide maintenance to 85 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 various facilities ............................. 1,874 2 Queens College 3 Campus-wide maintenance to 4 various facilities ............................. 6,125 5 College of Staten Island 6 Campus-wide maintenance to 7 various facilities ............................. 5,117 8 York College 9 Campus-wide maintenance to 10 various facilities ............................. 2,099 11 For university-wide maintenance or 12 capital improvement costs at senior 13 colleges attributable to the findings of 14 condition surveys for health and safety 15 needs ............................................ 9,220 16 For university-wide maintenance or 17 capital improvement costs at senior 18 colleges attributable to the findings of 19 condition surveys for preservation of 20 facilities needs ................................ 12,396 21 For university-wide maintenance or 22 capital improvement costs at senior 23 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 6,147 24 For university-wide maintenance or 25 capital improvement costs at senior 26 colleges attributable to mechanical and 27 infrastructure needs ............................. 7,171 28 For university-wide maintenance or 29 capital improvement costs at senior 30 colleges attributable to science and 31 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,020 32 For university-wide maintenance or 33 capital improvement costs at senior 34 colleges attributable to certificate of 35 occupancy/public assembly needs .................. 2,049 36 For university-wide maintenance or 37 capital improvement costs at senior 38 colleges attributable to energy 39 conservation needs ............................... 4,098 40 For university-wide maintenance or 41 capital improvement costs at senior 42 colleges attributable to science lab 43 upgrade needs .................................... 2,049 44 For university-wide maintenance or 45 capital improvement costs at senior 46 colleges attributable to educational 47 technology initiative needs ...................... 6,659 48 For university-wide maintenance or 49 capital improvement costs at senior 50 colleges attributable to bathroom 86 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,026 2 For university-wide maintenance or 3 capital improvement costs at senior 4 colleges attributable to CUNY TV 5 renovation needs ................................... 300 6 For university-wide priority capital 7 maintenance or capital improvement 8 projects to support the preservation 9 of facilities .................................. 181,222 10 -------------- 11 Total ....................................... 284,222 12 ============== 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 14 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 15 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 16 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 17 tation, and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facil- 18 ities, program improvement or program change, environmental 19 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 20 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 21 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2020 and subject to a 22 plan developed and submitted annually by the city university of New 23 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 24 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. 25 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 26 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 27 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 28 (30032003) (15420) ... 284,222,000 .............. (re. $151,939,000) 29 Project Schedule 30 PROJECT AMOUNT 31 ---------------------------------------------------------- 32 (thousands of dollars) 33 Baruch College 34 Campus-wide maintenance to 35 various facilities ............................. 3,370 36 Brooklyn College 37 Campus-wide maintenance to 38 various facilities ............................. 7,640 39 City College 40 Campus-wide maintenance to 41 various facilities ............................. 6,700 42 Graduate School and University Center 43 Campus-wide maintenance to 44 various facilities ............................... 890 45 Honors college 46 Campus-wide maintenance to 47 various facilities ................................ 90 48 Hunter College 87 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance to 2 various facilities ............................. 6,330 3 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 4 Campus-wide maintenance to 5 various facilities ............................. 1,360 6 Lehman College 7 Campus-wide maintenance to 8 various facilities ............................. 3,800 9 Medgar Evers College 10 Campus-wide maintenance to 11 various facilities ............................. 1,450 12 New York City College of Technology 13 Campus-wide maintenance to 14 various facilities ............................. 1,870 15 Queens College 16 Campus-wide maintenance to 17 various facilities ............................. 6,140 18 College of Staten Island 19 Campus-wide maintenance to 20 various facilities ............................. 5,110 21 York College 22 Campus-wide maintenance to 23 various facilities ............................. 2,110 24 For university-wide maintenance or 25 capital improvement costs at senior 26 colleges attributable to the findings of 27 condition surveys for health and safety 28 needs ............................................ 9,210 29 For university-wide maintenance or 30 capital improvement costs at senior 31 colleges attributable to the findings of 32 condition surveys for preservation of 33 facilities needs ................................ 12,400 34 For university-wide maintenance or 35 capital improvement costs at senior 36 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 6,140 37 For university-wide maintenance or 38 capital improvement costs at senior 39 colleges attributable to mechanical and 40 infrastructure needs ............................. 7,150 41 For university-wide maintenance or 42 capital improvement costs at senior 43 colleges attributable to science and 44 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,030 45 For university-wide maintenance or 46 capital improvement costs at senior 47 colleges attributable to certificate of 48 occupancy/public assembly needs .................. 2,070 49 For university-wide maintenance or 50 capital improvement costs at senior 88 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 colleges attributable to energy 2 conservation needs ............................... 4,080 3 For university-wide maintenance or 4 capital improvement costs at senior 5 colleges attributable to science lab 6 upgrade needs .................................... 2,070 7 For university-wide maintenance or 8 capital improvement costs at senior 9 colleges attributable to educational 10 technology initiative needs ...................... 6,640 11 For university-wide maintenance or 12 capital improvement costs at senior 13 colleges attributable to bathroom 14 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,050 15 For university-wide maintenance or 16 capital improvement costs at senior 17 colleges attributable to CUNY TV 18 renovation needs ................................... 300 19 For university-wide priority capital 20 maintenance or capital improvement 21 projects to support the preservation 22 of facilities .................................. 181,222 23 -------------- 24 Total ........................................ 284,222 25 ============== 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 27 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 28 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 29 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 30 tation, and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facil- 31 ities, program improvement or program change, environmental 32 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 33 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 34 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2019 and subject to a 35 plan developed and submitted annually by the city university of New 36 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 37 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. 38 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 39 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 40 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 41 (30031903) (15420) ... 284,222,000 .............. (re. $137,184,000) 42 Project Schedule 43 PROJECT AMOUNT 44 ---------------------------------------------------------- 45 (thousands of dollars) 46 Baruch College 47 Campus-wide maintenance to 89 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 various facilities ............................. 3,379 2 Brooklyn College 3 Campus-wide maintenance to 4 various facilities ............................. 8,005 5 City College 6 Campus-wide maintenance to 7 various facilities ............................. 6,716 8 Graduate School and University Center 9 Campus-wide maintenance to 10 various facilities ............................. 1,373 11 Honors college 12 Campus-wide maintenance to 13 various facilities ................................ 98 14 Hunter College 15 Campus-wide maintenance to 16 various facilities ............................. 6,331 17 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 18 Campus-wide maintenance to 19 various facilities ............................... 848 20 Lehman College 21 Campus-wide maintenance to 22 various facilities ............................. 4,166 23 Medgar Evers College 24 Campus-wide maintenance to 25 various facilities ............................... 703 26 New York City College of Technology 27 Campus-wide maintenance to 28 various facilities ............................. 1,903 29 Queens College 30 Campus-wide maintenance to 31 various facilities ............................. 6,125 32 College of Staten Island 33 Campus-wide maintenance to 34 various facilities ............................. 5,118 35 York College 36 Campus-wide maintenance to 37 various facilities ............................. 2,100 38 For university-wide maintenance or 39 capital improvement costs at senior 40 colleges attributable to the findings of 41 condition surveys for health and safety 42 needs ............................................ 9,220 43 For university-wide maintenance or 44 capital improvement costs at senior 45 colleges attributable to the findings of 46 condition surveys for preservation of 47 facilities needs ................................ 12,396 48 For university-wide maintenance or 49 capital improvement costs at senior 90 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 6,147 2 For university-wide maintenance or 3 capital improvement costs at senior 4 colleges attributable to mechanical and 5 infrastructure needs ............................. 7,171 6 For university-wide maintenance or 7 capital improvement costs at senior 8 colleges attributable to science and 9 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,020 10 For university-wide maintenance or 11 capital improvement costs at senior 12 colleges attributable to certificate of 13 occupancy/public assembly needs .................. 2,049 14 For university-wide maintenance or 15 capital improvement costs at senior 16 colleges attributable to energy 17 conservation needs ............................... 4,098 18 For university-wide maintenance or 19 capital improvement costs at senior 20 colleges attributable to science lab 21 upgrade needs .................................... 2,049 22 For university-wide maintenance or 23 capital improvement costs at senior 24 colleges attributable to educational 25 technology initiative needs ...................... 6,659 26 For university-wide maintenance or 27 capital improvement costs at senior 28 colleges attributable to bathroom 29 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,024 30 For university-wide maintenance or 31 capital improvement costs at senior 32 colleges attributable to CUNY TV 33 renovation needs ................................... 300 34 For university-wide priority capital 35 maintenance or capital improvement 36 projects to support the preservation 37 of facilities .................................. 181,222 38 -------------- 39 Total ........................................ 284,222 40 ============== 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 42 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 43 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 44 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 45 tation, and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facil- 46 ities, program improvement or program change, environmental 47 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 48 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 49 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2018 and subject to a 91 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 plan developed and submitted annually by the city university of New 2 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 3 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. 4 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 5 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 6 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 7 (30031803) (15420) ... 284,222,000 ............... (re. $83,687,000) 8 Project Schedule 9 PROJECT AMOUNT 10 ---------------------------------------------------------- 11 (thousands of dollars) 12 Baruch College 13 Campus-wide maintenance to 14 various facilities ............................. 2,511 15 Brooklyn College 16 Campus-wide maintenance to 17 various facilities ............................. 5,433 18 City College 19 Campus-wide maintenance to 20 various facilities ............................. 8,136 21 Graduate School and University Center 22 Campus-wide maintenance to 23 various facilities ................................ 25 24 Honors college 25 Campus-wide maintenance to 26 various facilities ................................ 25 27 Hunter College 28 Campus-wide maintenance to 29 various facilities ............................. 5,799 30 John Jay College of Criminal Justice 31 Campus-wide maintenance to 32 various facilities ............................. 3,193 33 Lehman College 34 Campus-wide maintenance to 35 various facilities ............................. 2,438 36 Medgar Evers College 37 Campus-wide maintenance to 38 various facilities ............................. 3,096 39 New York City College of Technology 40 Campus-wide maintenance to 41 various facilities ............................. 3,485 42 Queens College 43 Campus-wide maintenance to 44 various facilities ............................. 5,433 45 College of Staten Island 46 Campus-wide maintenance to 47 various facilities ............................. 2,877 48 York College 49 Campus-wide maintenance to 92 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 various facilities ............................. 3,899 2 For university-wide maintenance or 3 capital improvement costs at senior 4 colleges attributable to the findings of 5 condition surveys for health and safety 6 needs ............................................ 9,270 7 For university-wide maintenance or 8 capital improvement costs at senior 9 colleges attributable to the findings of 10 condition surveys for preservation of 11 facilities needs ................................ 12,463 12 For university-wide maintenance or 13 capital improvement costs at senior 14 colleges attributable to mechanical and 15 infrastructure needs ............................. 7,210 16 For university-wide maintenance or 17 capital improvement costs at senior 18 colleges attributable to ADA needs ............... 6,180 19 For university-wide maintenance or 20 capital improvement costs at senior 21 colleges attributable to certificate of 22 occupancy/public assembly needs .................. 2,060 23 For university-wide maintenance or 24 capital improvement costs at senior 25 colleges attributable to energy 26 conservation needs ............................... 4,120 27 For university-wide maintenance or 28 capital improvement costs at senior 29 colleges attributable to science lab 30 upgrade needs .................................... 2,060 31 For university-wide maintenance or 32 capital improvement costs at senior 33 colleges attributable to bathroom 34 facilities upgrade needs ......................... 1,030 35 For university-wide maintenance or 36 capital improvement costs at senior 37 colleges attributable to educational 38 technology initiative needs ...................... 6,695 39 For university-wide maintenance or 40 capital improvement costs at senior 41 colleges attributable to science and 42 technology equipment needs ....................... 5,047 43 For university-wide maintenance or 44 capital improvement costs at senior 45 colleges attributable to CUNY TV 46 renovation needs ................................... 515 47 For university-wide priority capital 48 maintenance or capital improvement 49 projects to support the preservation 50 of facilities .................................. 181,222 93 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 -------------- 2 Total ........................................ 284,222 3 ============== 4 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 1997: 5 Alterations and improvements for preservation of facilities (30039703) 6 (15506) ... 3,300,000 ............................. (re. $2,241,000) 7 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 1996, for: 8 Alterations and improvements to roofs on various buildings at Brooklyn 9 College (30299603) (15524) ... 300,000 .............. (re. $300,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1995, for: 11 Alterations and improvements to roofs on various buildings (30239503) 12 (15524) ... 5,933,000 ............................. (re. $2,524,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1994, for: 14 Alterations and improvements to roofs (30039403) (15524) ............. 15 5,579,000 ........................................... (re. $236,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1990, as amended by chapter 54, 17 section 3, of the laws of 1992, for: 18 Alterations and improvements for preservation of facilities (30A39003) 19 (15506) ... ... 9,947,000 ......................... (re. $255,000) 20 Capital Projects Funds - Other 21 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 22 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1995, for: 24 Alterations and improvements to child care facilities (30289508) 25 (15509) ... ... 1,306,000 ......................... (re. $736,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1994, for: Planning for master 27 plans, including telecommunications and predesign project estimates 28 (30389408) (15525) ... .......................................... 29 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $398,000) 30 PROGRAM CHANGES - EXPANSION AND IMPROVEMENTS (CCP) 31 Capital Projects Funds - Other 32 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 33 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 35 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 36 various facilities including but not limited to capital design, 37 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 38 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 39 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 94 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 2 maintenance and related projects, acquisition and implementation of 3 equipment, software, hardware and services in consultation with the 4 office of information technology services, including costs incurred 5 prior to April 1, 2025 and subject to a plan developed and submitted 6 annually by the city university of New York and approved by the 7 director of the budget. Funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 8 cated to the city university of New York following approval by the 9 chancellor of the city university of New York and the director of 10 the budget (30A12508) (40811) ...................................... 11 85,000,000 ....................................... (re. $85,000,000) 12 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 13 research facilities including but not limited to capital design, 14 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 15 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 16 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 17 and accreditation, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2025 18 and subject to a plan approved by the chancellor of the city univer- 19 sity of New York and the director of the budget. 20 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 21 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 22 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 23 (30IN2508)(40814) ... 133,000,000 ............... (re. $133,000,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 25 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 26 various facilities including but not limited to capital design, 27 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 28 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 29 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 30 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 31 maintenance and related projects, acquisition and implementation of 32 equipment, software, hardware and services in consultation with the 33 office of information technology services, including costs incurred 34 prior to April 1, 2024 and subject to a plan developed and submitted 35 annually by the city university of New York and approved by the 36 director of the budget. Funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 37 cated to the city university of New York following approval by the 38 chancellor of the city university of New York and the director of 39 the budget (30A12408) (40811) ...................................... 40 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $99,818,000) 41 For additional services and expenses related to alterations and 42 improvements to various facilities including but not limited to 43 capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and 44 equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 45 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 46 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 47 disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, acquisition 48 and implementation of equipment, software, hardware and services in 49 consultation with the office of information technology services, 95 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2024 and subject to a 2 plan developed and submitted annually by the city university of New 3 York and approved by the director of the budget. Funds appropriated 4 herein may be suballocated to the city university of New York 5 following approval by the chancellor of the city university of New 6 York and the director of the budget (30A42408)(40812) .............. 7 40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $40,000,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 9 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 10 various facilities including but not limited to capital design, 11 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 12 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 13 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 14 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 15 maintenance and related projects, acquisition and implementation of 16 equipment, software, hardware and services in consultation with the 17 office of information technology services, including costs incurred 18 prior to April 1, 2023 and subject to a plan developed and submitted 19 annually by the city university of New York and approved by the 20 director of the budget. Funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 21 cated to the city university of New York following approval by the 22 chancellor of the city university of New York and the director of 23 the budget (30A12308) (40811) ...................................... 24 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $53,310,000) 25 For additional services and expenses related to alterations and 26 improvements to various facilities including but not limited to 27 capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and 28 equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 29 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 30 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 31 disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, acquisition 32 and implementation of equipment, software, hardware and services in 33 consultation with the office of information technology services, 34 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2023 and subject to a 35 plan developed and submitted annually by the city university of New 36 York and approved by the director of the budget. Funds appropriated 37 herein may be suballocated to the city university of New York 38 following approval by the chancellor of the city university of New 39 York and the director of the budget (30A42308) (40812) ............. 40 435,000,000 ..................................... (re. $435,000,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 42 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 43 various facilities including but not limited to capital design, 44 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 45 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 46 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 47 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 48 maintenance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 96 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) SENIOR COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 April 1, 2022 and subject to a plan developed and submitted annually 2 by the city university of New York and approved by the director of 3 the budget (30A12208) (40811) ... 425,000,000 ... (re. $405,112,000) 4 For additional services and expenses related to alterations and 5 improvements to various facilities including but not limited to 6 capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and 7 equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 8 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 9 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 10 disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, including 11 costs incurred prior to April 1, 2022 and subject to a plan devel- 12 oped and submitted annually by the city university of New York and 13 approved by the director of the budget (30A42208) (40812) .......... 14 110,000,000 ..................................... (re. $110,000,000) 15 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 16 facilities and capital maintenance for the CUNY School of Labor and 17 Urban Studies (30A32208) (40813) ... 3,000,000 .... (re. $3,000,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 19 For the capital costs of training and educational programs in offshore 20 wind power, wind power, and other green energy fields (30GE2108) 21 (40810) ... 10,000,000 ............................ (re. $7,473,000) 22 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 23 various facilities including but not limited to capital design, 24 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 25 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 26 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 27 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 28 maintenance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 29 April 1, 2021 and subject to a plan developed and submitted annually 30 by the city university of New York and approved by the director of 31 the budget (30A12108) (40811) ... 100,000,000 .... (re. $93,665,000) 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 City University Capital Projects Fund - 32250 34 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 37 For services and expenses of capital improvements, available to city 38 university of New York senior colleges as defined in section 6203 of 39 the education law subject to a plan approved by the Director of the 40 Budget. Funding from this appropriation shall be available for, but 41 not limited to, service contracts, memoranda of understanding, capi- 42 tal design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 43 tation, equipment and personal service costs including costs 44 incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (30MB2008) (40807) ................. 45 100,000,000 ..................................... (re. $100,000,000) 97 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 GENERAL MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Administration Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 For services and expenses for state financial assistance to community 8 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 9 including services and expenses, capital design, construction, 10 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 11 preservation of facilities, new facilities program improvement or 12 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 13 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 14 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2017 subject to 15 an annual plan developed by the city university and approved by the 16 state director of the budget, and which may include, but not be 17 limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any 18 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 19 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 20 authority of the state of New York for such purpose (30CC1750) 21 (81067) ... 80,353,000 ........................... (re. $14,294,000) 22 Project Schedule 23 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 24 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 25 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 26 ---------------------------------------------------------- 27 (thousands of dollars) 28 Bronx Community College 29 Critical Maintenance ........... 42,000 21,000 30 Student Success Center ......... 14,000 7,000 31 STEM Resource Center ........... 300 150 32 Borough Manhattan Community College 33 Cooling Tower Rehab ............ 3,600 1,800 34 Gymnasium Light Replacement .... 700 350 35 Hostos Community College 36 One Stop Student Services Center 7,700 3,850 37 Kingsborough Community College 38 Roof Replacements .............. 2,000 1,000 39 Marina Upgrades ................ 500 250 40 Science Equipment .............. 454 227 41 LaGuardia Community College 42 Center for Career and Employment 43 Training ....................... 6,774 3,387 44 Queensborough Community College 45 Roof Repairs ................... 2,400 1,200 46 Kitchen and Cafeteria Renovation 5,600 2,800 47 For university-wide community college 98 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 critical maintenance or capital 2 improvement costs attributable to 3 preservation of facilities ..... 60,678 30,339 4 For university-wide community college 5 critical maintenance or capital 6 improvement costs attributable to 7 facilities which support ASAP 8 programs ....................... 14,000 7,000 9 ------- ------ 10 Total ........................ 160,706 80,353 11 ======= ====== 12 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 13 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 14 For services and expenses for state financial assistance to community 15 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 16 including services and expenses, capital design, construction, 17 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 18 preservation of facilities, new facilities program improvement or 19 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 20 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 21 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2016 subject to 22 an annual plan developed by the city university and approved by the 23 state director of the budget, and which may include, but not be 24 limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any 25 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 26 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 27 authority of the state of New York for such purpose (30CC1650) 28 (81067) ... 61,640,000 ............................ (re. $6,536,000) 29 Project Schedule 30 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 31 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 32 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 33 ---------------------------------------------------------- 34 (thousands of dollars) 35 Bronx Community College 36 Alumni Locker Room Accessibility 500 250 37 EOC Headquarter Renovation ..... 1,000 500 38 Campus Utility Upgrade ......... 8,000 4,000 39 Gould Library Rotunda Staircase 1,330 665 40 Fire Alarm Upgrades ............ 2,908 1,454 41 Lowe Hall ADA Improvements ..... 500 250 42 Borough Manhattan Community College 43 Lighting Controls and Sensors .. 1,552 776 44 Variable Frequency Drives ...... 1,934 967 45 Community Room HVAC ............ 2,700 1,350 46 Perimeter Security Lighting .... 600 300 47 199 Chambers Upgrade ........... 4,596 2,298 48 Hostos Community College 99 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Summer Boiler .................. 206 103 2 Technology Upgrades ............ 430 215 3 Kingsborough Community College 4 Pool Renovations ............... 2,000 1,000 5 Marina Reconstruction .......... 1,500 750 6 LaGuardia Community College 7 Staircase Lighting ............. 160 80 8 Center 3 Infrastructure Upgrades 20,000 10,000 9 Business and Entrepreneurial 10 Training Center .............. 6,800 3,400 11 M Building Boiler Replacement .. 546 273 12 E and C Building Cooling Towers 688 344 13 Chiller Plant .................. 17,964 8,982 14 Queensborough Community College 15 Upgrade Research Labs .......... 3,200 1,600 16 Central Chiller Plant .......... 2,000 1,000 17 Electrical System Upgrade ...... 7,980 3,990 18 Kitchen and Cafeteria Renovation 2,000 1,000 19 For university-wide community college 20 critical maintenance or capital 21 improvement costs attributable to 22 health and safety .............. 14,524 7,262 23 For university-wide community college 24 critical maintenance or capital 25 improvement costs attributable to 26 preservation of facilities ..... 17,462 8,731 27 For university-wide community college 28 critical maintenance or capital 29 improvement costs attributable to 30 assistive technology ........... 200 100 31 ------- ------ 32 Total ........................ 123,280 61,640 33 ======= ====== 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 35 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 36 For services and expenses for state financial assistance to community 37 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 38 including services and expenses, capital design, construction, 39 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 40 preservation of facilities, new facilities program improvement or 41 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 42 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 43 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2015 subject to 44 an annual plan developed by the city university and approved by the 45 state director of the budget, and which may include, but not be 46 limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any 47 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 48 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 100 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 authority of the state of New York for such purpose (30C11550) 2 (40801) ... 4,503,000 ............................. (re. $4,503,000) 3 Project Schedule 4 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 5 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 6 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 7 ---------------------------------------------------------- 8 (thousands of dollars) 9 Hostos Community College 10 Allied Health and Sciences 11 Building Complex ............. 9,006 4,503 12 ------- ------ 13 Total ........................ 9,006 4,503 14 ======= ====== 15 For services and expenses for state financial assistance to community 16 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 17 including services and expenses, capital design, construction, 18 acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for 19 health and safety, preservation of facilities, new facilities, 20 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 21 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 22 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 23 April 1, 2015 subject to an annual plan developed by the city 24 university and approved by the state director of the budget, and 25 which may include, but not be limited to, projects in the following 26 schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a 27 portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or 28 transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 29 such purpose (30CC1550) (81067) ... 16,422,000 .... (re. $8,091,000) 30 Project Schedule 31 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 32 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 33 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 34 ---------------------------------------------------------- 35 (thousands of dollars) 36 Bronx Community College 37 Ohio Track and Field Restoration 750 375 38 Monument Hill Restoration ...... 400 200 39 Gould Memorial Library Windows . 900 450 40 Bliss Hall ADA Improvements .... 600 300 41 Computer and Lab Upgrades ...... 70 35 42 Hostos Community College 43 475 Grand Concourse HVAC Upgrades 3,000 1,500 44 Kingsborough Community College 45 Pool Upgrades .................. 2,000 1,000 46 Science and Resiliency Institute 10,000 5,000 47 LaGuardia Community College 101 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Faculty Offices and Training Center 1,500 750 2 Tech Center .................... 200 100 3 Queensborough Community College 4 Roof Repairs ................... 1,700 850 5 Central Kitchen and 6 Cafeteria Renovation ........... 1,100 550 7 For university-wide community college 8 critical maintenance or capital 9 improvement costs attributable to 10 the preservation of facilities . 4,064 2,032 11 For university-wide community college 12 critical maintenance or capital 13 improvement costs attributable to 14 accelerated conservation and 15 efficiency projects ............ 6,560 3,280 16 ------- ------ 17 Total ........................ 32,844 16,422 18 ======= ====== 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 21 An advance for state financial assistance to community colleges for 22 alterations and improvements to existing facilities including 23 services and expenses, capital design, construction, reconstruction, 24 rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of 25 facilities, program improvement or program change, environmental 26 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 27 physically disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred 28 prior to April 1, 2014 subject to an annual plan developed by the 29 city university and approved by the state director of the budget, 30 and which may include, but not be limited to, projects in the 31 following schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 32 all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballo- 33 cated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New 34 York for such purpose (30CC1450) (81067) ........................... 35 15,628,000 ........................................ (re. $4,241,000) 36 Project Schedule 37 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 38 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 39 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 40 ---------------------------------------------------------- 41 (thousands of dollars) 42 Borough of Manhattan Community 43 College 44 Campus-wide critical maintenance 45 to various facilities .......... 3,500 1,750 46 Bronx Community College 47 Campus-wide critical maintenance 102 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 to various facilities .......... 2,200 1,100 2 Kingsborough Community College 3 Campus-wide critical maintenance 4 to various facilities .......... 3,000 1,500 5 LaGuardia Community College 6 Campus-wide critical maintenance 7 to various facilities .......... 6,000 3,000 8 Queensborough Community College 9 Campus-wide critical maintenance 10 to various facilities .......... 5,500 2,750 11 For university-wide community college 12 critical maintenance or capital 13 improvement costs attributable to 14 the preservation of facilities . 5,456 2,728 15 For university-wide community college 16 critical maintenance or capital 17 improvement costs attributable to 18 accelerated conservation and 19 efficiency projects ............ 5,600 2,800 20 ------- ------ 21 Total ........................ 31,256 15,628 22 ======= ====== 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 24 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 25 An advance for state financial assistance to community colleges for 26 alterations and improvements to various facilities including 27 services and expenses, capital design, construction, acquisition, 28 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 29 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 30 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 31 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 32 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2013 subject to 33 an annual plan developed by the city university and approved by the 34 state director of the budget, and which may include, but not be 35 limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any 36 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 37 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 38 authority of the state of New York for such purpose (30CC1350) 39 (81067) ... 8,100,000 ............................. (re. $1,182,000) 40 Project Schedule 41 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 42 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 43 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 44 ---------------------------------------------------------- 45 (thousands of dollars) 46 Borough of Manhattan Community 47 College 48 Campus-wide critical maintenance 103 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 to various facilities .......... 2,000 1,000 2 Bronx Community College 3 Campus-wide critical maintenance 4 to various facilities .......... 2,850 1,425 5 Hostos Community College 6 Campus-wide critical maintenance 7 to various facilities .......... 3,500 1,750 8 Kingsborough Community College 9 Campus-wide critical maintenance 10 to various facilities .......... 1,650 825 11 LaGuardia Community College 12 Campus-wide critical maintenance 13 to various facilities .......... 2,000 1,000 14 Queensborough Community College 15 Campus-wide critical maintenance 16 to various facilities .......... 4,200 2,100 17 ------- ------ 18 Total ........................ 16,200 8,100 19 ======= ====== 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 21 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 22 An advance for state financial assistance to community colleges for 23 alterations and improvements to various facilities including 24 services and expenses, capital design, construction, acquisition, 25 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 26 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 27 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 28 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 29 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2012 subject to 30 an annual plan developed by the city university and approved by the 31 state director of the budget, and which may include, but not be 32 limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any 33 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 34 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 35 authority of the state of New York for such purpose (30CC1250) 36 (81067) ... 26,704,000 ........................... (re. $16,399,000) 37 Project Schedule 38 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 39 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 40 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 41 ---------------------------------------------------------- 42 (thousands of dollars) 43 Borough of Manhattan Community 44 College 45 Campus-wide critical maintenance 46 to various facilities .......... 14,400 7,200 47 Bronx Community College 48 Campus-wide critical maintenance 104 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 to various facilities .......... 6,000 3,000 2 Kingsborough Community College 3 Campus-wide critical maintenance 4 to various facilities .......... 7,500 3,750 5 Health Technologies Education 6 Center ......................... 4,908 2,454 7 LaGuardia Community College 8 Center 3 Facade Replacement .... 3,800 1,900 9 Campus-wide critical maintenance 10 to various facilities .......... 6,800 3,400 11 Queensborough Community College 12 Central Kitchen/Cafeteria ...... 2,400 1,200 13 Campus-wide critical maintenance 14 to various facilities .......... 7,600 3,800 15 ------- ------ 16 Total ........................ 55,408 26,704 17 ======= ====== 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 19 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 20 An advance for state financial assistance to community colleges for 21 alterations and improvements to various facilities including 22 services and expenses, capital design, construction, acquisition, 23 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 24 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 25 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 26 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 27 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2011 subject to 28 an annual plan developed by the city university and approved by the 29 state director of the budget which shall include projects in the 30 following schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 31 all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballo- 32 cated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New 33 York for such purpose (30CC1150) (81067) ........................... 34 31,239,000 ....................................... (re. $18,597,000) 35 Project Schedule 36 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 37 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 38 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 39 ---------------------------------------------------------- 40 (thousands of dollars) 41 Borough of Manhattan Community 42 College 43 Theater Upgrades and 44 Equipment ...................... 3,400 1,700 45 Bronx Community College 46 Campus-wide Roofing, 47 Ph. I .......................... 4,068 2,034 48 Kingsborough Community College 105 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Theater Upgrades and Sciences Bldg- 2 Infrastructure ................. 5,150 2,575 3 T2 Building Upgrades ........... 7,200 3,600 4 LaGuardia Community College 5 Center 3 Facade, Ph. I ......... 5,000 2,500 6 Center 3 Upgrades .............. 1,000 500 7 Campus Improvements ............ 10,000 5,000 8 Queensborough Community College 9 Central Kitchen/Dining Hall 10 Renovation ..................... 8,660 4,330 11 Upgrade Campus-wide Electrical 12 System, Ph. II ................. 18,000 9,000 13 ------- ------ 14 Total ........................ 62,478 31,239 15 ======= ====== 16 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 17 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 18 An advance for state financial assistance to community colleges for 19 alterations and improvements to various facilities including 20 services and expenses, capital design, construction, acquisition, 21 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 22 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 23 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 24 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 25 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2010 subject to 26 an annual plan developed by the city university and approved by the 27 state director of the budget which shall include projects in the 28 following schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 29 all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballo- 30 cated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New 31 York for such purpose (30CC1050) (81067) ........................... 32 34,563,000 ........................................ (re. $5,480,000) 33 Project Schedule 34 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 35 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 36 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 37 ---------------------------------------------------------- 38 (thousands of dollars) 39 Borough of Manhattan Community 40 College 41 Central Plant Upgrades, 42 199 Chambers Street .......... 14,000 7,000 43 Bronx Community College 44 Campus-wide Utility Upgrades, 45 Ph. I ........................ 18,626 9,313 46 Kingsborough Community College 47 Mechanical and Infrastructure 106 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Improvements ................. 4,000 2,000 2 LaGuardia Community College 3 Conference Facility Space ...... 2,000 1,000 4 Center 3 Office Space and 5 Elevators .................... 2,500 1,250 6 Facility Upgrades .............. 10,000 5,000 7 Queensborough Community College 8 Upgrade Campus-wide Electrical 9 System, Ph. I ................ 18,000 9,000 10 ------- ------ 11 Total ........................ 69,126 34,563 12 ======= ====== 13 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 14 State financial assistance to community colleges for alterations and 15 improvements to various facilities for minor rehabilitation, includ- 16 ing but not limited to capital design, construction, acquisition, 17 reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for health and safe- 18 ty, preservation of facilities, program improvement or program 19 change, environmental protection, energy conservation, accredi- 20 tation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative mainte- 21 nance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to April 22 1, 2008, and subject to a plan submitted annually by the city 23 university of New York and approved by the director of the budget 24 (30110850) (15514) ... 2,750,000 .................. (re. $1,773,000) 25 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 27 Advances for alterations and improvements to various facilities for 28 capital critical maintenance and strategic initiatives, including 29 but not limited to capital design, construction, acquisition, recon- 30 struction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for health and safety, 31 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 32 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 33 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 34 maintenance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 35 April 1, 2008, and subject to a plan developed and submitted annual- 36 ly by the city university of New York and approved by the director 37 of the budget, and which may include, but not be limited to, 38 projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to 39 the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated 40 may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the 41 state of New York for such purpose (30090850) (15518) .............. 42 206,908,000 ...................................... (re. $38,400,000) 43 Project Schedule 44 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 45 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 46 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 47 ---------------------------------------------------------- 107 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 (thousands of dollars) 2 Borough of Manhattan Community 3 College 4 Fiterman Hall .................. 102,200 51,100 5 Bronx Community College 6 North Instructional Building ... 24,762 12,381 7 Backflow Prevention Devices .... 3,400 1,700 8 Campus-wide Roof Replacement ... 1,932 966 9 Hostos Community College 10 500 Grand Concourse ............ 18,446 9,223 11 Kingsborough Community College 12 Laboratories and Mechanical 13 Infrastructure Upgrade Phase I . 5,000 2,500 14 Medgar Evers College 15 Academic Building I ............ 68,346 34,173 16 Carroll Street Building ........ 12,000 6,000 17 University-wide 18 CUNY ERP (CUNY FIRST) .......... 27,600 13,800 19 Project Administration ......... 15,430 7,715 20 For university-wide critical main- 21 tenance or capital improvement 22 costs at community colleges 23 attributable to the findings 24 of condition surveys for health 25 and safety needs ............... 35,000 17,500 26 For university-wide critical main- 27 tenance or capital improvement 28 costs at community colleges 29 attributable to the findings 30 of condition surveys for 31 preservation of facilities needs 35,000 17,500 32 For university-wide critical main- 33 tenance or capital improvement 34 costs at community colleges 35 attributable to ADA needs ...... 15,000 7,500 36 For university-wide critical main- 37 tenance or capital improvement 38 costs at community colleges 39 attributable to certificate of 40 occupancy/public assembly needs 18,000 9,000 41 For university-wide critical main- 42 tenance or capital improvement 43 costs at community colleges 44 attributable to energy 45 conservation needs ............. 18,000 9,000 46 For university-wide critical main- 47 tenance or capital improvement 48 costs at community colleges 49 attributable to science lab 108 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 upgrade needs .................. 7,200 3,600 2 For university-wide critical main- 3 tenance or capital improvement 4 costs at community colleges 5 attributable to educational 6 technology initiative needs .... 4,000 2,000 7 For university-wide critical main- 8 tenance or capital improvement 9 costs at community colleges 10 attributable to athletic 11 facilities upgrade needs ....... 2,500 1,250 12 ------------ ------------ 13 Total .......................... 413,816 206,908 14 ============ ============ 15 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 54, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 17 An advance for state financial assistance to community colleges for 18 alterations and improvements to various facilities including 19 services and expenses, capital design, construction, acquisition, 20 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 21 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 22 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 23 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 24 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2007 subject to 25 an annual plan developed by the city university and approved by the 26 state director of the budget which shall include projects in the 27 following schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 28 all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballo- 29 cated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New 30 York for such purpose (30660750) (81067) ........................... 31 40,800,000 .......................................... (re. $540,000) 32 Project Schedule 33 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 34 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 35 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 36 ---------------------------------------------------------- 37 (thousands of dollars) 38 Borough of Manhattan Community College 39 Fiterman Hall Replacement ...... 40,000 20,000 40 Bronx Community College 41 Mechanical Systems Upgrades .... 1,800 900 42 Medgar Evers 43 Academic Building I ............ 22,000 11,000 44 For University-wide critical 45 maintenance or capital im- 46 provement costs at community 47 colleges attributable to the 48 findings of condition sur- 109 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 veys for health and safety 2 needs .......................... 4,800 2,400 3 For university-wide critical 4 maintenance or capital im- 5 provement costs at community 6 colleges attributable to the 7 findings of condition sur- 8 veys for preservation of 9 facilities needs ............... 3,000 1,500 10 For university-wide critical 11 maintenance or capital im- 12 provement costs at community 13 colleges to correct defic- 14 iencies in the mechanical, 15 electrical and plumbing 16 infrastructure ................. 10,000 5,000 17 ------- ------- 18 Total .......................... 81,600 40,800 19 ======= ======= 20 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 54, 21 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 22 An advance for state financial assistance to community colleges for 23 alterations and improvements to various facilities including 24 services and expenses, capital design, construction, acquisition, 25 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 26 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 27 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 28 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 29 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2006 subject to 30 an annual plan developed by the city university which shall include 31 projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to 32 the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated 33 may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the 34 state of New York for such purpose (30660650) (81067) .............. 35 8,769,000 ......................................... (re. $1,461,000) 36 Project Schedule 37 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 38 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 39 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 40 ---------------------------------------------------------- 41 (thousands of dollars) 42 Medgar Evers College 43 Theater ........................ 3,450 1,725 44 Auditorium ..................... 14,088 7,044 45 ------- ------ 46 Total .......................... 17,538 8,769 47 ======= ====== 110 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Additional advance for state financial assistance to community 2 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 3 including capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, 4 rehabilitation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and 5 safety, preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improve- 6 ment or program change, environmental protection, energy conserva- 7 tion, accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled and 8 related projects including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2006. 9 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 10 the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred 11 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 12 (30660650) (81067) ... 66,580,000 ................ (re. $21,009,000) 13 Project Schedule 14 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 15 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 16 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 17 ---------------------------------------------------------- 18 (thousands of dollars) 19 Borough of Manhattan Community 20 College 21 Fiterman Hall Replacement ...... 15,000 7,500 22 Chambers Street Renovations 23 Phase II ....................... 14,000 7,000 24 Bronx Community College 25 Mechanical System Upgrades ..... 6,000 3,000 26 Hostos Community College 27 Renovations in 475 Grand Concourse 6,000 3,000 28 Kings Borough Community College 29 Air conditioning T5 ............ 218 109 30 Renovation of former auditorium T2 31 building as learning resource 32 center ......................... 2,000 1,000 33 Air conditioning T4 ............ 942 471 34 Mechanical System Upgrades ..... 6,000 3,000 35 Laguardia Community College 36 Renovations of Center 3 ........ 14,000 7,000 37 Acquisition and Renovation 38 of an Additional Educational 39 Building ....................... 55,000 27,500 40 Medgar Evers 41 Academic I ..................... 8,000 4,000 42 Queensborough Community College 43 Renovation of Science Building . 6,000 3,000 44 -------- -------- 45 Total ........................ 133,160 66,580 46 ======== ======== 47 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 54, 48 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 111 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 An advance for state financial assistance to community colleges for 2 alterations and improvements to various facilities including 3 services and expenses, capital design, construction, acquisition, 4 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 5 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 6 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 7 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 8 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2005 subject to 9 an annual plan developed by the city university which shall include 10 projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to 11 the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated 12 may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the 13 state of New York for such purpose (30590550) (81067) .............. 14 105,849,000 ....................................... (re. $2,877,000) 15 Project Schedule 16 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 17 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 18 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 19 ---------------------------------------------------------- 20 (thousands of dollars) 21 Queensborough Community College 22 Holocaust Resource Center ......... 3,000 1,500 23 Instruction Building Planning 24 and Design Costs .................. 4,948 2,474 25 Upgrade Campus Wide Electric 26 System ............................ 1,000 500 27 Upgrade Campus Wide Drainage 28 System ............................ 1,000 500 29 Kingsborough Community College 30 Roof Replacement .................. 3,000 1,500 31 Additional Roof Replacement ....... 3,000 1,500 32 Fire Alarm Rehab .................. 6,256 3,128 33 Gymnasium ......................... 6,060 3,030 34 Marine/Academic Center ............ 5,050 2,525 35 Primary Arts Center ................. 850 425 36 Hostos Community College 37 475 Grand Concourse Renovation .... 4,948 2,474 38 Site Acquisition .................... 750 375 39 LaGuardia Community College 40 Center 3 Renovations, Phase II .... 5,346 2,673 41 Department of Humanities 42 Renovation ....................... 17,012 8,506 43 Department of Computer Information 44 Systems .......................... 21,000 10,500 45 Medgar Evers College 46 Athletic Fields ................... 1,960 980 47 Bronx Community College 48 North Instructional Building ..... 60,962 30,481 49 Mechanical Systems & 112 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Infrastructure Upgrade Phase 1 .... 4,074 2,037 2 Borough Manhattan Community College 3 Training Program for Emergency 4 First Response ................... 21,400 10,700 5 North campus building ............. 2,000 1,000 6 Chambers Street Renovation Phase 7 II ................................ 5,506 2,753 8 Universitywide 9 For condition assessment: Health 10 and Safety ........................ 9,762 4,881 11 For condition assessment: 12 Facilities Preservation ........... 3,994 1,997 13 For condition assessment: ADA ..... 3,820 1,910 14 For construction, acquisition, 15 renovation or rehabilitation of 16 facilities including equipment and 17 other necessary incidental costs 18 related to the CUNY Incubator 19 Network .......................... 15,000 7,500 20 ------- ------- 21 Total ......................... 211,698 105,849 22 ======= ======= 23 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 24 State financial assistance to community colleges for alterations and 25 improvements to various facilities including services and expenses, 26 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 27 tation and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facili- 28 ties, new facilities, program improvement or program change, envi- 29 ronmental protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities 30 for the physically disabled, preventive maintenance and related 31 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2003, and 32 subject to a plan submitted annually by the city university of New 33 York and approved by the state director of the budget (30020350) 34 (15514) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,711,000) 35 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 37 An advance for state financial assistance to community colleges for 38 alterations and improvements to various facilities including 39 services and expenses, capital design, construction, acquisition, 40 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 41 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 42 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 43 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 44 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2003, subject 45 to an annual plan developed by the city university and approved by 46 the state director of the budget, and which may include, but not be 47 limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any 48 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 113 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 2 authority of the state of New York for such purpose (30050350) 3 (81067) ... 50,000,000 ........................... (re. $43,116,000) 4 Project Schedule 5 AMOUNT 6 -------------------------------------------- 7 (thousands of dollars) 8 Medgar Evers College ................ 19,400 9 -Academic Building I 10 University-wide ..................... 30,600 11 -For university-wide crit- 12 ical maintenance or capi- 13 tal improvement costs 14 attributable to the find- 15 ings of condition surveys 16 for health and safety, 17 preservation of facilities 18 and access for the phys- 19 ically disabled; code 20 compliance; asbestos 21 removal; emergencies; 22 energy conservation needs; 23 fire alarms, sprinklers, 24 electrical distribution 25 and heating and cooling 26 system requirements; and 27 other similar campus-wide 28 and system-wide needs 29 ------------ 30 Total ........................... 50,000 31 ============ 32 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as amended by chapter 54, 33 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 34 An advance for state financial assistance to community colleges for 35 alterations and improvements to various facilities including capital 36 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation 37 and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 38 new facilities, program improvement or program change, environmental 39 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 40 physically disabled, and related projects according to the following 41 project schedule. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all 42 or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated 43 or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 44 for such purpose (303198C1) (81067) ................................ 45 109,700,000 ...................................... (re. $10,230,000) 46 Project Schedule 114 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 AMOUNT 2 -------------------------------------------- 3 (thousands of dollars) 4 For payment of up to one- 5 half of the total capital 6 costs for community 7 colleges for health and 8 safety projects based on 9 the results of building 10 condition surveys ............... 1,500 11 For payment of up to one- 12 half of the total capital 13 costs for community 14 colleges for asbestos 15 removal and abatement ........... 1,000 16 For payment of up to one- 17 half of the total capital 18 costs for community 19 colleges for preservation 20 of facilities projects 21 based on the results of 22 building condition surveys ...... 2,000 23 For payment of up to one- 24 half of the total capital 25 costs for community 26 colleges for making 27 facilities accessible to the 28 physically disabled based 29 on the results of building 30 condition surveys ............... 1,000 31 For payment of up to one- 32 half of the total capital 33 costs for community 34 colleges for the 35 telecommunications initiative ... 2,000 36 For payment of up to one- 37 half of the total capital 38 costs for community 39 colleges for energy 40 conservation .................... 1,000 41 For payment of up to one- 42 half of the total capital 43 costs for community 44 colleges for the 45 educational technology 46 equipment initiative ............ 1,500 47 An additional advance for 48 state financial assistance 49 to community colleges for 50 alterations and 115 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 improvements to various 2 facilities including capital 3 design, construction, 4 acquisition, reconstruction, 5 rehabilitation and 6 equipment; for health and 7 safety, preservation of 8 facilities, new facilities, 9 program improvement or 10 program change, environ- 11 mental protection, energy 12 conservation, accredita- 13 tion, facilities for the 14 physically disabled, and 15 related projects according 16 to the following project 17 schedule (303198C1) ............ 99,700 18 -------------- 19 Total ......................... 109,700 20 ============== 21 Capital Projects Funds - Other 22 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 23 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 25 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 26 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 27 facilities, including services and expenses, capital design, 28 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for 29 health and safety, preservation of facilities, new facilities, 30 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 31 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 32 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 33 April 1, 2025 subject to an annual plan developed by the city 34 university and approved by the state director of the budget. 35 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 36 the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred 37 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 38 (30CC2503) (81067) ... 35,124,000 ................ (re. $35,124,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 40 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 41 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 42 facilities, including services and expenses, capital design, 43 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for 44 health and safety, preservation of facilities, new facilities, 45 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 46 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 47 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 116 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 April 1, 2024 subject to an annual plan developed by the city 2 university and approved by the state director of the budget. 3 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 4 the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred 5 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 6 (30CC2403) (81067) ... 15,650,000 ................ (re. $15,650,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 8 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 9 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 10 facilities, including services and expenses, capital design, 11 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for 12 health and safety, preservation of facilities, new facilities, 13 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 14 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 15 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 16 April 1, 2023 subject to an annual plan developed by the city 17 university and approved by the state director of the budget. 18 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 19 the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred 20 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 21 (30CC2303) (81067) ... 119,667,000 .............. (re. $117,876,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 23 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 24 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 25 facilities, including services and expenses, capital design, 26 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for 27 health and safety, preservation of facilities, new facilities, 28 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 29 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 30 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 31 April 1, 2022 subject to an annual plan developed by the city 32 university and approved by the state director of the budget. 33 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 34 the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred 35 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 36 (30CC2203) (81067) ... 44,793,000 ................ (re. $44,340,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 38 For services and expenses for state financial assistance to community 39 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 40 including services and expenses, capital design, construction, 41 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 42 preservation of facilities, new facilities program improvement or 43 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 44 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 45 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2021 subject to 46 an annual plan developed by the city university and approved by the 47 state director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other law to the 117 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be 2 suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state 3 of New York for such purpose (30CC2103) (81067) .................... 4 35,482,000 ....................................... (re. $35,193,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 6 For services and expenses for state financial assistance to community 7 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 8 including services and expenses, capital design, construction, 9 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 10 preservation of facilities, new facilities program improvement or 11 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 12 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 13 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2020 subject to 14 an annual plan developed by the city university and approved by the 15 state director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other law to the 16 contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be 17 suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state 18 of New York for such purpose (30CC2003) (81067) .................... 19 64,254,000 ....................................... (re. $63,554,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 21 For services and expenses for state financial assistance to community 22 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 23 including services and expenses, capital design, construction, 24 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 25 preservation of facilities, new facilities program improvement or 26 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 27 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 28 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2019 subject to 29 an annual plan developed by the city university and approved by the 30 state director of the budget, and which may include, but not be 31 limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any 32 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 33 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 34 authority of the state of New York for such purpose (30CC1903) 35 (81067) ... 68,293,000 ........................... (re. $63,732,000) 36 Project Schedule 37 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 38 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 39 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 40 ---------------------------------------------------------- 41 (thousands of dollars) 42 Borough Manhattan Community College 43 Childhood Center HVAC Upgrades ... 2,176 1,088 44 Door and Access Upgrades ......... 1,850 925 45 Bronx Community College 46 Alumni Gym HVAC and ADA Upgrades.. 6,000 3,000 47 Meister Hall Lab and Classroom 118 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Upgrades ....................... 800 400 2 Hostos Community College 3 Classroom Upgrades ............... 3,000 1,500 4 500 Grand Concourse Upgrades ..... 4,000 2,000 5 Kingsborough Community College 6 Performing Arts Center Upgrades .. 4,000 2,000 7 LaGuardia Community College 8 Center 3 Infrastructure and 9 Program Upgrades ............... 62,000 31,000 10 Student Tutoring Hub ............. 8,200 4,100 11 Library Upgrades Ph. II .......... 300 150 12 Queensborough Community College 13 ASAP Facility Upgrades ........... 2,700 1,350 14 For university-wide community college 15 critical maintenance or capital 16 improvement costs attributable to 17 preservation of facilities ....... 34,284 17,142 18 For university-wide community college 19 critical maintenance or capital 20 improvement costs attributable to 21 the accelerated conservation and 22 efficiency program ............... 1,196 598 23 For university-wide community college 24 critical maintenance or capital 25 improvement costs attributable to 26 facilities which support the CUNY 27 in the Heights programs .......... 6,080 3,040 28 ------- ------ 29 Total .......................... 136,586 68,293 30 ======= ====== 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 32 For services and expenses for state financial assistance to community 33 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 34 including services and expenses, capital design, construction, 35 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 36 preservation of facilities, new facilities program improvement or 37 program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 38 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 39 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2018 subject to 40 an annual plan developed by the city university and approved by the 41 state director of the budget, and which may include, but not be 42 limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any 43 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 44 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 45 authority of the state of New York for such purpose (30CC1803) 46 (81067) ... 48,483,000 ........................... (re. $39,417,000) 47 Project Schedule 48 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 119 12654-09-6 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE CITY UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 2 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 3 ---------------------------------------------------------- 4 (thousands of dollars) 5 Borough Manhattan Community College 6 Lighting Upgrades .............. 2,650 1,325 7 Pedestrian Walkway Upgrades .... 1,800 900 8 Bronx Community College 9 Student Center Exterior Renovation 1,000 500 10 Goud Memorial Library Restoration. 4,000 2,000 11 Community Hall Renovation ...... 1,000 500 12 Student Center ADA Upgrades .... 800 400 13 Hostos Community College 14 Lighting Upgrade ............... 750 375 15 Electrical System Upgrades ..... 500 250 16 Kingsborough Community College 17 Marina Upgrades ................ 3,000 1,500 18 Roadway Upgrades ............... 1,500 750 19 LaGuardia Community College 20 Science Lab Renovations ........ 10,200 5,100 21 Queensborough Community College 22 Theater Upgrades ............... 2,200 1,100 23 Kitchen and Cafeteria Renovation 6,400 3,200 24 For university-wide community college 25 critical maintenance or capital 26 improvement costs attributable to 27 preservation of facilities ..... 58,166 29,083 28 For university-wide community college 29 critical maintenance or capital 30 improvement costs attributable to 31 facilities which support ASAP 32 programs ....................... 3,000 1,500 33 ------- ------ 34 Total ........................ 96,966 48,483 35 ======= ====== 120 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 602,655,000 1,917,211,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 602,655,000 1,917,211,000 8 ================ ================ 9 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) ................ 113,655,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Correctional Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 13 DOCS Rehabilitation Projects Account - 32352 14 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 15 For the maintenance and operation of various 16 facilities and systems including personal 17 services, fringe benefits and indirect 18 costs. Notwithstanding any other law to 19 the contrary, all or a portion of the 20 funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 21 cated or transferred to any department, 22 agency, or public authority (10FM26MO) 23 (81107) .................................... 113,655,000 24 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENT OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) ... 489,000,000 25 -------------- 26 Capital Projects Funds - Other 27 Correctional Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 28 DOCS Rehabilitation Projects Account - 32352 29 Administration Purpose 30 For the preparation and review of plans, 31 specifications, estimates, studies, plant 32 evaluations, inspections, appraisals and 33 surveys, and legal claims relating to 34 existing or proposed facilities of the 35 department of corrections and community 36 supervision, and payment of personal 37 service and nonpersonal service, including 38 fringe benefits, related to the adminis- 39 tration and security of capital projects 40 provided by the department of corrections 41 and community supervision for new and 42 reappropriated projects (10502650) (81065) .. 34,000,000 43 Capital Projects Funds - Other 121 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Correctional Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 2 DOCS Rehabilitation Projects Account - 32352 3 Environmental Protection or Improvements Purpose 4 Alterations and improvements, including 5 related departmental administrative costs, 6 for environmental protection or improve- 7 ments including liabilities incurred prior 8 to April 1, 2026 (10062606) (81062) ......... 20,851,000 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 Correctional Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 11 DOCS Rehabilitation Projects Account - 32352 12 Health and Safety Purpose 13 Alterations and improvements, including 14 related departmental administrative costs, 15 for health and safety including liabil- 16 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2026 17 (10012601)(81028) ............................ 4,473,000 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Correctional Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 20 DOCS Rehabilitation Projects Account - 32352 21 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 22 Alterations and improvements, including 23 related departmental administrative costs, 24 for the preservation of facilities includ- 25 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 26 2026 (10032603) (81010) .................... 277,660,000 27 Alterations and improvements, including 28 related departmental administrative costs, 29 for preventative maintenance that will 30 prolong the useful life of assets includ- 31 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 32 2026 (10M32603) (81091) ..................... 20,000,000 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Correctional Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 35 DOCS Rehabilitation Projects Account - 32352 36 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 37 For services and expenses related to the 38 development and implementation of an elec- 39 tronic health record system (10262608) ...... 35,800,000 40 Alterations and improvements, including 41 related departmental administrative costs, 42 for program improvement or program change 43 including liabilities incurred prior to 44 April 1, 2026 (10082608) (81063) ............ 93,216,000 122 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Alterations and improvements within the 2 correctional industries program, including 3 related departmental administrative costs, 4 for program improvement or program change 5 including liabilities incurred prior to 6 April 1, 2026 (10IN2608) (19701) ............. 3,000,000 123 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Correctional Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 4 DOCS Rehabilitation Projects Account - 32352 5 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 7 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 8 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 9 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 10 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 11 any department, agency, or public authority (10FM25MO) (81107) ..... 12 113,655,000 ..................................... (re. $113,655,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 15 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 16 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 17 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 18 any department, agency, or public authority (10FM24MO) (81107) 19 111,427,000 ...................................... (re. $55,142,000) 20 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENT OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) 21 Capital Projects Funds - Other 22 Correctional Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 23 DOCS Rehabilitation Projects Account - 32352 24 Administration Purpose 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 26 For the preparation and review of plans, specifications, estimates, 27 studies, plant evaluations, inspections, appraisals and surveys, and 28 legal claims relating to existing or proposed facilities of the 29 department of corrections and community supervision, and payment of 30 personal service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, 31 related to the administration and security of capital projects 32 provided by the department of corrections and community supervision 33 for new and reappropriated projects (10502550) (81065) ............. 34 34,000,000 ....................................... (re. $23,989,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 36 For the preparation and review of plans, specifications, estimates, 37 studies, plant evaluations, inspections, appraisals and surveys, and 38 legal claims relating to existing or proposed facilities of the 39 department of corrections and community supervision, and payment of 40 personal service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, 41 related to the administration and security of capital projects 42 provided by the department of corrections and community supervision 43 for new and reappropriated projects (10502450) (81065) ............. 44 27,000,000 ............................................ (re. $1,000) 124 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 For the preparation and review of plans, specifications, estimates, 3 studies, plant evaluations, inspections, appraisals and surveys, and 4 legal claims relating to existing or proposed facilities of the 5 department of corrections and community supervision, and payment of 6 personal service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, 7 related to the administration and security of capital projects 8 provided by the department of corrections and community supervision 9 for new and reappropriated projects (10502350) (81065) ............. 10 16,000,000 .......................................... (re. $116,000) 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Correctional Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 13 DOCS Rehabilitation Projects Account - 32352 14 Environmental Protection or Improvements Purpose 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 16 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 17 trative costs, for environmental protection or improvements includ- 18 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (10062506) (81062) 19 ... 20,851,000 ................................... (re. $20,851,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 22 trative costs, for environmental protection or improvements includ- 23 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (10062406) (81062) 24 ... 20,851,000 ................................... (re. $12,561,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 27 trative costs, for environmental protection or improvements includ- 28 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (10062306) (81062) 29 ... 23,000,000 .................................... (re. $8,178,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 31 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 32 trative costs, for environmental protection or improvements includ- 33 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (10062206) (81062) 34 ... 23,000,000 .................................... (re. $3,318,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 36 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 37 trative costs, for environmental protection or improvements includ- 38 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (10062106) (81062) 39 ... 23,000,000 ...................................... (re. $770,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 41 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 42 trative costs, for environmental protection or improvements includ- 43 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (10062006) (81062) 44 ... 23,000,000 .................................... (re. $2,770,000) 125 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 2 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 3 trative costs, for environmental protection or improvements includ- 4 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (10061906) (81062) 5 ... 24,000,000 ...................................... (re. $378,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 7 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 8 trative costs, for environmental protection or improvements includ- 9 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (10061706) (81062) 10 ... 24,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,000) 11 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 12 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 13 trative costs, for environmental protection or improvements includ- 14 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (10061606) (81062) 15 ... 62,000,000 .................................... (re. $4,724,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 17 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 18 trative costs, for environmental protection or improvements includ- 19 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2013 (10061306) (81062) 20 ... 28,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 22 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 23 trative costs, for environmental protection or improvements includ- 24 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2012 (10061206) (81062) 25 ... 24,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,000) 26 Capital Projects Funds - Other 27 Correctional Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 28 DOCS Rehabilitation Projects Account - 32352 29 Facilities for the Physically Disabled Purpose 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2000: 31 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 32 trative costs, of facilities for the physically disabled including 33 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2000 (10A40004) (81061) ... 34 2,000,000 ............................................. (re. $1,000) 35 Capital Projects Funds - Other 36 Correctional Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 37 DOCS Rehabilitation Projects Account - 32352 38 Health and Safety Purpose 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 40 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 41 trative costs, for health and safety including liabilities incurred 42 prior to April 1, 2025 (10012501) (81028) .......................... 43 4,473,000 ......................................... (re. $4,473,000) 126 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 3 trative costs, for health and safety including liabilities incurred 4 prior to April 1, 2024 (10012401) (81028) .......................... 5 11,473,000 ....................................... (re. $11,473,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 7 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 8 trative costs, for health and safety including liabilities incurred 9 prior to April 1, 2023 (10012301) (81028) .......................... 10 23,000,000 ....................................... (re. $22,970,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 12 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 13 trative costs, for health and safety including liabilities incurred 14 prior to April 1, 2022 (10012201) (81028) .......................... 15 23,000,000 ....................................... (re. $17,508,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 17 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 18 trative costs, for health and safety including liabilities incurred 19 prior to April 1, 2021 (10012101) (81028) .......................... 20 23,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,473,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 22 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 23 trative costs, for health and safety including liabilities incurred 24 prior to April 1, 2020 (10012001) (81028) .......................... 25 23,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,388,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 27 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 28 trative costs, for health and safety including liabilities incurred 29 prior to April 1, 2019 (10011901) (81028) .......................... 30 15,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,907,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 32 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 33 trative costs, for health and safety including liabilities incurred 34 prior to April 1, 2018 (10011801) (81028) .......................... 35 15,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,897,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 37 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 38 trative costs, for health and safety including liabilities incurred 39 prior to April 1, 2017 (10011701) (81028) .......................... 40 15,000,000 .......................................... (re. $935,000) 41 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 42 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 43 trative costs, for health and safety including liabilities incurred 127 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 prior to April 1, 2016 (10011601) (81028) .......................... 2 23,000,000 ........................................... (re. $26,000) 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Correctional Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 5 DOCS Rehabilitation Projects Account - 32352 6 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 8 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 9 trative costs, for the preservation of facilities including liabil- 10 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (10032503) (81010) ........... 11 276,460,000 ...................................... (re.$275,967,000) 12 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 13 trative costs, for preventative maintenance that will prolong the 14 useful life of assets including liabilities incurred prior to April 15 1, 2025 (10M32503) (81091) ......................................... 16 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $19,989,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 18 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 19 trative costs, for the preservation of facilities including liabil- 20 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (10032403) (81010) ........... 21 281,460,000 ..................................... (re. $229,304,000) 22 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 23 trative costs, for preventative maintenance that will prolong the 24 useful life of assets including liabilities incurred prior to April 25 1, 2024 (10M32403) (81091) ... 15,000,000 ........ (re. $14,998,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 27 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 28 trative costs, for the preservation of facilities including liabil- 29 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (10032303) (81010) ........... 30 205,000,000 ...................................... (re. $93,882,000) 31 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 32 trative costs, for preventative maintenance that will prolong the 33 useful life of assets including liabilities incurred prior to April 34 1, 2023 (10M32303) (81091) ... 15,000,000 ......... (re. $9,214,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 36 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 37 trative costs, for the preservation of facilities including liabil- 38 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (10032203) (81010) ........... 39 205,000,000 ...................................... (re. $75,788,000) 40 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 41 trative costs, for preventative maintenance that will prolong the 42 useful life of assets including liabilities incurred prior to April 43 1, 2022 (10M32203) (81091) ... 15,000,000 ......... (re. $4,899,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 45 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 46 trative costs, for the preservation of facilities including liabil- 128 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (10032103) (81010) ........... 2 165,000,000 ...................................... (re. $27,060,000) 3 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 4 trative costs, for preventative maintenance that will prolong the 5 useful life of assets including liabilities incurred prior to April 6 1, 2021 (10M32103) (81091) ... 15,000,000 ......... (re. $1,048,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 8 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 9 trative costs, for the preservation of facilities including liabil- 10 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (10032003) (81010) ........... 11 165,000,000 ...................................... (re. $22,555,000) 12 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 13 trative costs, for preventative maintenance that will prolong the 14 useful life of assets including liabilities incurred prior to April 15 1, 2020 (10M32003) (81091) ... 15,000,000 ......... (re. $1,464,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 17 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 18 trative costs, for the preservation of facilities including liabil- 19 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (10031903) (81010) ........... 20 166,000,000 ...................................... (re. $13,204,000) 21 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 22 trative costs, for preventative maintenance that will prolong the 23 useful life of assets including liabilities incurred prior to April 24 1, 2019 (10M31903) (81091) ... 15,000,000 ........... (re. $972,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 26 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 27 trative costs, for the preservation of facilities including liabil- 28 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (10031803) (81010) ........... 29 166,000,000 ....................................... (re. $4,392,000) 30 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 31 trative costs, for preventative maintenance that will prolong the 32 useful life of assets including liabilities incurred prior to April 33 1, 2018 (10M31803) (81091) ... 15,000,000 ........... (re. $118,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 35 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 36 trative costs, for the preservation of facilities including liabil- 37 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (10031703) (81010) ........... 38 141,000,000 ....................................... (re. $7,635,000) 39 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 40 trative costs, for preventative maintenance that will prolong the 41 useful life of assets including liabilities incurred prior to April 42 1, 2017 (10M31703) (81091) ... 15,000,000 ............. (re. $6,000) 43 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 44 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 45 trative costs, for the preservation of facilities including liabil- 46 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (10031603) (81010) ........... 47 92,000,000 .......................................... (re. $354,000) 129 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 2 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 3 trative costs, for the preservation of facilities including liabil- 4 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2013 (10031303) (81010) ........... 5 186,000,000 ......................................... (re. $273,000) 6 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 7 trative costs, for preventative maintenance that will prolong the 8 useful life of assets including liabilities incurred prior to April 9 1, 2013 (10M31303) (81091) ... 13,000,000 ............. (re. $1,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 11 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 12 trative costs, for the preservation of facilities including liabil- 13 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2012 (10031203) (81010) ........... 14 174,000,000 ......................................... (re. $226,000) 15 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 16 trative costs, for preventative maintenance that will prolong the 17 useful life of assets including liabilities incurred prior to April 18 1, 2012 (10M31203) (81091) ... 15,000,000 ............ (re. $19,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 20 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 21 trative costs, for the preservation of facilities including liabil- 22 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2011 (10031103) (81010) ........... 23 174,000,000 .......................................... (re. $97,000) 24 Capital Projects Funds - Other 25 Correctional Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 26 DOCS Rehabilitation Projects Account - 32352 27 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 29 For services and expenses related to accelerating the installation of 30 the fixed camera system and associated technology across all correc- 31 tional facilities including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 32 2025 (10252508) (17530) ............................................ 33 400,000,000 .................................... (re. $397,673,000) 34 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 35 trative costs, for program improvement or program change including 36 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (10082508) (81063) ... 37 93,216,000 ....................................... (re. $93,216,000) 38 Alterations and improvements within the correctional industries 39 program, including related departmental administrative costs, for 40 program improvement or program change including liabilities incurred 41 prior to April 1, 2025 (10IN2508) (19701) .......................... 42 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 44 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 45 trative costs, for program improvement or program change including 46 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (10082408) (81063) ... 47 93,216,000 ....................................... (re. $91,117,000) 130 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Alterations and improvements within the correctional industries 2 program, including related departmental administrative costs, for 3 program improvement or program change including liabilities incurred 4 prior to April 1, 2024 (10IN2408) (19701) .......................... 5 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 7 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 8 trative costs, for program improvement or program change including 9 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (10082308) (81063) ... 10 87,000,000 ....................................... (re. $60,184,000) 11 Alterations and improvements within the correctional industries 12 program, including related departmental administrative costs, for 13 program improvement or program change including liabilities incurred 14 prior to April 1, 2023 (10IN2308) (19701) .......................... 15 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 17 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 18 trative costs, for program improvement or program change including 19 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (10082208) (81063) 20 87,000,000 ....................................... (re. $55,517,000) 21 Alterations and improvements within the correctional industries 22 program, including related departmental administrative costs, for 23 program improvement or program change including liabilities incurred 24 prior to April 1, 2022 (10IN2208) (19701) .......................... 25 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 27 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 28 trative costs, for program improvement or program change including 29 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (10082108) (81063) ..... 30 87,000,000 ....................................... (re. $42,499,000) 31 Alterations and improvements within the correctional industries 32 program, including related departmental administrative costs, for 33 program improvement or program change including liabilities incurred 34 prior to April 1, 2021 (10IN2108) (19701) .......................... 35 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 37 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 38 trative costs, for program improvement or program change including 39 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (10082008) (81063) ..... 40 87,000,000 ....................................... (re. $27,733,000) 41 Alterations and improvements within the correctional industries 42 program, including related departmental administrative costs, for 43 program improvement or program change including liabilities incurred 44 prior to April 1, 2020 (10IN2008) (19701) .......................... 45 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 131 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 2 trative costs, for program improvement or program change including 3 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (10081908) (81063) ..... 4 164,000,000 ....................................... (re. $3,376,000) 5 Alterations and improvements within the correctional industries 6 program, including related departmental administrative costs, for 7 program improvement or program change including liabilities incurred 8 prior to April 1, 2019 (10IN1908) (19701) .......................... 9 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,511,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 11 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 12 trative costs, for program improvement or program change including 13 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (10081808) (81063) ..... 14 95,000,000 .......................................... (re. $954,000) 15 Alterations and improvements within the correctional industries 16 program, including related departmental administrative costs, for 17 program improvement or program change including liabilities incurred 18 prior to April 1, 2018 (10IN1808) (19701) .......................... 19 3,000,000 ........................................... (re. $271,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 21 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 22 trative costs, for program improvement or program change including 23 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (10081708) (81063) ..... 24 95,000,000 .......................................... (re. $366,000) 25 Alterations and improvements within the correctional industries 26 program, including related departmental administrative costs, for 27 program improvement or program change including liabilities incurred 28 prior to April 1, 2017 (10IN1708) (19701) .......................... 29 3,000,000 ............................................ (re. $16,000) 30 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 31 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 32 trative costs, for program improvement or program change including 33 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (10081608) (81063) ..... 34 69,000,000 ........................................... (re. $28,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 36 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 37 trative costs, for program improvement or program change including 38 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2013 (10081308) (81063) ..... 39 46,000,000 .......................................... (re. $761,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 41 Alterations and improvements, including related departmental adminis- 42 trative costs, for program improvement or program change including 43 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2012 (10081208) (81063) 44 56,000,000 ............................................ (re. $1,000) 132 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 85,000,000 320,160,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 85,000,000 320,160,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SAFETY AND SECURITY PROJECTS FOR AT RISK FACILITIES (CCP) ... 85,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 14 For grants to provide safety and security 15 projects at nonprofit organizations at 16 risk of hate crimes or attacks including, 17 but not limited to, at a facility, virtu- 18 ally or on the internet because of their 19 ideology, beliefs or mission. Provided 20 that an assessment of facilities at risk 21 may include, but not be limited to, 22 considerations of the vulnerabilities of 23 the organization based on its location and 24 membership, and the potential consequences 25 of a hate crime or attack at the facility. 26 Recipients of such grants shall be enti- 27 tled to use such funds to purchase commod- 28 ities, services, and technology through 29 centralized contracts established by the 30 office of general services under section 31 163 of the state finance law, and such 32 recipients shall be deemed for such 33 purpose to be authorized users within the 34 meaning of paragraph k of subdivision 1 of 35 section 163 of the state finance law. All 36 or a portion of the funds appropriated 37 herein may be suballocated to any depart- 38 ment or agency (CJSS2608) (55970) ........... 35,000,000 39 For grants to support capital investments 40 related to innovative crime-reduction 41 strategies in communities affected by gun 42 violence. Recipients of such grants shall 43 be entitled to use such funds to purchase 44 commodities, services, and technology 45 through centralized contracts established 46 by the office of general services under 47 section 163 of the state finance law, and 48 such recipients shall be deemed for such 133 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 purpose to be authorized users within the 2 meaning of paragraph k of subdivision 1 of 3 section 163 of the state finance law. All 4 or a portion of the funds appropriated 5 herein may be suballocated to any depart- 6 ment or agency. A portion of this appro- 7 priation herein may be distributed through 8 a community engagement process, pursuant 9 to a plan submitted by the commissioner of 10 division of criminal justice services and 11 approved by the director of the budget 12 (CJGV2608) (60175) .......................... 50,000,000 134 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ADMINISTRATION (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 6 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 7 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software, and 8 services. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any other 9 state department to achieve the purpose of this appropriation 10 (CJSF2308) (60190) ... 18,000,000 ................ (re. $18,000,000) 11 DISCOVERY IMPLEMENTATION AND PRETRIAL SERVICES (CCP) 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 14 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 16 For services, expenses and grants related to the acquisition and 17 development of technology to support discovery, including but not 18 limited to, equipment, software, hardware, and consulting services. 19 Funding from this appropriation shall only be distributed pursuant 20 to a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal 21 justice services and approved by the director of the budget. Eligi- 22 ble entities shall include cities with a population greater than one 23 million. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, all or a 24 portion of these funds may be suballocated or transferred to any 25 department, agency, public authority or the judiciary (CJDC2308) 26 (60191) ... 50,000,000 ........................... (re. $45,326,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 28 To support capital investments related to statewide discovery data- 29 base, including but not limited to equipment, and technology 30 enhancements. All or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may 31 be transferred or suballocated to any state department, agency, or 32 the judiciary (CJDI2208) (60187) ... 25,000,000 .. (re. $19,209,000) 33 For payments to counties and nonprofit organizations to support capi- 34 tal investments related to pretrial, alternative to incarceration 35 services and reentry programs, including but not limited to equip- 36 ment, technology, and facility renovations. Funding under this 37 appropriation shall be pursuant to a plan developed by the commis- 38 sioner of division of criminal justice services and approved by the 39 director of the budget. All or a portion of the funds appropriated 40 herein may be suballocated to any department or agency (CJPS2208) 41 (60188) ... 10,000,000 ........................... (re. $10,000,000) 42 SAFETY AND SECURITY PROJECTS FOR AT RISK FACILITIES (CCP) 43 Capital Projects Funds - Other 44 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 135 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 2 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 3 For grants to provide safety and security projects at nonprofit organ- 4 izations at risk of hate crimes or attacks including, but not limit- 5 ed to, at a facility, virtually or on the internet because of their 6 ideology, beliefs or mission. Provided that an assessment of facili- 7 ties at risk may include, but not be limited to, considerations of 8 the vulnerabilities of the organization based on its location and 9 membership, and the potential consequences of a hate crime or attack 10 at the facility. Recipients of such grants shall be entitled to use 11 such funds to purchase commodities, services, and technology through 12 centralized contracts established by the office of general services 13 under section 163 of the state finance law, and such recipients 14 shall be deemed for such purpose to be authorized users within the 15 meaning of paragraph k of subdivision 1 of section 163 of the state 16 finance law. All or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may 17 be suballocated to any department or agency (CJSS2508) (55970) ... 18 35,000,000 ....................................... (re. $35,000,000) 19 For grants to support capital investments related to innovative crime- 20 reduction strategies in communities affected by gun violence. 21 Recipients of such grants shall be entitled to use such funds to 22 purchase commodities, services, and technology through centralized 23 contracts established by the office of general services under 24 section 163 of the state finance law, and such recipients shall be 25 deemed for such purpose to be authorized users within the meaning of 26 paragraph k of subdivision 1 of section 163 of the state finance 27 law. All or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be subal- 28 located to any department or agency. A portion of this appropriation 29 herein may be distributed through a community engagement process, 30 pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of division of 31 criminal justice services and approved by the director of the budget 32 (CJGV2508) (60175) ................................................. 33 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,000,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 35 For grants to provide safety and security projects at nonprofit organ- 36 izations at risk of hate crimes or attacks including, but not limit- 37 ed to, at a facility, virtually or on the internet because of their 38 ideology, beliefs or mission. Provided that an assessment of facili- 39 ties at risk may include, but not be limited to, considerations of 40 the vulnerabilities of the organization based on its location and 41 membership, and the potential consequences of a hate crime or attack 42 at the facility. Recipients of such grants shall be entitled to use 43 such funds to purchase commodities, services, and technology through 44 centralized contracts established by the office of general services 45 under section 163 of the state finance law, and such recipients 46 shall be deemed for such purpose to be authorized users within the 47 meaning of paragraph k of subdivision 1 of section 163 of the state 48 finance law. All or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may 49 be suballocated to any department or agency (CJSS2408) (55970) ..... 50 35,000,000 ....................................... (re. $34,956,000) 136 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 For competitive grants to provide safety and security projects at 3 nonprofit organizations at risk of hate crimes or attacks including, 4 but not limited to, at a facility, virtually or on the internet 5 because of their ideology, beliefs or mission, provided that 6 $10,000,000 be made available for not-for-profit reproductive health 7 centers. Provided that an assessment of facilities at risk may 8 include, but not be limited to, considerations of the vulnerabili- 9 ties of the organization based on its location and membership, and 10 the potential consequences of a hate crime or attack at the facili- 11 ty. Recipients of such grants shall be entitled to use such funds to 12 purchase commodities, services, and technology through centralized 13 contracts established by the office of general services under 14 section 163 of the state finance law, and such recipients shall be 15 deemed for such purpose to be authorized users within the meaning of 16 paragraph k of subdivision 1 of section 163 of the state finance 17 law. All or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be subal- 18 located to any department or agency (CJSS2308) (55970) ............. 19 35,000,000 ....................................... (re. $34,973,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 For competitive grants to provide safety and security projects at 22 nonprofit organizations at risk of hate crimes or attacks including, 23 but not limited to, at a facility, virtually or on the internet 24 because of their ideology, beliefs or mission. Provided that an 25 assessment of facilities at risk may include, but not be limited to, 26 considerations of the vulnerabilities of the organization based on 27 its location and membership, and the potential consequences of a 28 hate crime or attack at the facility. Recipients of such grants 29 shall be entitled to use such funds to purchase commodities, 30 services, and technology through centralized contracts established 31 by the office of general services under section 163 of the state 32 finance law, and such recipients shall be deemed for such purpose to 33 be authorized users within the meaning of paragraph k of subdivision 34 1 of section 163 of the state finance law. All or a portion of the 35 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any department or 36 agency (CJSS2208) (55970) ... 25,000,000 ......... (re. $16,162,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 39 For grants to support capital investments related to innovative crime- 40 reduction strategies in communities affected by gun violence. 41 Recipients of such grants shall be entitled to use such funds to 42 purchase commodities, services, and technology through centralized 43 contracts established by the office of general services under 44 section 163 of the state finance law, and such recipients shall be 45 deemed for such purpose to be authorized users within the meaning of 46 paragraph k of subdivision 1 of section 163 of the state finance 47 law. All or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be subal- 48 located to any department or agency. A portion of this appropriation 49 herein may be distributed through a community engagement process, 50 pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of division of 137 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 criminal justice services and approved by the director of the budget 2 (CJGV2208) (60175) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $21,391,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 4 For competitive grants to provide safety and security projects at 5 nonprofit organizations at risk of hate crimes or attacks including, 6 but not limited to, at a facility, virtually or on the internet 7 because of their ideology, beliefs or mission. Provided that an 8 assessment of facilities at risk may include, but not be limited to, 9 considerations of the vulnerabilities of the organization based on 10 its location and membership, and the potential consequences of a 11 hate crime or attack at the facility. Recipients of such grants 12 shall be entitled to use such funds to purchase commodities, 13 services, and technology through centralized contracts established 14 by the office of general services under section 163 of the state 15 finance law, and such recipients shall be deemed for such purpose to 16 be authorized users within the meaning of paragraph k of subdivision 17 1 of section 163 of the state finance law. All or a portion of the 18 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any department or 19 agency (CJSS2108) (55970) ... 25,000,000 ......... (re. $17,995,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 21 For competitive grants to provide safety and security projects at 22 nonprofit organizations at risk of hate crimes or attacks because of 23 their ideology, beliefs or mission. Provided that an assessment of 24 facilities at risk may include, but not be limited to, consider- 25 ations of the vulnerabilities of the organization based on its 26 location and membership, and the potential consequences of a hate 27 crime or attack at the facility. Recipients of such grants shall be 28 entitled to use such funds to purchase commodities, services, and 29 technology through centralized contracts established by the office 30 of general services under section 163 of the state finance law, and 31 such recipients shall be deemed for such purpose to be authorized 32 users within the meaning of paragraph k of subdivision 1 of section 33 163 of the state finance law. All or a portion of the funds appro- 34 priated herein may be suballocated to any department or agency 35 (CJSS2008) (55970) ... 25,000,000 ................ (re. $17,148,000) 138 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 203,463,000 2,470,114,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 203,463,000 2,470,114,000 8 ================ ================ 9 ADMINISTRATION (CCP) ........................................ 22,400,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 14 For various rehabilitation projects to keep 15 facilities in a safe operating condition 16 subject to a plan developed by the educa- 17 tion department and approved by the direc- 18 tor of the budget (11MR2603) (21860) ........ 18,200,000 19 For the maintenance and operation of various 20 facilities and systems including personal 21 services, fringe benefits and indirect 22 costs. Notwithstanding any other law to 23 the contrary, all or a portion of the 24 funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 25 cated or transferred to any department, 26 agency, or public authority (11PS2603) 27 (23304) ...................................... 4,200,000 28 CULTURAL EDUCATION CENTER (CCP) .............................. 1,500,000 29 -------------- 30 Capital Projects Funds - Other 31 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 32 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 33 For various rehabilitation and renovation 34 projects to keep the cultural education 35 center in a safe and satisfactory operat- 36 ing condition, including but not limited 37 to preservation and revamp of collections 38 and exhibits, security equipment and 39 enhancements, lighting upgrades, and visi- 40 tor counting equipment, subject to a plan 41 developed by the education department and 42 approved by the director of the budget 43 (11CE2603) ................................... 1,500,000 139 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 LIBRARY CONSTRUCTION (CCP) .................................. 44,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 5 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 6 For total approved project costs pursuant to 7 section 273-a of the education law, for 8 approved projects, excluding feasibility 9 studies, plans or similar activities, for 10 the acquisition of vacant land and the 11 acquisition, construction, renovation or 12 rehabilitation, including leasehold 13 improvements, of buildings of public 14 libraries and library systems chartered by 15 the regents of the state of New York or 16 established by an act of the legislature, 17 subject to distribution provisions in 18 subdivision 5 of section 273-a of the 19 education law on and upon approval by the 20 commissioner (11LC2608) (23486) ............. 34,000,000 21 For additional total approved project costs 22 pursuant to section 273-a of the education 23 law, for approved projects, excluding 24 feasibility studies, plans or similar 25 activities, for the acquisition of vacant 26 land and the acquisition, construction, 27 renovation or rehabilitation, including 28 projects related to health and safety and 29 the Americans with Disabilities Act of 30 1990 and leasehold improvements, of build- 31 ings of public libraries and library 32 systems chartered by the regents of the 33 state of New York or established by an act 34 of the legislature, subject to distrib- 35 ution provisions in subdivision 5 of 36 section 273-a of the education law on and 37 upon approval by the commissioner ........... 10,000,000 38 NON-PUBLIC SCHOOL HEALTH AND SAFETY PROJECTS (CCP) .......... 90,000,000 39 -------------- 40 Capital Projects Funds - Other 41 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 42 Health and Safety Purpose 43 For services and expenses for nonpublic 44 schools of health and safety equipment, 45 security personnel, related assessments 46 and training needs, remediation of hazard- 47 ous conditions, and the repair and mainte- 140 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 nance of buildings, facilities, appurte- 2 nances, equipment and systems to maintain 3 the health and safety of school building 4 occupants, utilizing competitive and 5 noncompetitive grants pursuant to a plan 6 developed by the commissioner of education 7 and approved by the director of the budget 8 (11SE2601) (55990) .......................... 90,000,000 9 SCHOOLS FOR NATIVE AMERICAN RESERVATIONS (CCP) .............. 20,099,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 14 For various rehabilitation and renovation 15 projects to keep facilities at the stat- 16 eowned St. Regis Mohawk School, the Onon- 17 daga Nation School, and the Tuscarora 18 Nation School in a safe and satisfactory 19 operating condition, subject to a plan 20 developed by the education department and 21 approved by the director of the budget 22 (11NA2608) (23368) .......................... 20,099,000 23 SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND (CCP) .................................. 22,470,000 24 -------------- 25 Capital Projects Funds - Other 26 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 27 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 28 For various rehabilitation and renovation 29 projects to keep facilities at the School 30 for the Blind in a safe and satisfactory 31 operating condition subject to a plan 32 developed by the education department and 33 approved by the director of the budget 34 (11BB2608) (23369) .......................... 22,470,000 35 SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF (CCP) .................................... 2,994,000 36 -------------- 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 39 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 40 For various rehabilitation and renovation 41 projects to keep facilities at the School 42 for the Deaf in a safe and satisfactory 141 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 operating condition subject to a plan 2 developed by the education department and 3 approved by the director of the budget 4 (11RD2608) (23370) ........................... 2,994,000 142 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ADMINISTRATION (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For various rehabilitation projects to keep facilities in a safe oper- 7 ating condition subject to a plan developed by the education depart- 8 ment and approved by the director of the budget (11MR2503) (21860) 9 ... 23,400,000 ................................... (re. $23,378,000) 10 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 11 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 12 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 13 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 14 any department, agency, or public authority (11PS2503) (23304) ... 15 4,200,000 ......................................... (re. $2,185,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 17 For various minor rehabilitation projects to keep facilities in a safe 18 operating condition subject to a plan developed by the education 19 department and approved by the director of the budget (11MR2403) 20 (21860) ... 3,400,000 ............................. (re. $1,444,000) 21 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 22 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 23 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 24 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 25 any department, agency, or public authority (11PS2403) (23304) ... 26 4,200,000 ......................................... (re. $2,423,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 28 For various minor rehabilitation projects to keep facilities in a safe 29 operating condition subject to a plan developed by the education 30 department and approved by the director of the budget (11MR2303) 31 (21860) ... 3,400,000 ............................. (re. $3,129,000) 32 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 33 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 34 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 35 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 36 any department, agency, or public authority (11PS2303) (23304) ..... 37 4,200,000 ............................................. (re. $5,200) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 39 For various minor rehabilitation projects to keep facilities in a safe 40 operating condition subject to a plan developed by the education 41 department and approved by the director of the budget (11MR2203) 42 (21860) ... 6,000,000 ............................. (re. $4,097,000) 43 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 44 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 45 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 46 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 143 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 any department, agency, or public authority (11PS2203) (23304) ..... 2 4,200,000 ............................................ (re. $27,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 4 For various minor rehabilitation projects to keep facilities in a safe 5 operating condition subject to a plan developed by the education 6 department and approved by the director of the budget (11MR2103) 7 (21860) ... 3,400,000 ............................. (re. $1,818,000) 8 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 9 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 10 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 11 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 12 any department, agency, or public authority (11PS2103) (23304) ..... 13 4,200,000 ......................................... (re. $1,486,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 15 For various minor rehabilitation projects to keep facilities in a safe 16 operating condition subject to a plan developed by the education 17 department and approved by the director of the budget (11MR2003) 18 (21860) ... 3,400,000 ............................. (re. $1,645,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 20 For various minor rehabilitation projects to keep facilities in a safe 21 operating condition subject to a plan developed by the education 22 department and approved by the director of the budget (11021903) 23 (21860) ... 3,400,000 ............................. (re. $1,950,000) 24 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 25 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 26 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 27 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 28 any department, agency, or public authority (11PS1903) (23304) ..... 29 4,100,000 ............................................ (re. $44,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 31 For various minor rehabilitation projects to keep facilities in a safe 32 operating condition subject to a plan developed by the education 33 department and approved by the director of the budget (11021803) 34 (21860) ... 3,400,000 ............................. (re. $1,144,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 36 For various minor rehabilitation projects to keep facilities in a safe 37 operating condition subject to a plan developed by the education 38 department and approved by the director of the budget (11021703) 39 (21860) ... 3,400,000 ............................... (re. $599,000) 40 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 41 For various minor rehabilitation projects to keep facilities in a safe 42 operating condition subject to a plan developed by the education 43 department and approved by the director of the budget (11021603) 44 (21860) ... 3,400,000 ................................. (re. $2,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 144 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For various minor rehabilitation projects to keep facilities in a safe 2 operating condition subject to a plan developed by the education 3 department and approved by the director of the budget (11021503) 4 (21860) ... 3,400,000 ............................... (re. $237,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 6 For various minor rehabilitation projects to keep facilities in a safe 7 operating condition, including but not limited to fire alarm system 8 and security system upgrades at the School for the Blind at Batavia, 9 subject to a plan developed by the education department and approved 10 by the director of the budget (11021303) (21860) ................... 11 3,400,000 ............................................ (re. $85,000) 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 14 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 15 By chapter 100, section 2, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 16 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 17 For services and expenses related to implementing a state longitudinal 18 data system including but not limited to the development and 19 purchase of computer hardware, software, and related equipment, such 20 amount shall include expenses to be made by the State University of 21 New York and the City University of New York provided that the 22 amount appropriated herein shall be subject to a plan developed by 23 the education department and approved by the director of the budget. 24 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and subject 25 to the approval of the director of the budget, a portion of the 26 funds appropriated herein may be transferred to the State University 27 of New York and City University of New York to carry out the 28 purposes of this appropriation (11031008) (21861) .................. 29 20,400,000 ....................................... (re. $10,220,000) 30 BREAKFAST AFTER THE BELL EQUIPMENT GRANTS (CCP) 31 Capital Projects Funds - Other 32 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 33 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 35 For grants to public elementary or secondary schools required to 36 implement the breakfast after the bell school breakfast program 37 beginning in the 2018-19 school year pursuant to a chapter of the 38 laws of 2018 for equipment purchases, provided, however, that such 39 grants shall be limited to no more than $5,000 per school, and shall 40 be awarded based on an application developed by the state education 41 department. Eligible equipment purchases shall include, but not be 42 limited to, equipment used for the storage, preservation, or 43 distribution of food (11BB1808) (55988) ............................ 44 7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,114,000) 45 CULTURAL EDUCATION CENTER (CCP) 145 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 Health and Safety Purpose 4 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 5 For the construction of an alternate emergency exit in the cultural 6 education center (11010801) (21862) ... 2,250,000 .... (re. $17,000) 7 For fire safety system upgrades, environmental controls, and the reno- 8 vation of restrooms in the cultural education center (11030801) 9 (21864) ... 2,500,000 ............................... (re. $627,000) 10 Capital Projects Funds - 11 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 12 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 13 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2002, as amended by chapter 54, 14 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 15 For renovation projects to preserve and revamp the collections and 16 exhibits of the state museum, library and archives subject to a plan 17 approved by the director of the budget. Funds appropriated herein 18 may be suballocated to any other state department, agency, or public 19 benefit corporation, to achieve the purpose of this appropriation 20 (11030203) (23456) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $4,410,000) 21 Capital Projects Funds - Other 22 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 23 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 24 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 26 An advance for projects to enhance the public display of the 27 collections and exhibits of the state museum, library and archives, 28 subject to a plan jointly submitted by the board of the cultural 29 education trust and the state education department and approved by 30 the director of the budget. Funds appropriated herein may be subal- 31 located to any other state department, agency, or public benefit 32 corporation, to achieve the purpose of this appropriation (11020808) 33 (21868) ... 15,000,000 ........................... (re. $10,950,000) 34 For preservation and stewardship of collections in the cultural educa- 35 tion center, including environmental controls, the preservation of 36 records, and the purchase and installment of map and microform cabi- 37 nets, compact shelving, and museum cabinetry (11060808) (21866) .... 38 4,325,000 ........................................... (re. $383,000) 39 CULTURAL EDUCATION STORAGE FACILITY (CCP) 40 Capital Projects Funds - Other 41 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 42 New Facilities Purpose 43 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 54, 44 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 146 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Cultural education storage facility. For costs of a storage facility 2 for the collections of the state museum, library and archives, 3 subject to a plan submitted by the commissioner and approved by the 4 division of the budget provided, however, that a portion of the 5 funds appropriated herein may be used to conduct a feasibility 6 study. For any additional project using these funds which would 7 create new storage space outside the confines of the state museum, 8 the commissioner shall conduct a land review prior to the submission 9 of a plan (11010707) (21878) ... 60,000,000 ...... (re. $59,735,000) 10 EDUCATION BUILDING (CCP) 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 14 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 15 For partial roof replacement of the education building and education 16 building addition to keep facilities in a safe operating condition 17 subject to a plan developed by the education department and approved 18 by the director of the budget (11030603) (23454) ................... 19 1,700,000 ........................................... (re. $108,000) 20 LIBRARY CONSTRUCTION (CCP) 21 Capital Projects Funds - Other 22 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 23 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 24 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, as 25 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with the state finance 26 law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 27 For total approved project costs pursuant to section 273-a of the 28 education law, for approved projects, excluding feasibility studies, 29 plans or similar activities, for the acquisition of vacant land and 30 the acquisition, construction, renovation or rehabilitation, includ- 31 ing leasehold improvements, of buildings of public libraries and 32 library systems chartered by the regents of the state of New York or 33 established by an act of the legislature, subject to distribution 34 provisions in subdivision 5 of section 273-a of the education law on 35 and upon approval by the commissioner (11LC2508) (23486) ... 36 [34,000,000] 44,000,000 .......................... (re. $44,000,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 39 For total approved project costs pursuant to section 273-a of the 40 education law, for approved projects, excluding feasibility studies, 41 plans or similar activities, for the acquisition of vacant land and 42 the acquisition, construction, renovation or rehabilitation, includ- 43 ing leasehold improvements, of buildings of public libraries and 44 library systems chartered by the regents of the state of New York or 45 established by an act of the legislature, subject to distribution 147 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 provisions in subdivision 5 of section 273-a of the education law on 2 and upon approval by the commissioner (11LC2408) (23486) ........... 3 44,000,000 ....................................... (re. $44,000,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 54, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For total approved project costs pursuant to section 273-a of the 7 education law, for approved projects, excluding feasibility studies, 8 plans or similar activities, for the acquisition of vacant land and 9 the acquisition, construction, renovation or rehabilitation, includ- 10 ing projects related to health and safety and the Americans with 11 Disabilities Act of 1990 and leasehold improvements, of buildings of 12 public libraries and library systems chartered by the regents of the 13 state of New York or established by an act of the legislature, 14 subject to distribution provisions in subdivision 5 of section 273-a 15 of the education law on and upon approval by the commissioner 16 (11LC2308) (23486) ... 34,000,000 ................. (re. $3,924,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 18 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 19 For total approved project costs pursuant to section 273-a of the 20 education law, for approved projects, excluding feasibility studies, 21 plans or similar activities, for the acquisition of vacant land and 22 the acquisition, construction, renovation or rehabilitation, includ- 23 ing leasehold improvements, of buildings of public libraries and 24 library systems chartered by the regents of the state of New York or 25 established by an act of the legislature, subject to distribution 26 provisions in subdivision 5 of section 273-a of the education law on 27 and upon approval by the commissioner (11LC2208) (23486) ........... 28 34,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,659,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 54, 30 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 31 For total approved project costs pursuant to section 273-a of the 32 education law, for approved projects, excluding feasibility studies, 33 plans or similar activities, for the acquisition of vacant land and 34 the acquisition, construction, renovation or rehabilitation, includ- 35 ing leasehold improvements, of buildings of public libraries and 36 library systems chartered by the regents of the state of New York or 37 established by an act of the legislature, subject to distribution 38 provisions in subdivision 5 of section 273-a of the education law on 39 and upon approval by the commissioner (11LC2108) (23486) ........... 40 34,000,000 .......................................... (re. $242,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 42 For total approved project costs pursuant to section 273-a of the 43 education law, for approved projects, excluding feasibility studies, 44 plans or similar activities, for the acquisition of vacant land and 45 the acquisition, construction, renovation or rehabilitation, includ- 46 ing leasehold improvements, of buildings of public libraries and 47 library systems chartered by the regents of the state of New York or 48 established by an act of the legislature, subject to distribution 148 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 provisions in subdivision 5 of section 273-a of the education law on 2 and upon approval by the commissioner (11LC2008) (23486) ........... 3 14,000,000 .......................................... (re. $751,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 54, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 6 For total approved project costs pursuant to section 273-a of the 7 education law, for approved projects, excluding feasibility studies, 8 plans or similar activities, for the acquisition of vacant land and 9 the acquisition, construction, renovation or rehabilitation, includ- 10 ing leasehold improvements, of buildings of public libraries and 11 library systems chartered by the regents of the state of New York or 12 established by an act of the legislature, subject to distribution 13 provisions in subdivision 5 of section 273-a of the education law on 14 and upon approval by the commissioner (11011908) (23486) ........... 15 34,000,000 .......................................... (re. $109,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 17 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 18 For total approved project costs pursuant to section 273-a of the 19 education law, for approved projects, excluding feasibility studies, 20 plans or similar activities, for the acquisition of vacant land and 21 the acquisition, construction, renovation or rehabilitation, includ- 22 ing leasehold improvements, of buildings of public libraries and 23 library systems chartered by the regents of the state of New York or 24 established by an act of the legislature, subject to distribution 25 provisions in subdivision 5 of section 273-a of the education law on 26 and upon approval by the commissioner (11001808) (23486) ........... 27 34,000,000 .......................................... (re. $366,000) 28 NEW YORK STATE MUSEUM, LIBRARY AND ARCHIVES (CCP) 29 Capital Projects Funds - Other 30 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 31 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 54, 33 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 34 For projects to preserve and improve the facilities of the state muse- 35 um, library, and archives pursuant to a plan approved by the direc- 36 tor of the budget. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to 37 any other state department, agency, or public benefit corporation, 38 to achieve the purpose of this appropriation (11MU2408) (57039) .... 39 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 40 NON-PUBLIC SCHOOL HEALTH AND SAFETY PROJECTS (CCP) 41 Capital Projects Funds - Other 42 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 43 Health and Safety Purpose 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 149 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses for nonpublic schools of health and safety 2 equipment, security personnel, related assessments and training 3 needs, remediation of hazardous conditions, and the repair and main- 4 tenance of buildings, facilities, appurtenances, equipment and 5 systems to maintain the health and safety of school building occu- 6 pants, utilizing competitive and noncompetitive grants pursuant to a 7 plan developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the 8 director of the budget (11SE2501) (55990) .......................... 9 70,000,000 ....................................... (re. $70,000,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 54, 11 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 12 For services and expenses for nonpublic schools of health and safety 13 equipment, security personnel, related assessments and training 14 needs, remediation of hazardous conditions, and the repair and main- 15 tenance of buildings, facilities, appurtenances, equipment and 16 systems to maintain the health and safety of school building occu- 17 pants, utilizing competitive and noncompetitive grants pursuant to a 18 plan developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the 19 director of the budget (11SE2401) (55990) .......................... 20 70,000,000 ....................................... (re. $70,000,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 22 For services and expenses for nonpublic schools of health and safety 23 equipment, security personnel, related assessments and training 24 needs, remediation of hazardous conditions, and the repair and main- 25 tenance of buildings, facilities, appurtenances, equipment and 26 systems to maintain the health and safety of school building occu- 27 pants, utilizing competitive and noncompetitive grants pursuant to a 28 plan developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the 29 director of the budget (11SE2301) (55990) .......................... 30 45,000,000 ....................................... (re. $45,000,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 32 For services and expenses for nonpublic schools of health and safety 33 equipment, security personnel, related assessments and training 34 needs, remediation of hazardous conditions, and the repair and main- 35 tenance of buildings, facilities, appurtenances, equipment and 36 systems to maintain the health and safety of school building occu- 37 pants, utilizing competitive and noncompetitive grants pursuant to a 38 plan developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the 39 director of the budget (11SE2201) (55990) .......................... 40 45,000,000 ....................................... (re. $41,226,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 42 For services and expenses of health and safety equipment, security 43 personnel and related assessments and training needs for Nonpublic 44 Schools, provided, however, that no more than $4,500,000 of the 45 funds appropriated herein shall be made available prior to April 1, 46 2022 (11SE2101) (55990) ... 15,000,000 ............ (re. $8,521,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 150 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses of health and safety equipment, security 2 personnel and related assessments and training needs for Nonpublic 3 Schools, provided, however, that no more than $4,500,000 of the 4 funds appropriated herein shall be made available prior to April 1, 5 2021 (11SE2001) (55990) ... 15,000,000 ............ (re. $7,065,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 7 For services and expenses of health and safety equipment, security 8 personnel and related assessments and training needs for Nonpublic 9 Schools, provided, however, that no more than $4,500,000 of the 10 funds appropriated herein shall be made available prior to April 1, 11 2020 (11SE1901) (55990) ... 15,000,000 ............ (re. $5,363,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 13 For services and expenses of health and safety equipment, security 14 personnel and related assessments and training needs for Nonpublic 15 Schools, provided, however, that no more than $4,500,000 of the 16 funds appropriated herein shall be made available prior to April 1, 17 2019 (11SE1801) (55990) ... 15,000,000 ............ (re. $4,527,000) 18 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as transferred by chapter 19 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 20 For services and expenses of health and safety equipment, security 21 personnel and related assessments and training needs for Nonpublic 22 Schools, provided, however, that no more than $4,500,000 of the 23 funds appropriated herein shall be made available prior to April 1, 24 2018 (11SE1701) (55990) ... 15,000,000 ............ (re. $3,080,000) 25 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 27 For services and expenses of health and safety equipment, security 28 personnel and related assessments and training needs for Nonpublic 29 Schools, provided, however, that no more than $4,500,000 of the 30 funds appropriated herein shall be made available prior to April 1, 31 2017 (11SE1601) (55990) ... 10,768,000 ............ (re. $2,132,000) 32 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 33 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 34 For services and expenses of Safety Equipment for Nonpublic Schools 35 (11SE1501) (55990) ... 1,383,000 .................... (re. $342,000) 36 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 37 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 38 For services and expenses of Safety Equipment for Nonpublic Schools 39 (11SE1401) (55990) ... 1,325,000 .................... (re. $459,000) 40 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 41 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 42 For services and expenses of Safety Equipment for Nonpublic Schools 43 (11SE1301) (55990) ... 806,000 ...................... (re. $481,000) 44 NON-PUBLIC SCHOOL TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS (CCP) 151 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 5 For payment of the costs of capital projects undertaken by or on 6 behalf of school districts for the acquisition of smart schools 7 classroom technology to be loaned to children attending a nonpublic 8 school located in the school district, except a nonpublic school to 9 which tuition is paid under articles 85 or 89 of the education law, 10 in accordance with the requirements of section 755 of the education 11 law and guidelines developed by the commissioner of education, in 12 connection with the smart schools investment plans first submitted 13 to the education department prior to April 15, 2017 and approved by 14 the smart schools review board pursuant to subdivision 16 of section 15 3641 of the education law. 16 Each school district shall be eligible to receive an allocation from 17 the funds appropriated herein equal to the product of the enrollment 18 of all such nonpublic schools in the 2014-15 school year multiplied 19 by the per pupil amount, provided that the liability of the state 20 and the amount to be distributed or otherwise expended by the state 21 to provide such loans shall be limited to the amount appropriated 22 herein. The per pupil amount shall equal the quotient of (i) the 23 amount budgeted by such school district in its approved smart 24 schools investment plan for servers, wireless access points and 25 other portable connectivity devices to be acquired as part of a 26 school connectivity project, divided by (ii) the total public and 27 nonpublic school enrollment in such school district in the 2014-15 28 school year. 29 Provided further that no school district shall be eligible to receive 30 an allocation to support the loan of smart schools classroom tech- 31 nology in an aggregate amount greater than $250 multiplied by the 32 nonpublic school enrollment in the 2014-15 school year. 33 Notwithstanding paragraph b of subdivision 16 of section 3641 of the 34 education law, the commissioner of education shall distribute funds 35 appropriated pursuant to this paragraph upon approval of an applica- 36 tion made by the school district. Requests to the school district 37 for loan of smart schools classroom technology to be acquired with 38 the funds appropriated herein shall be made in accordance with the 39 requirements of subdivision 3 of section 755 of the education law 40 (11NP1708) (55959) ... 25,000,000 ................ (re. $18,351,000) 41 OFFICE OF THE PROFESSIONS ELECTRONIC LICENSING SYSTEM (CCP) 42 Capital Projects Fund - Other 43 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 44 Office of the Professions Electronic Licensing Account - 32222 45 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 47 For services and expenses related to the development of an electronic 48 licensing system for the office of the professions, including but 152 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 not limited to equipment, software, hardware and services, subject 2 to a plan developed by the education department in conjunction with 3 the office of information technology services and approved by the 4 director of the budget. 5 Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any other state 6 department, agency, or public benefit corporation, to achieve the 7 purpose of this appropriation (11EL2308) (55992) ................... 8 5,160,000 ......................................... (re. $4,956,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 10 For services and expenses related to the development of an electronic 11 licensing system for the office of the professions, including but 12 not limited to equipment, software, hardware and services, subject 13 to a plan developed by the education department in conjunction with 14 the office of information technology services and approved by the 15 director of the budget. 16 Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any other state 17 department, agency, or public benefit corporation, to achieve the 18 purpose of this appropriation (11EL2208) (55992) ................... 19 7,790,000 ......................................... (re. $4,856,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 21 For services and expenses related to the development of an electronic 22 licensing system for the office of the professions, including but 23 not limited to equipment, software, hardware and services, subject 24 to a plan developed by the education department in conjunction with 25 the office of information technology services and approved by the 26 director of the budget. Funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 27 cated to any other state department, agency, or public benefit 28 corporation, to achieve the purpose of this appropriation (11EL2008) 29 (55992) ... 25,390,000 ............................ (re. $7,673,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 31 For services and expenses related to the development of an electronic 32 licensing system for the office of the professions, including but 33 not limited to equipment, software, hardware and services, subject 34 to a plan developed by the education department in conjunction with 35 the office of information technology services and approved by the 36 director of the budget. Funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 37 cated to any other state department, agency, or public benefit 38 corporation, to achieve the purpose of this appropriation (11EL1908) 39 (55992) ... 7,200,000 ............................... (re. $122,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 41 For services and expenses related to the development of an electronic 42 licensing system for the office of the professions, including but 43 not limited to equipment, software, hardware and services, subject 44 to a plan developed by the education department in conjunction with 45 the office of information technology services and approved by the 46 director of the budget. Funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 47 cated to any other state department, agency, or public benefit 153 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 corporation, to achieve the purpose of this appropriation (11EL1808) 2 (55992) ... 4,300,000 ............................... (re. $519,000) 3 SAFETY AND SECURITY PROJECTS FOR AT RISK FACILITIES (CCP) 4 Capital Projects Funds - Other 5 Capital Project Fund - 30000 6 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 54, 8 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 9 For a competitive grant program to provide safety and security 10 projects at nonpublic schools and day camps at risk of hate crimes 11 or attacks because of their ideology, beliefs or mission. Provided 12 that an assessment of facilities at risk may include, but not be 13 limited to, considerations of the vulnerabilities of the organiza- 14 tion based on its location and membership, and the potential conse- 15 quences of a hate crime or attack at the facility. Provided further 16 that recipients of such grants may be required to commit to under- 17 take matching safety and security projects in an amount established 18 in the request for applications for such grants, and provided 19 further that recipients of such grants shall be entitled to use such 20 funds to purchase commodities, services, and technology through 21 centralized contracts established by the office of general services 22 under section 163 of the state finance law, and such recipients 23 shall be deemed for such purposes to be "authorized users" within 24 the meaning of paragraph k of subdivision 1 of section 163 of the 25 state finance law. Notwithstanding section 93 of the state finance 26 law or any provision of law to the contrary, the amount appropriated 27 herein may be transferred or suballocated to the division of home- 28 land security and emergency services to accomplish the intent of 29 this appropriation or interchanged with any other appropriation 30 within the safety and security for at-risk facilities comprehensive 31 construction program (11MG1908) (23326) ............................ 32 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,583,000) 33 For competitive grants to provide safety and security projects at 34 nonpublic schools, community centers, residential camps, and day 35 care facilities at risk of hate crimes or attacks because of their 36 ideology, beliefs or mission. Provided that an assessment of facili- 37 ties at risk may include, but not be limited to, considerations of 38 the vulnerabilities of the organization based on its location and 39 membership, and the potential consequences of a hate crime or attack 40 at the facility, and provided further that recipients of such grants 41 shall be entitled to use such funds to purchase commodities, 42 services, and technology through centralized contracts established 43 by the office of general services under section 163 of the state 44 finance law, and such recipients shall be deemed for such purposes 45 to be "authorized users" within the meaning of paragraph k of subdi- 46 vision 1 of section 163 of the state finance law. Notwithstanding 47 section 93 of the state finance law or any provision of law to the 48 contrary, the amount appropriated herein may be transferred or 49 suballocated to the division of homeland security and emergency 154 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 services to accomplish the intent of this appropriation or inter- 2 changed with any other appropriation within the safety and security 3 for at-risk facilities comprehensive construction program (11HS1908) 4 (55970) ... 25,000,000 ............................ (re. $5,662,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 7 For competitive grants to provide safety and security projects at 8 nonpublic schools, community centers and day care facilities at risk 9 of hate crimes or attacks because of their ideology, beliefs or 10 mission. Provided that an assessment of facilities at risk may 11 include, but not be limited to, considerations of the vulnerabili- 12 ties of the organization based on its location and membership, and 13 the potential consequences of a hate crime or attack at the facili- 14 ty, and provided further that recipients of such grants shall be 15 entitled to use such funds to purchase commodities, services, and 16 technology through centralized contracts established by the office 17 of general services under section 163 of the state finance law, and 18 such recipients shall be deemed for such purposes to be "authorized 19 users" within the meaning of paragraph k of subdivision 1 of section 20 163 of the state finance law. The amount appropriated herein may be 21 transferred or suballocated to the division of homeland security and 22 emergency services to accomplish the intent of this appropriation 23 (11HS1708) (55970) ... 25,000,000 ................. (re. $3,780,000) 24 SCHOOLS FOR NATIVE AMERICAN RESERVATIONS (CCP) 25 Capital Projects Funds - Other 26 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 27 Health and Safety Purpose 28 The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2009, is 29 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 30 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 31 at the St. Regis Mohawk Elementary School in a safe operating condi- 32 tion, and for the design and construction of a new St. Regis Mohawk 33 elementary school, subject to a plan developed by the education 34 department and approved by the director of the budget (11020901) 35 (23464) ... 4,000,000 ................................ (re. $88,000) 36 Capital Projects Funds - Other 37 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 38 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 39 The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2004, is 40 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 41 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 42 at the St. Regis Mohawk Elementary School in a safe operating condi- 43 tion, and for the design and construction of a new St. Regis Mohawk 44 elementary school, subject to a plan developed by the education 45 department and approved by the director of the budget (11040403) 46 (21876) ... 4,500,000 ................................. (re. $2,000) 155 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 4 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is 5 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 6 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 7 at the state-owned St. Regis Mohawk School, the Onondaga Nation 8 School, and the Tuscarora Nation School in a safe and satisfactory 9 operating condition, and for the design and construction of a new 10 St. Regis Mohawk elementary school, subject to a plan developed by 11 the education department and approved by the director of the budget 12 (11NA2508) (23368) ... 20,099,000 ................ (re. $20,099,000) 13 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is 14 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 15 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 16 at the state-owned St. Regis Mohawk School, the Onondaga Nation 17 School, and the Tuscarora Nation School in a safe and satisfactory 18 operating condition, and for the design and construction of a new 19 St. Regis Mohawk elementary school, subject to a plan developed by 20 the education department and approved by the director of the budget 21 (11NA2408) (23368) ... 20,099,000 ................ (re. $20,080,000) 22 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 23 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is hereby 24 amended and reappropriated to read: 25 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 26 at the state-owned St. Regis Mohawk School, the Onondaga Nation 27 School, and the Tuscarora Nation School in a safe and satisfactory 28 operating condition, and for a study of the feasibility of 29 construction of new school facilities where necessary, and for the 30 design and construction of a new St. Regis Mohawk elementary school, 31 subject to a plan developed by the education department and approved 32 by the director of the budget (11NA2308) (23368) ................... 33 20,099,000 ....................................... (re. $20,004,000) 34 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, is 35 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 36 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 37 at the state-owned St. Regis Mohawk School, the Onondaga Nation 38 School, and the Tuscarora Nation School in a safe and satisfactory 39 operating condition, and for the design and construction of a new 40 St. Regis Mohawk elementary school, subject to a plan developed by 41 the education department and approved by the director of the budget 42 (11NA2208) (23368) ... 35,700,000 ................ (re. $33,005,000) 43 SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND (CCP) 44 Capital Projects Funds - Other 45 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 46 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 156 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 2 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 3 at the School for the Blind in a safe and satisfactory operating 4 condition subject to a plan developed by the education department 5 and approved by the director of the budget (11BB2508) (23369) ...... 6 4,470,000 ......................................... (re. $4,470,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 8 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 9 at the School for the Blind in a safe and satisfactory operating 10 condition subject to a plan developed by the education department 11 and approved by the director of the budget (11BB2408) (23369) ...... 12 4,470,000 ......................................... (re. $4,397,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 14 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 15 at the School for the Blind in a safe and satisfactory operating 16 condition subject to a plan developed by the education department 17 and approved by the director of the budget (11BB2308) (23369) ...... 18 4,470,000 ......................................... (re. $4,162,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 20 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 21 at the School for the Blind in a safe and satisfactory operating 22 condition subject to a plan developed by the education department 23 and approved by the director of the budget (11BB2208) [(23468)] 24 (23369) ... 3,200,000 ............................. (re. $2,581,000) 25 SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND - BATAVIA (CCP) 26 Capital Projects Funds - Other 27 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 28 Health and Safety Purpose 29 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 30 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 31 at the School for the Blind in a safe operating condition subject to 32 a plan developed by the education department and approved by the 33 director of the budget (11030901) (23468) ... 800,000 . (re. $1,000) 34 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 35 For security and fire alarm system upgrades, physical plant improve- 36 ments to infrastructure around Severne Hall, backflow prevention 37 devices, and roof replacement on Knight Hall and Hamilton Hall 38 (11050801) (21870) ... 2,330,000 .................... (re. $574,000) 39 SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF (CCP) 40 Capital Projects Funds - Other 41 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 42 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 157 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 2 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 3 at the School for the Deaf in a safe and satisfactory operating 4 condition subject to a plan developed by the education department 5 and approved by the director of the budget (11RD2508) (23370) ...... 6 2,994,000 ......................................... (re. $2,994,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 8 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 9 at the School for the Deaf in a safe and satisfactory operating 10 condition subject to a plan developed by the education department 11 and approved by the director of the budget (11RD2408) (23370) ...... 12 2,994,000 ......................................... (re. $2,994,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 14 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 15 at the School for the Deaf in a safe and satisfactory operating 16 condition subject to a plan developed by the education department 17 and approved by the director of the budget (11RD2308) (23370) ...... 18 2,994,000 ......................................... (re. $2,820,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 20 For various rehabilitation and renovation projects to keep facilities 21 at the School for the Deaf in a safe and satisfactory operating 22 condition subject to a plan developed by the education department 23 and approved by the director of the budget (11RD2208) [(23468)] 24 (23370) ... 1,800,000 ............................. (re. $1,253,000) 25 SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF - ROME (CCP) 26 Capital Projects Funds - Other 27 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 28 Health and Safety Purpose 29 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 30 For dormitory environmental controls and the replacement of paver 31 stones, manhole covers and catch basins (11040801) (21871) ......... 32 650,000 ............................................. (re. $138,000) 33 SMART SCHOOLS BOND ACT (CCP) 34 Capital Projects Funds - Other 35 Smart Schools Bond Fund 36 Smart Schools Bond Fund Account - 30710 37 Bond Proceeds Purpose 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 39 The sum of $2,000,000,000, or so much thereof as may be necessary and 40 available, is hereby appropriated from the smart schools bond fund 41 as established by section 97-oooo of the state finance law in 42 accordance with the provisions of such section, for payment to the 43 capital projects fund in order to reimburse such fund for disburse- 158 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ments certified by the state comptroller as bondable under the 2 provisions of the smart schools bond act of 2014. 3 The director of the budget is hereby authorized to designate to the 4 state comptroller specific appropriations made from the capital 5 projects fund for purposes for which smart schools bond fund expend- 6 itures are authorized. The state comptroller shall at the commence- 7 ment of each month certify to the director of the budget, the chair- 8 man of the senate finance committee, and the chairman of the 9 assembly ways and means committee, the amounts disbursed from the 10 appropriations so designated by the director of the budget from the 11 capital projects fund for such purposes for the month preceding such 12 certification and such certifications shall not exceed in the aggre- 13 gate the moneys hereby appropriated. A copy of each such certificate 14 shall also be delivered to departments, agencies and public authori- 15 ties to which such capital projects fund appropriations are made 16 available. 17 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, no 18 moneys shall be available from the smart schools bond fund until a 19 certificate of approval of availability shall have been issued by 20 the director of the budget, and a copy of such certificate of 21 approval filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 22 senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and 23 means committee. Such certificate may be amended from time to time 24 by the director of the budget, and a copy of each such amendment 25 shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 26 senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and 27 means committee (11SS1410) (80912) ................................. 28 2,000,000,000 ................................. (re. $1,009,007,000) 29 SMART SCHOOLS IMPLEMENTATION (CCP) 30 Capital Projects Funds - Other 31 Capital Projects Fund - Smart Schools (Bondable) - 30000 32 Educational Purpose 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 34 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 35 For payment of the costs of capital projects undertaken by or on 36 behalf of school districts as part of such school districts' smart 37 schools investment plans, pursuant to the smart schools bond act of 38 2014 and subdivision 16 of section 3641 of the education law, to be 39 reimbursed from bond fund proceeds for acquisition or installation 40 of educational technology equipment or for design, planning, site 41 acquisition, construction, reconstruction or rehabilitation of pre- 42 kindergarten classroom space; instructional space to replace trans- 43 portable classroom units, or for high-tech school safety and securi- 44 ty projects. 45 Costs of such smart schools projects may include but not be limited to 46 interactive whiteboards; computer servers; desktop, laptop and 47 tablet computers; grants for high-speed broadband and wireless 48 internet connectivity for schools and communities within the school 49 district for enhanced educational opportunity; classroom space to 159 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 accommodate pre-kindergarten programs; instructional space to 2 replace transportable classroom units; and high-tech school safety 3 and security projects. Pursuant to school districts' approved smart 4 schools investment plans, all or a portion of the funds appropriated 5 hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, 6 or public authority. 7 No part of this appropriation shall be made available prior to 8 approval of the smart schools bond act of 2014 by the voters at the 9 general election to be held in November of 2014 (11SR14ED) (56144) 10 ... 2,000,000,000 ............................... (re. $693,587,000) 11 SMART SCHOOLS SPECIAL EDUCATION PROJECTS (CCP) 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 14 Educational Purpose 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 17 For payment of the costs of capital projects undertaken by or on 18 behalf of special act school districts, state-supported schools for 19 the blind and deaf and approved private special education schools 20 for acquisition or installation of educational technology equipment. 21 Costs of such projects may include but not be limited to interactive 22 whiteboards; computer servers; desktop, laptop and tablet computers; 23 and high-speed broadband and wireless Internet connectivity; design, 24 planning, site acquisition, construction, reconstruction or rehabil- 25 itation of instructional space to replace transportable classroom 26 units; and high-tech school safety and security projects. This 27 appropriation shall be made available to the same extent as funds 28 are authorized and made available pursuant to the smart schools bond 29 act of 2014 (110014ED) (56156) ..................................... 30 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,359,000) 31 STATE AID DATA SYSTEM (CCP) 32 Capital Projects Fund - Other 33 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 34 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 36 For services and expenses related to the development of a modernized 37 state aid data system, including but not limited to equipment, soft- 38 ware, hardware and services, subject to a plan developed by the 39 education department in conjunction with the office of information 40 technology services and approved by the director of the budget. 41 Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any other state 42 department, agency, or public benefit corporation, to achieve the 43 purpose of this appropriation subject to approval by the director of 44 the budget (11SA2108) (23343) ... 41,000,000 ..... (re. $35,113,000) 45 STATE SUPPORTED SCHOOLS FOR THE BLIND AND DEAF (CCP) 160 12654-09-6 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 Health and Safety Purpose 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For alteration, rehabilitation and improvement of various facilities 6 operated by the state-supported schools for the blind and deaf 7 authorized under article 85 of the education law, provided that such 8 funds shall be prioritized for health and safety needs and appor- 9 tioned based on a plan developed by the education department and 10 approved by the director of the budget (11422401) (23303) .......... 11 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $30,000,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 13 For alteration, rehabilitation and improvement of various facilities 14 operated by the state-supported schools for the blind and deaf 15 authorized under article 85 of the education law, provided that such 16 funds shall be prioritized for health and safety needs and appor- 17 tioned based on a plan developed by the education department and 18 approved by the director of the budget (11422101) (23303) .......... 19 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $28,137,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 21 For alteration, rehabilitation and improvement of various facilities 22 operated by the state-supported schools for the blind and deaf 23 authorized under article 85 of the education law, provided that such 24 funds shall be prioritized for health and safety needs and appor- 25 tioned based on a plan developed by the education department and 26 approved by the director of the budget (11421901) (23303) .......... 27 30,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,496,000) 161 12654-09-6 STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 27,747,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 0 27,747,000 5 ================ ================ 6 PROGRAM IMPROVEMENTS OR CHANGE (CCP) 7 Capital Project Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 9 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 11 The amounts appropriated herein, shall be made available to local 12 boards of elections, including the New York city board of elections 13 for the reimbursement of eligible costs related to the purchase of 14 electronic poll books. The state board of elections shall develop a 15 plan for the distribution of such funds to local boards of elections 16 for reimbursement of eligible costs, including, but not limited to, 17 electronic poll books, associated software, and on-demand ballot 18 printers, provided that such reimbursement shall be apportioned 19 based on the number of registered voters in a county. The plan shall 20 include a listing of allowable costs and details of the reimburse- 21 ment claims process and timeframes, provided that local boards of 22 election claims shall include such information as necessary to 23 support state financing mechanisms. A copy of such plan shall be 24 sent to the director of budget, the senate finance committee, and 25 the assembly ways and means committee (EL012408)(23523) ............ 26 14,700,000 ........................................ (re. $7,604,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 28 The amounts appropriated herein, shall be made available to local 29 boards of elections for technology upgrades and equipment. Such 30 funds shall be made available to local boards of elections for 31 reimbursement of eligible costs, including, but not limited to, the 32 replacement of voting systems and equipment, absentee ballot scan- 33 ners, mail processing equipment, and infrastructure to protect the 34 connectivity and security of county elections software, pursuant to 35 a plan developed by the state board of elections. A copy of such 36 plan shall be sent to the director of the division of budget, the 37 senate finance committee, and the assembly ways and means committee 38 (EL012308)(23527) ... 15,000,000 .................. (re. $4,535,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 40 The amounts appropriated herein, shall be made available to the state 41 and local boards of elections, including the New York city board of 42 elections for software and technology upgrades and equipment. The 43 state board of elections shall develop a plan for the distribution 44 of such funds which may include up to $5,000,000 needed for state 45 board of elections capital costs and implementation costs. The 46 remaining funds, of at least $20,000,000 shall be made available to 162 12654-09-6 STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 local boards of elections for reimbursement of eligible costs, 2 including, but not limited to, the replacement of voting systems and 3 equipment, absentee ballot scanners, mail processing equipment, and 4 infrastructure to protect the connectivity and security of county 5 elections software, including assistance for areas unserved and 6 underserved by broadband service, provided that such reimbursement 7 shall be apportioned based on the number of registered voters in a 8 county (EL012108) (23527) ... 25,000,000 .......... (re. $1,774,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 10 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 11 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 12 services, which will support the implementation of the voter enfran- 13 chisement modernization act of 2019, including costs incurred prior 14 to April 1, 2020. A portion of these funds shall be used, as allow- 15 able, to satisfy the state match requirement of the 2020 federal 16 HAVA funding. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any 17 other state department, agency, or public benefit corporation, to 18 achieve this purpose (EL012008) (23523) ............................ 19 16,000,000 ....................................... (re. $13,337,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 21 The amounts appropriated herein, shall be made available to the state 22 and local boards of elections, including the New York city board of 23 elections for initial technology costs of electronic poll books as 24 authorized in 2019 voter reform legislation. The state board of 25 elections shall develop a plan for the distribution of such funds 26 which may include amounts needed for state board of elections imple- 27 mentation costs. The remaining funds shall be made available to 28 local boards of elections for reimbursement of eligible costs, 29 including, but not limited to, electronic poll books and associated 30 software, on-demand ballot printers and cyber security software 31 required to implement early voting provided that such reimbursement 32 shall be apportioned based on the number of registered voters in a 33 county. The plan shall include a listing of allowable costs and 34 details of the reimbursement claims process and timeframes, provided 35 that local boards of election claims shall include such information 36 as necessary to support state financing mechanisms. Notwithstanding 37 any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts here- 38 by appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to any depart- 39 ment, agency or public authority (EL011908) (23523) ................ 40 14,700,000 .......................................... (re. $497,000) 163 12654-09-6 ENERGY RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 90,400,000 27,260,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 90,400,000 27,260,000 8 ================ ================ 9 EMPOWER PLUS PROGRAM (CCP) .................................. 50,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 EmPower Plus Program Purpose 14 The sum of $50,000,000 is hereby appropri- 15 ated for services and expenses, loans, 16 grants, and other costs related to clean 17 energy projects, including but not limited 18 to the New York state energy research and 19 development authority's EmPower Plus 20 Program for residential low income energy 21 efficiency, heating and cooling, health 22 and safety and other related energy 23 improvements and expenses, including 24 administrative expenses needed to support 25 the program. Notwithstanding any other law 26 to the contrary, a portion of these funds 27 appropriated herein may be suballocated to 28 any department, agency, or public authori- 29 ty (03EM26EM) ............................... 50,000,000 30 MECHANICAL INSULATION PROGRAM (CCP) .......................... 5,000,000 31 -------------- 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 34 Energy Conservation Purpose 35 For services, expenses, loans, grants, and 36 other costs related to the New York state 37 energy research and development authori- 38 ty's mechanical insulation energy savings 39 program (03MI2605) ........................... 5,000,000 40 WESTERN NEW YORK NUCLEAR SERVICE CENTER PROGRAM (CCP) ....... 35,400,000 41 -------------- 42 Capital Projects Funds - Other 164 12654-09-6 ENERGY RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 2 Western New York Nuclear Service Center Program Purpose 3 For services and expenses required to meet 4 the New York state energy research and 5 development authority obligations for the 6 western New York nuclear service center, 7 including obligations pursuant to the West 8 Valley demonstration project act (Pub. L. 9 96-368) (03WV26G6) (44406) .................. 35,400,000 165 12654-09-6 ENERGY RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 CLEANER, GREENER COMMUNITIES PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Environmental Protection Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 6 For capital grants for the cleaner, greener communities program 7 (03CG1306) (44408) ... 25,000,000 ................. (re. $5,860,000) 8 EMPOWER PLUS PROGRAM (CCP) 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 11 EmPower Plus Program Purpose 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 The sum of $200,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 14 expenses, loans, grants, and other costs related to clean energy 15 projects, including but not limited to the New York state energy 16 research and development authority's EmPower Plus Program for resi- 17 dential low income energy efficiency, heating and cooling, health 18 and safety and other related energy improvements and expenses, 19 including administrative expenses needed to support the program. 20 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a portion of these 21 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any department, 22 agency, or public authority (03EM23EM) (58019) ..................... 23 200,000,000 ......................................... (re. $648,000) 24 WESTERN NEW YORK NUCLEAR SERVICE CENTER PROGRAM (CCP) 25 Capital Projects Funds - Other 26 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 27 Western New York Nuclear Service Center Program Purpose 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 29 For services and expenses required to meet the New York state energy 30 research and development authority obligations for the western New 31 York nuclear service center, including obligations pursuant to the 32 West Valley demonstration project act (Pub. L. 96-368) (03WV25G6) 33 (44406) ... 25,800,000 ........................... (re. $20,752,000) 166 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 2,461,800,000 18,683,214,000 6 Capital Projects Funds - Federal ... 551,000,000 1,693,670,000 7 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 0 97,000 8 ---------------- ---------------- 9 All Funds ........................ 3,012,800,000 20,376,981,000 10 ================ ================ 11 ADMINISTRATION (CCP) ....................................... 152,500,000 12 -------------- 13 Capital Projects Funds - Other 14 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 15 Administration Purpose 16 For employee fringe benefits and indirect 17 costs related to employees paid from 18 department capital projects funds and 19 capital accounts (09FG2650) (25729) ......... 20,000,000 20 For services and expenses related to the 21 support of the Department of Environmental 22 Conservation, including but not limited to 23 personal service, nonpersonal service, 24 fringe benefits and indirect costs. This 25 appropriation is available for payments 26 for state operations, aid to localities, 27 or capital purposes (09TS2650) (25623) ...... 30,000,000 28 For services and expenses related to the 29 acquisition, development, operations, and 30 maintenance of technology, including but 31 not limited to equipment, software, and 32 services. Funds appropriated herein may be 33 suballocated to any other state department 34 to achieve the purpose of this appropri- 35 ation (09CS2650) (24807) .................... 25,000,000 36 For services and expenses of the environ- 37 mental facilities corporation. All or a 38 portion of the appropriation may be 39 provided to the environmental facilities 40 corporation (09EF2650) ....................... 2,500,000 41 Capital Projects Funds - Other 42 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 43 Grants Reimbursement from Non-Federal Entity Account - 44 32231 45 Administration Projects Purpose 167 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the expenditure of funds with a federal 2 nexus, and administered by a non-federal 3 entity, and made available for reimburse- 4 ment to the department of environmental 5 conservation via official contract, award, 6 or agreement. For environmental purposes 7 including but not limited to construction, 8 reconstruction, preservation, and operat- 9 ing costs including personal service, 10 nonpersonal service, fringe benefits and 11 indirect costs. Any portion of this appro- 12 priation may be transferred to state oper- 13 ations and aid to localities. Notwith- 14 standing any other inconsistent provisions 15 of law, funding appropriated herein is 16 authorized for suballocation or transfer 17 to other state departments, agencies, and 18 authorities, and may be transferred or 19 interchanged within the department of 20 environmental conservation, as necessary 21 to accomplish the intended purpose of the 22 awarded funds with a federal nexus 23 (09NF2650) (62050) ........................... 5,000,000 24 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 25 Federal Capital Projects Fund - 31364 26 ENCON Federal Infrastructure and Jobs Act 27 Administration Projects Purpose 28 For the expenditure of federal funds includ- 29 ing but not limited to those funds 30 provided for in the Infrastructure Invest- 31 ment and Jobs Act made available to the 32 department of environmental conservation, 33 from any federal agency under any federal 34 programs, for environmental purposes 35 including but not limited to construction, 36 reconstruction, preservation, and operat- 37 ing costs. Any portion of this appropri- 38 ation may be transferred to state oper- 39 ations and aid to localities. 40 Notwithstanding any other inconsistent 41 provisions of law, funding appropriated 42 herein is authorized for suballocation or 43 transfer to other state departments, agen- 44 cies, and authorities, and may be trans- 45 ferred or interchanged within the depart- 46 ment of environmental conservation, as 47 necessary to accomplish the intended 48 purpose of the federal funds (09IJ2650) 49 (62014) ..................................... 70,000,000 168 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 AIR RESOURCES (CCP) .......................................... 1,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 4 Federal Capital Projects Fund 5 ENCON Federal Capital Account - 31364 6 Air Resources Purpose 7 For the federal share of capital projects 8 undertaken pursuant to air resources 9 purposes including suballocation to other 10 state departments and agencies (09AF2655) 11 (24693) ...................................... 1,000,000 12 ENVIRONMENT AND RECREATION (CCP) ........................... 425,000,000 13 -------------- 14 Capital Projects Funds - Other 15 Environmental Protection Fund 16 Climate Change Mitigation and Adaptation Account - 30455 17 Environment and Recreation Purpose 18 For services and expenses of projects and 19 purposes authorized by section 92-s of the 20 state finance law to receive funding from 21 the climate change mitigation and adapta- 22 tion account in accordance with a program- 23 matic and financial plan to be approved by 24 the director of the budget, including 25 suballocation to other state departments 26 and agencies, according to the following: 27 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to 28 address greenhouse gas emissions outside 29 of the power sector including but not 30 limited to the development of statewide 31 greenhouse gas inventories, demonstration 32 projects, community engagement and applied 33 research related to the transportation 34 sector or methane and other short-lived 35 climate pollutant sources; including up to 36 (a) $500,000 for the regenerate NY grant 37 program; (b) $500,000 to the North Ameri- 38 can Sustainable Refrigeration Council for 39 the purpose of establishing a natural 40 refrigeration demonstration project that 41 serves disadvantaged communities; (c) up 42 to $500,000 for grants to municipalities 43 for acquisition of community forests; and 44 (d) $250,000 to the Vermont Energy Invest- 45 ment Corporation for the deployment of 46 natural refrigerants and greenhouse gas 169 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 mitigation through research, demonstration 2 projects, or outreach (09GG26ER) (25706) ..... 2,400,000 3 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, (a) 4 for the department of environmental 5 conservation to enter into a contract or 6 contracts for the development of local 7 climate resiliency plans and adaptation 8 projects, and (b) up to $20,000 to the 9 department of agriculture and markets for 10 services and expenses of the wood products 11 development council, including suballo- 12 cation to other state departments and 13 agencies; (c) $2,500,000 for climate coor- 14 dinators, including for disadvantaged 15 communities; (d) $500,000 for a resiliency 16 planting program; (e) $50,000 to the 17 Nature Conservancy in New York to support 18 the Staying Connected Initiative; (f) 19 $1,500,000 for the Climate and Applied 20 Forestry Research Institute, a program of 21 the State University of New York College 22 of Environmental Science and Forestry, and 23 Cornell's College of Agriculture and Life 24 Sciences, to support research and develop- 25 ment of forestry and forest products; and 26 (g) $1,675,000 to the State University of 27 New York College of Environmental Science 28 and Forestry for the Timbuctoo pipeline 29 summer climate and careers institute 30 (09SV26ER) (25711) ........................... 6,600,000 31 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 32 smart growth program state assistance 33 payments, provided on a competitive basis, 34 to counties, cities, towns, or villages to 35 establish, update or implement comprehen- 36 sive plans in a manner consistent with 37 smart growth; provided, however, that up 38 to 25 percent of such payments may be 39 awarded to not-for-profit organizations 40 for such purposes (09SG26ER) (24824) ......... 3,900,000 41 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for 42 the New York state soil and water conser- 43 vation committee in conjunction with the 44 department of agriculture and markets to 45 develop a climate resilient farms program 46 consistent with agriculture and markets 47 law articles 11-A and 11-B, agricultural 48 environmental management program including 49 (a) up to $700,000 for the Cornell Soil 50 Health Program for research and education 51 to improve soil resiliency to climate 52 variations and mitigate green house gas 170 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 emissions by carbon sequestration; (b) 2 $1,000,000 for Cornell University's 3 College of Agriculture and Life Sciences 4 to study the ecological impacts of agri- 5 voltaics; (c) up to $2,000,000 for Cornell 6 University's College of Agriculture and 7 Life Sciences for satellite research farms 8 and forests; and (d) up to $500,000 to 9 maintain forests and woodlands located on 10 agricultural land for the purposes of 11 carbon sequestration and to promote 12 sustainable and resilient agriculture land 13 (09CR26ER) (25718) .......................... 20,500,000 14 For services, expenses, and grants related 15 Climate smart communities projects pursu- 16 ant to title 15 of article 54 of the envi- 17 ronmental conservation law including clean 18 vehicle projects; notwithstanding any law 19 to the contrary, including: $1,000,000 for 20 municipal pilot programs for publicly 21 accessible electric vehicle fast chargers 22 installed on municipal infrastructure 23 including for curbside charging stations 24 (09CS26ER) (25701) .......................... 12,000,000 25 For services, expenses, and grants related 26 to the farmers' market resiliency grant 27 program, including but not limited to the 28 increasing farmers' markets resiliency 29 through the development and enhancement of 30 farmers' market infrastructure and on-line 31 sales and delivery capabilities across the 32 state (09FM26ER) (24694) ....................... 800,000 33 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for 34 the department of environmental conserva- 35 tion to support the implementation of 36 climate resilience projects through 37 design, engineering, consulting, surveys, 38 audits, modeling, technical assistance, 39 public engagement, or other services that 40 support project completion, as well as 41 support the construction of such climate 42 resilience and restoration projects, 43 including but not limited to projects that 44 (a) support the implementation of the New 45 York State Adaptation and Resilience Plan; 46 (b) mitigate flood risk and increase 47 climate resilience; or (c) restore flood- 48 plains, wetlands, streams, and/or forests .... 1,000,000 49 Capital Projects Funds - Other 50 Environmental Protection Fund 51 Open Space Account - 30454 171 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Environment and Recreation Purpose 2 For services and expenses of projects and 3 purposes authorized by section 92-s of the 4 state finance law to receive funding from 5 the open space account in accordance with 6 a programmatic and financial plan to be 7 approved by the director of the budget, 8 including suballocation to other state 9 departments and agencies, according to the 10 following: Notwithstanding any law to the 11 contrary, up to $500,000 for reimbursement 12 of costs incurred by land trusts in 13 contract with, and prior to transfer of 14 title to the State of New York for build- 15 ing removal and other site cleanup and 16 preparation costs to prepare the parcel 17 for sale to the State and for future 18 public access, safety, and use; and costs 19 related to the acquisition of the follow- 20 ing properties: Atlantic Coast, Long 21 Island Sound, Long Island South Shore 22 Estuary Reserve, Peconic Pinelands Mari- 23 time Reserve Projects, Central Pine 24 Barrens, Shoreham Parcel, Western 25 Suffolk/Nassau Special Groundwater 26 Protection Areas, Mott Haven-Port Morris 27 Waterfront, Bronx River Greenway, Inner 28 City/Underserved Community Parks, Long 29 Pond, Staten Island Greenbelt, Staten 30 Island Bluebelt, Staten Island Wet Woods, 31 Great Swamp, Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands 32 Complex, New York Highlands, Shawangunk 33 Mountains Region, Delaware River High- 34 lands, Hudson River Corridor/Hudson River 35 Estuary and Greenway Trail/Hudson River 36 School Art Trail, Hudson Valley/New York 37 City Foodshed, Catskill Unfragmented 38 Forest, Catskill River and Road Corridors, 39 New York City Watershed Lands, Taconic 40 Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, 41 Five Rivers Environmental Education 42 Center, Lake George watershed, Lake Cham- 43 plain watershed, Boeselager forestry, 44 Rensselaer Plateau, Oomsdale Farm and 45 Surrounding Landscape, Turtle Conservation 46 Sites, Region 4 Rail Trail Projects, 47 Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, Sarato- 48 ga County, Hudson River Projects, Follens- 49 by Park, Washington County, Rome Sand 50 Plains, Black Creek Watershed, Tug Hill 51 Core Forests and Headwater Streams, Nelson 172 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Swamp, State Park Battlefields, Genny 2 Green Trail/Link Trail, Onondaga Escarp- 3 ment, State Parks Greenbelt/Tompkins Coun- 4 ty, Cattaraugus Creek and tributaries, 5 Northern Montezuma Wetlands, Genesee River 6 Corridor, Seneca Army Depot Conservation 7 Area, Lake Erie Tributary Gorges, Buffalo 8 River Watershed, Catharine Valley Complex, 9 High-Tor/Bristol Hills/Bare Hill State 10 Unique Area, Lake Ontario and Lake Erie 11 Shorelines, Islands and Niagara River, 12 Long Island Trails and Greenways, Bronx 13 Harlem Greenway, Harbor Herons Wildlife 14 Complex, Schunnemunk Mountain/Moodna 15 Creek/Woodcock Mountain/Hudson Highlands 16 Connectivity Project, Helderbergs, and 17 Finger Lakes Shorelines and Riparian 18 Zones, Hand Hollow Conservation Area, 19 Northern Flow River Corridors, Black River 20 Valley Corridor, Fort Drum Army Compatible 21 Use Buffer Project, Herkimer Home 22 Viewshed, Inman Gulf, Massawepie Mire, 23 Moose River Corridor, St. Lawrence River 24 Islands, Shoreline and Wetlands, Southern 25 Skaneateles Lake Forest and Shoreline, 26 Salmon River Corridor, Emerald Necklace, 27 Riparian Buffers, Coastline and Wetland 28 Protection Projects Aimed at Reducing the 29 Impacts of Storms, Storm Surges and Flood- 30 ing on Human and Natural Communities, Long 31 Distance Trail Corridors, Statewide Small 32 Projects, State Forest, Unique Area Wild- 33 life Management Area Protection, Working 34 Forest Lands, State Park and State Histor- 35 ic Site Protection, (a) notwithstanding 36 any law to the contrary, $3,200,000 from 37 the land acquisition allocation for urban 38 forestry projects provided that no less 39 than $500,000 shall be made available for 40 such programs in cities and towns with 41 populations of 65,000 or more, including 42 up to $200,000 to the New York State Urban 43 and Community Forestry Council for the 44 support of urban forestry in New York 45 State, and up to $200,000 for municipal 46 grants for re-treeing public lands 47 impacted by the invasive species; (b) 48 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 49 $3,500,000 from the land acquisition allo- 50 cation to the land trust alliance for the 51 purpose of awarding grants on a compet- 52 itive basis to local land trusts, provided 173 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 that up to ten percent of such amount may 2 be made available for administrative costs 3 and/or technical assistance, including: up 4 to $500,000 for the purchase of critical 5 grassland habitat for endangered, threat- 6 ened and other high priority species of 7 grassland birds; (c) notwithstanding any 8 law to the contrary, not less than 9 $4,000,000 for land acquisition in depart- 10 ment of environmental conservation regions 11 1, 2 and 3; (d) $1,500,000 to the land 12 trust alliance for the purpose of awarding 13 grants on a competitive basis to local 14 land trusts to purchase conservation ease- 15 ments, provided that up to ten percent of 16 such amount may be made available for 17 administrative costs and/or technical 18 assistance; (e) up to $250,000 shall be 19 made available to the tug hill tomorrow 20 land trust for army compatible use buffer 21 program projects around Fort Drum; (f) up 22 to $200,000 for pre-acquisition costs 23 associated with an open space grant 24 program to be administered by the depart- 25 ment of environmental conservation; and 26 (g) $150,000 for the Brooklyn Queens Land 27 Trust (09LA26ER) (24703) .................... 32,500,000 28 Albany Pine Bush Preserve Commission 29 (09AP26ER) (24828) ........................... 3,100,000 30 Long Island Central Pine Barrens Planning 31 (09LP26ER) (24829) ........................... 2,500,000 32 Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve 33 (09SE26ER) (24831) ........................... 3,000,000 34 Agricultural non-point source abatement and 35 control projects, notwithstanding any law 36 to the contrary, including projects to 37 combat harmful algal blooms; $250,000 38 shall be made available to Cornell for the 39 pesticide management education program to 40 support training and certification 41 (09AN26ER) (24832) .......................... 18,700,000 42 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement 43 and control projects notwithstanding any 44 law to the contrary, $1,000,000 of such 45 amount shall be made available for Cornell 46 community integrated pest management 47 (09NP26ER) (24833) ........................... 6,000,000 48 Agriculture and farmland protection activ- 49 ities, notwithstanding section 325-a of 50 the agriculture and markets law, (a) up to 51 $175,000 shall be made available to 52 Cornell University for services and 174 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 expenses of land classification, agricul- 2 ture district mapping and master list of 3 soils; and (b) up to $1,000,000 for capac- 4 ity grants (09FP26ER) (24825) ............... 27,000,000 5 Biodiversity stewardship and research; 6 including funding for public New York 7 universities to conduct field studies and 8 research on biodiversity issues and (a) up 9 to $500,000 of this amount to support 10 pollinator diversity, up to $300,000 of 11 which may be allocated to Cornell Univer- 12 sity, including research related to the 13 potential adverse impacts of pesticides 14 such as neonicitinoids, pursuant to a 15 contract with the department of agricul- 16 ture and markets, including the develop- 17 ment of bee husbandry best management 18 practices such as pest and pathogen 19 controls; creating diversity of pollinator 20 habitats; research to understand, prevent 21 and recover from pollinator losses; and 22 outreach and education; (b) including 23 $200,000 for the Cary Institute of Ecosys- 24 tem Studies to support the Catskill envi- 25 ronmental research and monitoring program; 26 (c) $200,000 to Paul Smith's College for 27 the Adirondack Watershed Institute; and 28 (d) $200,000 to the State University of 29 New York at Albany for the Atmospheric 30 Sciences Research Center (09BD26ER)(24827) ... 1,850,000 31 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for 32 the Hudson River Estuary Management Plan 33 prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of 34 the environmental conservation law, 35 including projects to combat harmful algal 36 blooms some or all of which may be allo- 37 cated to the New England Interstate Water 38 Pollution Control Commission or Cornell 39 water resources institute or department of 40 natural resources for the purposes of 41 implementing the Hudson River Estuary 42 Action agenda, $1,500,000 of which shall 43 be for the Mohawk river action plan 44 (09HE26ER) (24836) ........................... 8,000,000 45 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for 46 the Finger Lakes-Lake Ontario Watershed 47 Protection Alliance (09FL26ER) (24835) ....... 4,000,000 48 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to 49 the Erie County Soil and Water Conserva- 50 tion District for the Lake Erie Watershed 51 Protection Alliance (09LE26ER) (25764) ......... 250,000 175 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for 2 the state share of costs of wastewater 3 treatment improvement projects undertaken 4 by municipalities to upgrade municipal 5 systems to meet stormwater, combined sewer 6 overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and 7 wastewater treatment discharge require- 8 ments with priority given to systems that 9 are in violation of title 8 of article 17 10 of the environmental conservation law and 11 aquatic habitat restoration projects 12 undertaken by municipalities and not-for- 13 profit corporations for aquatic habitat 14 restoration projects as defined in subdi- 15 vision 1 of section 56-0101 of the envi- 16 ronmental conservation law and including 17 projects to combat harmful algal blooms; 18 (a) including up to $3,000,000 to Suffolk 19 county to provide a 50 percent match for a 20 program developed in consultation with the 21 department for research, development and 22 pilot projects to develop cost effective 23 methods to address nitrogen and pathogen 24 loading from septic system or cesspool 25 effluent or other sources or to support 26 such efforts without a match at the state 27 university of Stony Brook directly or 28 through its research foundation and 29 $1,500,000 for Suffolk county for sewer 30 improvement projects; (b) including 31 $5,000,000 for clean water infrastructure 32 projects benefitting Nassau county includ- 33 ing but not limited to the Bay park waste- 34 water treatment plant outfall pipe, asso- 35 ciated conveyance systems, nitrogen 36 abatement treatment works, ocean outfall 37 and/or connections, and/or for costs 38 incurred by Nassau County for the project 39 to connect the Long Beach waste water 40 treatment plant collection system to the 41 Bay Park wastewater treatment plant 42 including $750,000 for the Long Island 43 watershed program to implement the action 44 agenda and $250,000 to the Long Island 45 regional planning council for services and 46 expenses related to the Long Island Nitro- 47 gen Action Plan; (c) including $5,000,000 48 to update source water assessment plans 49 and develop associated water protection 50 programs some or all of which may be allo- 51 cated to the United States Geological 52 Survey or the New England Interstate Water 176 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Pollution Control Commission; (d) $150,000 2 for the Chautauqua Lake Association; (e) 3 $95,000 for the Chautauqua Lake Partner- 4 ship; (f) $1,000,000 to Cornell University 5 to support research development and any 6 associated monitoring, testing or pilot 7 projects towards improved septic and 8 wastewater treatment systems or remedi- 9 ation to remove contaminants of emerging 10 concern in groundwater; (g) $1,200,000 to 11 the Cayuga County Soil and Water Conserva- 12 tion District on behalf of the Eastern 13 Finger Lakes Coalition for the adminis- 14 tration of the eastern finger lakes 15 watershed basin program; (h) $1,000,000 16 for the Allegheny River watershed program, 17 including Chautauqua Lake projects; (i) 18 $1,300,000 for the Lake Erie-Niagara River 19 watershed basin program; (j) $1,000,000 to 20 the State University of New York at Stony 21 Brook directly or through its research 22 foundation, to support research develop- 23 ment and any associated testing or pilot 24 projects towards improved septic and 25 wastewater treatment systems to remove 26 phosphorous; (k) $300,000 for a study of 27 the Great Swamp; (l) $300,000 for the 28 Bronx River Alliance, Inc.; (m) $610,000 29 for the Finger Lakes Institute at Hobart 30 and William Smith Colleges; (n) $150,000 31 for the Fund for the City of New York-Ja- 32 maica Bay Rockaway Parks Conservancy, 33 Inc.; and (o) $200,000 to Save the Great 34 South Bay, Inc. for the restoration of the 35 Great South Bay (09WQ26ER) (24837) .......... 28,000,000 36 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for 37 New York ocean and Great Lakes ecosystem 38 conservation projects, consistent with the 39 policy articulated in article 14 of the 40 environmental conservation law including 41 projects to combat harmful algal blooms; 42 (a) including $1,000,000 for the Peconic 43 Estuary Partnership; and (b) $500,000 to 44 the Billion Oyster Project, Inc. for the 45 construction of the Hudson Reef project 46 (09GL26ER)(24830) ........................... 26,000,000 47 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for 48 the implementation of the recommendations 49 of the invasive species task force 50 prepared pursuant to chapter 324 of the 51 laws of 2003 and for the purposes set 52 forth in chapter 674 of the laws of 2007, 177 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 (a) including not less than $175,000 for 2 Cornell University for the plant certif- 3 ication program, (b) provided that not 4 less than $5,750,000 be made available for 5 invasive species eradication, including 6 but not limited to southern pine beetle, 7 (c) including up to $500,000 to Cornell 8 University for the control of hemlock 9 wooly adelgid, and including grants 10 related to the control and management of 11 invasive species, and (d) $500,000 to 12 address the southern pine beetle including 13 up to $250,000 to the Central Pine Barrens 14 Joint Planning and Policy Commission for 15 the implementation and administration of a 16 prescribed fire program. Such funding for 17 grants shall be provided on a competitive 18 basis in consultation with the New York 19 Invasive Species Council (09IS26ER) 20 (24704) ..................................... 18,550,000 21 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for 22 services and expenses to support the costs 23 of recruiting and retaining Soil and Water 24 Conservation District Regional Engineers 25 and Soil and Water Conservation District 26 activities as authorized for reimbursement 27 and funding in section 11-a of the soil 28 and water conservation districts law 29 including projects to combat harmful algal 30 blooms (09SW26ER) (24834) ................... 19,000,000 31 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for 32 Agricultural Waste Management projects, 33 including up to $700,000 to Cornell 34 University, in consultation with the 35 department, to continue implementing the 36 dairy acceleration program (09AW26ER) 37 (24826) ...................................... 2,400,000 38 Lake George Park Commission (09LG26ER) 39 (62038) ........................................ 975,000 40 For services, expenses, and grants related 41 to the urban farms and community gardens 42 grant program, including but not limited 43 to up to $325,000 for Cornell University 44 (09UF26ER) (24695) ........................... 2,325,000 45 Capital Projects Funds - Other 46 Environmental Protection Fund 47 Parks, Recreation and Historic Preservation Account - 48 30453 49 Environment and Recreation Purpose 178 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses of projects and 2 purposes authorized by section 92-s of the 3 state finance law to receive funding from 4 the parks, recreation and historic preser- 5 vation account in accordance with a 6 programmatic and financial plan to be 7 approved by the director of the budget, 8 including suballocation to other state 9 departments and agencies, according to the 10 following: 11 Local waterfront revitalization programs, 12 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 13 (a) not less than $10,500,000 for water- 14 front revitalization projects which are in 15 or primarily serve areas where demographic 16 and other relevant data for such areas 17 demonstrate that the areas are densely 18 populated and have sustained physical 19 deterioration, decay, neglect, or disin- 20 vestment, or where a substantial propor- 21 tion of the residential population is of 22 low income or is otherwise disadvantaged 23 and is underserved with respect to the 24 existing recreational opportunities in the 25 area; (b) including up to $2,000,000 for 26 updates to existing local waterfront revi- 27 talization program plans to mitigate 28 future physical climate risks; and (c) 29 $500,000 for the Niagara River greenway 30 commission (09WR26ER) (24700) ............... 14,275,000 31 Parks, recreation and historic preservation 32 projects, notwithstanding any law to the 33 contrary, (a) not less than, $14,000,000 34 for municipal parks projects which are in 35 or primarily serve areas where demographic 36 and other relevant data for such areas 37 demonstrate that the areas are densely 38 populated and have sustained physical 39 deterioration, decay, neglect or disin- 40 vestment or where a substantial proportion 41 of the residential population is of low 42 income or is otherwise disadvantaged and 43 is underserved with respect to the exist- 44 ing recreational opportunities in the 45 area; (b) including up to $250,000 for 46 Tivoli Park; (c) $500,000 suballocated to 47 the Hudson River Valley Greenway Authority 48 for the Hudson River Valley Trail Grants; 49 (d) $250,000 to the State University of 50 New York college of environmental science 51 and forestry; (e) $250,000 to Paul Smith's 52 College for the support of the Adirondack 179 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Park interpretive centers; (f) $250,000 to 2 the Catskill Center for conservation and 3 development for the support of the Cats- 4 kill Visitors Center; (g) $250,000 to the 5 Village of Westbury for the Alphonse 6 Campbell/Powells Lane Park; (h) $150,000 7 to Forest Park Trust, Inc.; (i) $100,000 8 to Hunters Point Parks Conservancy; (j) 9 $100,000 to North Brooklyn Parks Alliance; 10 (k) $200,000 to the Wolf Conservation 11 Center, Inc.; (l) $1,000,000 to Planting 12 Fields Foundation, Inc.; and (m) $250,000 13 to the Horticultural Society of New York 14 (09MP26ER) (24701) .......................... 28,750,000 15 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for 16 state parks and land and easement infras- 17 tructure, access and stewardship projects 18 which shall include capital projects: (a) 19 on state parks and state lands pursuant to 20 sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the envi- 21 ronmental conservation law; (b) on state 22 parks or state owned lands and easements 23 under the jurisdiction of the department 24 of environmental conservation or the 25 office of parks, recreation and historic 26 preservation for access opportunities for 27 people with disabilities; access to the 28 State Forest Preserve, State reforesta- 29 tion, Wildlife Management areas and 30 conservation easement lands; recreational 31 trail construction and maintenance: 32 including but not limited to sustainable 33 trail crews or other activities related to 34 sustainable use of the forest preserve and 35 other state lands that are threatened by 36 overuse; Catskill and Adirondack camp 37 ground improvements to public access and 38 sanitation facilities; environmental 39 education; facility improvements; archeo- 40 logical, historic, cultural and natural 41 resource surveys, forest health surveys, 42 interpretation, and inventories, and 43 response to forest pests including south- 44 ern pine beetle; Forest Preserve and state 45 forest unit management planning; invasive 46 species management; conservation easement 47 public recreation planning; habitat resto- 48 ration and enhancement; state fish hatch- 49 ery improvements; state tree nursery 50 improvements; safety equipment; water 51 access facilities and safety improvements; 52 public beach facility development and 180 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 improvement; public access improvements at 2 day use areas; state historic site exteri- 3 or restoration; and cabin area and camping 4 facility development, restoration and 5 reconstruction; (c) $2,650,000 from the 6 public access and stewardship allocation 7 to Parks & Trails New York for the purpose 8 of awarding grants on a competitive basis 9 to local parks and department of environ- 10 mental conservation friends groups, 11 provided that up to ten percent of such 12 amount may be made available for adminis- 13 trative costs and/or technical assistance; 14 (d) public protection and emergency 15 preparedness purposes; (e) $10,000,000 for 16 Adirondack and Catskill visitor safety and 17 wilderness protection activities to 18 address issues relating to overuse, 19 including $250,000 to the Adirondack Moun- 20 tain Club for visitor centers, and 21 $750,000 to the Adirondack Architectural 22 Heritage for the management of the Camp 23 Santanoni Historic Area; and (f) 24 $2,000,000 to the Ausable Freshwater 25 Center and their academic partners for a 26 climate change and Adirondack lake ecosys- 27 tem survey (09ST26ER) (24702) ............... 40,000,000 28 Notwithstanding subdivision 7 of section 29 92-s of the state finance law or any other 30 law to the contrary, for services and 31 expenses of the Hudson River Park Trust 32 for projects related to the development of 33 the Hudson River Park consistent with 34 provisions of chapter 592 of the laws of 35 1998, including but not limited to utility 36 infrastructure improvements; provided, 37 however, such funds shall not be available 38 for suballocation to any public benefit 39 corporation or public authority with the 40 exception of the Hudson River Park Trust 41 and shall be available solely for the 42 liabilities incurred by the Hudson River 43 Park Trust or by other state departments 44 or agencies on behalf of the Hudson River 45 Park Trust on or after April 1, 1999. 46 Provided further that, the comptroller is 47 hereby authorized and directed to release 48 monies to the Hudson River Park Trust in 49 amounts set forth in a schedule approved 50 by the director of the budget (09HR26ER) 51 (24820) ...................................... 4,400,000 52 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for 181 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 zoos, botanical gardens and aquaria 2 program (09ZB26ER) (24823) .................. 22,500,000 3 Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, 4 for the administration of the programs of 5 section 79-b of the navigation law 6 (09NV26ER) (25719) ........................... 2,300,000 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Environmental Protection Fund 9 Solid Waste Account - 30452 10 Environment and Recreation Purpose 11 For services and expenses of projects and 12 purposes authorized by section 92-s of the 13 state finance law to receive funding from 14 the solid waste account in accordance with 15 a programmatic and financial plan to be 16 approved by the director of the budget, 17 including suballocation to other state 18 departments and agencies, according to the 19 following: 20 Non-hazardous landfill closure projects 21 (09LC26ER) (24813) ............................. 300,000 22 Municipal waste reduction or recycling 23 projects, including developing secondary 24 recycling markets in New York state and 25 developing reuse, repair and decon- 26 struction opportunities through municipal 27 and not-for-profit grants. $6,000,000 of 28 such amount shall be made available for 29 municipalities and not-for-profits for 30 projects for food donation and the recycl- 31 ing of food scraps; and $3,250,000 for the 32 center for sustainable materials manage- 33 ment at the State University of New York 34 College of Environmental Science and 35 Forestry (09MR26ER) (24814) ................. 23,000,000 36 Secondary materials regional marketing 37 assistance (09SM26ER) (24816) .................. 650,000 38 Pesticide program, not less than $200,000 of 39 which shall be for activities related to 40 Long Island pesticide pollution prevention 41 (09PD26ER) (24818) ........................... 1,500,000 42 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for 43 the payment of the costs associated with 44 environmental justice projects and 45 programs, including but not limited to: 46 monitoring of air quality; education and 47 outreach; (a) $3,800,000 for the connect 48 kids program, including the payment of 49 transportation costs to swim instruction 50 programs in the State at facilities oper- 182 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 ated by State, municipal and not-for-pro- 2 fit organizations, and for facilitating 3 access in title 1 school districts, muni- 4 cipalities, and not-for-profit organiza- 5 tions to outdoor recreational activities, 6 public lands and parks providing environ- 7 mental education opportunities in environ- 8 mental justice, inner city and underserved 9 communities; (b) $4,000,000 of such amount 10 shall be made available for community 11 impact and job training grants. Community 12 impact and job training grants shall be in 13 or affecting environmental justice commu- 14 nities in an amount of up to $200,000 for 15 community groups for projects that address 16 an environmental justice community's expo- 17 sure to multiple environmental harms and 18 risks, including lead exposure and shall 19 include implementation, studies, including 20 air monitoring, to investigate the envi- 21 ronment, or related public health issues 22 of the community, research that will be 23 used to expand the knowledge or under- 24 standing of the affected community and 25 ways to improve the resiliency of the 26 affected community. The results of the 27 investigation shall be disseminated to 28 members of the affected community. Commu- 29 nity groups eligible for funding must 30 provide services within the same community 31 as the environmental and/or related public 32 health issues to be addressed by the 33 project. Such groups shall be primarily 34 focused on addressing the environmental 35 and/or related public health issues of the 36 residents of the affected community and 37 shall be comprised primarily of members of 38 the affected community; (c) $1,142,000 for 39 the college of environmental science and 40 forestry center for native peoples and the 41 environment; (d) $300,000 to the Newtown 42 Creek Alliance, Inc.; (e) $200,000 to the 43 Bronx Bethany Community Corporation; (f) 44 $100,000 to the Lower East Side Ecology 45 Center; and (g) $125,000 to the Long 46 Island City Coalition (09EJ26ER) (24713) .... 15,600,000 47 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for 48 natural resource damages assessment, 49 recovery, and restoration (09RD26ER) 50 (24817) ...................................... 1,775,000 51 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for 52 the pollution prevention institute, and 183 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 including $250,000 for the department to 2 contract with the Northeast waste manage- 3 ment officials' association for the Inter- 4 state Chemicals Clearing house (09PP26ER) 5 (24815) ...................................... 4,600,000 6 Environmental health for assessments, test- 7 ing and actions including but not limited 8 to abatement to address suspected human 9 exposure to chemical, physical and micro- 10 biological agents, including contaminants 11 in drinking water, including projects to 12 combat harmful algal blooms, including 13 vector control for tick-borne illnesses 14 such as lyme disease; (a) including up to 15 $500,000 for the CleanSweepNY program; (b) 16 $4,000,000 for children's environmental 17 health centers, including school and 18 community childhood lead exposure assess- 19 ment conducted by such centers; (c) not 20 more than $4,500,000 for programs to 21 expand and improve access to local, fresh, 22 nutritional food to nutritionally under- 23 served neighborhoods, including but not 24 limited to the New York State Fresh 25 Connect Program, expanded Supplemental 26 Nutrition Assistance Program access, 27 expanded community supported agriculture 28 program benefits, and the development of 29 expanded technological access for these 30 communities; and (d) $1,000,000 to the 31 State University of New York at Stony 32 Brook directly or through its research 33 foundation, to support research develop- 34 ment and any associated testing or pilot 35 projects towards the treatment of water to 36 remove contaminants of emerging concern 37 (09EH26ER) (25703) .......................... 12,000,000 38 Brownfield opportunity area grants as 39 authorized pursuant to section 970-r of 40 the general municipal law (09BO26ER) 41 (25702) ...................................... 2,000,000 42 FISH AND WILDLIFE (CCP) ...................................... 7,000,000 43 -------------- 44 Capital Projects Funds - Other 45 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 46 Habitat Conservation and Access Account - 32217 47 Fish and Wildlife Purpose 48 For services and expenses, including 49 personal service, nonpersonal service, 184 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 fringe benefits and indirect costs related 2 to management, protection and restoration 3 fish and wildlife habitat, and improvement 4 and development of public access for fish 5 and wildlife related recreation (09HC2654) 6 (24718) ...................................... 2,000,000 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 9 Endangered and Threatened Species Mitigation Bank Fund - 10 32228 11 Fish and Wildlife Purpose 12 For services and expenses, related to the 13 projects undertaken to facilitate a net 14 conservation benefit to endangered and 15 threatened species potentially impacted by 16 a major renewable energy facility as put 17 forth in section 11-0535-c of environ- 18 mental conservation law, including subal- 19 location to other state departments and 20 agencies (09ES2654) (62034) .................. 5,000,000 21 LANDS AND FORESTS (CCP) ...................................... 3,000,000 22 -------------- 23 Capital Projects Funds - Other 24 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 25 Lands and Forests Purpose 26 For services and expenses, including 27 personal service, nonpersonal service, 28 indirect costs and fringe benefits related 29 to the stewardship of newly acquired and 30 existing state lands, for the implementa- 31 tion of Unit Management Plans, costs 32 related to invasive species management 33 activities and for the development and 34 implementation of Green Certification for 35 state forests, including suballocation to 36 other state departments and agencies 37 (09LF2653) (25766) ........................... 2,000,000 38 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 39 Federal Capital Projects Fund 40 ENCON Federal Capital Account - 31364 41 Lands and Forests Purpose 42 For the federal share of capital projects 43 pursuant to lands and forests resources 44 purposes including the costs associated 185 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 with the acquisition of lands under the 2 forest legacy program, including suballo- 3 cation to other state departments and 4 agencies (09FL2653) (24847) .................. 1,000,000 5 MARINE RESOURCES (CCP) ....................................... 1,000,000 6 -------------- 7 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 8 Federal Capital Projects Fund 9 ENCON Federal Capital Account - 31364 10 Marine Projects Purpose 11 For the federal share of capital projects 12 undertaken pursuant to fish and wildlife 13 and marine resources purposes including 14 the acquisition of property including 15 suballocation to other state departments 16 and agencies (09MR26A1) (24708) .............. 1,000,000 17 NEW YORK WORKS (CCP) ....................................... 114,000,000 18 -------------- 19 Capital Projects Funds - Other 20 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 21 Operational Services Purpose 22 For services, expenses, and indirect costs 23 related to New York Works projects includ- 24 ing but not limited to air monitoring 25 infrastructure investments; remediation of 26 legacy environmental contamination; 27 investments in information technology; dam 28 safety projects and the demolition of 29 unsafe structures on state-owned land; 30 state-owned flood protection projects; 31 shore protection projects; state land 32 stewardship, public access and environ- 33 mental and recreation infrastructure 34 projects, vehicles and equipment; water 35 quality improvement projects, fish hatch- 36 eries; rehabilitation and improvements of 37 various department facilities and systems; 38 and well plugging; up to $24,000,000 for 39 the Conklingville, Indian Lake, Sixth Lake 40 and Old Forge Dams; up to $5,000,000 for 41 the Albany Pine Bush Preserve Commission; 42 notwithstanding any other provision of law 43 to the contrary, up to $1,500,000 to the 44 Adirondack Architectural Heritage for the 45 improvement, maintenance, renovation, and 46 management of the Camp Santanoni Historic 186 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Area; including personal service, nonper- 2 sonal service and fringe benefits, includ- 3 ing suballocation to any other state 4 department, agency, public authority or 5 public benefit corporation (09NY2651) 6 (25768) .................................... 114,000,000 7 OPERATIONS (CCP) ............................................ 50,500,000 8 -------------- 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 11 Operational Services Purpose 12 For rehabilitation and improvements of vari- 13 ous department facilities and systems; 14 including but not limited to services and 15 expenses of the Department for payment of 16 various liabilities accrued heretofore and 17 hereafter to accrue, pursuant to Articles 18 15, 17, and 27 of the Environmental 19 Conservation Law; for projects and 20 purposes required by Executive Order 88, 21 including design, construction, operation 22 and maintenance of all new buildings, and 23 the development and purchase of energy 24 efficient equipment; for remedial activ- 25 ities at state-owned facilities, including 26 the compliance with state and federal laws 27 and regulations; for alterations, rehabil- 28 itation and improvements at education 29 camps and centers; campground moderniza- 30 tion and reconstruction; purchase of capi- 31 tal equipment and for the renovation, 32 rehabilitation and reconstruction of the 33 department of environmental conservation's 34 fish hatcheries; for design and 35 construction of department facilities 36 including personal service and fringe 37 benefits and indirect costs in accordance 38 with a programmatic and financial plan to 39 be approved by the director of the budget 40 including suballocation to other state 41 departments and agencies (09RI2651) 42 (24855) ..................................... 40,000,000 43 For services and expenses, including 44 personal service, fringe benefits, and 45 non-personal services necessary for reme- 46 dial activities to plug or replug aban- 47 doned oil and gas wells including the 48 surface restoration of the affected land 187 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 pursuant to article 23 of the environ- 2 mental conservation law (09OG2651) (25767) ... 5,500,000 3 For replacement of vehicles and heavy duty 4 construction equipment; for purchase and 5 replacement of equipment and facility 6 improvements, including but not limited to 7 air monitoring, maintenance of facilities 8 and emergency response in support of 9 public safety, including personal 10 services, fringe benefits and indirect 11 costs (09EQ2651) (24856) ..................... 5,000,000 12 SOLID AND HAZARDOUS WASTE MANAGEMENT (CCP) ................. 155,000,000 13 -------------- 14 Capital Projects Funds - Other 15 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 16 Hazardous Waste Purpose 17 For payment by the state, as reimbursement 18 or as an advance from responsible parties 19 or volunteers for remedial and monitoring 20 work at sites contaminated with hazardous 21 waste. No portion of this appropriation 22 shall be available for expenditure until a 23 party or parties either responsible for a 24 site or volunteering to cleanup a site 25 have entered into an agreement with the 26 commissioner of the department of environ- 27 mental conservation or the commissioner's 28 designee, and which agreement is approved 29 by the director of the budget, providing 30 for repayment to the state of an amount 31 equal to the amount disbursed from this 32 appropriation. A copy of such agreement 33 shall be filed with the state comptroller, 34 the chairman of the senate finance commit- 35 tee and chairman of the assembly ways and 36 means committee. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 38 to the contrary, the comptroller is 39 authorized to repay settlements or 40 advances for specified remedial and moni- 41 toring projects from this fund with monies 42 of the hazardous waste remedial fund 43 received for such projects pursuant to 44 consent orders and agreements to address 45 sites contaminated with hazardous waste. 46 The director of the budget shall certify to 47 the comptroller the specific portions of 48 this appropriation for which monies have 188 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 been received pursuant to such consent 2 orders and agreements (09AD26F7) (24868) .... 20,000,000 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Hazardous Waste Remedial Fund 5 Hazardous Waste Cleanup Account - 31506 6 Hazardous Waste Purpose 7 For payment of the state share of the costs 8 of hazardous waste site remediation 9 projects, in accordance with title 13 of 10 article 27 of the environmental conserva- 11 tion law and section 97-b of the state 12 finance law, for projects, and for payment 13 of state costs associated with the remedi- 14 ation of offsite contamination at signif- 15 icant threat sites as provided for in 16 section 27-1411 of the environmental 17 conservation law, including personal 18 service and fringe benefits of the depart- 19 ments of environmental conservation, 20 health and law and including suballo- 21 cations to the departments of health and 22 law and including costs incidental and 23 appurtenant thereto, provided that a 24 portion of such amount may be available 25 for environmental restoration projects in 26 accordance with title 5 of article 56 of 27 the environmental conservation law. None 28 of this appropriation may be expended for 29 any purposes authorized in title 12 of 30 article 27 of the environmental conserva- 31 tion law (09HB26F7) (24863) ................ 125,000,000 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Hazardous Waste Remedial Fund 34 Hazardous Waste Remediation Oversight and Assistance 35 Account - 31505 36 Hazardous Waste Purpose 37 For the non-personal service, personal 38 services and fringe benefits of the 39 department of environmental conservation 40 including suballocation to the department 41 of health related to the brownfield clean- 42 up program pursuant to title 14 of article 43 27 of the environmental conservation law 44 and the voluntary cleanup program includ- 45 ing costs incurred prior to April 1, 2026 46 (09BC26F7) (24867) .......................... 10,000,000 189 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT (CCP) ................................ 27,700,000 2 -------------- 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 5 Solid Waste Management Purpose 6 For services and capital expenses related to 7 the waste management and cleanup program 8 as put forth in section 27-1915 of envi- 9 ronmental conservation law, including 10 suballocation to other state departments 11 and agencies (09WT2656) (25730) .............. 4,000,000 12 For pre-closure and post-closure costs asso- 13 ciated with Adirondack landfills pursuant 14 to agreements with Essex county (09EX2656) 15 (24872) ........................................ 500,000 16 Capital Projects Funds - Other 17 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 18 New York Environmental Protection and Spill Remediation 19 Account - 32219 20 Solid Waste Management Purpose 21 For services and capital expenses associated 22 with costs incurred under Article 12 of 23 the Navigation Law, and for cleanup, 24 investigation, and removal of petroleum 25 spills, including prior year liabilities 26 (09OS2656) (25720) .......................... 21,200,000 27 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 28 Federal Capital Projects Fund 29 ENCON Federal Capital Account - 31364 30 Hazardous Waste Purpose 31 For the federal share of the cleanup of 32 hazardous waste sites pursuant to the 33 provision of the federal comprehensive 34 environmental response, compensation and 35 liability act of 1980 reauthorization or 36 amendments thereto including suballocation 37 to other state departments and agencies 38 (09FS26F7) (24873) ........................... 1,000,000 39 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 40 Federal Capital Projects Fund 41 ENCON Federal Capital Account - 31364 42 Solid Waste Management Purpose 190 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the federal share of capital projects 2 undertaken pursuant to materials manage- 3 ment resources purposes including suballo- 4 cation to other state departments and 5 agencies (09MF2656) (62036) .................. 1,000,000 6 WATER RESOURCES (CCP) .................................... 2,076,100,000 7 -------------- 8 Capital Projects Funds - Other 9 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 10 Flood Control Purpose 11 For the state's share including personal 12 service, nonpersonal service, fringe bene- 13 fits and indirect costs of various shore 14 protection projects including suballo- 15 cation to other state departments and 16 agencies (09W12663) (24880) ................ 554,400,000 17 For various new and existing flood 18 protection projects including the state 19 share of federal sponsored flood control 20 projects, and the maintenance of existing 21 flood control projects; for coastal 22 erosion hazard area mapping of the state's 23 Atlantic Ocean and Great Lakes coastlines 24 and the state share of costs associated 25 with matching federal funds for a state- 26 wide flood plain map modernization 27 program; for the state share of costs 28 associated with the installation and/or 29 reinstallation, upgrade, monitoring and 30 maintenance of a statewide network of 31 stream flow gauges, including personal 32 service, nonpersonal service, fringe bene- 33 fits and indirect costs, including subal- 34 location to other state departments and 35 agencies (09FL2663) (24881) ................. 18,000,000 36 For an advance payment by the state for the 37 local costs of various shore protection 38 projects. No portion of this appropriation 39 shall be available until the respective 40 municipality has entered into an agreement 41 with the commissioner of the department of 42 environmental conservation, and such 43 agreement is approved by the director of 44 the budget (09AD2663) (24887) ................ 5,000,000 45 For services and expenses of the Ithaca 46 shoal removal project. All or a portion of 47 these funds may be suballocated to any 48 other state department, agency, public 191 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 authority or public benefit corporation 2 (09IS2663) .................................. 14,000,000 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 5 Water Resources Purpose 6 An advance for costs incurred relating to 7 work required for the safety of dams and 8 other structures impounding water, to be 9 reimbursed in accordance with section 10 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 11 law (09DA2657) (24878) ......................... 500,000 12 For payment of a portion of the state's 13 match for federal capitalization grants 14 for the water pollution control revolving 15 fund (09RF2657) (24874) ..................... 89,000,000 16 For services and expenses including personal 17 service, fringe benefits, and nonpersonal 18 service for the water pollution control 19 revolving fund and related water quality 20 activities including suballocation to 21 other state departments and agencies 22 (09SR2657) (25707) ........................... 3,500,000 23 For services and expenses including personal 24 service, fringe benefits, and nonpersonal 25 service for the Excelsior Conservation 26 Corps program including suballocation to 27 other state departments and agencies 28 (09CC2657) (25708) ............................. 200,000 29 The sum of $525,000,000 is hereby appropri- 30 ated for the costs of clean water infras- 31 tructure projects, including services, 32 expenses, and indirect costs, including 33 but not limited to the following: projects 34 as authorized by the New York state water 35 infrastructure improvement act of 2017; 36 for New York state intermunicipal water 37 infrastructure projects pursuant to 38 section 1285-s of the public authorities 39 law; for water quality improvement 40 projects, including nonagricultural 41 nonpoint source abatement and control 42 projects, municipal wastewater treatment 43 projects, and municipal separate storm 44 sewer system projects, and for the proper 45 management of road salt; for green infras- 46 tructure projects; for land acquisition 47 projects, including projects for source 48 water protection pursuant to title 33 of 49 article 15 of the environmental conserva- 50 tion law; for state assistance payments, 192 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 services, and expenses to soil and water 2 conservation districts for the cost of 3 water quality protection projects awarded 4 on a competitive basis prioritizing finan- 5 cial need and hardship, intended to assist 6 concentrated animal feeding operations; 7 for the remediation of sites, including 8 for investigation, mitigation and remedi- 9 ation of solid waste sites, pursuant to 10 titles 12 and 13 of article 27 of the 11 environmental conservation law and 12 consistent with the provisions of section 13 97-b of the state finance law, provided 14 however that no more than $10,000,000 of 15 such appropriation may be expended for 16 investigation, mitigation and remediation 17 of solid waste sites; for replacement of 18 lead drinking water service lines pursuant 19 to section 1114 of the public health law; 20 for New York City for water quality 21 projects located within the New York City 22 watershed; for a program to upgrade or 23 replace septic systems and cesspools 24 pursuant to section 1285-u of the public 25 authorities law; for water infrastructure 26 emergency assistance pursuant to section 27 1285-t of the public authorities law; to 28 support municipal water quality infras- 29 tructure programs which may otherwise not 30 qualify for state support, or may require 31 additional state support; for a program to 32 provide state assistance for the testing 33 and remediation of emerging contaminants 34 in private drinking water wells; for the 35 development of information technology 36 systems related to water quality pursuant 37 to section 3-0315 of the environmental 38 conservation law. All or a portion of the 39 appropriation may be provided to the envi- 40 ronmental facilities corporation or subal- 41 located to any other state department, 42 agency, public authority, or public bene- 43 fit corporation. Any portion of this 44 appropriation may be transferred to state 45 operations or aid to localities within the 46 state education department (09CW2657) 47 (25722) .................................... 525,000,000 48 Notwithstanding sections 112 and 163 of the 49 state finance law and section 142 of the 50 economic development law, or any other 51 inconsistent provision of law, funds 52 available for expenditure pursuant to this 193 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 appropriation may be allocated to support 2 water infrastructure improvement projects 3 necessary to promote housing development, 4 improvements and rehabilitation in regions 5 throughout the state, pursuant to a plan 6 submitted by the chief executive officer 7 of the environmental facilities corpo- 8 ration and approved by the division of the 9 budget. Such plan shall 1) include 10 projects that provide water access and 11 public health benefits to the residents of 12 New York State; 2) to the extent practica- 13 ble, prioritize providing funding to 14 projects located in disadvantaged communi- 15 ties; 3) be shared with the secretaries of 16 the assembly ways and means committee and 17 the senate finance committee no less than 18 sixty days after approval; 4) consider 19 projects that upgrade existing water, 20 sewer, and stormwater infrastructure. A 21 portion of this appropriation may be 22 suballocated and/or transferred to any 23 state department, agency, public authority 24 or public benefit corporation (09WH2657) ... 175,000,000 25 Notwithstanding sections 112 and 163 of the 26 state finance law and section 142 of the 27 economic development law, or any other 28 inconsistent provision of law, funds 29 available for expenditure pursuant to this 30 appropriation may be allocated to support 31 water infrastructure improvement projects 32 necessary to promote housing preservation, 33 development, improvements and rehabili- 34 tation in rural areas, pursuant to a plan 35 submitted by the chief executive officer 36 of the environmental facilities corpo- 37 ration and approved by the division of the 38 budget. Such plan shall 1) include 39 projects that provide water access and 40 public health benefits to the residents of 41 New York State; 2) to the extent practica- 42 ble, prioritize providing funding to 43 projects located in disadvantaged communi- 44 ties; 3) be shared with the secretaries of 45 the assembly ways and means committee and 46 the senate finance committee no less than 47 sixty days after approval; 4) consider 48 projects that upgrade existing water, 49 sewer, and stormwater infrastructure. All 50 or a portion of this appropriation may be 51 suballocated and and/or transferred to any 52 state department, agency, public authori- 194 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 ty, or public benefit corporation 2 (09HW2657) .................................. 50,000,000 3 For services and expenses of the Erie County 4 Department of Environment and Planning, 5 including but not limited to the Transit 6 Road Corridor project. All or a portion 7 of these funds may be suballocated to any 8 other state department, agency, public 9 authority or public benefit corporation 10 (09TR2657) .................................. 30,000,000 11 For the state's share of shore protection or 12 coastal erosion projects, including the 13 Army Corps of Engineers South Shore of 14 Staten Island Project (09SI2657) (25721) .... 10,000,000 15 For services and expenses of the Village of 16 Tupper Lake related to wastewater treat- 17 ment (09TW2657) ............................. 12,500,000 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 20 Renourishment Account - 32232 21 Flood Control Purpose 22 For payment by the state for local costs of 23 projects pursuant to section 40-a of state 24 finance law, including but not limited to 25 Army Corps of Engineers projects for: 26 supporting coastal renourishment and resi- 27 liency projects, water infrastructure and 28 protection projects, elevation of struc- 29 tures, widening of river channels, and 30 construction or rehabilitation of retain- 31 ing walls, seawalls, drainage structures, 32 levees, dunes and seawall groins or other 33 coastal defense structures. No portion of 34 this appropriation shall be available 35 until the respective municipality has 36 entered into an agreement with the commis- 37 sioner of the department of environmental 38 conservation and such agreement is 39 approved by the director of the budget 40 (09FZ2663) .................................. 84,000,000 41 Capital Projects Funds - Other 42 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 43 Local Water Protection Account 44 Flood Control Purpose 45 For an advance payment by the state for the 46 local costs of various water protection 47 projects pursuant to section 40-a of state 48 finance law. No portion of this appropri- 195 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 ation shall be available until the respec- 2 tive municipality has entered into an 3 agreement with the commissioner of the 4 department of environmental conservation, 5 and such agreement is approved by the 6 director of the budget (09KR2663) ........... 29,000,000 7 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 8 Federal Capital Projects Fund 9 SRF Capitalization Grants Account - 31359 10 Water Resources Purpose 11 For federal capitalization grants for the 12 water pollution control revolving fund 13 (09SF2657) (24876) ......................... 471,000,000 14 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 15 Federal Capital Projects Fund 16 ENCON Federal Capital Account - 31364 17 Water Resources Purpose 18 For the federal share of capital projects 19 undertaken pursuant to water resources 20 purposes including suballocation to other 21 state departments and agencies (09WF2657) 22 (62037) ...................................... 5,000,000 196 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ADMINISTRATION (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Administration Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For employee fringe benefits and indirect costs related to employees 7 paid from department capital projects funds and capital accounts 8 (09FG2550) (25729) ... 20,000,000 ................ (re. $10,761,000) 9 For services and expenses related to the support of the Department of 10 Environmental Conservation, including but not limited to personal 11 service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 12 This appropriation is available for payments for state operations, 13 aid to localities, or capital purposes (09TS2550) (25623) .......... 14 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $19,446,000) 15 For services and expenses related to the cybersecurity of water and 16 wastewater systems, including but not limited to the provision of 17 technical assistance and funding for such purpose. All or a portion 18 of the appropriation may be provided to the environmental facilities 19 corporation or suballocated to any other state department, agency, 20 public authority, or public benefit corporation (09EF2550) (62049) 21 ... 2,500,000 .................................... (re. $2,500,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 23 For employee fringe benefits and indirect costs related to employees 24 paid from department capital projects funds and capital accounts 25 (09FG2450) (25729) ... 20,000,000 ................. (re. $5,935,000) 26 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 27 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software, and 28 services. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any other 29 state department to achieve the purpose of this appropriation 30 (09CS2450) (24807) ... 5,000,000 .................... (re. $315,000) 31 For services and expenses related to the support of the Department of 32 Environmental Conservation, including but not limited to personal 33 service, nonpersonal service, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 34 This appropriation is available for payments for state operations, 35 aid to localities, or capital purposes (09TS2450) (25623) .......... 36 10,000,000 .......................................... (re. $659,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 38 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements at education camps 39 and centers including personal service, fringe benefits and indirect 40 costs (09ED1750) (24806) ... 500,000 ................ (re. $500,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2015: 43 For services and expenses including personal service, fringe benefits 44 and indirect costs relating to the maintenance and upgrade of the 45 department's information technology infrastructure, including but 46 not limited to the improved resiliency of the existing computer 47 systems environment, business continuance, equipment and infrastruc- 197 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ture related to the DEC automated licensing system (DECALS) and 2 improvements necessary for compliance with statewide cyber security 3 requirements including suballocation to other state departments and 4 agencies (09CS1450) (24807) ... 2,000,000 ......... (re. $2,000,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 6 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements at education camps 7 and centers including personal service, fringe benefits and indirect 8 costs (09ED1350) (24806) ... 1,000,000 .............. (re. $270,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2015: 11 For services and expenses including personal service, fringe benefits 12 and indirect costs relating to the maintenance and upgrade of the 13 department's information technology infrastructure, including but 14 not limited to the improved resiliency of the existing computer 15 systems environment, business continuance, equipment and infrastruc- 16 ture related to the DEC automated licensing system (DECALS) and 17 improvements necessary for compliance with statewide cyber security 18 requirements including suballocation to other state departments and 19 agencies (09CS1350) (24807) ... 4,000,000 ......... (re. $4,000,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 21 section 1, of the laws of 2015: 22 For services and expenses including personal service, fringe benefits 23 and indirect costs relating to the maintenance and upgrade of the 24 department's information technology infrastructure, including but 25 not limited to the improved resiliency of the existing computer 26 systems environment, business continuance, equipment and infrastruc- 27 ture related to the DEC automated licensing system (DECALS) and 28 improvements necessary for compliance with statewide cyber security 29 requirements including suballocation to other state departments and 30 agencies (09CS1250) (24807) ... 1,000,000 ......... (re. $1,000,000) 31 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 32 section 1, of the laws of 2015: 33 For services and expenses including personal services and fringe bene- 34 fits and indirect costs relating to the maintenance and upgrade of 35 the department's information technology infrastructure, including 36 but not limited to the improved resiliency of the existing computer 37 systems environment, business continuance, equipment and infrastruc- 38 ture related to the DEC automated licensing system (DECALS) and 39 improvements necessary for compliance with statewide cyber security 40 requirements including suballocation to other state departments and 41 agencies (09CS0950) (24807) ... 3,500,000 ......... (re. $1,734,000) 42 Capital Projects Funds - Other 43 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 44 Grants Reimbursement from Non-Federal Entity Account 32231 45 Administration Projects Purpose 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 198 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the expenditure of funds with a federal nexus, and administered by 2 a non-federal entity, and made available for reimbursement to the 3 department of environmental conservation via official contract, 4 award, or agreement. For environmental purposes including but not 5 limited to construction, reconstruction, preservation, and operating 6 costs including personal service, nonpersonal service, fringe bene- 7 fits and indirect costs. Any portion of this appropriation may be 8 transferred to state operations and aid to localities. Notwith- 9 standing any other inconsistent provisions of law, funding appropri- 10 ated herein is authorized for suballocation or transfer to other 11 state departments, agencies, and authorities, and may be transferred 12 or interchanged within the department of environmental conservation, 13 as necessary to accomplish the intended purpose of the awarded funds 14 with a federal nexus (09NF2550) (62050) ............................ 15 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 16 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 17 Federal Capital Projects Fund - 31364 18 ENCON Federal Infrastructure and Jobs Act 19 Administration Projects Purpose 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 21 For the expenditure of federal funds including but not limited to 22 those funds provided for in the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs 23 Act made available to the department of environmental conservation, 24 from any federal agency under any federal programs, for environ- 25 mental purposes including but not limited to construction, recon- 26 struction, preservation, and operating costs. Any portion of this 27 appropriation may be transferred to state operations and aid to 28 localities. Notwithstanding any other inconsistent provisions of 29 law, funding appropriated herein is authorized for suballocation or 30 transfer to other state departments, agencies, and authorities, and 31 may be transferred or interchanged within the department of environ- 32 mental conservation, as necessary to accomplish the intended purpose 33 of the federal funds (09IJ2550) (62014) ............................ 34 70,000,000 ....................................... (re. $70,000,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 37 For the expenditure of federal funds including but not limited to 38 those funds provided for in the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs 39 Act made available to the department of environmental conservation, 40 from any federal agency under any federal programs, for environ- 41 mental purposes including but not limited to construction, recon- 42 struction, preservation, and operating costs. Any portion of this 43 appropriation may be transferred to state operations and aid to 44 localities. Notwithstanding any other inconsistent provisions of 45 law, funding appropriated herein is authorized for suballocation or 46 transfer to other state departments, agencies, and authorities, and 47 may be transferred or interchanged within the department of environ- 48 mental conservation, as necessary to accomplish the intended purpose 199 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of the federal funds (09IJ2450) (62014) ............................ 2 63,514,000 ....................................... (re. $63,514,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53, 4 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 5 For the expenditure of federal funds including but not limited to 6 those funds provided for in the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs 7 Act made available to the department of environmental conservation, 8 from any federal agency under any federal programs, for environ- 9 mental purposes including but not limited to construction, recon- 10 struction, preservation, and operating costs. Any portion of this 11 appropriation may be transferred to state operations and aid to 12 localities. Notwithstanding any other inconsistent provisions of 13 law, funding appropriated herein is authorized for suballocation or 14 transfer to other state departments, agencies, and authorities, and 15 may be transferred or interchanged within the department of environ- 16 mental conservation, as necessary to accomplish the intended purpose 17 of the federal funds (09IJ2350) (62014) ............................ 18 67,058,000 ....................................... (re. $61,800,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 21 For the expenditure of federal funds including but not limited to 22 those funds provided for in the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs 23 Act made available to the department of environmental conservation, 24 from any federal agency under any federal programs, for environ- 25 mental purposes including but not limited to construction, recon- 26 struction, preservation, and operating costs. Any portion of this 27 appropriation may be transferred to state operations and aid to 28 localities. Notwithstanding any other inconsistent provisions of 29 law, funding appropriated herein is authorized for suballocation or 30 transfer to other state departments, agencies, and authorities, and 31 may be transferred or interchanged within the department of environ- 32 mental conservation, as necessary to accomplish the intended purpose 33 of the federal funds (09IJ2250) (62014) ............................ 34 49,045,000 ........................................ (re. $4,187,000) 35 Capital Projects Funds - Other 36 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 37 ENCON Capital Miscellaneous Gifts Account - 32224 38 Operational Services Purposes 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 40 For services and expenses for projects in support of the department's 41 mission in accordance with section 3-0321 of the environmental 42 conservation law (09GI2351) (25613) ................................ 43 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 45 For services and expenses for projects in support of the department's 46 mission in accordance with section 3-0321 of the environmental 47 conservation law (09GI2051) (25613) ... 1,000,000 ... (re. $468,000) 200 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 AIR RESOURCES (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 3 Federal Capital Projects Fund 4 ENCON Federal Capital Account - 31364 5 Air Resources Purpose 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 7 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to air 8 resources purposes including suballocation to other state depart- 9 ments and agencies (09AF2555) (24693) .............................. 10 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 12 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to air 13 resources purposes including suballocation to other state depart- 14 ments and agencies (09AF2455) (24693) .............................. 15 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 16 AIR RESOURCES - CLEAN WATER/CLEAN AIR (CCP) 17 Capital Projects Funds - Other 18 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 19 Air Resources Purpose 20 Air Quality Improvement Projects 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 22 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of air 23 quality/green growth projects in accordance with the provisions of 24 title 6 of article 56 of the environmental conservation law for 25 project costs, including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto 26 and for payment of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air 27 implementation fund for services and expenses of state departments 28 and agencies, including fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as 29 "Air Quality Project Disbursements". The moneys appropriated herein 30 may be suballocated to any state department or agency. Further, 31 moneys herein appropriated may be suballocated only to public 32 authorities and public benefit corporations specifically authorized 33 by title 6 of article 56 of the environmental conservation law to 34 enter into contracts for state assistance payments for the state 35 share of costs for air quality projects, provided however, that 36 moneys herein appropriated pursuant to subdivision 1 of section 37 56-0603 of the environmental conservation law for state clean-fueled 38 vehicles projects may be suballocated to any public authority or 39 public benefit corporation and moneys herein appropriated pursuant 40 to section 56-0607 of the environmental conservation law for other 41 air quality projects may be suballocated to the environmental facil- 42 ities corporation. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 43 contrary, the moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for 44 state air quality improvement projects in accordance with title 6 of 45 article 56 of the environmental conservation law upon the issuance 201 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of a certificate of approval of availability by the director of the 2 division of the budget. The state comptroller shall at the commence- 3 ment of each month certify to the director of the division of the 4 budget, the commissioner of environmental conservation, the chairman 5 of the senate finance committee, and the chairman of the assembly 6 ways and means committee, the amounts disbursed from this appropri- 7 ation for "Air Quality Improvement Disbursements" for the month 8 preceding such certification (09BA0255) (24809) .................... 9 6,000,000 ........................................... (re. $567,000) 10 Project Schedule 11 PROJECT AMOUNT 12 -------------------------------------------- 13 (thousands of dollars) 14 Clean-fueled buses projects .......... 4,000 15 State clean-fueled vehicles 16 projects ........................... 2,000 17 -------------- 18 Total .............................. 6,000 19 ============== 20 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998: 21 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of air 22 quality/green growth projects in accordance with the provisions of 23 title 6 of article 56 of the environmental conservation law for 24 project costs, including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto 25 and for payment of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air 26 implementation fund for services and expenses of state departments 27 and agencies, including fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as 28 "Air Quality Project Disbursements". The moneys appropriated herein 29 may be suballocated to any state department or agency. Further, 30 moneys herein appropriated may be suballocated only to public 31 authorities and public benefit corporations specifically authorized 32 by title 6 of article 56 of the environmental conservation law to 33 enter into contracts for state assistance payments for the state 34 share of costs for air quality projects, provided however, that 35 moneys herein appropriated pursuant to paragraph one of section 36 56-0603 of the environmental conservation law for state clean-fueled 37 vehicles projects may be suballocated to any public authority or 38 public benefit corporation and moneys herein appropriated pursuant 39 to section 56-0607 of the environmental conservation law for other 40 air quality projects may be suballocated to the environmental facil- 41 ities corporation. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 42 special law, the moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for 43 state air quality improvement projects in accordance with title 6 of 44 article 56 of the environmental conservation law upon the issuance 45 of a certificate of approval of availability by the director of the 46 division of the budget. The state comptroller shall at the commence- 47 ment of each month certify to the director of the division of the 48 budget, the commissioner of environmental conservation, the chairman 49 of the senate finance committee, and the chairman of the assembly 50 ways and means committee the amounts disbursed from this appropri- 202 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ation for "Air Quality Improvement Disbursements" for the month 2 preceding such certification (09BA9855) (24809) .................... 3 44,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,510,000) 4 project schedule 5 PROJECT AMOUNT 6 -------------------------------------------- 7 (thousands of dollars) 8 State clean-fueled vehicles 9 projects ........................... 6,000 10 Clean-fueled buses projects ......... 10,000 11 Other air quality projects ........... 3,000 12 Clean air for schools projects ...... 10,000 13 Clean air for schools projects ...... 15,000 14 -------------- 15 Total ............................. 44,000 16 ============== 17 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997: 18 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of air 19 quality/green growth projects in accordance with the provisions of 20 title 6 of article 56 of the environmental conservation law for 21 project costs, including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto 22 and for payment of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air 23 implementation fund for services and expenses of state departments 24 and agencies, including fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as 25 "Air Quality Project Disbursements". The moneys appropriated herein 26 may be suballocated to any state department or agency. Further, 27 moneys herein appropriated may be suballocated only to public 28 authorities and public benefit corporations specifically authorized 29 by title 6 of article 56 of the environmental conservation law to 30 enter into contracts for state assistance payments for the state 31 share of costs for air quality projects, provided however, that 32 moneys herein appropriated pursuant to paragraph one of section 33 56-0603 of the environmental conservation law for state clean-fueled 34 vehicles projects may be suballocated to any public authority or 35 public benefit corporation and moneys herein appropriated pursuant 36 to section 56-0607 of the environmental conservation law for other 37 air quality projects may be suballocated to the environmental facil- 38 ities corporation. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 39 special law, the moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for 40 state air quality improvement projects in accordance with title 6 of 41 article 56 of the environmental conservation law upon the issuance 42 of a certificate of approval of availability by the director of the 43 division of the budget. The state comptroller shall at the commence- 44 ment of each month certify to the director of the division of the 45 budget, the commissioner of environmental conservation, the chairman 46 of the senate finance committee, and the chairman of the assembly 47 ways and means committee the amounts disbursed from this appropri- 48 ation for "Air Quality Improvement Disbursements" for the month 49 preceding such certification (09BA9755) (24809) .................... 50 80,000,000 ....................................... (re. $22,568,000) 203 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 project schedule 2 PROJECT AMOUNT 3 -------------------------------------------- 4 (thousands of dollars) 5 State clean-fueled vehicles 6 projects ........................... 4,000 7 Clean-fueled buses projects .......... 4,000 8 Other air quality projects .......... 17,000 9 Clean air for schools projects ...... 25,000 10 Environmental compliance 11 assistance projects - air 12 quality .......................... 30,000 13 -------------- 14 Total ............................ 80,000 15 ============== 16 AIR RESOURCES - EQBA (CCP) 17 Capital Projects Funds - Other 18 Capital Projects Fund - EQBA (Bondable) - 30000 19 Air Resources Purpose 20 Municipal Air Quality Improvement Projects 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2002, as amended by chapter 55, 22 section 1, of the laws of 2003: 23 For payment of the costs of state air quality improvement projects 24 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 25 (09720255) (24810) ... 5,810,000 .................. (re. $5,421,000) 26 State Air Quality Improvement Projects 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1987: 28 For payment of the cost of State air quality improvement projects, 29 including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1987 30 (09A18755) (24811) ................................................. 31 2,588,000 ........................................... (re. $528,000) 32 CLEAN WATER/CLEAN AIR BOND FUND (CCP) 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Clean Water/Clean Air Bond Fund 35 Clean Water/Clean Air Bond Fund Account - 30690 36 Bond Proceeds Purpose 37 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997: 38 The sum of $1,475,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary is 39 hereby appropriated from the clean water/clean air bond fund as 40 established by section 97-aaa of the state finance law for payment 41 to the capital projects fund for disbursements from such fund as 42 certified by the state comptroller as: "Safe Drinking Water Project 43 Disbursements", "Clean Water Project Disbursements", "Solid Waste 204 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Project Disbursements", "Environmental Restoration Project Disburse- 2 ments", and "Air Quality Project Disbursements". 3 The director of the budget shall designate to the state comptroller 4 appropriations made from the capital projects fund which are eligi- 5 ble for reimbursement from the clean air/clean water bond fund. The 6 state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify to 7 the director of the budget, the chairman of the senate finance 8 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means commit- 9 tee, the amounts disbursed from such appropriations. 10 No moneys shall be available from the clean water/clean air bond fund 11 until a certificate of approval of availability shall have been 12 issued by the director of the budget, and a copy of such certificate 13 of approval filed with the chairman of the senate finance committee 14 and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee (09019710) 15 (80913) ... 1,475,000,000 ........................ (re. $92,390,000) 16 CLEAN WATER, CLEAN AIR, AND GREEN JOBS ENVIRONMENTAL BOND ACT (CCP) 17 Capital Projects Fund - Other 18 Capital Projects Fund - Clean Water, Clean Air, And Green Jobs Envi- 19 ronmental Bond Act (Bondable) - 30000 20 Clean Water, Clean Air, And Green Jobs Environmental Bond Act Purpose 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 22 For the payment of the costs of capital projects, pursuant to the 23 environmental bond act of 2022 and section 58-0303 of the environ- 24 mental conservation law, to be reimbursed from bond proceeds for 25 capital projects for restoration and flood risk reduction, including 26 not more than $250,000,000 for a voluntary real property buy-out 27 program, not less than $100,000,000 for shoreline protection, and 28 not less than $100,000,000 for inland flooding and the local water- 29 front revitalization program. 30 Costs of such projects may include but not be limited to appraisal, 31 surveying, planning, engineering and architectural services, plans 32 and specifications, consultation and legal services, site prepara- 33 tion, demolition, construction, and other direct expenses incident 34 to such project, including personal services, fringe benefits, and 35 indirect costs necessary for implementation. All or a portion of the 36 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 37 department, agency, or public authority including but not limited to 38 the environmental facilities corporation and New York state energy 39 research and development authority. 40 No part of this appropriation shall be made available prior to the 41 approval of the environmental bond act of 2022 by the voters at the 42 general election to be held in November of 2022 (09FR22RM) (62016) 43 ... 1,100,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,096,426,000) 44 For the payment of the costs of capital projects, pursuant to the 45 environmental bond act of 2022 and section 58-0503 of the environ- 46 mental conservation law, to be reimbursed from bond proceeds for 47 capital projects for open space land conservation and recreation 48 including not more than $75,000,000 for fish hatcheries, not less 205 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 than $300,000,000 for open space, and not less than $150,000,000 for 2 farmland protection. 3 Costs of such projects may include but not be limited to appraisal, 4 surveying, planning, engineering and architectural services, plans 5 and specifications, consultation and legal services, site prepara- 6 tion, demolition, construction, and other direct expenses incident 7 to such project, including personal services, fringe benefits, and 8 indirect costs necessary for implementation. All or a portion of the 9 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 10 department, agency, or public authority including but not limited to 11 the environmental facilities corporation and New York state energy 12 research and development authority. 13 No part of this appropriation shall be made available prior to the 14 approval of the environmental bond act of 2022 by the voters at the 15 general election to be held in November of 2022 (09OP22RM) (62017) 16 ... 650,000,000 ................................. (re. $634,154,000) 17 For the payment of the costs of capital projects, pursuant to the 18 environmental bond act of 2022 and section 58-0703 of the environ- 19 mental conservation law, to be reimbursed from bond proceeds for 20 capital projects for climate change mitigation, including not less 21 than $400,000,000 for green buildings, not less than $500,000,000 22 for zero emission transportation, including the purchase or conver- 23 sion of zero emission school buses, and supporting infrastructure, 24 not less than $100,000,000 for climate adaptation and mitigation 25 projects, and not less than $200,000,000 for disbursement to reduce 26 or eliminate water pollution or air pollution affecting disadvan- 27 taged communities. 28 Costs of such projects may include but not be limited to appraisal, 29 surveying, planning, engineering and architectural services, plans 30 and specifications, consultation and legal services, site prepara- 31 tion, demolition, construction, and other direct expenses incident 32 to such project, including personal services, fringe benefits, and 33 indirect costs necessary for implementation. All or a portion of the 34 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 35 department, agency, or public authority including but not limited to 36 the environmental facilities corporation and New York state energy 37 research and development authority. 38 No part of this appropriation shall be made available prior to the 39 approval of the environmental bond act of 2022 by the voters at the 40 general election to be held in November of 2022 (09CC22RM) (62018) 41 ... 1,500,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,491,747,000) 42 For the payment of the costs of capital projects, pursuant to the 43 environmental bond act of 2022 and section 58-0903 of the environ- 44 mental conservation law, to be reimbursed from bond proceeds for 45 capital projects for water quality improvement and resilient infras- 46 tructure, including not less than $200,000,000 for water infrastruc- 47 ture improvement act projects and not less than $250,000,000 for 48 municipal stormwater grants. 49 Costs of such projects may include but not be limited to appraisal, 50 surveying, planning, engineering and architectural services, plans 51 and specifications, consultation and legal services, site prepara- 52 tion, demolition, construction, and other direct expenses incident 206 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 to such project, including personal services, fringe benefits, and 2 indirect costs necessary for implementation. All or a portion of the 3 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 4 department, agency, or public authority including but not limited to 5 the environmental facilities corporation and New York state energy 6 research and development authority. 7 No part of this appropriation shall be made available prior to the 8 approval of the environmental bond act of 2022 by the voters at the 9 general election to be held in November of 2022 (09WQ22RM) (62019) 10 ... 650,000,000 ................................. (re. $642,331,000) 11 For the payment of the costs of capital projects, pursuant to the 12 environmental bond act of 2022 and article 58 the environmental 13 conservation law, to be reimbursed from bond proceeds for capital 14 projects that preserve, enhance, and restore New York's natural 15 resources and reduce the impact of climate change. 16 Costs of such projects may include but not be limited to appraisal, 17 surveying, planning, engineering and architectural services, plans 18 and specifications, consultation and legal services, site prepara- 19 tion, demolition, construction, and other direct expenses incident 20 to such project, including personal services, fringe benefits, and 21 indirect costs necessary for implementation. All or a portion of the 22 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 23 department, agency, or public authority including but not limited to 24 the environmental facilities corporation and New York state energy 25 research and development authority. 26 No part of this appropriation shall be made available prior to the 27 approval of the environmental bond act of 2022 by the voters at the 28 general election to be held in November of 2022 (09RS22RM) (62020) 29 ... 300,000,000 ................................. (re. $300,000,000) 30 Capital Projects Fund - Other 31 Clean Water, Clean Air, and Green Jobs Environmental Bond Act Bond 32 Fund 33 Clean Water, Clean Air, and Green Jobs Environmental Bond Act Bond 34 Fund Account - 30720 35 Bond Proceeds Purpose 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 37 The sum of $4,200,000,000, or so much thereof as may be necessary and 38 available, is hereby appropriated from the clean water, clean air, 39 and green jobs environmental bond act bond fund as established by 40 section 97-tttt of the state finance law in accordance with the 41 provisions of such section, as added by a chapter of the laws of 42 2022, for payment to the capital projects fund in order to reimburse 43 such fund for disbursements certified by the state comptroller as 44 bondable under the provisions of the environmental bond act of 2022 45 "clean water, clean air, and green jobs environmental bond act". 46 The director of the budget is hereby authorized to designate to the 47 state comptroller specific appropriations made from the capital 48 projects fund for purposes for which clean water, clean air, and 49 green jobs environmental bond act expenditures are authorized. The 50 state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify to 207 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the director of the budget, the chairman of the senate finance 2 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means commit- 3 tee, the amounts disbursed from the appropriations so designated by 4 the director of the budget from the capital projects fund for such 5 purposes for the month preceding such certification and such certif- 6 ication shall not exceed in the aggregate the moneys hereby appro- 7 priated. A copy of each such certificate shall also be delivered to 8 departments, agencies, and public authorities to which such capital 9 project fund appropriations are made available. 10 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, no 11 moneys shall be available from the clean water, clean air, and green 12 jobs environmental bond act bond fund until a certificate of 13 approval of availability shall have been issued by the director of 14 the budget, and a copy of such certificate of approval filed with 15 the state comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance committee, 16 and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee. Such 17 certificate may be amended from time to time by the director of the 18 budget, and a copy of each such amendment shall be filed with the 19 state comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance committee, and 20 the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee (09RM2210) 21 (62021) ... 4,200,000,000 ..................... (re. $4,195,440,000) 22 ENVIRONMENT AND RECREATION (CCP) 23 Capital Projects Funds - Other 24 Environmental Protection Fund 25 Climate Change Mitigation and Adaptation Account - 30455 26 Environment and Recreation Purpose 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 28 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 29 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 30 climate change mitigation and adaptation account in accordance with 31 a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the director of 32 the budget, including suballocation to other state departments and 33 agencies, according to the following: 34 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to address greenhouse gas 35 emissions outside of the power sector including but not limited to 36 the development of statewide greenhouse gas inventories, demon- 37 stration projects, community engagement and applied research related 38 to the transportation sector or methane and other short-lived 39 climate pollutant sources; including up to (a) $500,000 for the 40 regenerate NY grant program; (b) $500,000 to the North American 41 Sustainable Refrigeration Council for the purpose of establishing a 42 natural refrigeration demonstration project in a disadvantaged 43 community; (c) up to $500,000 for grants to municipalities for 44 acquisition of community forests; and (d) $250,000 to the Vermont 45 Energy Investment Corporation for the deployment of natural refri- 46 gerants and greenhouse gas mitigation through research, demon- 47 stration projects, or outreach (09GG25ER) (25706) .................. 48 2,400,000 ......................................... (re. $2,400,000) 208 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, (a) for the department of 2 environmental conservation to enter into a contract or contracts for 3 the development of local climate resiliency plans and adaptation 4 projects, and (b) up to $20,000 to the department of agriculture and 5 markets for services and expenses of the wood products development 6 council, including suballocation to other state departments and 7 agencies; (c) $2,500,000 for climate coordinators, including for 8 disadvantaged communities; (d) $500,000 for a resiliency planting 9 program; (e) $25,000 to the Nature Conservancy in New York to 10 support the Staying Connected Initiative; (f) $1,500,000 for the 11 Climate and Applied Forestry Research Institute, a program of the 12 State University of New York College of Environmental Science and 13 Forestry, and Cornell's College of Agriculture and Life Sciences, to 14 support research and development of forestry and forest products; 15 and (g) $1,250,000 to the State University of New York College of 16 Environmental Science and Forestry for the Timbuctoo pipeline summer 17 climate and careers institute (09SV25ER) (25711) ................... 18 6,600,000 ......................................... (re. $6,600,000) 19 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, smart growth program state 20 assistance payments, provided on a competitive basis, to counties, 21 cities, towns, or villages to establish, update or implement compre- 22 hensive plans in a manner consistent with smart growth; provided, 23 however, that up to 25 percent of such payments may be awarded to 24 not-for-profit organizations for such purposes (09SG25ER) (24824) 25 ... 3,800,000 ..................................... (re. $3,800,000) 26 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for the New York state soil 27 and water conservation committee in conjunction with the department 28 of agriculture and markets to develop a pilot climate resilient 29 farms program consistent with agriculture and markets law articles 30 11-A and 11-B, agricultural environmental management program includ- 31 ing (a) up to $500,000 for the Cornell Soil Health Program for 32 research and education to improve soil resiliency to climate vari- 33 ations and mitigate green house gas emissions by carbon sequestra- 34 tion, and (b) up to $500,000 to maintain forests and woodlands 35 located on agricultural land for the purpose of carbon sequestration 36 and to promote sustainable and resilient agriculture land (09CR25ER) 37 (25718) ... 19,500,000 ........................... (re. $19,500,000) 38 Climate smart communities projects pursuant to title 15 of article 54 39 of the environmental conservation law including clean vehicle 40 projects; notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including: 41 $1,000,000 for municipal pilot programs for publicly accessible 42 electric vehicle fast chargers installed on municipal infrastructure 43 including for curbside charging stations (09CS25ER) (25701) ........ 44 12,000,000 ....................................... (re. $12,000,000) 45 For services, expenses, and grants related to the farmers' market 46 resiliency grant program, including but not limited to the increas- 47 ing farmers' markets resiliency through the development and enhance- 48 ment of farmers' market infrastructure and on-line sales and deliv- 49 ery capabilities across the state (09FM25ER) (24694) ............... 50 700,000 ............................................. (re. $700,000) 51 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 209 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 2 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 3 climate change mitigation and adaptation account in accordance with 4 a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the director of 5 the budget, including suballocation to other state departments and 6 agencies, according to the following: 7 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to address greenhouse gas 8 emissions outside of the power sector including but not limited to 9 the development of statewide greenhouse gas inventories, demon- 10 stration projects, community engagement and applied research related 11 to the transportation sector or methane and other short-lived 12 climate pollutant sources; including up to (a) $500,000 for the 13 regenerate NY grant program; (b) $500,000 to the North American 14 Sustainable Refrigeration Council for the purpose of establishing a 15 natural refrigeration demonstration project in a disadvantaged 16 community; (c) up to $500,000 for grants to municipalities for 17 acquisition of community forests (09GG24ER) (25706) ................ 18 2,400,000 ......................................... (re. $2,351,000) 19 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, (a) for the department of 20 environmental conservation to enter into a contract or contracts for 21 the development of local climate resiliency plans and adaptation 22 projects, and (b) up to $200,000 to the department of agriculture 23 and markets for services and expenses of the wood products develop- 24 ment council, including suballocation to other state departments and 25 agencies; (c) $2,000,000 for climate coordinators, including for 26 disadvantaged communities; (d) $500,000 for a resiliency planting 27 program; (e) $25,000 to the Nature Conservancy in New York to 28 support the Staying Connected Initiative; (f) and $1,500,000 to the 29 State University of New York College of Environmental Science and 30 Forestry, directly or through its Climate and Applied Forestry 31 Research Institute, and Cornell's College of Agriculture and Life 32 Sciences, to support research and development of forestry and forest 33 products; (g) $1,250,000 to the State University of New York College 34 of Environmental Science and Forestry for the Timbuctoo pipeline 35 summer climate and careers institute (09SV24ER) (25711) ............ 36 7,025,000 ......................................... (re. $7,025,000) 37 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, smart growth program state 38 assistance payments, provided on a competitive basis, to counties, 39 cities, towns, or villages to establish, update or implement compre- 40 hensive plans in a manner consistent with smart growth; provided, 41 however, that up to 25 percent of such payments may be awarded to 42 not-for-profit organizations for such purposes (09SG24ER) (24824) 43 ... 3,800,000 ..................................... (re. $3,800,000) 44 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for the New York state soil 45 and water conservation committee in conjunction with the department 46 of agriculture and markets to develop a pilot climate resilient 47 farms program consistent with agriculture and markets law article 48 11-A and 11-B, agricultural environmental management program includ- 49 ing (a) up to $500,000 for the Cornell Soil Health Program for 50 research and education to improve soil resiliency to climate vari- 51 ations and mitigate greenhouse gas emissions by carbon sequestra- 52 tion, and (b) up to $500,000 to maintain forests and woodlands 210 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 located on agricultural land for the purpose of carbon sequestration 2 and to promote sustainable and resilient agriculture and forestry 3 (09CR24ER) (25718) ... 15,250,000 ................ (re. $15,250,000) 4 Climate smart communities projects pursuant to title 15 of article 54 5 of the environmental conservation law including clean vehicle 6 projects (09CS24ER) (25701) ... 12,500,000 ....... (re. $12,500,000) 7 For services, expenses, and grants related to the farmers' market 8 resiliency grant program, including but not limited to the increas- 9 ing farmers' markets resiliency through the development and enhance- 10 ment of farmers' market infrastructure and on-line sales and deliv- 11 ery capabilities across the state (09FM24ER) (24694) ............... 12 700,000 ............................................. (re. $700,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 54, 14 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 15 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 16 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 17 climate change mitigation and adaptation account in accordance with 18 a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the director of 19 the budget, including suballocation to other state departments and 20 agencies, according to the following: 21 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to address greenhouse gas 22 emissions outside of the power sector including but not limited to 23 the development of statewide greenhouse gas inventories, demon- 24 stration projects, community engagement and applied research related 25 to the transportation sector or methane and other shortlived climate 26 pollutant sources; including up to $500,000 for the regenerate NY 27 grant program; $500,000 to the North American Sustainable Refriger- 28 ation Council for the purpose of establishing a natural refriger- 29 ation demonstration project in a disadvantaged community; up to 30 $1,000,000 for: grants to municipalities for acquisition of communi- 31 ty forests (09GG23ER) (25706) ... 2,900,000 ....... (re. $2,228,000) 32 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, (a) for the department of 33 environmental conservation to enter into a contract or contracts for 34 the development of local climate resiliency plans and adaptation 35 projects, and (b) up to $200,000 to the department of agriculture 36 and markets for services and expenses of the wood products develop- 37 ment council, including suballocation to other state departments and 38 agencies; $2,000,000 for climate coordinators, including for disad- 39 vantaged communities; and $2,100,000 to the State University of New 40 York College of Environmental Science and Forestry for the Timbuctoo 41 pipeline summer climate and careers institute; $500,000 for a resi- 42 liency planting program; $25,000 to the Nature Conservancy in New 43 York to support the Staying Connected Initiative; $500,000 for the 44 Association of Public Broadcasting Stations of New York, Inc. for 45 the creation and distribution of climate change digital teaching 46 tools, in consultation with the department of environmental conser- 47 vation; and $1,000,000 to the State University of New York College 48 of Environmental Science and Forestry, directly or through its 49 Climate and Applied Forestry Research Institute, to support research 50 and development of forestry and forest products (09SV23ER) (25711) 51 ... 7,925,000 ..................................... (re. $4,339,000) 211 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, smart growth program state 2 assistance payments, provided on a competitive basis, to counties, 3 cities, towns, or villages to establish, update or implement compre- 4 hensive plans in a manner consistent with smart growth; provided, 5 however, that up to 25 percent of such payments may be awarded to 6 not-for-profit organizations for such purposes (09SG23ER) (24824) 7 ... 3,650,000 ..................................... (re. $3,256,000) 8 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for the New York state soil 9 and water conservation committee in conjunction with the department 10 of agriculture and markets to develop a pilot climate resilient 11 farms program consistent with agriculture and markets law article 12 11-A and 11-B, agricultural environmental management program includ- 13 ing up to $500,000 for the Cornell Soil Health Program for research 14 and education to improve soil resiliency to climate variations and 15 mitigate greenhouse gas emissions by carbon sequestration; and 16 including up to $500,000 to maintain forests and woodlands located 17 on agricultural land for the purpose of carbon sequestration and to 18 promote sustainable and resilient agriculture and forestry 19 (09CR23ER) (25718) ... 15,250,000 ................. (re. $8,205,000) 20 Climate smart communities projects pursuant to title 15 of article 54 21 of the environmental conservation law including clean vehicle 22 projects; and $1,000,000 for municipal pilot programs for publicly 23 accessible electric vehicle fast chargers installed on municipal 24 infrastructure including for curbside charging stations (09CS23ER) 25 (25701) ... 13,500,000 ........................... (re. $13,500,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2025, as supplemented by an interchange in 28 accordance with section 93 of the state finance law, are hereby 29 amended and reappropriated to read: 30 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 31 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 32 climate change mitigation and adaptation account in accordance with 33 a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the director of 34 the budget, including suballocation to other state departments and 35 agencies, according to the following: 36 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to address greenhouse gas 37 emissions outside of the power sector including but not limited to 38 the development of statewide greenhouse gas inventories, demon- 39 stration projects, community engagement and applied research related 40 to the transportation sector or methane and other shortlived climate 41 pollutant sources; including up to $500,000 for the regenerate NY 42 grant program; $250,000 to the North American Sustainable Refriger- 43 ation Council for the purpose of establishing a natural refriger- 44 ation demonstration project in a disadvantaged community; up to 45 $500,000 for grants to municipalities for acquisition of community 46 forests (09GG22ER) (25706) ......................................... 47 [2,500,000]3,000,000 .............................. (re. $2,328,000) 48 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, (a) for the department of 49 environmental conservation to enter into a contract or contracts for 50 the development of local climate resiliency plans and adaptation 51 projects; notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including 212 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 $500,000 for a resiliency planting program, and (b) up to $200,000 2 to the department of agriculture and markets for services and 3 expenses of the wood products development council, including subal- 4 location to other state departments and agencies; $1,750,000 for 5 climate coordinators; and $2,100,000 to the State University of New 6 York College of Environmental Science and Forestry for the Timbuctoo 7 pipeline summer climate and careers institute; and $500,000 to the 8 State University of New York College of Environmental Science and 9 Forestry, directly or through its Climate and Applied Forestry 10 Research Institute, to support research and development of forestry 11 and forest products (09SV22ER) (25711) ............................. 12 5,800,000 ......................................... (re. $2,700,000) 13 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, smart growth program state 14 assistance payments, provided on a competitive basis, to counties, 15 cities, towns, or villages to establish, update or implement compre- 16 hensive plans in a manner consistent with smart growth; provided, 17 however, that up to 25 percent of such payments may be awarded to 18 not-for-profit organizations for such purposes (09SG22ER) (24824) 19 ... 3,000,000 ..................................... (re. $2,698,000) 20 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for the New York state soil 21 and water conservation committee in conjunction with the department 22 of agriculture and markets to develop a pilot climate resilient 23 farms program consistent with agriculture and markets law article 24 11-A and 11-B, agricultural environmental management program includ- 25 ing up to $500,000 for the Cornell Soil Health Program for research 26 and education to improve soil resiliency to climate variations and 27 mitigate greenhouse gas emissions by carbon sequestration (09CR22ER) 28 (25718) ... 16,750,000 ........................... (re. $10,559,000) 29 Climate smart communities projects pursuant to title 15 of article 54 30 of the environmental conservation law including clean vehicle 31 projects; notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including up to 32 [$500,000 for: grants to municipalities for acquisition of community 33 forests;] $1,000,000 for municipal pilot programs for publicly 34 accessible electric vehicle fast chargers installed on municipal 35 infrastructure including for curbside charging stations (09CS22ER) 36 (25701) ... [14,500,000]14,000,000 ............... (re. $13,739,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 39 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 40 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 41 climate change mitigation and adaptation account in accordance with 42 a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the director of 43 the budget, including suballocation to other state departments and 44 agencies, according to the following: 45 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to address greenhouse gas 46 emissions outside of the power sector including but not limited to 47 the development of statewide greenhouse gas inventories, demon- 48 stration projects, community engagement and applied research related 49 to the transportation sector or methane and other short-lived 50 climate pollutant sources; including up to $500,000 for the regener- 213 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ate NY grant program (09GG21ER) (25706) ............................ 2 1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,036,000) 3 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, (a) for the department of 4 environmental conservation to enter into a contract or contracts for 5 the development of local climate resiliency plans and adaptation 6 projects; notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including 7 $500,000 for a resiliency planting program, and (b) up to $200,000 8 to the department of agriculture and markets for services and 9 expenses of the wood products development council, including subal- 10 location to other state departments and agencies (09SV21ER) (25711) 11 ... 1,300,000 ....................................... (re. $800,000) 12 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, smart growth program state 13 assistance payments, provided on a competitive basis, to counties, 14 cities, towns, or villages to establish, update or implement compre- 15 hensive plans in a manner consistent with smart growth; provided, 16 however, that up to 25 percent of such payments may be awarded to 17 not-for-profit organizations for such purposes (09SG21ER) (24824) 18 ... 2,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,738,000) 19 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for the New York state soil 20 and water conservation committee in conjunction with the department 21 of agriculture and markets to develop a pilot climate resilient 22 farms program consistent with agriculture and markets law article 23 11-A, agricultural environmental management program including up to 24 $200,000 for the Cornell Soil Health Program for research and educa- 25 tion to improve soil resiliency to climate variations and mitigate 26 greenhouse gas emissions by carbon sequestration (09CR21ER) (25718) 27 ... 4,500,000 ..................................... (re. $1,573,000) 28 Climate smart communities projects pursuant to title 15 of article 54 29 of the environmental conservation law including clean vehicle 30 projects; notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including up to 31 $500,000 for: grants to municipalities for acquisition of community 32 forests; and not less than $1,000,000 for municipal pilot programs 33 for publicly accessible electric vehicle fast chargers installed on 34 municipal infrastructure (09CS21ER) (25701) ........................ 35 9,800,000 ......................................... (re. $7,900,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 54, 37 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 38 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 39 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 40 climate change mitigation and adaptation account in accordance with 41 a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the director of 42 the budget, including suballocation to other state departments and 43 agencies, according to the following: 44 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to address greenhouse gas 45 emissions outside of the power sector including but not limited to 46 the development of statewide greenhouse gas inventories, demon- 47 stration projects, community engagement and applied research related 48 to the transportation sector or methane and other short-lived 49 climate pollutant sources; including up to $500,000 for the regener- 50 ate NY grant program (09GG20ER) (25706) ............................ 51 1,500,000 ........................................... (re. $861,000) 214 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, (a) for the department of 2 environmental conservation to enter into a contract or contracts for 3 the development of local climate resiliency plans and adaptation 4 projects; notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including 5 $500,000 for a resiliency planting program, and (b) up to $200,000 6 to the department of agriculture and markets for services and 7 expenses of the wood products development council, including subal- 8 location to other state departments and agencies (09SV20ER) (25711) 9 ... 1,500,000 ....................................... (re. $818,000) 10 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, smart growth program state 11 assistance payments, provided on a competitive basis, to counties, 12 cities, towns, or villages to establish, update or implement compre- 13 hensive plans in a manner consistent with smart growth; provided, 14 however, that up to 25 percent of such payments may be awarded to 15 not-for-profit organizations for such purposes (09SG20ER) (24824) 16 ... 2,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,712,000) 17 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for the New York state soil 18 and water conservation committee in conjunction with the department 19 of agriculture and markets to develop a pilot climate resilient 20 farms program consistent with agriculture and markets law article 21 11-a, agricultural environmental management program including up to 22 $200,000 for the Cornell Soil Health Program for research and educa- 23 tion to improve soil resiliency to climate variations and mitigate 24 greenhouse gas emissions by carbon sequestration (09CR20ER) (25718) 25 ... 4,500,000 ..................................... (re. $1,426,000) 26 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as 27 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is hereby 28 amended and reappropriated to read: 29 Climate smart communities projects pursuant to title 15 of article 54 30 of the environmental conservation law including clean vehicle 31 projects; notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including $50,000 32 to Groundwork Hudson Valley; and up to $500,000 for: grants to muni- 33 cipalities for [aquisition]acquisition of community forests 34 (09CS20ER) (25701) ................................................. 35 9,650,000 ......................................... (re. $8,106,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 54, 37 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 38 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 39 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 40 climate change mitigation and adaptation account in accordance with 41 a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the director of 42 the budget, including suballocation to other state departments and 43 agencies, according to the following: 44 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to address greenhouse gas 45 emissions outside of the power sector including but not limited to 46 the development of statewide greenhouse gas inventories, demon- 47 stration projects, community engagement and applied research related 48 to the transportation sector or methane and other short-lived 49 climate pollutant sources; (a) up to $500,000 for the regenerate NY 50 grant program; and (b) up to $500,000 for Cornell for the natural 215 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 working lands agricultural inventory (09GG19ER) (25706) ............ 2 1,500,000 ........................................... (re. $514,000) 3 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, (a) for the department of 4 environmental conservation to enter into a contract or contracts for 5 the development of local climate resiliency plans and adaptation 6 projects; notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including 7 $500,000 for a resiliency planting program, and (b) up to $200,000 8 to the department of agriculture and markets for services and 9 expenses of the wood products development council, including subal- 10 location to other state departments and agencies (09SV19ER) (25711) 11 ... 2,500,000 ..................................... (re. $1,784,000) 12 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, smart growth program state 13 assistance payments, provided on a competitive basis, to counties, 14 cities, towns, or villages to establish, update or implement compre- 15 hensive plans in a manner consistent with smart growth; provided, 16 however, that up to 25 percent of such payments may be awarded to 17 not-for-profit organizations for such purposes (09SG19ER) (24824) 18 ... 2,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,539,000) 19 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for the New York state soil 20 and water conservation committee in conjunction with the department 21 of agriculture and markets to develop a pilot climate resilient 22 farms program consistent with agriculture and markets law article 23 11-a, agricultural environmental management program including up to 24 $200,000 for the Cornell Soil Health Program for research and educa- 25 tion to improve soil resiliency to climate variations and mitigate 26 greenhouse gas emissions by carbon sequestration, and up to $400,000 27 for the Dutchess county soil and water conservation district to 28 implement a Hudson Valley Carbon Farming Pilot project to study the 29 carbon and other greenhouse gas sequestration potential of on-farm 30 best management practices in cooperation with the Columbia, Ulster, 31 Sullivan, and Orange county soil and water conservation districts. 32 Such study shall consist of no less than eight commercial farms and 33 orchards, and shall be no longer than two years in duration, with 34 soil testing for carbon content and water holding capacity at six 35 month intervals (09CR19ER) (25718) ... 4,500,000 .. (re. $1,589,000) 36 Climate smart communities projects pursuant to title 15 of article 54 37 of the environmental conservation law including clean vehicle 38 projects; notwithstanding any law to the contrary (09CS19ER) (25701) 39 ... 10,150,000 .................................... (re. $8,105,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 41 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 42 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 43 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 44 climate change mitigation and adaptation account in accordance with 45 a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the director of 46 the budget, including suballocation to other state departments and 47 agencies, according to the following: 48 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to address greenhouse gas 49 emissions outside of the power sector including but not limited to 50 the development of statewide greenhouse gas inventories, demon- 51 stration projects, community engagement and applied research related 216 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 to the transportation sector or methane and other short-lived 2 climate pollutant sources (09GG18ER) (25706) ....................... 3 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $168,000) 4 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the department of envi- 5 ronmental conservation to enter into a contract or contracts for the 6 development of local climate resiliency plans and adaptation 7 projects; notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including 8 $500,000 for a resiliency planting program (09SV18ER) (25711) ...... 9 3,500,000 ........................................... (re. $607,000) 10 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, smart growth program state 11 assistance payments, provided on a competitive basis, to counties, 12 cities, towns, or villages to establish, update or implement compre- 13 hensive plans in a manner consistent with smart growth; provided, 14 however, that up to 25 percent of such payments may be awarded to 15 not-for-profit organizations for such purposes (09SG18ER) (24824) 16 ... 2,000,000 ........................................ (re. $86,000) 17 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for the New York state soil 18 and water conservation committee in conjunction with the department 19 of agriculture and markets to develop a pilot climate resilient 20 farms program consistent with agriculture and markets law article 21 11-a, agricultural environmental management program including up to 22 $200,000 for the Cornell Soil Health Program for research and educa- 23 tion to improve soil resiliency to climate variations and mitigate 24 greenhouse gas emissions by carbon sequestration (09CR18ER) (25718) 25 ... 2,500,000 ..................................... (re. $1,154,000) 26 Climate smart communities projects pursuant to title 15 of article 54 27 of the environmental conservation law including clean vehicle 28 projects; notwithstanding any law to the contrary(09CS18ER) (25701) 29 ... 10,150,000 .................................... (re. $4,613,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 31 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 32 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 33 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 34 climate change mitigation and adaptation account in accordance with 35 a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the director of 36 the budget, including suballocation to other state departments and 37 agencies, according to the following: 38 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to address greenhouse gas 39 emissions outside of the power sector including but not limited to 40 the development of statewide greenhouse gas inventories, demon- 41 stration projects, community engagement and applied research related 42 to the transportation sector or methane and other short-lived 43 climate pollutant sources (09GG17ER) (25706) ....................... 44 1,700,000 ........................................... (re. $273,000) 45 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the department of envi- 46 ronmental conservation to fund climate adaptation projects and to 47 provide up to $750,000 to support municipalities incorporation of 48 guidance developed under the community risk and resiliency act into 49 their local planning and ordinances; notwithstanding any law to the 50 contrary, including $500,000 for a resiliency planting program 51 (09SV17ER) (25711) ... 1,250,000 .................... (re. $366,000) 217 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, smart growth program state 2 assistance payments, provided on a competitive basis, to counties, 3 cities, towns, or villages to establish, update or implement compre- 4 hensive plans in a manner consistent with smart growth; provided, 5 however, that up to 25 percent of such payments may be awarded to 6 not-for-profit organizations for such purposes (09SG17ER) (24824) 7 ... 2,000,000 ........................................ (re. $83,000) 8 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for the New York state soil 9 and water conservation committee in conjunction with the department 10 of agriculture and markets to develop a pilot climate resilient 11 farms program consistent with agriculture and markets law article 12 11-a, agricultural environmental management program including up to 13 $400,000 for the Cornell Soil Health Program for research and educa- 14 tion to improve soil resiliency to climate variations and mitigate 15 greenhouse gas emissions by carbon sequestration; and up to $50,000 16 in consultation with the department of taxation and finance, the 17 department of agriculture and markets and the empire state develop- 18 ment corporation, for the study of incentives for carbon sequester- 19 ing farming practices which may include tax credits and grants and 20 systems or methods of quantifying carbon sequestration for such 21 incentives (09CR17ER) (25718) ... 2,500,000 ......... (re. $347,000) 22 Climate smart communities projects pursuant to title 15 of article 54 23 of the environmental conservation law including clean vehicle 24 projects; notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including 25 $500,000 to implement easily replicated renewable energy projects, 26 including solar arrays, heat pumps, and wind turbines across the 27 state in public low income housing in suburban, urban, and rural 28 areas with the goal of advancing employment opportunities for indi- 29 viduals living in environmental justice communities and individuals 30 who have been discharged from state correctional facilities or local 31 jails (09CS17ER) (25701) ........................................... 32 11,500,000 ........................................ (re. $4,895,000) 33 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 34 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 35 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 36 climate change mitigation and adaptation account in accordance with 37 a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the director of 38 the budget, including suballocation to other state departments and 39 agencies, according to the following: 40 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to address greenhouse gas 41 emissions outside of the power sector including but not limited to 42 the development of inventories, demonstration projects and applied 43 research related to the transportation sector or methane sources 44 (09GG16ER) (25706) ... 1,000,000 ..................... (re. $67,000) 45 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, smart growth program state 46 assistance payments, provided on a competitive basis, to counties, 47 cities, towns, or villages to establish, update or implement compre- 48 hensive plans in a manner consistent with smart growth; provided, 49 however, that up to 25 percent of such payments may be awarded to 50 not-for-profit organizations for such purposes (09SG16ER) (24824) 51 ... 2,000,000 ........................................ (re. $59,000) 218 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for the New York state soil 2 and water conservation committee in conjunction with the department 3 of agriculture and markets to develop a pilot climate resilient 4 farms program consistent with agriculture and markets law article 5 11-a, agricultural environmental management program (09CR16ER) 6 (25718) ... 2,500,000 ............................... (re. $462,000) 7 Climate smart communities projects pursuant to title 15 of article 54 8 of the environmental conservation law (09CS16ER) (25701) ........... 9 14,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,563,000) 10 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 11 section 1, of the laws of 2017: 12 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to conduct state vulnerabili- 13 ty assessments (09SV16ER) (25711) ... 2,500,000 ... (re. $1,536,000) 14 Capital Projects Funds - Other 15 Environmental Protection Fund 16 Open Space Account - 30454 17 Environment and Recreation Purpose 18 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is 19 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 20 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 21 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 22 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 23 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 24 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 25 following: Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, up to $500,000 26 for reimbursement of costs incurred by land trusts in contract with, 27 and prior to transfer of title to the State of New York for building 28 removal and other site cleanup and preparation costs to prepare the 29 parcel for sale to the State and for future public access, safety, 30 and use; and costs related to the acquisition of the following prop- 31 erties: Atlantic Coast, Long Island Sound, Long Island South Shore 32 Estuary Reserve, Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, 33 Central Pine Barrens, Shoreham Parcel, Western Suffolk/Nassau 34 Special Groundwater Protection Areas, Mott Haven-Port Morris Water- 35 front, Bronx River Greenway, Inner City/Underserved Community Parks, 36 Long Pond, Staten Island Greenbelt, Staten Island Bluebelt, Staten 37 Island Wet Woods, Great Swamp, Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands 38 Complex, New York Highlands, Shawangunk Mountains Region, Delaware 39 River Highlands, Hudson River Corridor/Hudson River Estuary and 40 Greenway Trail/Hudson River School Art Trail, Hudson Valley/New York 41 City Foodshed, Catskill Unfragmented Forest, Catskill River and Road 42 Corridors, New York City Watershed Lands, Taconic Ridge/Harlem 43 Valley, Albany Pine Bush, Five Rivers Environmental Education 44 Center, Lake George watershed, Lake Champlain watershed, Boeselager 45 forestry, Rensselaer Plateau, Oomsdale Farm and Surrounding Land- 46 scape, Turtle Conservation Sites, Region 4 Rail Trail Projects, 47 Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, Saratoga County, Hudson River 48 Projects, Follensby Park, Washington County, Rome Sand Plains, Black 49 Creek Watershed, Tug Hill Core Forests and Headwater Streams, Nelson 219 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Swamp, State Park Battlefields, Genny Green Trail/Link Trail, Onon- 2 daga Escarpment, State Parks Greenbelt/Tompkins County, Cattaraugus 3 Creek and tributaries, Northern Montezuma Wetlands, Genesee River 4 Corridor, Seneca Army Depot Conservation Area, Lake Erie Tributary 5 Gorges, Buffalo River Watershed, Catharine Valley Complex, 6 High-Tor/Bristol Hills/Bare Hill State Unique Area, Lake Ontario and 7 Lake Erie Shorelines, Islands and Niagara River, Long Island Trails 8 and Greenways, Bronx Harlem Greenway, Harbor Herons Wildlife 9 Complex, Schunnemunk Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain/Hudson 10 Highlands Connectivity Project, Helderbergs, and Finger Lakes Shore- 11 lines and Riparian Zones, Hand Hollow Conservation Area, Northern 12 Flow River Corridors, Black River Valley Corridor, Fort Drum Army 13 Compatible Use Buffer Project, Herkimer Home Viewshed, Inman Gulf, 14 Massawepie Mire, Moose River Corridor, St. Lawrence River Islands, 15 Shoreline and Wetlands, Southern Skaneateles Lake Forest and Shore- 16 line, Salmon River Corridor, Emerald Necklace, Riparian Buffers, 17 Coastline and Wetland Protection Projects Aimed at Reducing the 18 Impacts of Storms, Storm Surges and Flooding on Human and Natural 19 Communities, Long Distance Trail Corridors, Statewide Small 20 Projects, State Forest, Unique Area Wildlife Management Area 21 Protection, Working Forest Lands, State Park and State Historic Site 22 Protection, (a) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $3,200,000 23 from the land acquisition allocation for urban forestry projects 24 provided that no less than $500,000 shall be made available for such 25 programs in cities and towns with populations of 65,000 or more, and 26 including up to $200,000 for municipal grants for re-treeing public 27 lands impacted by the invasive species; (b) notwithstanding any law 28 to the contrary, [$3,000,000] $3,500,000 from the land acquisition 29 allocation to the land trust alliance for the purpose of awarding 30 grants on a competitive basis to local land trusts, provided that up 31 to ten percent of such amount may be made available for administra- 32 tive costs and/or technical assistance, including $500,000 for the 33 purchase of critical grassland habitat for endangered, threatened 34 and other high priority species of grassland birds; (c) notwith- 35 standing any law to the contrary, not less than $4,000,000 for land 36 acquisition in department of environmental conservation regions 1, 2 37 and 3; (d) $1,500,000 to the land trust alliance for the purpose of 38 awarding grants on a competitive basis to local land trusts to 39 purchase conservation easements, provided that up to ten percent of 40 such amount may be made available for administrative costs and/or 41 technical assistance; (e) up to $250,000 shall be made available to 42 the tug hill tomorrow land trust for army compatible use buffer 43 program projects around Fort Drum; (f) up to $200,000 for pre-acqui- 44 sition costs associated with an open space grant program to be 45 administered by the department of environmental conservation[; and 46 (g) $500,000 for the purchase of critical grassland habitat for 47 endangered, threatened and other high priority species of grassland 48 birds] (09LA25ER) (24703) ... 42,000,000 ......... (re. $41,994,000) 49 Albany Pine Bush Preserve Commission (09AP25ER) (24828) .............. 50 3,100,000 ......................................... (re. $3,100,000) 51 Long Island Central Pine Barrens Planning (09LP25ER) (24829) ......... 52 2,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,500,000) 220 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve (09SE25ER) (24831) ........... 2 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 3 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects, notwith- 4 standing any law to the contrary, including projects to combat harm- 5 ful algal blooms; $250,000 shall be made available to Cornell for 6 the pesticide management education program to support training and 7 certification (09AN25ER) (24832) ................................... 8 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $18,500,000) 9 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 10 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $1,000,000 of such amount 11 shall be made available for Cornell community integrated pest 12 management (09NP25ER) (24833) ... 6,000,000 ....... (re. $6,000,000) 13 Agriculture and farmland protection activities, notwithstanding 14 section 325-a of the agriculture and markets law, (a) up to $150,000 15 shall be made available to Cornell University for services and 16 expenses of land classification, agriculture district mapping and 17 master list of soils; and (b) up to $1,000,000 for capacity grants 18 (09FP25ER) (24825) ... 25,000,000 ................ (re. $25,000,000) 19 Biodiversity stewardship and research; including funding for public 20 New York universities to conduct field studies and research on 21 biodiversity issues and (a) up to $500,000 of this amount to support 22 pollinator diversity, up to $300,000 of which may be allocated to 23 Cornell University, including research related to the potential 24 adverse impacts of pesticides such as neonicitinoids, pursuant to a 25 contract with the department of agriculture and markets, including 26 the development of bee husbandry best management practices such as 27 pest and pathogen controls; creating diversity of pollinator habi- 28 tats; research to understand, prevent and recover from pollinator 29 losses; and outreach and education; (b) including $200,000 for the 30 Cary Institute of Ecosystem Studies to support the Catskill environ- 31 mental research and monitoring program; (c) $200,000 to Paul Smith's 32 College for the Adirondack Watershed Institute; and (d) $200,000 to 33 the State University of New York at Albany for the Atmospheric 34 Sciences Research Center (09BD25ER) (24827) ........................ 35 1,850,000 ......................................... (re. $1,850,000) 36 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Hudson River Estuary 37 Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environ- 38 mental conservation law, including projects to combat harmful algal 39 blooms some or all of which may be allocated to the New England 40 Interstate Water Pollution Control Commission or Cornell water 41 resources institute or department of natural resources for the 42 purposes of implementing the Hudson River Estuary Action agenda, 43 $1,500,000 of which shall be for the Mohawk river action plan 44 (09HE25ER) (24836) ... 7,500,000 .................. (re. $7,500,000) 45 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Finger Lakes-Lake 46 Ontario Watershed Protection Alliance (09FL25ER) (24835) ........... 47 3,500,000 ......................................... (re. $3,500,000) 48 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to the Erie County Soil and 49 Water Conservation District for the Lake Erie Watershed Protection 50 Alliance (09LE25ER) (25764) ... 250,000 ............. (re. $250,000) 51 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 52 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 221 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 2 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 3 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 4 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 5 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 6 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 7 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 8 the environmental conservation law and including projects to combat 9 harmful algal blooms; (a) including up to $3,000,000 to Suffolk 10 county to provide a 50 percent match for a program developed in 11 consultation with the department for research, development and pilot 12 projects to develop cost effective methods to address nitrogen and 13 pathogen loading from septic system or cesspool effluent or other 14 sources or to support such efforts without a match at the state 15 university of Stony Brook directly or through its research founda- 16 tion and $1,500,000 for Suffolk county for sewer improvement 17 projects; (b) including $5,000,000 for clean water infrastructure 18 projects benefitting Nassau county including but not limited to the 19 Bay park wastewater treatment plant outfall pipe, associated convey- 20 ance systems, nitrogen abatement treatment works, ocean outfall 21 and/or connections, and/or for costs incurred by Nassau County for 22 the project to connect the Long Beach waste water treatment plant 23 collection system to the Bay Park wastewater treatment plant and 24 including $250,000 from such amount to the Long Island regional 25 planning council for services and expenses related to the Long 26 Island Nitrogen Action Plan; (c) including $5,000,000 to update 27 source water assessment plans and develop associated water 28 protection programs some or all of which may be allocated to the 29 United States Geological Survey or the New England Interstate Water 30 Pollution Control Commission; (d) $150,000 for the Chautauqua Lake 31 Association; (e) $95,000 for the Chautauqua Lake Partnership; (f) 32 $1,000,000 to Cornell University to support research development and 33 any associated monitoring, testing or pilot projects towards 34 improved septic and wastewater treatment systems or remediation to 35 remove contaminants of emerging concern in groundwater; (g) 36 $1,200,000 to the Cayuga County Soil and Water Conservation District 37 on behalf of the Eastern Finger Lakes Coalition for the adminis- 38 tration of the eastern finger lakes watershed basin program; (h) 39 $1,000,000 for the Allegheny River watershed program, including 40 Chautauqua Lake projects; (i) $1,300,000 for the Lake Erie-Niagara 41 River watershed basin program; (j) $1,000,000 to the State Universi- 42 ty of New York at Stony Brook directly or through its research foun- 43 dation, to support research development and any associated testing 44 or pilot projects towards improved septic and wastewater treatment 45 systems to remove phosphorous; and (k) $200,000 to Save the Great 46 South Bay, Inc. for the restoration of the Great South Bay 47 (09WQ25ER) (24837) ... 25,300,000 ................ (re. $25,300,000) 48 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 49 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 50 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 51 including projects to combat harmful algal blooms; (a) including 52 $750,000 for the Peconic Estuary Partnership; and (b) $500,000 to 222 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the Billion Oyster Project, Inc. for the construction of the Hudson 2 Reef project (09GL25ER) (24830) ... 24,600,000 ... (re. $24,600,000) 3 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 4 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 5 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 6 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007, (a) including not less than 7 $175,000 for Cornell University for the plant certification program, 8 (b) provided that not less than $5,750,000 be made available for 9 invasive species eradication, including but not limited to southern 10 pine beetle, (c) including up to $500,000 to Cornell University for 11 the control of hemlock wooly adelgid, and including grants related 12 to the control and management of invasive species, and (d) $500,000 13 to address the southern pine beetle including up to $250,000 to the 14 Central Pine Barrens Joint Planning and Policy Commission for the 15 implementation and administration of a prescribed fire program. Such 16 funding for grants shall be provided on a competitive basis in 17 consultation with the New York Invasive Species Council (09IS25ER) 18 (24704) ... 18,550,000 ........................... (re. $18,550,000) 19 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Soil and Water Conserva- 20 tion District activities as authorized for reimbursement and funding 21 in section 11-a of the soil and water conservation districts law 22 including projects to combat harmful algal blooms (09SW25ER) (24834) 23 ... 18,000,000 ................................... (re. $18,000,000) 24 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Agricultural Waste 25 Management projects, including up to $700,000 to Cornell University, 26 in consultation with the department, to continue implementing the 27 dairy acceleration program (09AW25ER) (24826) ...................... 28 1,900,000 ......................................... (re. $1,900,000) 29 Lake George Park Commission (09LG25ER) (62038) ....................... 30 900,000 ............................................. (re. $688,000) 31 For services, expenses, and grants related to the urban farms and 32 community gardens grant program, including but not limited to up to 33 $325,000 for Cornell University (09UF25ER) (24695) ................. 34 2,325,000 ......................................... (re. $2,325,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 37 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 38 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 39 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 40 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 41 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 42 following: 43 Costs related to the acquisition of the following properties: Atlantic 44 Coast, Long Island Sound, Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve, 45 Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, Central Pine Barrens, 46 Shoreham Parcel, Western Suffolk/Nassau Special Groundwater 47 Protection Areas, Mott Haven-Port Morris Waterfront, Bronx River 48 Greenway, Inner City/Underserved Community Parks, Long Pond, Staten 49 Island Greenbelt, Staten Island Bluebelt, Staten Island Wet Woods, 50 Great Swamp, Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands Complex, New York High- 51 lands, Shawangunk Mountains Region, Delaware River Highlands, Hudson 223 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 River Corridor/Hudson River Estuary and Greenway Trail/Hudson River 2 School Art Trail, Hudson Valley/New York City Foodshed, Catskill 3 Unfragmented Forest, Catskill River and Road Corridors, New York 4 City Watershed Lands, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, 5 Five Rivers Environmental Education Center, Lake George watershed, 6 Lake Champlain watershed, Boeselager forestry, Rensselaer Plateau, 7 Oomsdale Farm and Surrounding Landscape, Turtle Conservation Sites, 8 Region 4 Rail Trail Projects, Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, 9 Saratoga County, Hudson River Projects, Follensby Park, Washington 10 County, Rome Sand Plains, Black Creek Watershed, Tug Hill Core 11 Forests and Headwater Streams, Nelson Swamp, State Park Battle- 12 fields, Genny Green Trail/Link Trail, Onondaga Escarpment, State 13 Parks Greenbelt/Tompkins County, Cattaraugus Creek and tributaries, 14 Northern Montezuma Wetlands, Genesee River Corridor, Seneca Army 15 Depot Conservation Area, Lake Erie Tributary Gorges, Buffalo River 16 Watershed, Catharine Valley Complex, High-Tor/Bristol Hills/Bare 17 Hill State Unique Area, Lake Ontario and Lake Erie Shorelines, 18 Islands and Niagara River, Long Island Trails and Greenways, Bronx 19 Harlem Greenway, Harbor Herons Wildlife Complex, Schunnemunk 20 Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain/Hudson Highlands Connectivi- 21 ty Project, Helderbergs, and Finger Lakes Shorelines and Riparian 22 Zones, Hand Hollow Conservation Area, Northern Flow River Corridors, 23 Black River Valley Corridor, Fort Drum Army Compatible Use Buffer 24 Project, Herkimer Home Viewshed, Inman Gulf, Massawepie Mire, Moose 25 River Corridor, St. Lawrence River Islands, Shoreline and Wetlands, 26 Southern Skaneateles Lake Forest and Shoreline, Salmon River Corri- 27 dor, Emerald Necklace, Riparian Buffers, Coastline and Wetland 28 Protection Projects Aimed at Reducing the Impacts of Storms, Storm 29 Surges and Flooding on Human and Natural Communities, Long Distance 30 Trail Corridors, Statewide Small Projects, State Forest, Unique Area 31 Wildlife Management Area Protection, Working Forest Lands, State 32 Park and State Historic Site Protection, (a) notwithstanding any law 33 to the contrary, $3,200,000 from the land acquisition allocation for 34 urban forestry projects provided that no less than $500,000 shall be 35 made available for such programs in cities and towns with popu- 36 lations of 65,000 or more, and including up to $200,000 for munici- 37 pal grants for re-treeing public lands impacted by the invasive 38 species; (b) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $3,000,000 39 from the land acquisition allocation to the land trust alliance for 40 the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to local land 41 trusts, provided that up to ten percent of such amount may be made 42 available for administrative costs and/or technical assistance; (c) 43 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, not less than $4,000,000 44 for land acquisition in department of environmental conservation 45 regions 1, 2 and 3; and (d) $1,500,000 to the land trust alliance 46 for the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to local 47 land trusts to purchase conservation easements, provided that up to 48 ten percent of such amount may be made available for administrative 49 costs and/or technical assistance (09LA24ER) (24703) ............... 50 39,500,000 ....................................... (re. $36,700,000) 51 Albany Pine Bush Preserve Commission (09AP24ER) (24828) .............. 52 3,000,000 ........................................... (re. $449,000) 224 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Long Island Central Pine Barrens Planning (09LP24ER) (24829) ......... 2 2,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,500,000) 3 Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve (09SE24ER) (24831) ........... 4 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 5 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects, notwith- 6 standing any law to the contrary, including projects to combat harm- 7 ful algal blooms; (a) $500,000 shall be made available to the 8 Cornell Cooperative Extension of Suffolk County for nutrient manage- 9 ment planning and implementation activities; and (b) $250,000 shall 10 be made available to Cornell for the pesticide management education 11 program to support training and certification (09AN24ER) (24832) ... 12 17,500,000 ....................................... (re. $17,500,000) 13 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 14 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $1,000,000 of such amount 15 shall be made available for Cornell community integrated pest 16 management (09NP24ER) (24833) ... 6,000,000 ....... (re. $6,000,000) 17 Agriculture and farmland protection activities, notwithstanding any 18 law to the contrary, (a) up to $500,000 shall be made available to 19 the tug hill tomorrow land trust for army compatible use buffer 20 program projects around Fort Drum, and (b) up to $106,000 shall be 21 made available to Cornell University for services and expenses of 22 land classification, agriculture district mapping and master list of 23 soils (09FP24ER) (24825) ... 21,000,000 .......... (re. $20,902,000) 24 Biodiversity stewardship and research; including funding for public 25 New York universities to conduct field studies and research on 26 biodiversity issues and (a) up to $500,000 of this amount to support 27 pollinator diversity, up to $300,000 of which may be allocated to 28 Cornell University, including research related to the potential 29 adverse impacts of pesticides such as neonicitinoids, pursuant to a 30 contract with the department of agriculture and markets, including 31 the development of bee husbandry best management practices such as 32 pest and pathogen controls; creating diversity of pollinator habi- 33 tats; research to understand, prevent and recover from pollinator 34 losses; and outreach and education; (b) including $180,000 for the 35 Cary Institute of Ecosystem Studies to support the Catskill environ- 36 mental research and monitoring program; (c) $100,000 to Paul Smith's 37 College for the Adirondack Watershed Institute; and (d) $100,000 to 38 the State University of New York at Albany for the Atmospheric 39 Sciences Research Center (09BD24ER) (24827) ........................ 40 1,850,000 ......................................... (re. $1,348,000) 41 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Hudson River Estuary 42 Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environ- 43 mental conservation law, including projects to combat harmful algal 44 blooms some or all of which may be allocated to the New England 45 Interstate Water Pollution Control Commission or Cornell water 46 resources institute or department of natural resources for the 47 purposes of implementing the Hudson River Estuary Action agenda, 48 $1,000,000 of which shall be for the Mohawk river action plan 49 (09HE24ER) (24836) ... 7,500,000 .................. (re. $7,487,000) 50 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Finger Lakes-Lake 51 Ontario Watershed Protection Alliance (09FL24ER) (24835) ........... 52 3,500,000 ........................................... (re. $669,000) 225 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to the Erie County Soil and 2 Water Conservation District for the Lake Erie Watershed Protection 3 Alliance (09LE24ER) (25764) ... 250,000 ............. (re. $250,000) 4 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 5 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 6 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 7 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 8 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 9 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 10 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 11 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 12 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 13 the environmental conservation law and including projects to combat 14 harmful algal blooms; (a) including up to $3,000,000 to Suffolk 15 county to provide a 50 percent match for a program developed in 16 consultation with the department for research, development and pilot 17 projects to develop cost effective methods to address nitrogen and 18 pathogen loading from septic system or cesspool effluent or other 19 sources or to support such efforts without a match at the state 20 university of Stony Brook directly or through its research founda- 21 tion and $1,500,000 for Suffolk county for sewer improvement 22 projects; (b) including $5,000,000 for Nassau county for the Bay 23 park wastewater treatment plant outfall pipe, associated conveyance 24 systems, nitrogen abatement treatment works, ocean outfall and/or 25 connections, and/or for costs incurred by Nassau County for the 26 project to connect the Long Beach waste water treatment plant 27 collection system to the Bay Park wastewater treatment plant and 28 including $250,000 from such amount to the Long Island regional 29 planning council for services and expenses related to the Long 30 Island Nitrogen Action Plan; (c) including $5,000,000 to update 31 source water assessment plans and develop associated water 32 protection programs some or all of which may be allocated to the 33 United States Geological Survey or the New England Interstate Water 34 Pollution Control Commission; (d) $150,000 for the Chautauqua Lake 35 Association; (e) $95,000 for the Chautauqua Lake Partnership; (f) 36 $1,000,000 to the State University of New York at Stony Brook 37 directly or through its research foundation, to support research 38 development and any associated testing or pilot projects towards 39 improved septic and wastewater treatment systems to remove phospho- 40 rus; (g) $1,200,000 to the Cayuga County Soil and Water Conservation 41 District on behalf of the Eastern Finger Lakes Coalition for the 42 administration of the eastern finger lakes watershed basin program; 43 (h) $1,000,000 for the Allegheny River watershed program, including 44 Chautauqua Lake projects; (i) $1,300,000 for the Lake Erie-Niagara 45 River watershed basin program; and (j) $200,000 to Save the Great 46 South Bay, Inc. for the restoration of the Great South Bay 47 (09WQ24ER) (24837) ................................................. 48 22,250,000 ....................................... (re. $20,597,000) 49 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 50 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 51 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 52 including projects to combat harmful algal blooms; including 226 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 $750,000 for the Peconic Estuary Partnership (09GL24ER)(24830) ..... 2 22,500,000 ....................................... (re. $20,620,000) 3 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 4 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 5 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 6 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007, (a) including not less than 7 $120,000 for Cornell University for the plant certification program, 8 (b) provided that not less than $5,750,000 be made available for 9 invasive species eradication, including but not limited to southern 10 pine beetle, (c) including up to $500,000 to Cornell University for 11 the control of hemlock wooly adelgid, and including grants related 12 to the control and management of invasive species, and (d) $500,000 13 to address the southern pine beetle including up to $250,000 to the 14 Central Pine Barrens Joint Planning and Policy Commission for the 15 implementation and administration of a prescribed fire program. Such 16 funding for grants shall be provided on a competitive basis in 17 consultation with the New York Invasive Species Council (09IS24ER) 18 (24704) ... 18,550,000 ........................... (re. $14,377,000) 19 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Soil and Water Conserva- 20 tion District activities as authorized for reimbursement and funding 21 in section 11-a of the soil and water conservation districts law 22 including projects to combat harmful algal blooms (09SW24ER) (24834) 23 ... 17,250,000 ....................................... (re. $26,000) 24 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Agricultural Waste 25 Management projects, including up to $700,000 to Cornell University, 26 in consultation with the department, to continue implementing the 27 dairy acceleration program (09AW24ER) (24826) ...................... 28 1,900,000 ......................................... (re. $1,900,000) 29 Lake George Park Commission (09LG24ER) (62038) ....................... 30 900,000 ............................................. (re. $415,000) 31 For services, expenses, and grants related to the urban farms and 32 community gardens grant program, including but not limited to up to 33 $325,000 for Cornell University (09UF24ER) (24695) ................. 34 2,325,000 ......................................... (re. $2,286,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 37 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 38 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 39 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 40 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 41 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 42 following: 43 Costs related to the acquisition of the following properties: Atlantic 44 Coast, Long Island Sound, Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve, 45 Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, Central Pine Barrens, 46 Shoreham Parcel, Western Suffolk/Nassau Special Groundwater 47 Protection Areas, Mott Haven-Port Morris Waterfront, Bronx River 48 Greenway, Inner City/Underserved Community Parks, Long Pond, Staten 49 Island Greenbelt, Staten Island Bluebelt, Staten Island Wet Woods, 50 Great Swamp, Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands Complex, New York High- 51 lands, Shawangunk Mountains Region, Delaware River Highlands, Hudson 227 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 River Corridor/Hudson River Estuary and Greenway Trail/Hudson River 2 School Art Trail, Hudson Valley/New York City Foodshed, Catskill 3 Unfragmented Forest, Catskill River and Road Corridors, New York 4 City Watershed Lands, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, 5 Five Rivers Environmental Education Center, Lake George watershed, 6 Lake Champlain watershed, Boeselager forestry, Rensselaer Plateau, 7 Oomsdale Farm and Surrounding Landscape, Turtle Conservation Sites, 8 Region 4 Rail Trail Projects, Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, 9 Saratoga County, Hudson River Projects, Follensby Park, Washington 10 County, Rome Sand Plains, Black Creek Watershed, Tug Hill Core 11 Forests and Headwater Streams, Nelson Swamp, State Park Battle- 12 fields, Genny Green Trail/Link Trail, Onondaga Escarpment, State 13 Parks Greenbelt/Tompkins County, Cattaraugus Creek and tributaries, 14 Northern Montezuma Wetlands, Genesee River Corridor, Seneca Army 15 Depot Conservation Area, Lake Erie Tributary Gorges, Buffalo River 16 Watershed, Catharine Valley Complex, High-Tor/Bristol Hills/Bare 17 Hill State Unique Area, Lake Ontario and Lake Erie Shorelines, 18 Islands and Niagara River, Long Island Trails and Greenways, Bronx 19 Harlem Greenway, Harbor Herons Wildlife Complex, Schunnemunk 20 Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain/Hudson Highlands Connectivi- 21 ty Project, Helderbergs, and Finger Lakes Shorelines and Riparian 22 Zones, Hand Hollow Conservation Area, Northern Flow River Corridors, 23 Black River Valley Corridor, Fort Drum Army Compatible Use Buffer 24 Project, Herkimer Home Viewshed, Inman Gulf, Massawepie Mire, Moose 25 River Corridor, St. Lawrence River Islands, Shoreline and Wetlands, 26 Southern Skaneateles Lake Forest and Shoreline, Salmon River Corri- 27 dor, Emerald Necklace, Riparian Buffers, Coastline and Wetland 28 Protection Projects Aimed at Reducing the Impacts of Storms, Storm 29 Surges and Flooding on Human and Natural Communities, Long Distance 30 Trail Corridors, Statewide Small Projects, State Forest, Unique Area 31 Wildlife Management Area Protection, Working Forest Lands, State 32 Park and State Historic Site Protection, (a) notwithstanding any law 33 to the contrary, $3,200,000 from the land acquisition allocation for 34 urban forestry projects provided that no less than $500,000 shall be 35 made available for such programs in cities and towns with popu- 36 lations of 65,000 or more, and including up to $200,000 for munici- 37 pal grants for re-treeing public lands impacted by the invasive 38 species; (b) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $3,000,000 39 from the land acquisition allocation to the land trust alliance for 40 the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to local land 41 trusts, provided that up to ten percent of such amount may be made 42 available for administrative costs and/or technical assistance; (c) 43 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, not less than $4,000,000 44 for land acquisition in department of environmental conservation 45 regions 1, 2 and 3; (d) $1,500,000 to the land trust alliance for 46 the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to local land 47 trusts to purchase conservation easements, provided that up to ten 48 percent of such amount may be made available for administrative 49 costs and/or technical assistance; and (e) Notwithstanding any law 50 to the contrary, up to $300,000 to the Village of Lake Placid for 51 the purchase of land associated with the Adirondack rail trail park- 52 ing area (09LA23ER) (24703) ... 38,900,000 ....... (re. $26,281,000) 228 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Albany Pine Bush Preserve Commission (09AP23ER) (24828) .............. 2 3,000,000 ........................................... (re. $588,000) 3 Long Island Central Pine Barrens Planning (09LP23ER) (24829) ......... 4 2,500,000 ........................................... (re. $209,000) 5 Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve (09SE23ER) (24831) ........... 6 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 7 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects, notwith- 8 standing any law to the contrary, including projects to combat harm- 9 ful algal blooms; (a) $2,000,000 shall be made available for 10 services and expenses of the Cornell University Integrated Pest 11 Management program; (b) $500,000 shall be made available to the 12 Cornell Cooperative Extension of Suffolk County for nutrient manage- 13 ment planning and implementation activities; and (c) $250,000 shall 14 be made available to Cornell for the pesticide management education 15 program to support training and certification (09AN23ER) (24832) ... 16 19,500,000 ....................................... (re. $10,890,000) 17 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 18 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $1,000,000 of such amount 19 shall be made available for Cornell community integrated pest 20 management (09NP23ER) (24833) ... 6,200,000 ....... (re. $5,109,000) 21 Agriculture and farmland protection activities, notwithstanding any 22 law to the contrary, up to $1,000,000 shall be made available to the 23 tug hill tomorrow land trust for army compatible use buffer program 24 projects around Fort Drum, and up to $97,000 shall be made available 25 to Cornell University for services and expenses of land classifica- 26 tion, agriculture district mapping and master list of soils 27 (09FP23ER) (24825) ... 21,000,000 ................ (re. $20,213,000) 28 Biodiversity stewardship and research; including funding for public 29 New York universities to conduct field studies and research on 30 biodiversity issues and up to $500,000 of this amount to support 31 pollinator diversity, up to $300,000 of which may be allocated to 32 Cornell University, including research related to the potential 33 adverse impacts of pesticides such as neonicitinoids, pursuant to a 34 contract with the department of agriculture and markets, including 35 the development of bee husbandry best management practices such as 36 pest and pathogen controls; creating diversity of pollinator habi- 37 tats; research to understand, prevent and recover from pollinator 38 losses; and outreach and education; and including $100,000 for the 39 Cary Institute of Ecosystem Studies to support the Catskill environ- 40 mental research and monitoring program (09BD23ER) (24827) .......... 41 1,850,000 ........................................... (re. $595,000) 42 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Hudson River Estuary 43 Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environ- 44 mental conservation law, including projects to combat harmful algal 45 blooms some or all of which may be allocated to the New England 46 Interstate Water Pollution Control Commission or Cornell water 47 resources institute or department of natural resources for the 48 purposes of implementing the Hudson River Estuary Action agenda, 49 $1,000,000 of which shall be for the Mohawk river action plan 50 (09HE23ER) (24836) ... 7,500,000 .................. (re. $4,065,000) 229 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to the Erie County Soil and 2 Water Conservation District for the Lake Erie Watershed Protection 3 Alliance (09LE23ER) (25764) ... 250,000 ............. (re. $250,000) 4 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 5 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 6 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 7 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 8 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 9 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 10 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 11 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 12 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 13 the environmental conservation law and including projects to combat 14 harmful algal blooms; including up to $3,000,000 to Suffolk county 15 to provide a 50 percent match for a program developed in consulta- 16 tion with the department for research, development and pilot 17 projects to develop cost effective methods to address nitrogen and 18 pathogen loading from septic system or cesspool effluent or other 19 sources or to support such efforts without a match at the state 20 university of Stony Brook directly or through its research founda- 21 tion and $1,500,000 for Suffolk county for sewer improvement 22 projects; and including $5,000,000 for Nassau county for the Bay 23 park wastewater treatment plant outfall pipe, associated conveyance 24 systems, nitrogen abatement treatment works, ocean outfall and/or 25 connections, and/or for costs incurred by Nassau County for the 26 project to connect the Long Beach waste water treatment plant 27 collection system to the Bay Park wastewater treatment plant and 28 including $250,000 from such amount to the Long Island regional 29 planning council for services and expenses related to the Long 30 Island Nitrogen Action Plan; and including $5,000,000 to update 31 source water assessment plans and develop associated water 32 protection programs some or all of which may be allocated to the 33 United States Geological Survey or the New England Interstate Water 34 Pollution Control Commission; $150,000 for the Chautauqua Lake Asso- 35 ciation; $95,000 for the Chautauqua Lake Partnership; $1,000,000 to 36 the State University of New York at Stony Brook directly or through 37 its research foundation, to support research development and any 38 associated testing or pilot projects towards improved septic and 39 wastewater treatment systems to remove phosphorus; $25,000 to the 40 Ossi Sport Club, Inc. for the restoration of Lake Ossi; $500,000 to 41 Save the Great South Bay, Inc. for the restoration of the Great 42 South Bay; and $100,000 to the Town of Southeast for the restoration 43 of Peach Lake Brook (09WQ23ER) (24837) ............................. 44 22,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,175,000) 45 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 46 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 47 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 48 including projects to combat harmful algal blooms; including 49 $550,000 for the Peconic Estuary Partnership; and $500,000 to the 50 Billion Oyster Project, Inc. for the construction of the Head of Bay 51 Oyster Reef (09GL23ER) (24830) ... 22,500,000 .... (re. $13,880,000) 230 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 2 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 3 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 4 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007, including not less than $120,000 5 for Cornell University for the plant certification program, provided 6 that not less than $5,750,000 be made available for invasive species 7 eradication, including but not limited to southern pine beetle, 8 including up to $500,000 to Cornell University for the control of 9 hemlock wooly adelgid, and including grants related to the control 10 and management of invasive species, and $500,000 to address the 11 southern pine beetle including up to $250,000 to the Central Pine 12 Barrens Joint Planning and Policy Commission for the implementation 13 and administration of a prescribed fire program. Such funding for 14 grants shall be provided on a competitive basis in consultation with 15 the New York Invasive Species Council (09IS23ER) (24704) ........... 16 18,550,000 ....................................... (re. $13,151,000) 17 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Agricultural Waste 18 Management projects, including up to $700,000 to Cornell University, 19 in consultation with the department, to continue implementing the 20 dairy acceleration program (09AW23ER) (24826) ...................... 21 1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000) 22 Lake George Park Commission (09LG23ER) (62038) ....................... 23 900,000 ............................................... (re. $3,000) 24 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, is 25 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 26 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 27 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 28 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 29 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 30 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 31 following: 32 Costs related to the acquisition of the following properties: Atlantic 33 Coast, Long Island Sound, Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve, 34 Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, Central Pine Barrens, 35 Shoreham Parcel, Western Suffolk/Nassau Special Groundwater 36 Protection Areas, Mott Haven-Port Morris Waterfront, Bronx River 37 Greenway, Inner City/Underserved Community Parks, Long Pond, Staten 38 Island Greenbelt, Staten Island Bluebelt, Staten Island Wet Woods, 39 Great Swamp, Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands Complex, New York High- 40 lands, Shawangunk Mountains Region, Delaware River Highlands, Hudson 41 River Corridor/Hudson River Estuary and Greenway Trail/Hudson River 42 School Art Trail, Hudson Valley/New York City Foodshed, Catskill 43 Unfragmented Forest, Catskill River and Road Corridors, New York 44 City Watershed Lands, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, 45 Five Rivers Environmental Education Center, Lake George watershed, 46 Lake Champlain watershed, Boeselager forestry, Rensselaer Plateau, 47 Oomsdale Farm and Surrounding Landscape, Turtle Conservation Sites, 48 Region 4 Rail Trail Projects, Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, 49 Saratoga County, Hudson River Projects, Follensby Park, Washington 50 County, Rome Sand Plains, Black Creek Watershed, Tug Hill Core 51 Forests and Headwater Streams, Nelson Swamp, State Park Battle- 231 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 fields, Genny Green Trail/Link Trail, Onondaga Escarpment, State 2 Parks Greenbelt/Tompkins County, Cattaraugus Creek and tributaries, 3 Northern Montezuma Wetlands, Genesee River Corridor, Seneca Army 4 Depot Conservation Area, Lake Erie Tributary Gorges, Buffalo River 5 Watershed, Catharine Valley Complex, HighTor/Bristol Hills/Bare Hill 6 State Unique Area, Lake Ontario and Lake Erie Shorelines, Islands 7 and Niagara River, Long Island Trails and Greenways, Bronx Harlem 8 Greenway, Harbor Herons Wildlife Complex, Schunnemunk 9 Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain/Hudson Highlands Connectivi- 10 ty Project, Helderbergs, and Finger Lakes Shorelines and Riparian 11 Zones, Hand Hollow Conservation Area, Northern Flow River Corridors, 12 Black River Valley Corridor, Fort Drum Army Compatible Use Buffer 13 Project, Herkimer Home Viewshed, Inman Gulf, Massawepie Mire, Moose 14 River Corridor, St. Lawrence River Islands, Shoreline and Wetlands, 15 Southern Skaneateles Lake Forest and Shoreline, Salmon River Corri- 16 dor, Emerald Necklace, Riparian Buffers, Coastline and Wetland 17 Protection Projects Aimed at Reducing the Impacts of Storms, Storm 18 Surges and Flooding on Human and Natural Communities, Long Distance 19 Trail Corridors, Statewide Small Projects, State Forest, Unique Area 20 Wildlife Management Area Protection, Working Forest Lands, State 21 Park and State Historic Site Protection, (a) notwithstanding any law 22 to the contrary, $3,200,000 from the land acquisition allocation for 23 urban forestry projects provided that no less than $500,000 shall be 24 made available for such programs in cities and towns with popu- 25 lations of 65,000 or more, and including up to $200,000 for munici- 26 pal grants for retreeing public lands impacted by invasive species; 27 (b) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $3,000,000 from the 28 land acquisition allocation to the land trust alliance for the 29 purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to local land 30 trusts, provided that up to ten percent of such amount may be made 31 available for administrative costs and/or technical assistance; (c) 32 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, not less than $4,000,000 33 for land acquisition in department of environmental conservation 34 regions 1, 2 and 3; (d) $1,500,000 to the land trust alliance for 35 the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to local land 36 trusts to purchase conservation easements, provided that up to ten 37 percent of such amount may be made available for administrative 38 costs and/or technical assistance (09LA22ER) (24703) ............... 39 40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,839,000) 40 Long Island Central Pine Barrens Planning (09LP22ER) (24829) ......... 41 2,500,000 ........................................... (re. $878,000) 42 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for services and expenses of 43 the following commissions: $259,000 for Susquehanna river basin 44 commission; $359,500 for the Delaware river basin commission; 45 $14,100 for the Ohio river basin commission; $41,600 for the Inter- 46 state environmental commission; and $38,000 for the New England 47 Interstate commission; and $373,000 for the college of environmental 48 science and forestry center for native peoples and the environment 49 (09EC22ER) (25705) ... 1,085,200 .................... (re. $374,000) 50 Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve (09SE22ER) (24831) ........... 51 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $980,000) 232 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects, notwith- 2 standing any law to the contrary, including projects to combat harm- 3 ful algal blooms; (a) $2,000,000 shall be made available for 4 services and expenses of the Cornell University Integrated Pest 5 Management program; (b) $500,000 shall be made available to the 6 Cornell Cooperative Extension of Suffolk County for nutrient manage- 7 ment planning and implementation activities; and (c) $250,000 shall 8 be made available to Cornell for the pesticide management education 9 program to support training and certification (09AN22ER) (24832) ... 10 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,528,000) 11 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 12 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $1,000,000 of such amount 13 shall be made available for Cornell community integrated pest 14 management (09NP22ER) (24833) ... 6,200,000 ....... (re. $4,297,000) 15 Agriculture and farmland protection activities, notwithstanding any 16 law to the contrary, up to $1,000,000 shall be made available to the 17 tug hill tomorrow land trust for army compatible use buffer program 18 projects around Fort Drum, and up to $96,000 shall be made available 19 to Cornell University for services and expenses of land classifica- 20 tion, agriculture district mapping and master list of soils 21 (09FP22ER) (24825) ... 21,000,000 ................ (re. $16,002,000) 22 Biodiversity stewardship and research; including funding for public 23 New York universities to conduct field studies and research on 24 biodiversity issues and up to $500,000 of this amount to support 25 pollinator diversity, up to $300,000 of which may be allocated to 26 Cornell University, including research related to the potential 27 adverse impacts of pesticides such as neonicitinoids, pursuant to a 28 contract with the department of agriculture and markets, including 29 the development of bee husbandry best management practices such as 30 pest and pathogen controls; creating diversity of pollinator habi- 31 tats; research to understand, prevent and recover from pollinator 32 losses; and outreach and education; [and] including $100,000 for the 33 Cary Institute of Ecosystem Studies to support the Catskill environ- 34 mental research and monitoring program; and $95,000 to the New York 35 City Department of Parks and Recreation for Prospect Park (09BD22ER) 36 (24827) ... 1,750,000 ............................... (re. $564,000) 37 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Hudson River Estuary 38 Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environ- 39 mental conservation law, including projects to combat harmful algal 40 blooms some or all of which may be allocated to the New England 41 Interstate Water Pollution Control Commission or Cornell water 42 resources institute or department of natural resources for the 43 purposes of implementing the Hudson River Estuary Action agenda, 44 $1,000,000 of which shall be for the Mohawk river action plan 45 (09HE22ER) (24836) ... 7,500,000 .................. (re. $2,138,000) 46 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Finger Lakes-Lake 47 Ontario Watershed Protection Alliance (09FL22ER) (24835) ........... 48 2,500,000 ........................................... (re. $946,000) 49 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to the Erie County Soil and 50 Water Conservation District for the Lake Erie Watershed Protection 51 Alliance (09LE22ER) (25764) ... 250,000 ............. (re. $125,000) 233 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 2 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 3 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 4 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 5 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 6 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 7 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 8 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 9 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 10 the environmental conservation law and including projects to combat 11 harmful algal blooms; including up to $3,000,000 to Suffolk county 12 to provide a 50 percent match for a program developed in consulta- 13 tion with the department for research, development and pilot 14 projects to develop cost effective methods to address nitrogen and 15 pathogen loading from septic system or cesspool effluent or other 16 sources or to support such efforts without a match at the state 17 university of Stony Brook directly or through its research founda- 18 tion and $1,500,000 for Suffolk county for sewer improvement 19 projects; and including $5,000,000 for Nassau county for the Bay 20 park wastewater treatment plant outfall pipe, associated conveyance 21 systems, nitrogen abatement treatment works, ocean outfall and/or 22 connections, and/or for costs incurred by Nassau County for the 23 project to connect the Long Beach waste water treatment plant 24 collection system to the Bay Park wastewater treatment plant and 25 including $250,000 from such amount to the Long Island regional 26 planning council for services and expenses related to the Long 27 Island Nitrogen Action Plan; and including $5,000,000 to update 28 source water assessment plans and develop associated water 29 protection programs some or all of which may be allocated to the 30 United States Geological Survey or the New England Interstate Water 31 Pollution Control Commission; $150,000 for the Chautauqua Lake Asso- 32 ciation; $95,000 for the Chautauqua Lake Partnership; and $1,000,000 33 to the State University of New York at Stony Brook directly or 34 through its research foundation, to support research development and 35 any associated testing or pilot projects towards improved septic and 36 wastewater treatment systems to remove phosphorus; and $500,000 to 37 the City of Long Beach for a salt storage dome (09WQ22ER) (24837) 38 ... 22,000,000 ................................... (re. $16,324,000) 39 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 40 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 41 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 42 including projects to combat harmful algal blooms; including 43 $450,000 for the Peconic Estuary Partnership, including $60,000 for 44 the Great Lakes commission (09GL22ER) (24830) ...................... 45 22,500,000 ........................................ (re. $9,550,000) 46 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 47 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 48 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 49 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007 including not less than $900,000 for 50 Lake George, including not less than $120,000 for Cornell University 51 for the plant certification program, provided that not less than 52 $5,750,000 be made available for invasive species eradication, 234 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 including but not limited to southern pine beetle, including up to 2 $500,000 to Cornell University for the control of hemlock wooly 3 adelgid, and including grants related to the control and management 4 of invasive species, and $500,000 to address the southern pine 5 beetle including up to $250,000 to the Central Pine Barrens Joint 6 Planning and Policy Commission for the implementation and adminis- 7 tration of a prescribed fire program; and $100,000 to Onondaga Coun- 8 ty for the mitigation and eradication of the water chestnut. Such 9 funding for grants shall be provided on a competitive basis in 10 consultation with the New York Invasive Species Council (09IS22ER) 11 (24704) ... 17,000,000 ........................... (re. $10,810,000) 12 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Agricultural Waste 13 Management projects, including up to $700,000 to Cornell University, 14 in consultation with the department, to continue implementing the 15 dairy acceleration program (09AW22ER) (24826) ...................... 16 1,500,000 ........................................... (re. $897,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 54, 18 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 19 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 20 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 21 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 22 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 23 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 24 following: 25 Costs related to the acquisition of the following properties: Atlantic 26 Coast, Long Island Sound, Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve, 27 Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, Central Pine Barrens, 28 Shoreham Parcel, Western Suffolk/Nassau Special Groundwater 29 Protection Areas, Mott Haven-Port Morris Waterfront, Bronx River 30 Greenway, Inner City/Underserved Community Parks, Long Pond, Staten 31 Island Greenbelt, Staten Island Bluebelt, Staten Island Wet Woods, 32 Great Swamp, Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands Complex, New York High- 33 lands, Shawangunk Mountains Region, Delaware River Highlands, Hudson 34 River Corridor/Hudson River Estuary and Greenway Trail/Hudson River 35 School Art Trail, Hudson Valley/New York City Foodshed, Catskill 36 Unfragmented Forest, Catskill River and Road Corridors, New York 37 City Watershed Lands, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, 38 Five Rivers Environmental Education Center, Lake George watershed, 39 Lake Champlain watershed, Boeselager forestry, Rensselaer Plateau, 40 Oomsdale Farm and Surrounding Landscape, Turtle Conservation Sites, 41 Region 4 Rail Trail Projects, Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, 42 Saratoga County, Hudson River Projects, Follensby Park, Washington 43 County, Rome Sand Plains, Black Creek Watershed, Tug Hill Core 44 Forests and Headwater Streams, Nelson Swamp, State Park Battle- 45 fields, Genny Green Trail/Link Trail, Onondaga Escarpment, State 46 Parks Greenbelt/Tompkins County, Cattaraugus Creek and tributaries, 47 Northern Montezuma Wetlands, Genesee River Corridor, Seneca Army 48 Depot Conservation Area, Lake Erie Tributary Gorges, Buffalo River 49 Watershed, Catharine Valley Complex, High-Tor/Bristol Hills/Bare 50 Hill State Unique Area, Lake Ontario and Lake Erie Shorelines, 51 Islands and Niagara River, Long Island Trails and Greenways, Bronx 235 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Harlem Greenway, Harbor Herons Wildlife Complex, Schunnemunk 2 Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain/Hudson Highlands Connectivi- 3 ty Project, Helderbergs, and Finger Lakes Shorelines and Riparian 4 Zones, Hand Hollow Conservation Area, Northern Flow River Corridors, 5 Black River Valley Corridor, Fort Drum Army Compatible Use Buffer 6 Project, Herkimer Home Viewshed, Inman Gulf, Massawepie Mire, Moose 7 River Corridor, St. Lawrence River Islands, Shoreline and Wetlands, 8 Southern Skaneateles Lake Forest and Shoreline, Salmon River Corri- 9 dor, Emerald Necklace, Riparian Buffers, Coastline and Wetland 10 Protection Projects Aimed at Reducing the Impacts of Storms, Storm 11 Surges and Flooding on Human and Natural Communities, Long Distance 12 Trail Corridors, Statewide Small Projects, State Forest, Unique Area 13 Wildlife Management Area Protection, Working Forest Lands, State 14 Park and State Historic Site Protection, (a) notwithstanding any law 15 to the contrary, $1,000,000 from the land acquisition allocation for 16 urban forestry projects provided that no less than $500,000 shall be 17 made available for such programs in cities and towns with popu- 18 lations of 65,000 or more; (b) notwithstanding any law to the 19 contrary, $2,500,000 from the land acquisition allocation to the 20 land trust alliance for the purpose of awarding grants on a compet- 21 itive basis to local land trusts, provided that up to ten percent of 22 such amount may be made available for administrative costs and/or 23 technical assistance; (c) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 24 not less than $1,500,000 for land acquisition in department of envi- 25 ronmental conservation regions 1, 2 and 3; (d) $1,500,000 to the 26 land trust alliance for the purpose of awarding grants on a compet- 27 itive basis to local land trusts to purchase conservation easements, 28 provided that up to ten percent of such amount may be made available 29 for administrative costs and/or technical assistance; (e) $100,000 30 for land acquisition in department of environmental conservation 31 region 9 pursuant to chapter 55 of the laws of 2021 related to ease- 32 ments on state forest land (09LA21ER) (24703) ...................... 33 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,496,000) 34 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for services and expenses of 35 the following commissions: $259,000 for Susquehanna river basin 36 commission; $359,500 for the Delaware river basin commission; 37 $14,100 for the Ohio river basin commission; $41,600 for the Inter- 38 state environmental commission; and $38,000 for the New England 39 Interstate commission; and $373,000 for the college of environmental 40 science and forestry center for native peoples and the environment 41 (09EC21ER) (25705) ... 1,085,200 .................... (re. $373,000) 42 Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve (09SE21ER) (24831) ........... 43 900,000 ............................................. (re. $900,000) 44 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects, notwith- 45 standing any law to the contrary, including projects to combat harm- 46 ful algal blooms; (a) $1,000,000 shall be made available for 47 services and expenses of the Cornell University Integrated Pest 48 Management program; (b) $500,000 shall be made available to the 49 Cornell Cooperative Extension of Suffolk County for nutrient manage- 50 ment planning and implementation activities; and (c) $250,000 shall 51 be made available to Cornell for the pesticide management education 236 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 program to support training and certification (09AN21ER) (24832) ... 2 18,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,557,000) 3 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 4 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $550,000 of such amount 5 shall be made available for Cornell community integrated pest 6 management (09NP21ER) (24833) ... 5,750,000 ....... (re. $4,188,000) 7 Agriculture and farmland protection activities, notwithstanding any 8 law to the contrary, up to $1,000,000 shall be made available to the 9 tug hill tomorrow land trust for army compatible use buffer program 10 projects around Fort Drum, and up to $95,000 shall be made available 11 to Cornell University for services and expenses of land classifica- 12 tion, agriculture district mapping and master list of soils 13 (09FP21ER) (24825) ... 18,000,000 ................ (re. $12,309,000) 14 Biodiversity stewardship and research; including funding for public 15 New York universities to conduct field studies and research on 16 biodiversity issues and up to $500,000 of this amount to support 17 pollinator diversity, up to $300,000 of which may be allocated to 18 Cornell University, including research related to the potential 19 adverse impacts of pesticides such as neonicitinoids, pursuant to a 20 contract with the department of agriculture and markets, including 21 the development of bee husbandry best management practices such as 22 pest and pathogen controls; creating diversity of pollinator habi- 23 tats; research to understand, prevent and recover from pollinator 24 losses; and outreach and education; and including $100,000 for the 25 Cary Institute of Ecosystem Studies to support the Catskill environ- 26 mental research and monitoring program (09BD21ER) (24827) .......... 27 1,350,000 ........................................... (re. $576,000) 28 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Hudson River Estuary 29 Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environ- 30 mental conservation law, including projects to combat harmful algal 31 blooms some or all of which may be allocated to the New England 32 Interstate Water Pollution Control Commission or Cornell water 33 resources institute or department of natural resources for the 34 purposes of implementing the Hudson River Estuary Action agenda, 35 $1,000,000 of which shall be for the Mohawk river action plan 36 (09HE21ER) (24836) ... 6,500,000 .................. (re. $1,342,000) 37 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 38 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 39 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 40 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 41 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 42 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 43 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 44 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 45 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 46 the environmental conservation law and including projects to combat 47 harmful algal blooms; including up to $4,500,000 to Suffolk county 48 to provide a 50 percent match for a program developed in consulta- 49 tion with the department for research, development and pilot 50 projects to develop cost effective methods to address nitrogen and 51 pathogen loading from septic system or cesspool effluent or other 52 sources or to support such efforts without a match at the state 237 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 university of Stony Brook directly or through its research founda- 2 tion and $1,500,000 for Suffolk county for sewer improvement 3 projects; and including $5,000,000 for Nassau county for the Bay 4 park wastewater treatment plant outfall pipe, associated conveyance 5 systems, nitrogen abatement treatment works, ocean outfall and/or 6 connections, and including $250,000 from such amount to the Long 7 Island regional planning council for services and expenses related 8 to the Long Island Nitrogen Action Plan; and including $5,000,000 to 9 update source water assessment plans and develop associated water 10 protection programs some or all of which may be allocated to the 11 United States Geological Survey or the New England Interstate Water 12 Pollution Control Commission; $150,000 for the Chautauqua Lake Asso- 13 ciation; $95,000 for the Chautauqua Lake Partnership; $500,000 for 14 the City of Long Beach for water quality projects; and $150,000 for 15 the East of Hudson Watershed Corporation (09WQ21ER) (24837) ........ 16 18,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,984,000) 17 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 18 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 19 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 20 including projects to combat harmful algal blooms; including 21 $450,000 for the Peconic Estuary Partnership, including $60,000 for 22 the Great Lakes commission (09GL21ER) (24830) ...................... 23 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $10,762,000) 24 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 25 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 26 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 27 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007 including not less than $450,000 for 28 Lake George, including not less than $120,000 for Cornell University 29 for the plant certification program, provided that not less than 30 $5,750,000 be made available for invasive species eradication, 31 including but not limited to southern pine beetle, including up to 32 $500,000 to Cornell University for the control of hemlock wooly 33 adelgid, and including grants related to the control and management 34 of invasive species, and $500,000 to address the southern pine 35 beetle including up to $250,000 to the Central Pine Barrens Joint 36 Planning and Policy Commission for the implementation and adminis- 37 tration of a prescribed fire program. Such funding for grants shall 38 be provided on a competitive basis in consultation with the New York 39 Invasive Species Council (09IS21ER) (24704) ........................ 40 13,238,000 ........................................ (re. $2,904,000) 41 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Agricultural Waste 42 Management projects, including up to $700,000 to Cornell University, 43 in consultation with the department, to continue implementing the 44 dairy acceleration program (09AW21ER) (24826) ...................... 45 1,500,000 ........................................... (re. $640,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 47 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 48 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 49 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 50 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 238 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 2 following: 3 Costs related to the acquisition of the following properties: Atlantic 4 Coast, Long Island Sound, Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve, 5 Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, Central Pine Barrens, 6 Shoreham Parcel, Western Suffolk/Nassau Special Groundwater 7 Protection Areas, Mott Haven-Port Morris Waterfront, Bronx River 8 Greenway, Inner City/Underserved Community Parks, Long Pond, Staten 9 Island Greenbelt, Staten Island Bluebelt, Staten Island Wet Woods, 10 Great Swamp, Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands Complex, New York High- 11 lands, Shawangunk Mountains Region, Delaware River Highlands, Hudson 12 River Corridor/Hudson River Estuary and Greenway Trail/Hudson River 13 School Art Trail, Hudson Valley/New York City Foodshed, Catskill 14 Unfragmented Forest, Catskill River and Road Corridors, New York 15 City Watershed Lands, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, 16 Five Rivers Environmental Education Center, Lake George watershed, 17 Lake Champlain watershed, Boeselager forestry, Rensselaer Plateau, 18 Oomsdale Farm and Surrounding Landscape, Turtle Conservation Sites, 19 Region 4 Rail Trail Projects, Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, 20 Saratoga County, Hudson River Projects, Follensby Park, Washington 21 County, Rome Sand Plains, Black Creek Watershed, Tug Hill Core 22 Forests and Headwater Streams, Nelson Swamp, State Park Battle- 23 fields, Genny Green Trail/Link Trail, Onondaga Escarpment, State 24 Parks Greenbelt/Tompkins County, Cattaraugus Creek and tributaries, 25 Northern Montezuma Wetlands, Genesee River Corridor, Seneca Army 26 Depot Conservation Area, Lake Erie Tributary Gorges, Buffalo River 27 Watershed, Catharine Valley Complex, High-Tor/Bristol Hills/Bare 28 Hill State Unique Area, Lake Ontario and Lake Erie Shorelines, 29 Islands and Niagara River, Long Island Trails and Greenways, Bronx 30 Harlem Greenway, Harbor Herons Wildlife Complex, Schunnemunk 31 Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain/Hudson Highlands Connectivi- 32 ty Project, Helderbergs, and Finger Lakes Shorelines and Riparian 33 Zones, Hand Hollow Conservation Area, Northern Flow River Corridors, 34 Black River Valley Corridor, Fort Drum Army Compatible Use Buffer 35 Project, Herkimer Home Viewshed, Inman Gulf, Massawepie Mire, Moose 36 River Corridor, St. Lawrence River Islands, Shoreline and Wetlands, 37 Southern Skaneateles Lake Forest and Shoreline, Salmon River Corri- 38 dor, Emerald Necklace, Riparian Buffers, Coastline and Wetland 39 Protection Projects Aimed at Reducing the Impacts of Storms, Storm 40 Surges and Flooding on Human and Natural Communities, Long Distance 41 Trail Corridors, Statewide Small Projects, State Forest, Unique Area 42 Wildlife Management Area Protection, Working Forest Lands, State 43 Park and State Historic Site Protection, (a) notwithstanding any law 44 to the contrary, $1,000,000 from the land acquisition allocation for 45 urban forestry projects provided that no less than $500,000 shall be 46 made available for such programs in cities and towns with popu- 47 lations of 65,000 or more; (b) notwithstanding any law to the 48 contrary, $2,500,000 from the land acquisition allocation to the 49 land trust alliance for the purpose of awarding grants on a compet- 50 itive basis to local land trusts, provided that up to ten percent of 51 such amount may be made available for administrative costs and/or 52 technical assistance; (c) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 239 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 not less than $3,000,000 for land acquisition in department of envi- 2 ronmental conservation regions 1, 2 and 3; (d) $200,000 for the Lake 3 George Park Commission for facilities construction and upgrades; and 4 (e) $1,500,000 to the land trust alliance for the purpose of award- 5 ing grants on a competitive basis to local land trusts to purchase 6 conservation easements, provided that up to ten percent of such 7 amount may be made available for administrative costs and/or techni- 8 cal assistance (09LA20ER) (24703) .................................. 9 31,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,764,000) 10 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for service and expenses of 11 the following commissions: $259,000 for Susquehanna river basin 12 commission; $359,500 for the Delaware river basin commission; 13 $14,100 for the Ohio river basin commission; $41,600 for the Inter- 14 state environmental commission; and $38,000 for the New England 15 Interstate commission; and $373,000 for the college of environmental 16 science and forestry center for native peoples and the environment 17 (09EC20ER) (25705) ... 1,086,000 ..................... (re. $27,000) 18 Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve (09SE20ER) (24831) ........... 19 900,000 ............................................. (re. $242,000) 20 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects, notwith- 21 standing any law to the contrary, including projects to combat harm- 22 ful algal blooms; (a) $1,000,000 shall be made available for 23 services and expenses of the Cornell University Integrated Pest 24 Management program; (b) $500,000 shall be made available to the 25 Cornell Cooperative Extension of Suffolk County for nutrient manage- 26 ment planning and implementation activities; and (c) $250,000 shall 27 be made available to Cornell for the pesticide management education 28 program to support training and certification (09AN20ER) (24832) ... 29 18,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,682,000) 30 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 31 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $550,000 of such amount 32 shall be made available for Cornell community integrated pest 33 management (09NP20ER) (24833) ... 6,000,000 ....... (re. $3,071,000) 34 Agriculture and farmland protection activities, notwithstanding any 35 law to the contrary, up to $1,000,000 shall be made available to the 36 tug hill tomorrow land trust for army compatible use buffer program 37 projects around Fort Drum, and up to $95,000 shall be made available 38 to Cornell University for services and expenses of land classifica- 39 tion, agriculture district mapping and master list of soils 40 (09FP20ER) (24825) ... 18,000,000 ................. (re. $6,923,000) 41 Biodiversity stewardship and research; including funding for public 42 New York universities to conduct field studies and research on 43 biodiversity issues and up to $500,000 of this amount to support 44 pollinator diversity, up to $300,000 of which may be allocated to 45 Cornell University, including research related to the potential 46 adverse impacts of pesticides such as neonicitinoids, pursuant to a 47 contract with the department of agriculture and markets, including 48 the development of bee husbandry best management practices such as 49 pest and pathogen controls; creating diversity of pollinator habi- 50 tats; research to understand, prevent and recover from pollinator 51 losses; and outreach and education; and including $100,000 for the 52 Cary Institute of Ecosystem Studies to support the Catskill environ- 240 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 mental research and monitoring program (09BD20ER) (24827) .......... 2 1,350,000 ........................................... (re. $225,000) 3 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Hudson River Estuary 4 Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environ- 5 mental conservation law, including projects to combat harmful algal 6 blooms some or all of which may be allocated to the New England 7 Interstate Water Pollution Control Commission or Cornell water 8 resources institute or department of natural resources for the 9 purposes of implementing the Hudson River Estuary Action agenda, 10 $1,000,000 of which shall be for the Mohawk river action plan 11 (09HE20ER) (24836) ... 6,500,000 .................... (re. $383,000) 12 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 13 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 14 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 15 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 16 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 17 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 18 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 19 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 20 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 21 the environmental conservation law and including projects to combat 22 harmful algal blooms; including up to $3,000,000 to Suffolk county 23 to provide a 50 percent match for a program developed in consulta- 24 tion with the department for research, development and pilot 25 projects to develop cost effective methods to address nitrogen and 26 pathogen loading from septic system or cesspool effluent or other 27 sources or to support such efforts without a match at the state 28 university of Stony Brook directly or through its research founda- 29 tion and $1,500,000 for Suffolk county for sewer improvement 30 projects; and including $5,000,000 for Nassau county for the Bay 31 park wastewater treatment plant outfall pipe, associated conveyance 32 systems, nitrogen abatement treatment works, ocean outfall and/or 33 connections, and including $250,000 from such amount to the Long 34 Island regional planning council for services and expenses related 35 to the Long Island Nitrogen Action Plan; and including $5,000,000 to 36 update source water assessment plans and develop associated water 37 protection programs some or all of which may be allocated to the 38 United States Geological Survey or the New England Interstate Water 39 Pollution Control Commission; $350,000 for the costs of rehabili- 40 tation and improvements to the Town of Hempstead Marine laboratory; 41 $1,000,000 for activities related to the cleanup of Scajaquada 42 Creek; $150,000 for the Chautauqua Lake Association; and $95,000 for 43 the Chautauqua Lake Partnership (09WQ20ER) (24837) ................. 44 18,600,000 ........................................ (re. $2,833,000) 45 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 46 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 47 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 48 including projects to combat harmful algal blooms; including 49 $200,000 to Suffolk county for the Peconic Bay Estuary Program, 50 including $60,000 for the Great Lakes commission (09GL20ER) (24830) 51 ... 18,750,000 .................................... (re. $6,176,000) 241 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 2 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 3 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 4 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007 including not less than $450,000 for 5 Lake George, including not less than $120,000 for Cornell University 6 for the plant certification program, provided that not less than 7 $5,750,000 be made available for invasive species eradication, 8 including but not limited to southern pine beetle, including up to 9 $500,000 to Cornell University for the control of hemlock wooly 10 adelgid, and including grants related to the control and management 11 of invasive species, and $500,000 to address the southern pine 12 beetle including up to $250,000 to the Central Pine Barrens Joint 13 Planning and Policy Commission for the implementation and adminis- 14 tration of a prescribed fire program, and $300,000 to the county of 15 Nassau for the purchase of an aquatic weed harvester. Such funding 16 for grants shall be provided on a competitive basis in consultation 17 with the New York Invasive Species Council (09IS20ER) (24704) ...... 18 13,238,000 ........................................ (re. $4,116,000) 19 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Agricultural Waste 20 Management projects, including up to $700,000 to Cornell University, 21 in consultation with the department, to continue implementing the 22 dairy acceleration program (09AW20ER) (24826) ...................... 23 1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,047,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 25 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 26 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 27 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 28 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 29 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 30 following: 31 Costs related to the acquisition of the following properties: Atlantic 32 Coast, Long Island Sound, Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve, 33 Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, Central Pine Barrens, 34 Shoreham Parcel, Western Suffolk/Nassau Special Groundwater 35 Protection Areas, Mott Haven-Port Morris Waterfront, Bronx River 36 Greenway, Inner City/Underserved Community Parks, Long Pond, Staten 37 Island Greenbelt, Staten Island Bluebelt, Staten Island Wet Woods, 38 Great Swamp, Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands Complex, New York High- 39 lands, Shawangunk Mountains Region, Delaware River Highlands, Hudson 40 River Corridor/Hudson River Estuary and Greenway Trail/Hudson River 41 School Art Trail, Hudson Valley/New York City Foodshed, Catskill 42 Unfragmented Forest, Catskill River and Road Corridors, New York 43 City Watershed Lands, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, 44 Five Rivers Environmental Education Center, Lake George watershed, 45 Lake Champlain watershed, Boeselager forestry, Rensselaer Plateau, 46 Oomsdale Farm and Surrounding Landscape, Turtle Conservation Sites, 47 Region 4 Rail Trail Projects, Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, 48 Saratoga County, Hudson River Projects, Follensby Park, Washington 49 County, Rome Sand Plains, Black Creek Watershed, Tug Hill Core 50 Forests and Headwater Streams, Nelson Swamp, State Park Battle- 51 fields, Genny Green Trail/Link Trail, Onondaga Escarpment, State 242 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Parks Greenbelt/Tompkins County, Cattaraugus Creek and tributaries, 2 Northern Montezuma Wetlands, Genesee River Corridor, Seneca Army 3 Depot Conservation Area, Lake Erie Tributary Gorges, Buffalo River 4 Watershed, Catharine Valley Complex, High-Tor/Bristol Hills/Bare 5 Hill State Unique Area, Lake Ontario and Lake Erie Shorelines, 6 Islands and Niagara River, Long Island Trails and Greenways, Bronx 7 Harlem Greenway, Harbor Herons Wildlife Complex, Schunnemunk 8 Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain/Hudson Highlands Connectivi- 9 ty Project, Helderbergs, and Finger Lakes Shorelines and Riparian 10 Zones, Hand Hollow Conservation Area, Northern Flow River Corridors, 11 Black River Valley Corridor, Fort Drum Army Compatible Use Buffer 12 Project, Herkimer Home Viewshed, Inman Gulf, Massawepie Mire, Moose 13 River Corridor, St. Lawrence River Islands, Shoreline and Wetlands, 14 Southern Skaneateles Lake Forest and Shoreline, Salmon River Corri- 15 dor, Emerald Necklace, Riparian Buffers, Coastline and Wetland 16 Protection Projects Aimed at Reducing the Impacts of Storms, Storm 17 Surges and Flooding on Human and Natural Communities, Long Distance 18 Trail Corridors, Statewide Small Projects, State Forest, Unique Area 19 Wildlife Management Area Protection, Working Forest Lands, State 20 Park and State Historic Site Protection, (a) notwithstanding any law 21 to the contrary, $1,000,000 from the land acquisition allocation for 22 urban forestry projects provided that no less than $500,000 shall be 23 made available for such programs in cities and towns with popu- 24 lations of 65,000 or more; (b) notwithstanding any law to the 25 contrary, $2,500,000 from the land acquisition allocation to the 26 land trust alliance for the purpose of awarding grants on a compet- 27 itive basis to local land trusts, provided that up to ten percent of 28 such amount may be made available for administrative costs and/or 29 technical assistance; (c) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 30 not less than $3,000,000 for land acquisition in department of envi- 31 ronmental conservation regions 1, 2 and 3; and (d) $200,000 for the 32 Lake George Park Commission for facilities construction (09LA19ER) 33 (24703) ... 33,087,000 ............................ (re. $9,519,000) 34 Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve (09SE19ER) (24831) ........... 35 900,000 ............................................. (re. $155,000) 36 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects, notwith- 37 standing any law to the contrary, including projects to combat harm- 38 ful algal blooms; (a) $1,000,000 shall be made available for 39 services and expenses of the Cornell University Integrated Pest 40 Management program; (b) $500,000 shall be made available to the 41 Cornell Cooperative Extension of Suffolk County for nutrient manage- 42 ment planning and implementation activities; and (c) $250,000 shall 43 be made available to Cornell for the pesticide management education 44 program to support training and certification (09AN19ER) (24832) ... 45 18,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,430,000) 46 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 47 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $550,000 of such amount 48 shall be made available for Cornell community integrated pest 49 management (09NP19ER) (24833) ... 7,000,000 ....... (re. $4,582,000) 50 Agriculture and farmland protection activities, notwithstanding any 51 law to the contrary, up to $1,000,000 shall be made available to the 52 tug hill tomorrow land trust for army compatible use buffer program 243 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 projects around Fort Drum, and up to $95,000 shall be made available 2 to Cornell University for services and expenses of land classifica- 3 tion, agriculture district mapping and master list of soils 4 (09FP19ER) (24825) ... 18,000,000 ................. (re. $6,704,000) 5 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Hudson River Estuary 6 Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environ- 7 mental conservation law, including projects to combat harmful algal 8 blooms some or all of which may be allocated to the New England 9 Interstate Water Pollution Control Commission or Cornell water 10 resources institute or department of natural resources for the 11 purposes of implementing the Hudson River Estuary Action agenda, 12 $1,000,000 of which shall be for the Mohawk river action plan 13 (09HE19ER) (24836) ... 6,500,000 .................... (re. $461,000) 14 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 15 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 16 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 17 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 18 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 19 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 20 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 21 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 22 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 23 the environmental conservation law and including projects to combat 24 harmful algal blooms; including up to $3,000,000 to Suffolk county 25 to provide a 50 percent match for a program developed in consulta- 26 tion with the department for research, development and pilot 27 projects to develop cost effective methods to address nitrogen and 28 pathogen loading from septic system or cesspool effluent or other 29 sources or to support such efforts without a match at the state 30 university of Stony Brook directly or through its research founda- 31 tion and $1,500,000 for Suffolk county for sewer improvement 32 projects; and including $5,000,000 for Nassau county for the Bay 33 park wastewater treatment plant outfall pipe, associated conveyance 34 systems, nitrogen abatement treatment works, ocean outfall and/or 35 connections, and including $250,000 from such amount to the Long 36 Island regional planning council for services and expenses related 37 to the Long Island Nitrogen Action Plan; and including $5,000,000 to 38 update source water assessment plans and develop associated water 39 protection programs some or all of which may be allocated to the 40 United States Geological Survey or the New England Interstate Water 41 Pollution Control Commission; and including up to $100,000 for the 42 removal and appropriate disposal of firefighting foam containing 43 regulated perfluoronated compounds from municipal fire and emergency 44 response departments; $350,000 for the costs of rehabilitation and 45 improvements to the Town of Hempstead Marine laboratory (09WQ19ER) 46 (24837) ... 17,750,000 ............................ (re. $4,754,000) 47 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 48 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 49 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 50 including projects to combat harmful algal blooms; including 51 $200,000 to Suffolk county for the Peconic Bay Estuary Program, 244 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 including $60,000 for the Great Lakes commission (09GL19ER) (24830) 2 ... 17,250,000 .................................... (re. $2,863,000) 3 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 4 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 5 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 6 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007 including not less than $450,000 for 7 Lake George, including not less than $120,000 for Cornell University 8 for the plant certification program, provided that not less than 9 $6,050,000 be made available for invasive species eradication, 10 including but not limited to southern pine beetle, including up to 11 $500,000 to Cornell University for the control of hemlock wooly 12 adelgid, and including grants related to the control and management 13 of invasive species, and $500,000 to address the southern pine 14 beetle including up to $250,000 to the Central Pine Barrens Joint 15 Planning and Policy Commission for the implementation and adminis- 16 tration of a prescribed fire program. Such funding for grants shall 17 be provided on a competitive basis in consultation with the New York 18 Invasive Species Council (09IS19ER) (24704) ........................ 19 13,300,000 ........................................ (re. $1,034,000) 20 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Agricultural Waste 21 Management projects, including up to $700,000 to Cornell University, 22 in consultation with the department, to continue implementing the 23 dairy acceleration program (09AW19ER) (24826) ...................... 24 1,500,000 ........................................... (re. $236,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 27 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 28 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 29 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 30 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 31 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 32 following: 33 Costs related to the acquisition of the following properties: Atlan- 34 tic Coast, Long Island Sound, Long Island South Shore Estuary 35 Reserve, Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, Central Pine 36 Barrens, Western Suffolk/Nassau Special Groundwater Protection 37 Areas, Mott Haven-Port Morris Waterfront, Bronx River Greenway, 38 Inner City/Underserved Community Parks, Long Pond, Staten Island 39 Greenbelt, Staten Island Bluebelt, Staten Island Wet Woods, Great 40 Swamp, Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands Complex, New York Highlands, 41 Shawangunk Mountains Region, Delaware River Highlands, Hudson River 42 Corridor/Hudson River Estuary and Greenway Trail/Hudson River School 43 Art Trail, Hudson Valley/New York City Foodshed, Catskill Unfrag- 44 mented Forest, Catskill River and Road Corridors, New York City 45 Watershed Lands, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, Five 46 Rivers Environmental Education Center, Lake George watershed, Lake 47 Champlain watershed, Boeselager forestry, Rensselaer Plateau, Ooms- 48 dale Farm and Surrounding Landscape, Turtle Conservation Sites, 49 Region 4 Rail Trail Projects, Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, 50 Saratoga County, Hudson River Projects, Follensby Park, Washington 51 County, Rome Sand Plains, Black Creek Watershed, Tug Hill Core 245 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Forests and Headwater Streams, Nelson Swamp, State Park Battle- 2 fields, Genny Green Trail/Link Trail, Onondaga Escarpment, State 3 Parks Greenbelt/Tompkins County, Cattaraugus Creek and tributaries, 4 Northern Montezuma Wetlands, Genesee River Corridor, Seneca Army 5 Depot Conservation Area, Lake Erie Tributary Gorges, Buffalo River 6 Watershed, Catharine Valley Complex, High-Tor/Bristol Hills/Bare 7 Hill State Unique Area, Lake Ontario and Lake Erie Shorelines, 8 Islands and Niagara River, Long Island Trails and Greenways, Bronx 9 Harlem Greenway, Harbor Herons Wildlife Complex, Schunnemunk 10 Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain/Hudson Highlands Connectivi- 11 ty Project, Helderbergs, and Finger Lakes Shorelines and Riparian 12 Zones, Hand Hollow Conservation Area, Northern Flow River Corridors, 13 Black River Valley Corridor, Fort Drum Army Compatible Use Buffer 14 Project, Herkimer Home Viewshed, Inman Gulf, Massawepie Mire, Moose 15 River Corridor, St. Lawrence River Islands, Shoreline and Wetlands, 16 Southern Skaneateles Lake Forest and Shoreline, Salmon River Corri- 17 dor, Emerald Necklace, Riparian Buffers, Coastline and Wetland 18 Protection Projects Aimed at Reducing the Impacts of Storms, Storm 19 Surges and Flooding on Human and Natural Communities, Long Distance 20 Trail Corridors, Statewide Small Projects, State Forest, Unique Area 21 Wildlife Management Area Protection, Working Forest Lands, State 22 Park and State Historic Site Protection, (a) notwithstanding any law 23 to the contrary, $1,000,000 from the land acquisition allocation for 24 urban forestry projects provided that no less than $500,000 shall be 25 made available for such programs in cities and towns with popu- 26 lations of 65,000 or more; (b) notwithstanding any law to the 27 contrary, $2,500,000 from the land acquisition allocation to the 28 land trust alliance for the purpose of awarding grants on a compet- 29 itive basis to local land trusts, provided that up to ten percent of 30 such amount may be made available for administrative costs and/or 31 technical assistance; (c) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 32 not less than $3,000,000 for land acquisition in department of envi- 33 ronmental conservation regions 1, 2 and 3; (d) including $1,000,000 34 for Adirondack infrastructure and environmental improvements for the 35 towns of Long Lake, North Hudson, Minerva, Indian Lake, and Newcomb; 36 and (e) $700,000 for the Lake George Park Commission for facilities 37 construction (09LA18ER) (24703) ... 35,000,000 .... (re. $4,328,000) 38 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects, notwith- 39 standing any law to the contrary, including projects to combat harm- 40 ful algal blooms; (a) $1,000,000 shall be made available for 41 services and expenses of the Cornell University Integrated Pest 42 Management program; (b) $500,000 shall be made available to the 43 Cornell Cooperative Extension of Suffolk County for nutrient manage- 44 ment planning and implementation activities; and (c) $250,000 shall 45 be made available to Cornell for the pesticide management education 46 program to support training and certification (09AN18ER) (24832) ... 47 17,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,541,000) 48 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 49 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $550,000 of such amount 50 shall be made available for Cornell community integrated pest 51 management (09NP18ER) (24833) ... 7,000,000 ....... (re. $3,333,000) 246 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Agriculture and farmland protection activities, notwithstanding any 2 law to the contrary, up to $1,000,000 shall be made available to the 3 tug hill tomorrow land trust for army compatible use buffer program 4 projects around Fort Drum, and up to $90,000 shall be made available 5 to Cornell University for services and expenses of land classifica- 6 tion, agriculture district mapping and master list of soils 7 (09FP18ER) (24825) ... 18,000,000 ................ (re. $10,409,000) 8 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Hudson River Estuary 9 Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environ- 10 mental conservation law, including projects to combat harmful algal 11 blooms some or all of which may be allocated to the New England 12 Interstate Water Pollution Control Commission or Cornell water 13 resources institute or department of natural resources for the 14 purposes of implementing the Hudson River Estuary Action agenda, 15 $1,000,000 of which shall be for the Mohawk river action plan 16 (09HE18ER) (24836) ... 6,500,000 .................... (re. $510,000) 17 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 18 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 19 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 20 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 21 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 22 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 23 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 24 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 25 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 26 the environmental conservation law and including projects to combat 27 harmful algal blooms; including up to $3,000,000 to Suffolk county 28 to provide a 50 percent match for a program developed in consulta- 29 tion with the department for research, development and pilot 30 projects to develop cost effective methods to address nitrogen and 31 pathogen loading from septic system or cesspool effluent or other 32 sources or to support such efforts without a match at the state 33 university of Stony Brook directly or through its research founda- 34 tion and $1,500,000 for Suffolk county for sewer improvement 35 projects; and including $5,000,000 for Nassau county for the Bay 36 park wastewater treatment plant outfall pipe, associated conveyance 37 systems, nitrogen abatement treatment works, ocean outfall and/or 38 connections, including up to $400,000 from such amount for testing 39 of monitoring wells in Nassau County and including $250,000 from 40 such amount to the Long Island regional planning council for 41 services and expenses related to the Long Island Nitrogen Action 42 Plan; and including $1,000,000 for the African American Experience 43 in the Adirondacks exhibition at Adirondack Experience, the Museum 44 on Blue Mountain Lake; and including $5,000,000 to update source 45 water assessment plans and develop associated water protection 46 programs some or all of which may be allocated to the United States 47 Geological Survey or the New England Interstate Water Pollution 48 Control Commission; and including up to $100,000 for the removal and 49 appropriate disposal of firefighting foam containing regulated 50 perfluoronated compounds from municipal fire and emergency response 51 departments (09WQ18ER) (24837) ... 20,250,000 ..... (re. $4,838,000) 247 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 2 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 3 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 4 including projects to combat harmful algal blooms; including 5 $200,000 to Suffolk county for the Peconic Bay Estuary Program, 6 including $60,000 for the Great Lakes commission, and including 7 $50,000 for the State University of New York at Brockport for resi- 8 liency monitoring, and including $250,000 for the State University 9 of New York Stony Brook for a study of the feasibility, costs, 10 location, and impacts of a seagate to act as a storm surge barrier 11 for the south shore of Long Island (09GL18ER) (24830) .............. 12 17,250,000 ........................................ (re. $2,938,000) 13 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 14 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 15 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 16 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007 including not less than $450,000 for 17 Lake George, including not less than $120,000 for Cornell University 18 for the plant certification program, provided that not less than 19 $6,050,000 be made available for invasive species eradication, 20 including but not limited to southern pine beetle, including up to 21 $500,000 to Cornell University for the control of hemlock wooly 22 adelgid, and including grants related to the control and management 23 of invasive species, and $500,000 to address the southern pine 24 beetle including up to $250,000 to the Central Pine Barrens Joint 25 Planning and Policy Commission for the implementation and adminis- 26 tration of a prescribed fire program. Such funding for grants shall 27 be provided on a competitive basis in consultation with the New York 28 Invasive Species Council (09IS18ER) (24704) ........................ 29 13,300,000 ........................................ (re. $1,252,000) 30 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Soil and Water Conserva- 31 tion District activities as authorized for reimbursement and funding 32 in section 11-a of the soil and water conservation districts law 33 including projects to combat harmful algal blooms; including up to 34 $270,000 for the Schuyler and Chemung County SWCD Shared Services 35 Infrastructure; and up to $85,000 for the Steuben County SWCD Public 36 Education Outreach and Policy (09SW18ER) (24834) ................... 37 10,000,000 ........................................... (re. $64,000) 38 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Agricultural Waste 39 Management projects, including up to $700,000 to Cornell University, 40 in consultation with the department, to continue implementing the 41 dairy acceleration program (09AW18ER) (24826) ...................... 42 1,500,000 ........................................... (re. $118,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 44 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 45 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 46 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 47 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 48 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 49 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 50 following: 248 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Costs related to the acquisition of the following properties: Atlan- 2 tic Coast, Long Island Sound, Long Island South Shore Estuary 3 Reserve, Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, Central Pine 4 Barrens, Western Suffolk/Nassau Special Groundwater Protection 5 Areas, Mott Haven-Port Morris Waterfront, Bronx River Greenway, 6 Inner City/Underserved Community Parks, Long Pond, Staten Island 7 Greenbelt, Staten Island Bluebelt, Staten Island Wet Woods, Great 8 Swamp, Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands Complex, New York Highlands, 9 Shawangunk Mountains Region, Delaware River Highlands, Hudson River 10 Corridor/Hudson River Estuary and Greenway Trail/Hudson River School 11 Art Trail, Hudson Valley/New York City Foodshed, Catskill Unfrag- 12 mented Forest, Catskill River and Road Corridors, New York City 13 Watershed Lands, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, Five 14 Rivers Environmental Education Center, Lake George watershed, Lake 15 Champlain watershed, Boeselager forestry, Rensselaer Plateau, Ooms- 16 dale Farm and Surrounding Landscape, Turtle Conservation Sites, 17 Region 4 Rail Trail Projects, Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, 18 Saratoga County, Hudson River Projects, Follensby Park, Washington 19 County, Rome Sand Plains, Black Creek Watershed, Tug Hill Core 20 Forests and Headwater Streams, Nelson Swamp, State Park Battle- 21 fields, Genny Green Trail/Link Trail, Onondaga Escarpment, State 22 Parks Greenbelt/Tompkins County, Cattaraugus Creek and tributaries, 23 Northern Montezuma Wetlands, Genesee River Corridor, Seneca Army 24 Depot Conservation Area, Lake Erie Tributary Gorges, Buffalo River 25 Watershed, Catharine Valley Complex, High-Tor/Bristol Hills/Bare 26 Hill State Unique Area, Lake Ontario and Lake Erie Shorelines, 27 Islands and Niagara River, Long Island Trails and Greenways, Bronx 28 Harlem Greenway, Harbor Herons Wildlife Complex, Schunnemunk 29 Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain/Hudson Highlands Connectivi- 30 ty Project, Helderbergs, and Finger Lakes Shorelines and Riparian 31 Zones, Hand Hollow Conservation Area, Northern Flow River Corridors, 32 Black River Valley Corridor, Fort Drum Army Compatible Use Buffer 33 Project, Herkimer Home Viewshed, Inman Gulf, Massawepie Mire, Moose 34 River Corridor, St. Lawrence River Islands, Shoreline and Wetlands, 35 Southern Skaneateles Lake Forest and Shoreline, Salmon River Corri- 36 dor, Emerald Necklace, Riparian Buffers, Coastline and Wetland 37 Protection Projects Aimed at Reducing the Impacts of Storms, Storm 38 Surges and Flooding on Human and Natural Communities, Long Distance 39 Trail Corridors, Statewide Small Projects, State Forest, Unique Area 40 Wildlife Management Area Protection, Working Forest Lands, State 41 Park and State Historic Site Protection, (a) notwithstanding any law 42 to the contrary, $1,000,000 from the land acquisition allocation for 43 urban forestry projects provided that no less than $500,000 shall be 44 made available for such programs in cities and towns with popu- 45 lations of 65,000 or more; (b) notwithstanding any law to the 46 contrary, $2,500,000 from the land acquisition allocation to the 47 land trust alliance for the purpose of awarding grants on a compet- 48 itive basis to local land trusts, provided that up to ten percent of 49 such amount may be made available for administrative costs and/or 50 technical assistance; (c) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 51 not less than $3,000,000 for land acquisition in department of envi- 249 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ronmental conservation regions 1, 2 and 3 (09LA17ER) (24703) ....... 2 36,349,000 ........................................ (re. $2,035,000) 3 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects, notwith- 4 standing any law to the contrary, (a) $1,000,000 shall be made 5 available for services and expenses of the Cornell University Inte- 6 grated Pest Management program; and (b) $500,000 shall be made 7 available to the Cornell Cooperative Extension of Suffolk County for 8 nutrient management planning and implementation activities 9 (09AN17ER) (24832) ... 17,000,000 ................. (re. $3,332,000) 10 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 11 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $550,000 of such amount 12 shall be made available for Cornell community integrated pest 13 management (09NP17ER) (24833) ... 7,000,000 ......... (re. $500,000) 14 Agriculture and farmland protection activities, notwithstanding any 15 law to the contrary, up to $1,000,000 shall be made available to the 16 tug hill tomorrow land trust for army compatible use buffer program 17 projects around Fort Drum, and up to $87,000 shall be made available 18 to Cornell University for services and expenses of land classifica- 19 tion, agriculture district mapping and master list of soils 20 (09FP17ER) (24825) ... 20,000,000 ................ (re. $10,496,000) 21 Biodiversity stewardship and research; including funding for public 22 New York universities to conduct field studies and research on bidi- 23 versity issues and up to $500,000 of this amount to support pollina- 24 tor diversity, up to $300,000 of which may be allocated to Cornell 25 University, including research related to the potential adverse 26 impacts of pesticides such as neonicitinoids, pursuant to a contract 27 with the department of agriculture and markets, including the devel- 28 opment of bee husbandry best management practices such as pest and 29 pathogen controls; creating diversity of pollinator habitats; 30 research to understand, prevent and recover from pollinator losses; 31 and outreach and education (09BD17ER) (24827) ...................... 32 1,000,000 ............................................ (re. $54,000) 33 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Hudson River Estuary 34 Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environ- 35 mental conservation law, $1,000,000 of which shall be for the Mohawk 36 river action plan (09HE17ER) (24836) ............................... 37 5,500,000 ........................................... (re. $247,000) 38 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 39 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 40 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 41 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 42 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 43 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 44 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 45 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 46 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 47 the environmental conservation law; including up to $3,000,000 to 48 Suffolk county to provide a 50 percent match for a program developed 49 in consultation with the department for research, development and 50 pilot projects to develop cost effective methods to address nitrogen 51 and pathogen loading from septic system or cesspool effluent or 52 other sources or to support such efforts without a match at the 250 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 state university of Stony Brook directly or through its research 2 foundation and $1,500,000 for Suffolk county for sewer improvement 3 projects; and including $5,000,000 for Nassau county for the Bay 4 park wastewater treatment plant outfall pipe, associated conveyance 5 systems, nitrogen abatement treatment works, ocean outfall and/or 6 connections, including up to $400,000 from such amount for testing 7 of monitoring wells in Nassau County and including $250,000 from 8 such amount to the Long Island regional planning council for 9 services and expenses related to the Long Island Nitrogen Action 10 Plan; and including $1,000,000 for the African American Experience 11 in the Adirondacks at Adirondack Experience, The Museum on Blue 12 Mountain Lake; and including $5,000,000 to update source water 13 assessment plans and develop associated water protection programs 14 some or all of which may be allocated to the United States Geologi- 15 cal Survey or the New England Interstate Water Pollution Control 16 Commission; and including up to $500,000 for the removal and appro- 17 priate disposal of firefighting foam containing regulated perfluoro- 18 nated compounds from municipal fire and emergency response depart- 19 ments; and $1,000,000 for activities related to the cleanup of 20 Scajaquada Creek (09WQ17ER) (24837) ................................ 21 20,250,000 ........................................ (re. $5,217,000) 22 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 23 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 24 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law; 25 including $200,000 to Suffolk county for the Peconic Bay Estuary 26 Program and including $60,000 for the Great Lakes commission; and 27 including $250,000 for the Long Island Commission for aquifer 28 protection (09GL17ER) (24830) ... 15,000,000 ...... (re. $1,332,000) 29 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 30 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 31 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 32 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007 including not less than $450,000 for 33 Lake George, provided that not less than $6,050,000 be made avail- 34 able for invasive species eradication, including but not limited to 35 southern pine beetle, including up to $500,000 to Cornell University 36 for the control of hemlock wooly adelgid and including grants 37 related to the control and management of invasive species. Such 38 funding for grants shall be provided on a competitive basis in 39 consultation with the New York Invasive Species Council (09IS17ER) 40 (24704) ... 13,000,000 .............................. (re. $845,000) 41 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Agricultural Waste 42 Management projects, including up to $700,000 to Cornell University, 43 in consultation with the department, to continue implementing the 44 dairy acceleration program (09AW17ER) (24826) ...................... 45 1,500,000 ............................................ (re. $44,000) 46 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 47 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 48 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 49 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 50 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 51 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 251 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 2 following: 3 Costs related to the acquisition of the following properties: Atlan- 4 tic Coast, Long Island Sound Coastal Area, Long Island South Shore 5 Estuary Reserve, Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, 6 Central Pine Barrens, Hudson River projects, Western Suffolk/Nassau 7 Special Groundwater Protection Areas, Mott Haven-Port Morris Water- 8 front, Bronx River Greenway, Inner City/Underserved Community Parks, 9 Long Pond/Butler Woods, Staten Island Greenbelt, Staten Island Blue- 10 belt, Staten Island Wet Woods, Great Swamp, Neversink Highlands, 11 Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands Complex, New York Highlands, Northern 12 Putnam Greenway, Shawangunk Mountains, Catskill Mountain/Delaware 13 River Region, Beaverkill/Willowemoc, Hudson River Estuary/Greenway 14 Trail/Quadricentennial Legacy Trail Corridor, Catskill Unfragmented 15 Forest, Catskill River and Road Corridors, Long Path, New York City 16 Watershed Lands, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, Five 17 Rivers Environmental Education Center, Batten Kill Watershed-Sarato- 18 ga National Historic Park View shed, Washington County Agricultural 19 Lands-Saratoga National Historic Park View shed, Lake George 20 watershed, Lake Champlain watershed, Boeselager forestry, Rensselaer 21 plateau, Oomsdale Farm and Surrounding Landscape, Hudson River 22 Gorge, Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, Lake Champlain Shoreline 23 and Wetlands, Saratoga County, State Forest and Wildlife Management 24 Area Protection, Follensby Park, Undeveloped Lake George Shore, 25 Whitney Park, Finch Woodlands, Washington County, Washington County 26 Grasslands, Recreational Trail Linkages and Networks, Rome Sand 27 Plains, Black Creek Watershed, Portaferry Lake, Tug Hill Core 28 Forests and Headwater Streams, Tioga County Park Opportunities, 29 Nelson Swamp, Clark Reservation State Park, State Parks 30 Greenbelt/Tompkins County, Cattaraugus Creek and tributaries, North- 31 ern Montezuma Wetlands, Seneca Army Depot Conservation Area, Lake 32 Erie Tributary Gorges, Two Rivers State Park, Buffalo River 33 Watershed, Braddock Bay, Catharine Valley Complex, Genesee 34 Greenway/Recreationway, Hi Tor/Bristol Hills, Allegany State Park, 35 Great Lakes Shorelines and Niagara River, Long Island Trail and 36 Greenway System, Bronx Harlem Greenway, Harbor Herons Wildlife 37 Complex, Schunnemunk Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain, Held- 38 erberg Escarpment, and Western Finger Lakes: Conesus, Hemlock, 39 Canadice & Honeoye, Hand Hollow Conservation Area, Northern Flow 40 River Corridors, Black River Valley Corridor, Fort Drum Conservation 41 Partnership Project, Herkimer Home Viewshed, Inman Gulf, Massawepie 42 Mire, Moose River Corridor, St. Lawrence River Islands, Shoreline 43 and Wetlands, Carpenter Falls/Bear Swamp Creek Corridor, Salmon 44 River Corridor, Emerald Necklace, Finger Lakes Shorelines, Long 45 Distance Trail Corridors, Statewide Small Projects, Working Forest 46 Lands, State Park and State Historic Site Protection, (a) notwith- 47 standing any law to the contrary, $1,000,000 from the land acquisi- 48 tion allocation for urban forestry projects provided that no less 49 than $500,000 shall be made available for such programs in cities 50 and towns with populations of 65,000 or more; (b) notwithstanding 51 any law to the contrary, $2,000,000 from the land acquisition allo- 52 cation to the land trust alliance for the purpose of awarding grants 252 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 on a competitive basis to local land trusts, provided that up to ten 2 percent of such amount may be made available for administrative 3 costs and/or technical assistance; (c) notwithstanding any law to 4 the contrary, not less than $3,000,000 for land acquisition in 5 department of environmental conservation regions 1, 2 and 3; 6 $500,000 for a resiliency planting program (09LA16ER) (24703) ...... 7 40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $19,390,000) 8 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects, notwith- 9 standing any law to the contrary, (a) $1,000,000 shall be made 10 available for services and expenses of the Cornell University Inte- 11 grated Pest Management program; and (b) $500,000 shall be made 12 available to the Cornell Cooperative Extension of Suffolk County for 13 nutrient management planning and implementation activities 14 (09AN16ER) (24832) ... 19,000,000 ................. (re. $5,364,000) 15 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 16 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $550,000 of such amount 17 shall be made available for Cornell community integrated pest 18 management and including $250,000 to the county of Rockland for the 19 development of a long-term water conservation strategy (09NP16ER) 20 (24833) ... 8,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,810,000) 21 Agriculture and farmland protection activities, notwithstanding any 22 law to the contrary, $1,000,000 shall be made available to the tug 23 hill tomorrow land trust for army compatible use buffer program 24 projects around Fort Drum, and $70,000 shall be made available to 25 Cornell University for services and expenses of land classification 26 and master list of soils (09FP16ER) (24825) ........................ 27 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,943,000) 28 Biodiversity stewardship and research; notwithstanding any law to the 29 contrary, any or all of this amount shall be used for the New York 30 state landowner incentive program to offer grants awarded on a 31 competitive basis to landowners for the implementation of habitat 32 conservation plans and up to $500,000 of this amount to support 33 pollinator diversity, including the development of bee husbandry 34 best management practices such as pest and pathogen controls; creat- 35 ing diversity of pollinator habitats; research to understand, 36 prevent and recover from pollinator losses; and outreach and educa- 37 tion (09BD16ER) (24827) ... 1,000,000 ................. (re. $6,000) 38 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Hudson River Estuary 39 Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environ- 40 mental conservation law, $800,000 of which shall be for the Mohawk 41 river action plan (09HE16ER) (24836) ... 5,000,000 ... (re. $14,000) 42 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 43 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 44 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 45 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 46 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 47 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 48 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 49 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto 50 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 51 the environmental conservation law; including up to $3,000,000 to 52 Suffolk county to provide a 50 percent match for a program developed 253 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 in consultation with the department for research, development and 2 pilot projects to develop cost effective methods to address nitrogen 3 and pathogen loading from septic system or cesspool effluent or 4 other sources or to support such efforts without a match at the 5 state university of Stony Brook directly or through its research 6 foundation and $1,500,000 for Suffolk county for sewer improvement 7 projects; and including $5,000,000 for Nassau county for the Bay 8 park wastewater treatment plant outfall pipe, associated conveyance 9 systems, nitrogen abatement treatment works, ocean outfall and/or 10 connections; including $1,000,000 to the Hudson River Park Trust for 11 the purposes of an estuarium, and including $750,000 for the city of 12 Corning Denison Park stormwater outfall pipe (09WQ16ER) (24837) .... 13 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,324,000) 14 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 15 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 16 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law; 17 including $200,000 to Suffolk county for the Peconic Bay Estuary 18 Program (09GL16ER) (24830) ... 15,000,000 ......... (re. $1,439,000) 19 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 20 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 21 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 22 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007 including not less than $450,000 for 23 Lake George, provided that not less than $5,550,000 be made avail- 24 able for invasive species eradication, including but not limited to 25 southern pine beetle, emerald ash borer, and hydrilla and including 26 grants related to the control and management of invasive species. 27 Such funding for grants shall be provided on a competitive basis in 28 consultation with the New York Invasive Species Council (09IS16ER) 29 (24704) ... 12,000,000 .............................. (re. $243,000) 30 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Agricultural Waste 31 Management projects (09AW16ER) (24826) ............................. 32 1,500,000 ............................................. (re. $7,000) 33 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for a public waterway recon- 34 struction program to be established and administered by the depart- 35 ment of state, at the request of any county, city, town, village or 36 other governmental entity, for projects to dredge, clear, and repair 37 public waterways, according to best practices, that allow for proac- 38 tively managing public waterways. Funds appropriated herein shall 39 provide fifty percent reimbursement to such localities for author- 40 ized expenditures (09DR16ER) (25704) ............................... 41 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 42 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, and within amounts appropri- 43 ated, for a free water testing pilot program to be established and 44 administered by the department of health, or pursuant to contracts 45 with laboratories, within one hundred and twenty days whereby, at 46 the request of any individual, public water system, or school 47 district, the department shall cause to be provided to such individ- 48 ual, public water system, or school district a container or contain- 49 ers for the collection of a sample of drinking water and the means 50 to forward such sample to a laboratory to be tested for contam- 51 inants. The results of such test shall be forwarded to the individ- 52 ual, public water system, or school district by the laboratory as 254 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 soon as practicable (09WT16ER) (25710) ............................. 2 1,500,000 ........................................... (re. $731,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 4 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 5 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 6 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 7 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 8 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 9 following: 10 Costs related to the acquisition of the following properties: Atlan- 11 tic Coast, Long Island Sound Coastal Area, Long Island South Shore 12 Estuary Reserve, Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, 13 Central Pine Barrens, Hudson River projects, Western Suffolk/Nassau 14 Special Groundwater Protection Areas, Mott Haven-Port Morris Water- 15 front, Bronx River Greenway, Inner City/Underserved Community Parks, 16 Long Pond/Butler Woods, Staten Island Greenbelt, Staten Island Blue- 17 belt, Staten Island Wet Woods, Great Swamp, Neversink Highlands, 18 Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands Complex, New York Highlands, Northern 19 Putnam Greenway, Shawangunk Mountains, Catskill Mountain/Delaware 20 River Region, Beaverkill/Willowemoc, Hudson River Estuary/Greenway 21 Trail/Quadricentennial Legacy Trail Corridor, Catskill Unfragmented 22 Forest, Catskill River and Road Corridors, Long Path, New York City 23 Watershed Lands, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, Five 24 Rivers Environmental Education Center, Batten Kill Watershed-Sarato- 25 ga National Historic Park View shed, Washington County Agricultural 26 Lands-Saratoga National Historic Park View shed, Lake George 27 watershed, Lake Champlain watershed, Boeselager forestry, Rensselaer 28 plateau, Oomsdale Farm and Surrounding Landscape, Hudson River 29 Gorge, Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, Lake Champlain Shoreline 30 and Wetlands, Saratoga County, State Forest and Wildlife Management 31 Area Protection, Follensby Park, Undeveloped Lake George Shore, 32 Whitney Park, Finch Woodlands, Washington County, Washington County 33 Grasslands, Recreational Trail Linkages and Networks, Rome Sand 34 Plains, Black Creek Watershed, Portaferry Lake, Tug Hill Core 35 Forests and Headwater Streams, Tioga County Park Opportunities, 36 Nelson Swamp, Clark Reservation State Park, State Parks 37 Greenbelt/Tompkins County, Cattaraugus Creek and tributaries, North- 38 ern Montezuma Wetlands, Seneca Army Depot Conservation Area, Lake 39 Erie Tributary Gorges, Two Rivers State Park, Buffalo River 40 Watershed, Braddock Bay, Catharine Valley Complex, Genesee 41 Greenway/Recreationway, Hi Tor/Bristol Hills, Allegany State Park, 42 Great Lakes Shorelines and Niagara River, Long Island Trail and 43 Greenway System, Bronx Harlem Greenway, Harbor Herons Wildlife 44 Complex, Schunnemunk Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain, Held- 45 erberg Escarpment, and Western Finger Lakes: Conesus, Hemlock, 46 Canadice & Honeoye, Long Distance Trail Corridors, Statewide Small 47 Projects, Working Forest Lands, State Park and State Historic Site 48 Protection, (a) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $1,000,000 49 from the land acquisition allocation for urban forestry projects 50 provided that no less than $500,000 shall be made available for such 51 programs in cities and towns with populations of 65,000 or more; (b) 255 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $2,000,000 from the land 2 acquisition allocation to the land trust alliance for the purpose of 3 awarding grants on a competitive basis to local land trusts, 4 provided that up to ten percent of such amount may be made available 5 for administrative costs and/or technical assistance; (c) $250,000 6 for a resiliency planting program; and, notwithstanding any law to 7 the contrary, not less than $1,000,000 for land acquisition in 8 department of environmental conservation regions 1, 2 and 3 9 (09LA15ER) (24703) ... 26,550,000 ................. (re. $3,537,000) 10 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 11 (09AN15ER) (24832) ... 14,200,000 ................. (re. $2,388,000) 12 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 13 (09NP15ER) (24833) ... 4,800,000 .................... (re. $155,000) 14 Agriculture and farmland protection activities, notwithstanding any 15 law to the contrary, $1,000,000 shall be made available to the tug 16 hill tomorrow land trust for army compatible use buffer program 17 projects around Fort Drum (09FP15ER) (24825) ....................... 18 15,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,087,000) 19 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Hudson River Estuary 20 Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environ- 21 mental conservation law, $800,000 of which shall be for the Mohawk 22 river action plan and $200,000 of which shall be for the Peconic Bay 23 Estuary Program (09HE15ER) (24836) ... 4,700,000 ..... (re. $99,000) 24 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state assistance 25 payments, pursuant to a smart growth program, provided on a compet- 26 itive basis, to counties, cities, towns, or villages to establish, 27 update or implement comprehensive plans in a manner consistent with 28 smart growth; provided, however, that up to 25 percent of such 29 payments may be awarded to not-for-profit organizations for such 30 purposes (09SG15ER) (24824) ... 600,000 ............. (re. $300,000) 31 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 32 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 33 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 34 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 35 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 36 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 37 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 38 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 39 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 40 the environmental conservation law; including up to $3,000,000 to 41 Suffolk county to provide a 50 percent match for a program developed 42 in consultation with the department for research, development and 43 pilot projects to develop cost effective methods to address nitrogen 44 and pathogen loading from septic system or cesspool effluent or 45 other sources or to support such efforts without a match at the 46 state university of Stony Brook directly or through its research 47 foundation (09WQ15ER) (24837) ... 8,000,000 ......... (re. $121,000) 48 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 49 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 50 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 51 (09GL15ER) (24830) ... 6,050,000 .................... (re. $395,000) 256 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 2 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 3 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 4 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007 including not less than $450,000 for 5 Lake George, provided that not less than $1,000,000 be made avail- 6 able for invasive species eradication, and including grants related 7 to the control and management of invasive species. Such funding for 8 grants shall be provided on a competitive basis in consultation with 9 the New York Invasive Species Council (09IS15ER) (24704) ........... 10 5,850,000 ............................................ (re. $62,000) 11 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for Agricultural Waste 12 Management projects (09AW15ER) (24826) ............................. 13 1,500,000 ............................................ (re. $23,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 15 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 16 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 17 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 18 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 19 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 20 following: 21 Costs related to the acquisition of the following properties: Atlan- 22 tic Coast, Long Island Sound Coastal Area, Long Island South Shore 23 Estuary Reserve, Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, 24 Central Pine Barrens, Hudson River projects, Western Suffolk/Nassau 25 Special Groundwater Protection Areas, Inner City/Underserved Commu- 26 nity Parks, Long Pond/Butler Woods, Staten Island Greenbelt, Staten 27 Island Bluebelt, Staten Island Wet Woods, Great Swamp, Neversink 28 Highlands, Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands Complex, New York High- 29 lands, Northern Putnam Greenway, Shawangunk Mountains, Catskill 30 Mountain/Delaware River Region, Beaverkill/Willowemoc, Hudson River 31 Estuary/Greenway Trail/Quadricentennial Legacy Trail Corridor, Cats- 32 kill Unfragmented Forest, Catskill River and Road Corridors, Long 33 Path, New York City Watershed Lands, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, 34 Albany Pine Bush, Five Rivers Environmental Education Center, Batten 35 Kill Watershed-Saratoga National Historic Park View shed, Washington 36 County Agricultural Lands-Saratoga National Historic Park View shed, 37 Lake George watershed, Lake Champlain watershed, Boeselager fores- 38 try, Rensselaer plateau, Oomsdale Farm and Surrounding Landscape, 39 Hudson River Gorge, Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, Lake Cham- 40 plain Shoreline and Wetlands, Saratoga County, State Forest and 41 Wildlife Management Area Protection, Follensby Park, Undeveloped 42 Lake George Shore, Whitney Park, Finch Woodlands, Washington County, 43 Washington County Grasslands, Recreational Trail Linkages and 44 Networks, Rome Sand Plains, Black Creek Watershed, Portaferry Lake, 45 Tug Hill Core Forests and Headwater Streams, Tioga County Park 46 Opportunities, Nelson Swamp, Clark Reservation State Park, State 47 Parks Greenbelt/Tompkins County, Cattaraugus Creek and tributaries, 48 Northern Montezuma Wetlands, Lake Erie Tributary Gorges, Two Rivers 49 State Park, Buffalo River Watershed, Braddock Bay, Catharine Valley 50 Complex, Genesee Greenway/Recreationway, Hi Tor/Bristol Hills, Alle- 51 gany State Park, Great Lakes Shorelines and Niagara River, Long 257 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Island Trail and Greenway System, Bronx Harlem Greenway, Harbor 2 Herons Wildlife Complex, Schunnemunk Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock 3 Mountain, Helderberg Escarpment, and Western Finger Lakes: Conesus, 4 Hemlock, Canadice & Honeoye, Long Distance Trail Corridors, State- 5 wide Small Projects, Working Forest Lands, State Park and State 6 Historic Site Protection, (a) notwithstanding any law to the contra- 7 ry, $1,000,000 from the land acquisition allocation for urban fores- 8 try projects provided that no less than $250,000 shall be made 9 available for such programs in cities and towns with populations of 10 65,000 or more; (b) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 11 $2,000,000 from the land acquisition allocation to the land trust 12 alliance for the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis 13 to local land trusts, provided that up to ten percent of such amount 14 may be made available for administrative costs and/or technical 15 assistance; (c) $250,000 for a resiliency planting program; (d) 16 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $1,500,000 for land acqui- 17 sition in Department of Environmental Conservation Regions 1, 2 and 18 3 (09LA14ER) (24703) ... 21,650,000 ................. (re. $505,000) 19 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 20 (09AN14ER) (24832) ... 14,200,000 .................... (re. $60,000) 21 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 22 (09NP14ER) (24833) ... 4,500,000 .................... (re. $176,000) 23 Agriculture and farmland protection activities, notwithstanding any 24 law to the contrary, not less than $1,000,000 shall be made avail- 25 able to the tug hill tomorrow land trust for army compatible use 26 buffer program projects around Fort Drum (09FP14ER) (24825) ........ 27 14,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,383,000) 28 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 29 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 30 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 31 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 32 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 33 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 34 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 35 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 36 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 37 the environmental conservation law; including up to $3,000,000 to be 38 allocated to Suffolk county to provide a 50 percent match for a 39 program developed in consultation with the department for research, 40 development and pilot projects to develop cost effective methods to 41 address nitrogen and pathogen loading from septic system or cesspool 42 effluent or other sources and the county may transfer a portion of 43 such funds to the town of Southampton or the state university of 44 Stonybrook (09WQ14ER) (24837) ... 7,800,000 ......... (re. $309,000) 45 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 46 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 47 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 48 (09GL14ER) (24830) ... 5,050,000 .................... (re. $230,000) 49 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 50 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 51 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 52 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007 including not less than $550,000 for 258 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Lake George, provided that not less than $1,000,000 be made avail- 2 able for invasive species eradication, and including grants related 3 to the control and management of invasive species. Such funding for 4 grants shall be provided on a competitive basis in consultation with 5 the New York Invasive Species Council (09IS14ER) (24704) ........... 6 4,700,000 ............................................ (re. $60,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 8 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 9 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 10 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 11 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 12 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 13 following: 14 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 15 (09AN13ER) (24832) ... 14,200,000 ................. (re. $2,138,000) 16 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 17 (09NP13ER) (24833) ... 4,500,000 .................. (re. $1,297,000) 18 Agriculture and farmland protection activities (09FP13ER) (24825) .... 19 13,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,254,000) 20 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 21 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 22 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 23 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 24 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 25 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 26 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 27 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 28 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 29 the environmental conservation law; including $4,000,000 to be 30 distributed to municipalities pursuant to a competitive grants proc- 31 ess for natural infrastructure projects designed to mitigate the 32 impacts of floods, storm surge, and other effects of climate change 33 (09WQ13ER) (24837) ... 6,945,000 .................... (re. $454,000) 34 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 35 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 36 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 37 (09GL13ER) (24830) ... 4,750,000 .................... (re. $172,000) 38 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 39 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 40 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 41 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007 including not less than $100,000 for 42 Lake George, provided that not less than $1,000,000 be made avail- 43 able for invasive species eradication, and including grants related 44 to the control and management of invasive species. Such funding for 45 grants shall be provided on a competitive basis in consultation with 46 the New York Invasive Species Council (09IS13ER) (24704) ........... 47 4,600,000 ............................................ (re. $69,000) 48 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 49 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 50 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 259 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 2 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 3 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 4 following: 5 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 6 (09AN12ER) (24832) ... 13,000,000 ................... (re. $297,000) 7 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 8 (09NP12ER) (24833) ... 4,000,000 .................. (re. $1,064,000) 9 Agriculture and farmland protection activities (09FP12ER) (24825) .... 10 12,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,289,000) 11 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 12 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 13 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 14 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 15 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 16 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 17 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 18 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 19 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 20 the environmental conservation law and not less than $300,000 for a 21 total maximum daily load study for the Western Bays in the South 22 Shore Estuary Reserve (09WQ12ER) (24837) ........................... 23 2,932,000 ........................................... (re. $944,000) 24 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 25 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 26 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 27 (09GL12ER) (24830) ... 4,728,000 ...................... (re. $5,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 29 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 30 (09AN11ER) (24832) ... 13,000,000 .................... (re. $34,000) 31 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 32 (09NP11ER) (24833) ... 4,000,000 ..................... (re. $62,000) 33 Agriculture and farmland protection activities (09FP11ER) (24825) .... 34 12,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,617,000) 35 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state assistance 36 payments, pursuant to a smart growth program, provided on a compet- 37 itive basis, to counties, cities, towns, or villages to establish, 38 update or implement comprehensive plans in a manner consistent with 39 smart growth; provided, however, that up to 25 percent of such 40 payments may be awarded to not-for-profit organizations for such 41 purposes (09SG11ER) (24824) ... 300,000 ............. (re. $300,000) 42 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 43 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 44 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 45 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 46 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 47 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 48 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 49 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 50 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 260 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the environmental conservation law (09WQ11ER) (24837) .............. 2 2,932,000 ........................................... (re. $853,000) 3 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 4 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 5 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 6 (09GL11ER) (24830) ... 5,000,000 ..................... (re. $55,000) 7 The appropriation made by chapter 99, section 1, of the laws of 2010, is 8 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 9 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 10 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 11 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 12 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 13 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 14 following: 15 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 16 (09NP10ER) (24833) ... 3,703,000 .................... (re. $147,000) 17 Agriculture and farmland protection activities (09FP10ER) (24825) .... 18 10,750,000 ........................................ (re. $1,549,000) 19 Biodiversity stewardship and research, and notwithstanding any law to 20 the contrary, [$75,000 for Cayuga Island] $75,000 to the Climate 21 Jobs Institute at Cornell University's Industrial and Labor 22 Relations School (09BD10ER) (24827) ................................ 23 500,000 ............................................. (re. $194,000) 24 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state assistance 25 payments, pursuant to a smart growth program, provided on a compet- 26 itive basis, to counties, cities, towns, or villages to establish, 27 update or implement comprehensive plans in a manner consistent with 28 smart growth; provided, however, that up to 25 percent of such 29 payments may be awarded to not-for-profit organizations for such 30 purposes (09SG10ER) (24824) ... 300,000 ............. (re. $300,000) 31 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 32 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 33 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 34 (09GL10ER) (24830) ... 5,000,000 ..................... (re. $17,000) 35 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, is 36 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 37 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 38 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 39 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 40 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 41 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 42 following: 43 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 44 (09NP09ER) (24833) ... 5,600,000 .................... (re. $315,000) 45 Biodiversity stewardship and research, and notwithstanding any law to 46 the contrary, [$100,000 for Cayuga Island] $100,000 to the New York 47 City Department of Parks and Recreation for Prospect Park (09BD09ER) 48 (24827) ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $100,000) 261 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 2 502, section 5, of the laws of 2009: 3 Agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 4 (09AN09ER) (24832) ... 11,468,000 .................... (re. $19,000) 5 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state assistance 6 payments, pursuant to a smart growth program, provided on a compet- 7 itive basis, to counties, cities, towns, or villages to establish, 8 update or implement comprehensive plans in a manner consistent with 9 smart growth; provided, however, that up to 25 percent of such 10 payments may be awarded to not-for-profit organizations for such 11 purposes (09SG09ER) (24824) ... 400,000 .............. (re. $59,000) 12 Agriculture and farmland protection activities (09FP09ER) (24825) .... 13 22,054,000 .......................................... (re. $894,000) 14 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 15 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 16 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 17 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 18 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 19 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 20 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 21 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 22 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 23 the environmental conservation law (09WQ09ER) (24837) .............. 24 8,900,000 ........................................... (re. $221,000) 25 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 26 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 27 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 28 (09GL09ER) (24830) ... 5,953,000 ..................... (re. $15,000) 29 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 30 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 31 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 32 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007 including not less than $96,000 for 33 Lake George, provided that not less than $1,000,000 be made avail- 34 able for invasive species eradication, and including grants related 35 to the control and management of invasive species. Such funding for 36 grants shall be provided on a competitive basis in consultation with 37 the New York Invasive Species Council (09IS09ER) (24704) ........... 38 4,794,000 ............................................ (re. $26,000) 39 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 1, 40 section 4, of the laws of 2009: 41 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 42 (09NP08ER) (24833) ... 4,750,000 .................... (re. $274,000) 43 Agriculture and farmland protection activities (09FP08ER) (24825) .... 44 23,000,000 .......................................... (re. $225,000) 45 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the Hudson River Estuary 46 Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environ- 47 mental conservation law provided however that no more than 48 $1,000,000 shall be used for Hudson-Fulton Champlain Quadricentenni- 49 al celebrations, projects and programs (09HE08ER) (24836) .......... 50 5,000,000 ............................................ (re. $11,000) 262 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state assistance 2 payments, pursuant to a smart growth program, provided on a compet- 3 itive basis, to counties, cities, towns, or villages to establish, 4 update or implement comprehensive plans in a manner consistent with 5 smart growth; provided, however, that up to 25 percent of such 6 payments may be awarded to not-for-profit organizations for such 7 purposes (09SG08ER) (24824) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $4,000) 8 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 9 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 10 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 11 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 12 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 13 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 14 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 15 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 16 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 17 the environmental conservation law (09WQ08ER) (24837) .............. 18 9,000,000 ............................................ (re. $17,000) 19 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the implementation of the 20 recommendations of the invasive species task force prepared pursuant 21 to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 and for the purposes set forth in 22 chapter 674 of the laws of 2007 provided that not less than 23 $1,000,000 be made available for invasive species eradication, and 24 including grants related to the control and management of invasive 25 species. Such funding for grants shall be provided on a competitive 26 basis in consultation with the New York Invasive Species Council 27 (09IS08ER) (24704) ... 4,000,000 ..................... (re. $49,000) 28 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 29 Agriculture and farmland protection activities (09FP07ER) (24825) .... 30 28,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,151,000) 31 Non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 32 (09NP07ER) (24833) ... 6,417,000 ..................... (re. $66,000) 33 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary for New York ocean and Great 34 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 35 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law 36 (09GL07ER) (24830) ... 4,000,000 .................... (re. $437,000) 37 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 55, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2008: 39 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the state share of costs 40 of wastewater treatment improvement projects undertaken by munici- 41 palities to upgrade municipal systems to meet stormwater, combined 42 sewer overflow, sanitary sewer overflow and wastewater treatment 43 discharge requirements with priority given to systems that are in 44 violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental conservation 45 law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken by munici- 46 palities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habitat resto- 47 ration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 56-0101 of 48 the environmental conservation law (09WQ07ER) (24837) .............. 49 10,000,000 ........................................... (re. $39,000) 263 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 55, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 3 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 4 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 5 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 6 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 7 location to other state departments and agencies, including costs 8 related to the acquisition of the following properties: Long Island 9 Sound Coastal Area, Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve, Peconic 10 Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, Pine Barrens Core Compatible 11 Growth Area and Critical Resource Area, Western Suffolk/Nassau 12 Special Groundwater Protection Area, Inner City/Underserved Communi- 13 ty Parks, Long Pond/Butler Wood, Staten Island Greenbelt, Staten 14 Island Wet Woods, Fahnestock State Park, Great Swamp, Neversink 15 Highlands, Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands Complex, Highlands Greenway 16 Corridor, Mongaup Valley Wildlife Management Area, Northern Putnam 17 Greenway, Schunnemunk Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain, Ster- 18 ling Forest, Shawangunk Mountains, Westchester Marine Corridor, 19 Rockland County Highlands, Catskill Mountain/Delaware River Region, 20 Beaverkill/Willowemoc, Hudson River Corridor Estuary/Greenway Trail, 21 Catskill Unfragmented Forest, Long Path, New York City Watershed 22 Lands-Croton, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, Five 23 Rivers Environmental Education Center, Helderberg Escarpment, Pine 24 Bush-Hudson River Link/Tivoli Preserve, Westmere Woods, Interna- 25 tional Paper Fee Lands, Lake George watershed, Lake Champlain 26 watershed, Boeselager forestry, Domtar/Lyme Fee Lands, Catskill 27 River and Road corridor, Rensselaer plateau, Franklinton Vlaie Wild- 28 life Management area, Black Creek Marsh/Vly Swamp, Mohawk River 29 Valley Corridor/Erie Canal, Oomsdale farm and surrounding landscape, 30 Susquehanna River Valley Corridor, Pilot Knob, Floodwood Camp, Lake 31 Champlain Shoreline and Wetlands, Wilton Wildlife Preserve and Park, 32 Follensby Park, National Lead/Tahawus, Undeveloped Lake George 33 Shore, Whitney Park, Northern Flow River Corridors, Recreational 34 Trail Linkages and Networks, Bog River/Beaver River Headwater 35 Complex, Maumee Swamp, Moose River Corridor, Rome Sand Plains, Saint 36 Lawrence River Islands, Shorelines and Wetlands, Eastern Lake Ontar- 37 io Shoreline and Islands, Tug Hill Core Forests and Headwater 38 Streams, Tioga County Park Opportunities, Nelson Swamp, Genny-Green 39 Trail/Link Trail, Clark Reservation State Park, Salmon River Corri- 40 dor, Cattaraugus Creek and tributaries, Carpenter Falls/Bear Swamp 41 Creek Corridor, Junius Ponds State Forest and Wildlife Management 42 Area Protection, Tonawanda Creek Watershed, Two Rivers State Park, 43 Finger Lakes Shoreline, Buffalo/Niagara River Corridors, Northern 44 Montezuma Wetlands, HiTor/Bristol Hills, Braddock Bay, Catharine 45 Valley Complex, Sonnenberg Gardens, Western Finger Lakes: Conesus, 46 Hemlock, Canadice and Honeoye, Genesee Greenway/Recreationway, Alle- 47 gany State Park, Alder Bottom Pond/French Creek, Great Lakes and 48 Niagara River Access Shore Lands and Vistas, Chautauqua Lake Access, 49 Shore Lands and Vistas, Randolph Swamp, Eighteen Mile Creek/Hampton 50 Brook Woods, Statewide Small Projects, Working Forest Lands, and 51 State Park and State Historic Site Protection, including: (a) 52 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $5,000,000 for the Hudson 264 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 River Estuary Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 2 of the environmental conservation law; (b) notwithstanding any law 3 to the contrary, $2,000,000 for the Finger Lakes-Lake Ontario 4 Watershed Protection Alliance; (c) notwithstanding any law to the 5 contrary, $3,000,000 for Soil and Water Conservation District activ- 6 ities as authorized for reimbursement in section 11-a of the soil 7 and water conservation districts law; (d) notwithstanding any law to 8 the contrary, $500,000 from the land acquisition allocation for 9 urban forestry projects provided that no less than $250,000 shall be 10 made available for such programs in cities with populations of 11 65,000 or more; (e) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 12 $500,000 from the land acquisition allocation to the land trust 13 alliance for the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis 14 to local land trusts, provided that up to ten percent of such amount 15 shall be made available for administrative costs; (f) notwithstand- 16 ing any law to the contrary, $3,000,000 for reimbursement of eligi- 17 ble costs related to the New York state quality communities program; 18 (g) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $7,000,000 for the 19 state share costs of wastewater treatment improvement projects 20 undertaken by municipalities to upgrade municipal systems to meet 21 stormwater discharge requirements with priority given to systems 22 that are in violation of title 8 of article 17 of the environmental 23 conservation law and aquatic habitat restoration projects undertaken 24 by municipalities and not-for-profit corporations for aquatic habi- 25 tat restoration projects as defined in subdivision 1 of section 26 56-0101 of the environmental conservation law; (h) notwithstanding 27 any law to the contrary $3,000,000 for New York ocean and Great 28 Lakes ecosystem conservation projects, consistent with the policy 29 articulated in article 14 of the environmental conservation law; (i) 30 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $3,250,000 for the imple- 31 mentation of the recommendations of the invasive species task force 32 prepared pursuant to chapter 324 of the laws of 2003 including not 33 less than $250,000 for Lake George, provided that not less than 34 $1,000,000 be made available for invasive species eradication. 35 Funding shall be limited to the preparation of a comprehensive inva- 36 sive species management plan, and grants for projects related to the 37 control and management of invasive species, education and outreach 38 efforts, and for projects aimed at the early detection and 39 prevention of invasive species. Such funding for grants shall be 40 provided on a competitive basis in consultation with the New York 41 State Invasive Species Task Force; and (j) notwithstanding any law 42 to the contrary, $16,505,000 for non-point source abatement and 43 control projects provided that no less than $11,003,000 shall be 44 made available for agricultural nonpoint source abatement and 45 control projects and no less than $5,502,000 shall be made available 46 for non-agricultural non-point source abatement and control projects 47 (09E606ER) (24753) ... 121,259,500 .................. (re. $661,000) 48 Project Schedule 49 PROJECT AMOUNT 50 -------------------------------------------- 265 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 (thousands of dollars) 2 Land acquisition .................... 50,000 3 Hudson River Estuary Manage- 4 ment Plan .......................... 5,000 5 Biodiversity stewardship and 6 research ........................... 1,500 7 County agriculture and farm- 8 land protection activities ........ 23,000 9 Agricultural non-point source 10 abatement and control 11 projects .......................... 11,003 12 Non-agricultural non-point 13 source abatement and 14 control projects ................... 5,502 15 Soil and water conservation 16 districts .......................... 3,000 17 Finger Lakes-Lake Ontario 18 Watershed Protection Alli- 19 ance ............................... 2,000 20 Albany Pine Bush Preserve 21 Commission ......................... 1,500 22 Long Island Central Pine 23 Barrens Planning ................... 1,100 24 Long Island South Shore Estu- 25 ary Reserve .......................... 900 26 Quality Communities Projects ......... 3,000 27 Invasive Species Projects ............ 3,250 28 Water Quality Improvement 29 Projects ........................... 7,000 30 New York ocean and Great Lakes 31 Ecosystem conservation ............. 3,000 32 -------------- 33 Total ............................ 120,755 34 ============== 35 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 55, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 37 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 38 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 39 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 40 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 41 location to other state departments and agencies, including costs 42 related to the acquisition of the following properties: Long Island 43 Sound Coastal Area, Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve, Peconic 44 Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, Pine Barrens Core Compatible 45 Growth Area and Critical Resource Area, Western Suffolk/Nassau 46 Special Groundwater Protection Area, Inner City/Underserved Communi- 47 ty Parks, Long Pond/Butler Wood, Staten Island Greenbelt, Staten 48 Island Wet Woods, Fahnestock State Park, Great Swamp, Neversink 49 Highlands, Plutarch/Black Creek Wetlands Complex, Highlands Greenway 50 Corridor, Mongaup Valley Wildlife Management Area, Northern Putnam 51 Greenway, Schunnemunk Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain, Ster- 266 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ling Forest, Shawangunk Mountains, Westchester Marine Corridor, 2 Rockland County Highlands, Catskill Mountain/Delaware River Region, 3 Beaverkill/Willowemoc, Hudson River Corridor Estuary/Greenway Train, 4 Catskill Unfragmented Forest, Long Path, New York City Watershed 5 Lands-Croton, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, Five 6 Rivers Environmental Education Center, Helderberg Escarpment, Pine 7 Bush-Hudson River Link/Tivoli Preserve, Westmere Woods, Black Creek 8 Marsh/Vly Swamp, Mohawk River Valley Corridor/Erie Canal, Susquehan- 9 na River Valley Corridor, Pilot Knob, Floodwood Camp, Lake Champlain 10 Shoreline and Wetlands, Wilton Wildlife Preserve and Park, National 11 Lead/Tahawus, Undeveloped Lake George Shore, Whitney Park, Northern 12 Flow River Corridors, Recreational Trail Linkages and Networks, Bog 13 River/Beaver River Headwater Complex, Maumee Swamp, Moose River 14 Corridor, Rome Sand Plains, Saint Lawrence River Islands, Shorelines 15 and Wetlands, Eastern Lake Ontario Shoreline and Islands, Tug Hill 16 Core Forests and Headwater Streams, Tioga County Park Opportunities, 17 Nelson Swamp, Genny-Green Trail/Link Trail, Clark Reservation State 18 Park, Salmon River Corridor, Northern Montezuma Wetlands, 19 HiTor/Bristol Hills, Braddock Bay, Catharine Valley Complex, Sonnen- 20 berg Gardens, Western Finger Lakes: Conesus, Hemlock, Canadice and 21 Honeoye, Genesee Greenway/Recreationway, Allegany State Park, Alder 22 Bottom Pond/French Creek, Great Lakes and Niagara River Access Shore 23 Lands and Vistas, Chautauqua Lake Access, Shore Lands and Vistas, 24 Randolph Swamp, Eighteen Mile Creek/Hampton Brook Woods, Statewide 25 Small Projects, Working Forest Lands, and State Park and State 26 Historic Site Protection, including: (a) notwithstanding any law to 27 the contrary, $5,000,000 for the Hudson River Estuary Management 28 Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environmental 29 conservation law; (b) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 30 $1,500,000 for the Finger Lakes-Lake Ontario Watershed Protection 31 Alliance; (c) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $1,860,000 32 for Soil and Water Conservation District activities as authorized 33 for reimbursement in section 11-a of the soil and water conservation 34 districts law; (d) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $500,000 35 from the land acquisition allocation for urban forestry projects 36 provided that no less than $250,000 shall be made available for such 37 programs in cities with populations of 65,000 or more; (e) notwith- 38 standing any law to the contrary, $500,000 from the land acquisition 39 allocation to the land trust alliance for the purpose of awarding 40 grants on a competitive basis to local land trusts, provided that up 41 to ten percent of such amount shall be made available for adminis- 42 trative costs; and (f) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 43 $3,000,000 for reimbursement of eligible costs related to the New 44 York state quality communities program pursuant to chapter 62 of the 45 laws of 2005 (09E605ER) (24753) ... 84,435,000 ...... (re. $147,000) 46 PROJECT SCHEDULE 47 PROJECT AMOUNT 48 -------------------------------------------- 49 (thousands of dollars) 267 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Land acquisition .................... 40,000 2 Hudson River Estuary Manage- 3 ment Plan .......................... 5,000 4 Biodiversity stewardship and 5 research ........................... 1,000 6 County agriculture and farm- 7 land protection activities ........ 16,000 8 Non-point source abatement and 9 control projects .................. 11,700 10 Soil and water conservation 11 districts .......................... 1,860 12 Finger Lakes-Lake Ontario 13 Watershed Protection Alli- 14 ance ............................... 1,500 15 Albany Pine Bush Preserve 16 Commission ........................... 800 17 Long Island Central Pine 18 Barrens Planning ..................... 950 19 Long Island South Shore Estu- 20 ary Reserve .......................... 600 21 Quality Communities Projects ......... 3,000 22 -------------- 23 Total ............................. 82,410 24 ============== 25 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as added by chapter 684, 26 section 2, of the laws of 2003: 27 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 28 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 29 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 30 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 31 location to other state departments and agencies including costs 32 related to the acquisition of the following properties: Long Island 33 Sound Coastal Area; Long Island South Shore Estuary Reserve; Peconic 34 Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects; Pine Barrens Core, Compatible 35 Growth Area and Critical Resource Area; Western Suffolk/Nassau 36 Special Groundwater Protection Area; Inner City/Underserved Communi- 37 ty Parks; Staten Island Greenbelt; Staten Island Wet Woods; Fahnes- 38 tock State Park; Great Swamp; Neversink Highlands; Plutarch/Black 39 Creek Wetland Complex; Highlands Greenway Corridor; Mongaup Valley 40 Wildlife Management Area; Catskill Mountain/Delaware River Region; 41 Schunnemunk Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain; Sterling 42 Forest; Sawangunk Mountains; Westchester Marine Corridor; 43 Beaverkill/Willowemoc; Hudson River Corridor Estuary/Greenway Trail; 44 Catskill Unfragmented Forest; Long Path; New York City Watershed 45 Lands-Croton; Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley; Albany Pine Bush; Five 46 Rivers Environmental Education Center; Pine Bush-Hudson River/Tivoli 47 Preserve; Westmere Woods; Pilot Knob; Floodwood Camp; McLenitahn 48 Property; Lake Champlain Shoreline and Wetlands; Wilton Wildlife 49 Preserve and Park; National Lead/Hahawus; Undeveloped Lake George 50 Shore; Whitney Park; Roden Property; Northern Flow River Corridors; 51 Recreational Trail Linkages and Networks; Bog River/Beaver River 268 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Headwater Complex; Eastern Lake Ontario Shoreline and Islands; 2 Maumee Swamp; Moose River Corridor; Tug Hill Core Forests and Head- 3 water Streams; Rome Sand Plains; Nelson Swamp; Genesee 4 Greenway/Recreationway; Genny-Green Trail/Link Trail; Northern 5 Montezuma Wetlands; HiTor/Bristol Hills; Western Finger Lakes: 6 Conesus, Hemlock, Canadice, and Honeoye; Allegany State Park; Alder 7 Bottom Pond/French Creek; Great Lakes and Niagara River Access, 8 Shore Lands and Vistas; Salmon River Corridor; Braddock Bay; Catha- 9 rine Valley Complex; Clark Reservation State Park; Chautauqua Lake 10 Access, Shore Lands and Vistas; Randolph Swamp; Eighteen Mile 11 Creek/Hampton Brook Woods; Statewide Small Projects; Working Forest 12 Lands; State Park and State Historic Site Protection; and Northern 13 Putnam Greenway (09E603ER) (24753) ... 62,410,000 .... (re. $24,000) 14 Project Schedule 15 PROJECT AMOUNT 16 -------------------------------------------- 17 (thousands of dollars) 18 Land acquisition .................... 30,000 19 Hudson River Estuary Manage- 20 ment Plan .......................... 5,000 21 Biodiversity stewardship and 22 research ............................. 700 23 County agriculture and farm- 24 land protection activities ........ 12,000 25 Non-point source abatement and 26 control projects .................. 10,100 27 Soil and water conservation 28 districts .......................... 1,860 29 Finger Lakes-Lake Ontario 30 Watershed Protection Alli- 31 ance ............................... 1,300 32 Albany Pine Bush Preserve 33 Commission ........................... 400 34 Long Island Central Pine 35 Barrens Planning ..................... 700 36 Long Island South Shore Estu- 37 ary Reserve .......................... 350 38 -------------- 39 Total ............................. 62,410 40 ============== 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 42 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 43 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 44 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 45 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 46 location to other state departments and agencies including costs 47 related to the acquisition of the following properties: Long Island 48 Sound Coastal Area including Held Property, Long Island South Shore 49 Estuary Reserve, Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, Pine 50 Barrens Core Compatible Growth Area and Critical Resource Area, 269 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Western Suffolk/Nassau Special Groundwater Protection Area Undhill, 2 Inner City/Underserved Community Parks - including Bushwick Inlet, 3 Mount Loretto, Staten Island Greenbelt, Staten Island Wet Woods, 4 Fahnestock State Park, Great Swamp, Lundy Estate, Neversink High- 5 lands, Highlands Greenway Corridor, Mongaup Valley Wildlife Manage- 6 ment Area, Schunnemunk Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain, 7 Sterling Forest, Shawangunk Mountains, Westchester Marine Corridor, 8 Beaverkill/Willowemoc, Hudson River Corridor Estuary/Greenway Trail, 9 Catskill Unfragmented Forest, Long Path, New York City Watershed 10 Lands-Croton, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, Olana 11 Viewshed, Five Rivers Environmental Education Center, Tivoli 12 Preserve, Cedarlands, Pilot Knob, Floodwood Camp, Lake Champlain 13 Shoreline and Wetlands, Wilton Wildlife Preserve and Park, National 14 Lead/Tahawus, Undeveloped Lake George Shore, Whitney Park, Northern 15 Flow River Corridors, Recreational Trail Linkages and Networks, Bog 16 River/Beaver River Headwater Complex, Eastern Lake Ontario Shoreline 17 and Islands, Minnehaha Tract, Maumee Swamp, Moose River Corridor, 18 Tug Hill Core Forests and Headwater Streams, Rome Sand Plains, 19 Nelson Swamp, Genesee Greenway/Recreationway, Genny-Green Trail/Link 20 Trail, Northern Montezuma Wetlands, Hemlock/Canadice/Honeoye Lakes, 21 Allegany State Park, Alder Bottom/French Creek, Great Lakes & 22 Niagara River Access, Shore Lands & Vistas, Salmon River Corridor, 23 Braddock Bay, Clark Reservation State park, Chautauqua Lake Access, 24 Shore Lands and Vistas, Randolf Swamp, Eighteen Mile Creek/Hampton 25 Brook Woods, Delaware River Tailwaters, Statewide Small Projects, 26 Working Forest Lands/Conservation Easements, Working Forest 27 Lands/Conservation Easements, Working Forest Lands/Conservation 28 Easements-Domtar Inc., Working Forest Lands/Conservation Easements- 29 Boeselager Forestry, and Working Forest Lands/Conservation Ease- 30 ments-Clerical Medical Forestry (09E402ER) (24753) ................. 31 62,630,000 ........................................... (re. $49,000) 32 Project Schedule 33 PROJECT AMOUNT 34 -------------------------------------------- 35 (thousands of dollars) 36 Land acquisition .................... 38,000 37 Hudson River Estuary Manage- 38 ment Plan .......................... 5,800 39 Biodiversity stewardship and 40 research ............................. 750 41 County agriculture and farm- 42 land protection activities ......... 8,000 43 Non-point source abatement and 44 control projects ................... 5,500 45 Soil and water conservation 46 districts .......................... 1,860 47 Finger Lakes-Lake Ontario 48 Watershed Protection Alli- 49 ance ............................... 1,300 50 Albany Pine Bush Preserve 270 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Commission ........................... 370 2 Long Island Central Pine 3 Barrens Planning ..................... 700 4 Long Island South Shore Estu- 5 ary Reserve .......................... 350 6 -------------- 7 Total ............................. 62,630 8 ============== 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 Environmental Protection Fund 11 Parks, Recreation and Historic Preservation Account - 30453 12 Environment and Recreation Purpose 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 14 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 15 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 16 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 17 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 18 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 19 ments and agencies, according to the following: 20 Local waterfront revitalization programs, notwithstanding any law to 21 the contrary, (a) not less than $10,500,000 for waterfront revitali- 22 zation projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 23 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 24 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 25 oration, decay, neglect, or disinvestment, or where a substantial 26 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 27 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 28 existing recreational opportunities in the area; (b) including up to 29 $2,000,000 for updates to existing local waterfront revitalization 30 program plans to mitigate future physical climate risks; and (c) 31 $300,000 for the Niagara River greenway commission (09WR25ER) 32 (24700) ............................................................ 33 14,275,000 ....................................... (re. $14,230,000) 34 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 35 any law to the contrary, (a) not less than, $13,000,000 for munici- 36 pal parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 37 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 38 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 39 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 40 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 41 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 42 existing recreational opportunities in the area; (b) including 43 $250,000 for Tivoli Park; (c) $500,000 suballocated to the Hudson 44 River Valley Greenway Authority for the Hudson River Valley Trail 45 Grants; (d) $250,000 to the State University of New York college of 46 environmental science and forestry; (e) $250,000 to Paul Smith's 47 College for the support of the Adirondack Park interpretive centers; 48 (f) $250,000 to the Catskill Center for conservation and development 49 for the support of the Catskill Visitors Center; and (g) $500,000 to 50 the Teatown Lake Reservation, Inc. for an ADA accessible campus 271 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 renovation (09MP25ER) (24701) ...................................... 2 26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $25,500,000) 3 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 4 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 5 include capital projects: (a) on state parks and state lands pursu- 6 ant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environmental conserva- 7 tion law; (b) on state parks or state owned lands and easements 8 under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental conserva- 9 tion or the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation 10 for access opportunities for people with disabilities; access to the 11 State Forest Preserve, State reforestation, Wildlife Management 12 areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 13 construction and maintenance: including but not limited to sustaina- 14 ble trail crews or other activities related to sustainable use of 15 the forest preserve and other state lands that are threatened by 16 overuse; Catskill and Adirondack camp ground improvements to public 17 access and sanitation facilities; environmental education; facility 18 improvements; archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource 19 surveys, forest health surveys, interpretation, and inventories, and 20 response to forest pests including southern pine beetle; Forest 21 Preserve and state forest unit management planning; invasive species 22 management; conservation easement public recreation planning; habi- 23 tat restoration and enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; 24 state tree nursery improvements; safety equipment; water access 25 facilities and safety improvements; public beach facility develop- 26 ment and improvement; public access improvements at day use areas; 27 state historic site exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping 28 facility development, restoration and reconstruction; (c) $2,500,000 29 from the public access and stewardship allocation to Parks & Trails 30 New York for the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis 31 to local parks and department of environmental conservation friends 32 groups, provided that up to ten percent of such amount may be made 33 available for administrative costs and/or technical assistance; (d) 34 public protection and emergency preparedness purposes; (e) $300,000 35 to New York Natural Heritage to update the New York Protected Areas 36 Database; (f) $10,000,000 for Adirondack and Catskill visitor safety 37 and wilderness protection activities to address issues relating to 38 overuse, including $250,000 to the Adirondack Mountain Club for 39 visitor centers, and up to $300,000 each to the towns of Minerva, 40 Long Lake, Indian Lake, North Hudson, and Newcomb; (g) $2,000,000 to 41 the Ausable Freshwater Center and their academic partners for a 42 climate change and Adirondack lake ecosystem survey; (h) $750,000 to 43 the Adirondack Architectural Heritage for the management of the Camp 44 Santanoni Historic Area; and (i) $1,000,000 for a carrying capacity 45 study on the Saranac Chain of Lakes (09ST25ER) (24702) ............. 46 50,075,000 ....................................... (re. $49,744,000) 47 Notwithstanding subdivision 7 of section 92-s of the state finance law 48 or any other law to the contrary, for services and expenses of the 49 Hudson River Park Trust for projects related to the development of 50 the Hudson River Park consistent with provisions of chapter 592 of 51 the laws of 1998, including but not limited to utility infrastruc- 52 ture improvements; provided, however, such funds shall not be avail- 272 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 able for suballocation to any public benefit corporation or public 2 authority with the exception of the Hudson River Park Trust and 3 shall be available solely for the liabilities incurred by the Hudson 4 River Park Trust or by other state departments or agencies on behalf 5 of the Hudson River Park Trust on or after April 1, 1999. Provided 6 further that, the comptroller is hereby authorized and directed to 7 release monies to the Hudson River Park Trust in amounts set forth 8 in a schedule approved by the director of the budget (09HR25ER) 9 (24820) ... 4,400,000 ............................. (re. $4,400,000) 10 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for zoos, botanical gardens 11 and aquaria program (09ZB25ER) (24823) ............................. 12 21,500,000 ....................................... (re. $21,500,000) 13 Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, for the administration of 14 the programs of section 79-b of the navigation law (09NV25ER) 15 (25719) ... 2,300,000 ............................... (re. $214,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 17 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 18 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 19 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 20 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 21 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 22 ments and agencies, according to the following: Local waterfront 23 revitalization programs, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 24 (a) not less than $10,500,000 for waterfront revitalization projects 25 which are in or primarily serve areas where demographic and other 26 relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the areas are densely 27 populated and have sustained physical deterioration, decay, neglect, 28 or disinvestment, or where a substantial proportion of the residen- 29 tial population is of low income or is otherwise disadvantaged and 30 is underserved with respect to the existing recreational opportu- 31 nities in the area; (b) including up to $2,000,000 for updates to 32 existing local waterfront revitalization program plans to mitigate 33 future physical climate risks; and (c) $300,000 for the Niagara 34 River greenway commission (09WR24ER) (24700) ....................... 35 14,275,000 ....................................... (re. $13,975,000) 36 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 37 any law to the contrary, (a) not less than, $13,000,000 for munici- 38 pal parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 39 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 40 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 41 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 42 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 43 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 44 existing recreational opportunities in the area; (b) including 45 $250,000 for Tivoli Park; (c) $500,000 suballocated to the Hudson 46 River Valley Greenway Authority for the Hudson River Valley Trail 47 Grants; (d) $250,000 to the State University of New York college of 48 environmental science and forestry; (e) $250,000 to Paul Smith's 49 College for the support of the Adirondack Park interpretive centers; 50 (f) $250,000 to the Catskill Center for conservation and development 51 for the support of the Catskill Visitors Center; and (g) $250,000 to 273 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the Westchester Parks Foundation for Camp Morty (09MP24ER) (24701) 2 ... 26,000,000 ................................... (re. $25,250,000) 3 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 4 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 5 include capital projects: (a) on state parks and state lands pursu- 6 ant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environmental conserva- 7 tion law; (b) on state parks or state owned lands and easements 8 under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental conserva- 9 tion or the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation 10 for access opportunities for people with disabilities; access to the 11 State Forest Preserve, State reforestation, Wildlife Management 12 areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 13 construction and maintenance: including but not limited to sustaina- 14 ble trail crews or other activities related to sustainable use of 15 the forest preserve and other state lands that are threatened by 16 overuse; Catskill and Adirondack camp ground improvements to public 17 access and sanitation facilities; environmental education; facility 18 improvements; archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource 19 surveys, forest health surveys, interpretation, and inventories, and 20 response to forest pests including southern pine beetle; Forest 21 Preserve and state forest unit management planning; invasive species 22 management; conservation easement public recreation planning; habi- 23 tat restoration and enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; 24 state tree nursery improvements; safety equipment; water access 25 facilities and safety improvements; public beach facility develop- 26 ment and improvement; public access improvements at day use areas; 27 state historic site exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping 28 facility development, restoration and reconstruction; (c) $2,000,000 29 from the public access and stewardship allocation to Parks & Trails 30 New York for the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis 31 to local parks and department of environmental conservation friends 32 groups, provided that up to ten percent of such amount may be made 33 available for administrative costs and/or technical assistance; (d) 34 public protection and emergency preparedness purposes; (e) $18,000 35 to New York Natural Heritage to update the New York Protected Areas 36 Database; (f) $10,000,000 for Adirondack and Catskill visitor safety 37 and wilderness protection activities to address issues relating to 38 overuse, including $250,000 to the Adirondack Mountain Club for 39 visitor centers, and $2,000,000 to the Ausable River Association and 40 their academic partners for a climate change and Adirondack lake 41 ecosystem survey; (g) and $500,000 to the Adirondack Architectural 42 Heritage for a fire safety system at the Camp Santanoni Historic 43 Area (09ST24ER) (24702) ... 47,000,000 ........... (re. $37,494,000) 44 Notwithstanding subdivision 7 of section 92-s of the state finance law 45 or any other law to the contrary, for services and expenses of the 46 Hudson River Park Trust for projects related to the development of 47 the Hudson River Park consistent with provisions of chapter 592 of 48 the laws of 1998, including but not limited to utility infrastruc- 49 ture improvements; provided, however, such funds shall not be avail- 50 able for suballocation to any public benefit corporation or public 51 authority with the exception of the Hudson River Park Trust and 52 shall be available solely for the liabilities incurred by the Hudson 274 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 River Park Trust or by other state departments or agencies on behalf 2 of the Hudson River Park Trust on or after April 1, 1999. Provided 3 further that, the comptroller is hereby authorized and directed to 4 release monies to the Hudson River Park Trust in amounts set forth 5 in a schedule approved by the director of the budget (09HR24ER) 6 (24820) ... 4,400,000 ............................. (re. $2,511,000) 7 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for zoos, botanical gardens 8 and aquaria program (09ZB24ER) (24823) ............................. 9 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,959,000) 10 Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, for the administration of 11 the programs of section 79-b of the navigation law (09NV24ER) 12 (25719) ... 2,300,000 ............................... (re. $244,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 14 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 15 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 16 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 17 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 18 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 19 ments and agencies, according to the following: 20 Local waterfront revitalization programs, notwithstanding any law to 21 the contrary, not less than, $10,500,000 for waterfront revitaliza- 22 tion projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demograph- 23 ic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the areas 24 are densely populated and have sustained physical deterioration, 25 decay, neglect, or disinvestment, or where a substantial proportion 26 of the residential population is of low income or is otherwise 27 disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the existing recre- 28 ational opportunities in the area including up to $2,000,000 for 29 updates to existing local waterfront revitalization program plans to 30 mitigate future physical climate risks; and $300,000 for the Niagara 31 River greenway commission (09WR23ER) (24700) ....................... 32 14,275,000 ....................................... (re. $13,975,000) 33 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 34 any law to the contrary, not less than, $13,000,000 for municipal 35 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 36 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 37 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 38 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 39 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 40 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 41 existing recreational opportunities in the area; and including 42 $250,000 for Tivoli Park; $500,000 for the Hudson River Valley Trail 43 Grants; $250,000 to the State University of New York college of 44 environmental science and forestry; $250,000 to Paul Smith's College 45 for the support of the Adirondack Park interpretive centers; 46 $200,000 to the Catskill Center for conservation and development for 47 the support of the Catskill Visitors Center; $225,000 to the Western 48 New York Land Conservancy for The Riverline; and $250,000 to the 49 Town of Amherst for a splash pad (09MP23ER) (24701) ................ 50 26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $22,050,000) 275 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for zoos, botanical gardens 2 and aquaria program (09ZB23ER) (24823) ............................. 3 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,875,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 54, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 7 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 8 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state lands pursu- 9 ant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environmental conserva- 10 tion law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands and easements 11 under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental conserva- 12 tion or the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation 13 for access opportunities for people with disabilities; access to the 14 State Forest Preserve, State reforestation, Wildlife Management 15 areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 16 construction and maintenance: including but not limited to sustaina- 17 ble trail crews or other activities related to sustainable use of 18 the forest preserve and other state lands that are threatened by 19 overuse; Catskill and Adirondack camp ground improvements to public 20 access and sanitation facilities; environmental education; facility 21 improvements; archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource 22 surveys, forest health surveys, interpretation, and inventories, and 23 response to forest pests including southern pine beetle; Forest 24 Preserve and state forest unit management planning; invasive species 25 management; conservation easement public recreation planning; habi- 26 tat restoration and enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; 27 state tree nursery improvements; safety equipment; water access 28 facilities and safety improvements; public beach facility develop- 29 ment and improvement; public access improvements at day use areas; 30 state historic site exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping 31 facility development, restoration and reconstruction; (iii) 32 $1,000,000 for Belleayre Mountain ski center projects; (iv) 33 $2,000,000 from the public access and stewardship allocation to 34 Parks & Trails New York for the purpose of awarding grants on a 35 competitive basis to local parks and department of environmental 36 conservation friends groups, provided that up to ten percent of such 37 amount may be made available for administrative costs and/or techni- 38 cal assistance; (v) public protection and emergency preparedness 39 purposes; (vi) $18,000 to New York Natural Heritage to update the 40 New York Protected Areas Database; (vii) $8,000,000 for Adirondack 41 and Catskill visitor safety and wilderness protection activities to 42 address issues relating to overuse; (viii) $100,000 to the Adiron- 43 dack Mountain Club for the High Peaks Information Center; (ix) 44 $500,000 to the Adirondack Architectural Heritage for a fire safety 45 system at the Camp Santanoni Historic Area; and (x) $2,000,000 to 46 the Ausable River Association and their academic partners for a 47 climate change and Adirondack lake ecosystem survey (09ST23ER) 48 (24702) ... 47,525,000 ........................... (re. $26,280,000) 49 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 276 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 2 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 3 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 4 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 5 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 6 ments and agencies, according to the following: 7 Local waterfront revitalization programs, notwithstanding any law to 8 the contrary, not less than, $10,500,000 for waterfront revitaliza- 9 tion projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demograph- 10 ic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the areas 11 are densely populated and have sustained physical deterioration, 12 decay, neglect, or disinvestment, or where a substantial proportion 13 of the residential population is of low income or is otherwise 14 disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the existing recre- 15 ational opportunities in the area including up to $2,000,000 for 16 updates to existing local waterfront revitalization program plans to 17 mitigate future physical climate risks; and $200,000 for the Niagara 18 River greenway commission (09WR22ER) (24700) ....................... 19 16,500,000 ....................................... (re. $16,220,000) 20 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 21 any law to the contrary, not less than, $13,000,000 for municipal 22 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 23 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 24 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 25 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 26 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 27 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 28 existing recreational opportunities in the area; and including 29 $250,000 for Tivoli Park; $500,000 for the Hudson River Valley Trail 30 Grants; $150,000 to the State University of New York college of 31 environmental science and forestry; $225,000 to Paul Smith's College 32 for the support of the Adirondack Park interpretive centers; 33 $150,000 to the Catskill Center for conservation and development for 34 the support of the Catskill Visitors Center; and $3,500,000 to 35 Scenic Hudson, Inc. for the Westchester RiverWalk; and $350,000 to 36 the Buffalo Museum of Science for the Tifft Nature Preserve accessi- 37 bilty trail (09MP22ER) (24701) ..................................... 38 26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $19,410,000) 39 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 40 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 41 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state lands pursu- 42 ant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environmental conserva- 43 tion law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands and easements 44 under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental conserva- 45 tion or the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation 46 for access opportunities for people with disabilities; access to the 47 State Forest Preserve, State reforestation, Wildlife Management 48 areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 49 construction and maintenance: including but not limited to sustaina- 50 ble trail crews or other activities related to sustainable use of 51 the forest preserve and other state lands that are threatened by 52 overuse; Catskill and Adirondack camp ground improvements to public 277 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 access and sanitation facilities; environmental education; facility 2 improvements; archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource 3 surveys, forest health surveys, interpretation, and inventories, and 4 response to forest pests including southern pine beetle; Forest 5 Preserve and state forest unit management planning; invasive species 6 management; conservation easement public recreation planning; habi- 7 tat restoration and enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; 8 state tree nursery improvements; safety equipment; water access 9 facilities and safety improvements; public beach facility develop- 10 ment and improvement; public access improvements at day use areas; 11 state historic site exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping 12 facility development, restoration and reconstruction; (iii) 13 $1,000,000 for Belleayre Mountain ski center projects; (iv) 14 $2,000,000 from the public access and stewardship allocation to 15 Parks & Trails New York for the purpose of awarding grants on a 16 competitive basis to local parks and department of environmental 17 conservation friends groups, provided that up to ten percent of such 18 amount may be made available for administrative costs and/or techni- 19 cal assistance; (v) public protection and emergency preparedness 20 purposes; and (vi) $18,000 to New York Natural Heritage to update 21 the New York Protected Areas Database, (vii) $8,000,000 for Adiron- 22 dack and Catskill visitor safety and wilderness protection activ- 23 ities to address issues relating to overuse; (viii) and up to 24 $600,000 to the Department of Environmental Conservation to initiate 25 a procurement for a Visitor Use Management Framework that will serve 26 as a tool to guide future management and stewarship decision-making 27 for the Adirondack and Catskill Parks; (ix) and $500,000 to the 28 Adirondack Architectural Heritage for the management of the Camp 29 Santanoni Historic Area (09ST22ER) (24702) ......................... 30 48,689,800 ....................................... (re. $23,617,000) 31 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for zoos, botanical gardens 32 and aquaria program (09ZB22ER) (24823) ............................. 33 20,000,000 .......................................... (re. $297,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 35 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 36 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 37 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 38 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 39 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 40 ments and agencies, according to the following: Local waterfront 41 revitalization programs, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 42 not less than, $9,000,000 for waterfront revitalization projects 43 which are in or primarily serve areas where demographic and other 44 relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the areas are densely 45 populated and have sustained physical deterioration, decay, neglect, 46 or disinvestment, or where a substantial proportion of the residen- 47 tial population is of low income or is otherwise disadvantaged and 48 is underserved with respect to the existing recreational opportu- 49 nities in the area including up to $2,000,000 for updates to exist- 50 ing local waterfront revitalization program plans to mitigate future 51 physical climate risks; and $200,000 for the Niagara River greenway 278 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 commission (09WR21ER) (24700) ...................................... 2 14,150,000 ....................................... (re. $13,950,000) 3 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 4 any law to the contrary, not less than, $10,000,000 for municipal 5 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 6 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 7 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 8 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 9 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 10 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 11 existing recreational opportunities in the area; and including 12 $250,000 for Tivoli Park; $500,000 for the Hudson River Valley Trail 13 Grants; $120,000 to the State University of New York college of 14 environmental science and forestry; $180,000 to Paul Smith's College 15 for the support of the Adirondack Park interpretive centers; 16 $150,000 to the Catskill Center for Conservation and Development for 17 the support of the Catskill Visitors Center; and $1,000,000 to the 18 city of New York for the East River Esplanade 107th Street Pier 19 (09MP21ER) (24701) ... 19,500,000 ................ (re. $11,895,000) 20 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 21 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 22 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state lands pursu- 23 ant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environmental conserva- 24 tion law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands and easements 25 under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental conserva- 26 tion or the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation 27 for access opportunities for people with disabilities; access to the 28 State Forest Preserve, State reforestation, Wildlife Management 29 areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 30 construction and maintenance: including but not limited to sustaina- 31 ble trail crews or other activities related to sustainable use of 32 the forest preserve and other state lands that are threatened by 33 overuse; Catskill and Adirondack camp ground improvements to public 34 access and sanitation facilities; environmental education; facility 35 improvements; archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource 36 surveys, forest health surveys, interpretation, and inventories, and 37 response to forest pests including southern pine beetle; Forest 38 Preserve and state forest unit management planning; invasive species 39 management; conservation easement public recreation planning; habi- 40 tat restoration and enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; 41 state tree nursery improvements; safety equipment; water access 42 facilities and safety improvements; public beach facility develop- 43 ment and improvement; public access improvements at day use areas; 44 state historic site exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping 45 facility development, restoration and reconstruction; (iii) 46 $1,000,000 for Belleayre Mountain ski center projects; (iv) 47 $1,000,000 from the public access and stewardship allocation to 48 Parks & Trails New York for the purpose of awarding grants on a 49 competitive basis to local parks and department of environmental 50 conservation friends groups, provided that up to ten percent of such 51 amount may be made available for administrative costs and/or techni- 52 cal assistance; (v) public protection and emergency preparedness 279 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 purposes; (vi) $18,000 to New York Natural Heritage to update the 2 New York Protected Areas Database; (vii) $1,550,000 for Adirondack 3 and Catskill visitor safety and wilderness protection activities to 4 address issues relating to overuse including up to $800,000 to Essex 5 County to address issues of overuse in the Adirondack Park 6 (09ST21ER) (24702) ... 34,451,800 ................. (re. $9,083,000) 7 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for zoos, botanical gardens 8 and aquaria program (09ZB21ER) (24823) ............................. 9 16,000,000 .......................................... (re. $149,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 11 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 12 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 13 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 14 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 15 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 16 ments and agencies, according to the following: 17 Local waterfront revitalization programs, notwithstanding any law to 18 the contrary, not less than, $9,000,000 for waterfront revitaliza- 19 tion projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demograph- 20 ic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the areas 21 are densely populated and have sustained physical deterioration, 22 decay, neglect, or disinvestment, or where a substantial proportion 23 of the residential population is of low income or is otherwise 24 disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the existing recre- 25 ational opportunities in the area including up to $2,000,000 for 26 updates to existing local waterfront revitalization program plans to 27 mitigate future physical climate risks; and $200,000 for the Niagara 28 River greenway commission (09WR20ER) (24700) ....................... 29 14,000,000 ....................................... (re. $13,800,000) 30 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 31 any law to the contrary, not less than, $10,000,000 for municipal 32 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 33 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 34 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 35 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 36 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 37 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 38 existing recreational opportunities in the area; and including 39 $250,000 for Tivoli Park; $500,000 for the Hudson River Valley Trail 40 Grants; $120,000 to the State University of New York college of 41 environmental science and forestry; $180,000 to Paul Smith's College 42 for the support of the Adirondack Park interpretive centers; and 43 $150,000 to the Catskill Center for Conservation and Development for 44 the support of the Catskill Visitors Center; and $1,000,000 to the 45 city of New York for the East River Esplanade 107th Street Pier 46 (09MP20ER) (24701) ................................................. 47 19,500,000 ....................................... (re. $13,574,000) 48 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 49 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 50 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state lands pursu- 51 ant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environmental conserva- 280 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 tion law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands and easements 2 under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental conserva- 3 tion or the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation 4 for access opportunities for people with disabilities; access to the 5 State Forest Preserve, State reforestation, Wildlife Management 6 areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 7 construction and maintenance: including but not limited to sustaina- 8 ble trail crews or other activities related to sustainable use of 9 the forest preserve and other state lands that are threatened by 10 overuse; Catskill and Adirondack camp ground improvements to public 11 access and sanitation facilities; environmental education; facility 12 improvements; archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource 13 surveys, forest health surveys, interpretation, and inventories, and 14 response to forest pests including southern pine beetle; Forest 15 Preserve and state forest unit management planning; invasive species 16 management; conservation easement public recreation planning; habi- 17 tat restoration and enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; 18 state tree nursery improvements; safety equipment; water access 19 facilities and safety improvements; public beach facility develop- 20 ment and improvement; public access improvements at day use areas; 21 state historic site exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping 22 facility development, restoration and reconstruction; (iii) 23 $1,000,000 for Belleayre Mountain ski center projects; (iv) 24 $1,000,000 from the public access and stewardship allocation to 25 Parks & Trails New York for the purpose of awarding grants on a 26 competitive basis to local parks and department of environmental 27 conservation friends groups, provided that up to ten percent of such 28 amount may be made available for administrative costs and/or techni- 29 cal assistance; (v) public protection and emergency preparedness 30 purposes; (vi) $250,000 to Adirondack Architectural Heritage for 31 restoration projects at Camp Santanoni Historic Area; (vii) $55,000 32 to New York Natural Heritage to update the New York Protected Areas 33 Database; (viii) up to $1,200,000 to Essex County to address issues 34 of overuse in the Adirondack Park (09ST20ER) (24702) ............... 35 34,400,000 ........................................ (re. $4,687,000) 36 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for zoos, botanical gardens 37 and aquaria program (09ZB20ER) (24823) ............................. 38 16,000,000 .......................................... (re. $943,000) 39 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, is 40 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 41 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 42 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 43 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 44 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 45 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 46 ments and agencies, according to the following: 47 Local waterfront revitalization programs, notwithstanding any law to 48 the contrary, not less than, $9,000,000 for waterfront revitaliza- 49 tion projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demograph- 50 ic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the areas 51 are densely populated and have sustained physical deterioration, 281 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 decay, neglect, or disinvestment, or where a substantial proportion 2 of the residential population is of low income or is otherwise 3 disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the existing recre- 4 ational opportunities in the area including up to $2,000,000 for 5 updates to existing local waterfront revitalization program plans to 6 mitigate future physical climate risks; [and] $200,000 for the 7 Niagara River greenway commission; $100,000 to the New York City 8 Department of Parks and Recreation for Bissel Gardens; $100,000 to 9 the New York City Department of Parks and Recreation for the Ujamaa 10 Northeast Community Garden; and $150,000 to the Center for Urban 11 Environment Reform at City University of New York Law (09WR19ER) 12 (24700) ... 14,500,000 ........................... (re. $14,300,000) 13 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 14 any law to the contrary, not less than, $10,000,000 for municipal 15 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 16 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 17 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 18 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 19 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 20 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 21 existing recreational opportunities in the area; and including 22 $250,000 for Tivoli Park; $500,000 for the Hudson River Valley Trail 23 Grants; $120,000 to the State University of New York college of 24 environmental science and forestry and $180,000 to Paul Smith's 25 College for the support of the Adirondack Park interpretive centers, 26 $1,000,000 to the city of New York for the East River Esplanade 27 107th Street Pier (09MP19ER) (24701) ............................... 28 19,500,000 ........................................ (re. $4,589,000) 29 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 30 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 31 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state lands pursu- 32 ant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environmental conserva- 33 tion law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands and easements 34 under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental conserva- 35 tion or the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation 36 for access opportunities for people with disabilities; access to the 37 State Forest Preserve, State reforestation, Wildlife Management 38 areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 39 construction and maintenance; Catskill and Adirondack camp ground 40 improvements to public access and sanitation facilities; environ- 41 mental education; facility improvements; archeological, historic, 42 cultural and natural resource surveys, forest health surveys, inter- 43 pretation, and inventories, and response to forest pests including 44 southern pine beetle; Forest Preserve and state forest unit manage- 45 ment planning; invasive species management; conservation easement 46 public recreation planning; habitat restoration and enhancement; 47 state fish hatchery improvements; state tree nursery improvements; 48 safety equipment; water access facilities and safety improvements; 49 public beach facility development and improvement; public access 50 improvements at day use areas; state historic site exterior restora- 51 tion; and cabin area and camping facility development, restoration 52 and reconstruction; (iii) $1,000,000 for Belleayre Mountain ski 282 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 center projects; (iv) $1,000,000 from the public access and steward- 2 ship allocation to Parks & Trails New York for the purpose of award- 3 ing grants on a competitive basis to local parks and department of 4 environmental conservation friends groups, provided that up to ten 5 percent of such amount may be made available for administrative 6 costs and/or technical assistance; (v) public protection and emer- 7 gency preparedness purposes (09ST19ER) (24702) ..................... 8 33,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,042,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 10 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 11 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 12 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 13 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 14 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 15 ments and agencies, according to the following: 16 Local waterfront revitalization programs, notwithstanding any law to 17 the contrary, not less than, $9,000,000 for waterfront revitaliza- 18 tion projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demograph- 19 ic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the areas 20 are densely populated and have sustained physical deterioration, 21 decay, neglect, or disinvestment, or where a substantial proportion 22 of the residential population is of low income or is otherwise 23 disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the existing recre- 24 ational opportunities in the area including up to $2,000,000 for 25 updates to existing local waterfront revitalization program plans to 26 mitigate future physical climate risks; and $200,000 for the Niagara 27 River greenway commission (09WR18ER) (24700) ....................... 28 14,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,630,000) 29 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 30 any law to the contrary, not less than, $10,000,000 for municipal 31 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 32 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 33 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 34 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 35 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 36 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 37 existing recreational opportunities in the area; and including 38 $250,000 for Tivoli Park; $500,000 for the Hudson River Valley Trail 39 Grants; $120,000 to the State University of New York college of 40 environmental science and forestry and $180,000 to Paul Smith's 41 College for the support of the Adirondack Park interpretive centers, 42 $500,000 to the city of New York for the East River Esplanade 107th 43 Street Pier, and $1,000,000 to the Wildlife Conservation Society for 44 the Bronx Zoo (09MP18ER) (24701) ... 19,500,000 ... (re. $5,191,000) 45 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 46 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 47 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state lands pursu- 48 ant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environmental conserva- 49 tion law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands and easements 50 under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental conserva- 51 tion or the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation 283 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 for access opportunities for people with disabilities; access to the 2 State Forest Preserve, State reforestation, Wildlife Management 3 areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 4 construction and maintenance; Catskill and Adirondack camp ground 5 improvements to public access and sanitation facilities; environ- 6 mental education; facility improvements; archeological, historic, 7 cultural and natural resource surveys, forest health surveys, inter- 8 pretation, and inventories, and response to forest pests including 9 southern pine beetle; Forest Preserve and state forest unit manage- 10 ment planning; invasive species management; conservation easement 11 public recreation planning; habitat restoration and enhancement; 12 state fish hatchery improvements; state tree nursery improvements; 13 safety equipment; water access facilities and safety improvements; 14 public beach facility development and improvement; public access 15 improvements at day use areas; state historic site exterior restora- 16 tion; and cabin area and camping facility development, restoration 17 and reconstruction; (iii) $1,000,000 for Belleayre Mountain ski 18 center projects; (iv) $500,000 from the public access and steward- 19 ship allocation to Parks & Trails New York for the purpose of award- 20 ing grants on a competitive basis to local parks and department of 21 environmental conservation friends groups, provided that up to ten 22 percent of such amount may be made available for administrative 23 costs and/or technical assistance; (v) public protection and emer- 24 gency preparedness purposes; and (vi) up to $50,000 for Earl W. 25 Brydges Artpark State Park improvements; and (vii) up to $150,000 26 for Old Fort Niagara State Park Improvements (09ST18ER) (24702) ... 27 32,638,000 ........................................ (re. $1,124,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 29 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 30 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 31 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 32 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 33 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 34 ments and agencies, according to the following: 35 Local waterfront revitalization programs, notwithstanding any law to 36 the contrary, not less than, $10,000,000 for waterfront revitaliza- 37 tion projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demograph- 38 ic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the areas 39 are densely populated and have sustained physical deterioration, 40 decay, neglect, or disinvestment, or where a substantial proportion 41 of the residential population is of low income or is otherwise 42 disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the existing recre- 43 ational opportunities in the area including up to $2,000,000 for 44 updates to existing local waterfront revitalization program plans to 45 mitigate future physical climate risks; and including $660,000 for 46 Adirondack infrastructure and environmental improvements for the 47 towns of Minerva, Indian Lake and Newcomb and $200,000 for the 48 Niagara River greenway commission (09WR17ER) (24700) ............... 49 16,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,928,000) 50 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 51 any law to the contrary, not less than, $10,000,000 for municipal 284 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 2 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 3 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 4 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 5 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 6 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 7 existing recreational opportunities in the area; and including 8 $250,000 for Tivoli Park, $1,000,000 for the Ulster County rail 9 trail pursuant to initiation of a public planning process; and 10 $1,000,000 to the city of New York for the East River Esplanade 11 107th Street Pier (09MP17ER) (24701) ............................... 12 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,911,000) 13 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 14 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 15 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state lands pursu- 16 ant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environmental conserva- 17 tion law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands and easements 18 under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental conserva- 19 tion or the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation 20 for access opportunities for people with disabilities; access to the 21 State Forest Preserve, State reforestation, Wildlife Management 22 areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 23 construction and maintenance; Catskill and Adirondack camp ground 24 improvements to public access and sanitation facilities; environ- 25 mental education; facility improvements; archeological, historic, 26 cultural and natural resource surveys, forest health surveys, inter- 27 pretation, and inventories, and response to forest pests including 28 southern pine beetle; Forest Preserve and state forest unit manage- 29 ment planning; invasive species management; conservation easement 30 public recreation planning; habitat restoration and enhancement; 31 state fish hatchery improvements; state tree nursery improvements; 32 water access facilities and safety improvements; public beach facil- 33 ity development and improvement; public access improvements at day 34 use areas; state historic site exterior restoration; and cabin area 35 and camping facility development, restoration and reconstruction; 36 (iii) $1,000,000 for Belleayre Mountain ski center projects; (iv) 37 $500,000 from the public access and stewardship allocation to Parks 38 & Trails New York for the purpose of awarding grants on a compet- 39 itive basis to local parks and department of environmental conserva- 40 tion friends groups, provided that up to ten percent of such amount 41 may be made available for administrative costs and/or technical 42 assistance; and $250,000 for the Hudson River Valley Trail Grants 43 (09ST17ER) (24702) ... 30,000,000 ................... (re. $903,000) 44 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 45 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 46 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 47 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 48 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 49 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 50 ments and agencies, according to the following: 285 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Local waterfront revitalization programs, notwithstanding any law to 2 the contrary, not less than, $10,000,000 for waterfront revitaliza- 3 tion projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demograph- 4 ic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the areas 5 are densely populated and have sustained physical deterioration, 6 decay, neglect, or disinvestment, or where a substantial proportion 7 of the residential population is of low income or is otherwise 8 disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the existing recre- 9 ational opportunities in the area including up to $2,000,000 for 10 updates to existing local waterfront revitalization program plans to 11 mitigate future physical climate risks; and including $660,000 for 12 Adirondack infrastructure and environmental improvements for the 13 towns of Minerva, Indian Lake and Newcomb and $200,000 for the 14 Niagara River greenway commission and including $150,000 for 15 Hammonds Cove dredging projects; and $1,000,000 to the city of New 16 York for the East River Esplanade 107th Street pier (09WR16ER) 17 (24700) ... 16,000,000 ............................ (re. $5,900,000) 18 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 19 any law to the contrary, not less than, $10,000,000 for municipal 20 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 21 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 22 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 23 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 24 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 25 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 26 existing recreational opportunities in the area; and including 27 $250,000 for Tivoli Park, $300,000 for the Ulster County rail trail, 28 pursuant to initiation of a public planning process, and including 29 $100,000 for Old Westbury Gardens to rehabilitate property barns, 30 and including $150,000 for Udall's Cove land acquisition, and 31 including $100,000 to the Town of Middlesex Vine Valley Public Park 32 (09MP16ER) (24701) ... 20,000,000 ................. (re. $3,706,000) 33 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 34 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 35 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state lands pursu- 36 ant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environmental conserva- 37 tion law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands and easements 38 under the jurisdiction of the department of environmental conserva- 39 tion or the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation 40 for access opportunities for people with disabilities; access to the 41 State Forest Preserve, State reforestation, Wildlife Management 42 areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 43 construction and maintenance; Catskill and Adirondack camp ground 44 improvements to public access and sanitation facilities; environ- 45 mental education; facility improvements; archeological, historic, 46 cultural and natural resource surveys, forest health surveys, inter- 47 pretation, and inventories, and response to forest pests; Forest 48 Preserve and state forest unit management planning; invasive species 49 management; conservation easement public recreation planning; habi- 50 tat restoration and enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; 51 state tree nursery improvements; water access facilities and safety 52 improvements; public beach facility development and improvement; 286 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 public access improvements at day use areas; state historic site 2 exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping facility develop- 3 ment, restoration and reconstruction; (iii) $500,000 for Belleayre 4 Mountain ski center projects; (iv) $500,000 from the public access 5 and stewardship allocation to Parks & Trails New York for the 6 purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to local parks' 7 friends groups, provided that up to ten percent of such amount may 8 be made available for administrative costs and/or technical assist- 9 ance; and $250,000 for the Hudson River Valley Trail Grants Program 10 and including $200,000 to SUNY ESF for an updated assessment of the 11 state's deer population (09ST16ER) (24702) ......................... 12 28,000,000 .......................................... (re. $317,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 14 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 15 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 16 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 17 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 18 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 19 ments and agencies, according to the following: 20 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 21 any law to the contrary, not less than, $7,875,000 for municipal 22 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 23 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 24 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 25 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 26 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 27 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 28 existing recreational opportunities in the area; including $250,000 29 for Tivoli Park; $500,000 for Clute Park; and $150,000 for Yates 30 County SWCD Keuka Outlet Trail (09MP15ER) (24701) .................. 31 15,750,000 ........................................ (re. $2,013,000) 32 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 33 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 34 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state owned lands 35 acquired pursuant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environ- 36 mental conservation law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands 37 and easements under the jurisdiction of the department of environ- 38 mental conservation or the office of parks, recreation and historic 39 preservation for access opportunities for people with disabilities; 40 access to the State Forest Preserve, State reforestation, Wildlife 41 Management areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 42 construction and maintenance; Catskill and Adirondack campground 43 improvements to public access and sanitation facilities; environ- 44 mental education; conservation education facility improvements; 45 archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource surveys, 46 forest health surveys, interpretation, and inventories, and response 47 to forest pests; Forest Preserve and state forest unit management 48 planning; conservation easement public recreation planning; habitat 49 restoration and enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; state 50 tree nursery improvements; water access facilities and safety 51 improvements; public beach facility development and improvement; 287 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 public access improvements at day use areas; state historic site 2 exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping facility develop- 3 ment, restoration and reconstruction; (iii) $500,000 for Belleayre 4 Mountain ski center projects; (iv) $500,000 from the public access 5 and stewardship allocation to Parks & Trails New York for the 6 purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to local parks' 7 friends groups, provided that up to ten percent of such amount may 8 be made available for administrative costs and/or technical assist- 9 ance; and $100,000 for the Hudson River Valley Trail Grants Program 10 (09ST15ER) (24702) ... 18,500,000 .................... (re. $59,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 12 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 13 any law to the contrary, not less than, $7,750,000 for municipal 14 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 15 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 16 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 17 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 18 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 19 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 20 existing recreational opportunities in the area; including $50,000 21 for Yaddo Artists' Community; including $50,000 for Green Lake Dam; 22 including $150,000 for Greek Lakes Center; including $180,000 for 23 Joseph Rodman Drake Park; including $20,000 for Udall's Cove; and 24 including $200,000 for Chestnut Ridge Conservancy (09MP14ER) (24701) 25 ... 15,500,000 .................................... (re. $3,048,000) 26 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 27 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 28 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state owned lands 29 acquired pursuant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environ- 30 mental conservation law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands 31 and easements under the jurisdiction of the department of environ- 32 mental conservation or the office of parks, recreation and historic 33 preservation for access opportunities for people with disabilities; 34 access to the State Forest Preserve; State reforestation, Wildlife 35 Management areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 36 construction and maintenance; Catskill and Adirondack campground 37 improvements to public access and sanitation facilities; environ- 38 mental education; conservation education facility improvements; 39 archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource surveys, 40 forest health surveys, interpretation, and inventories; Forest 41 Preserve and state forest unit management planning; conservation 42 easement public recreation planning; habitat restoration and 43 enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; water access facili- 44 ties and safety improvements; public beach facility development and 45 improvement; public access improvements at day use areas; state 46 historic site exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping 47 facility development, restoration and reconstruction; and (iii) 48 $500,000 for Belleayre Mountain ski center projects (09ST14ER) 49 (24702) ... 17,350,000 ................................ (re. $3,000) 50 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 288 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 2 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 3 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 4 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 5 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 6 ments and agencies, according to the following: 7 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 8 any law to the contrary, not less than, $7,750,000 for municipal 9 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 10 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 11 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 12 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 13 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 14 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 15 existing recreational opportunities in the area; including 16 $2,000,000 for the Ulster County Rail Trail, pursuant to the initi- 17 ation of a public planning process; $200,000 for the town of Orchard 18 Park; $150,000 for the Cazenovia community resource center; $100,000 19 for the town of Evans; and $275,000 for the Buffalo military and 20 naval park (09MP13ER) (24701) ... 15,500,000 ...... (re. $1,137,000) 21 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 22 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 23 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state owned lands 24 acquired pursuant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environ- 25 mental conservation law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands 26 and easements under the jurisdiction of the department of environ- 27 mental conservation or the office of parks, recreation and historic 28 preservation for access opportunities for people with disabilities; 29 access to the State Forest Preserve; State reforestation, Wildlife 30 Management areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 31 construction and maintenance; Catskill and Adirondack campground 32 improvements to public access and sanitation facilities; environ- 33 mental education; conservation education facility improvements; 34 archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource surveys, 35 forest health surveys, interpretation, and inventories; Forest 36 Preserve and state forest unit management planning; conservation 37 easement public recreation planning; habitat restoration and 38 enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; water access facili- 39 ties and safety improvements; public beach facility development and 40 improvement; public access improvements at day use areas; state 41 historic site exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping 42 facility development, restoration and reconstruction; and (iii) 43 $500,000 for Belleayre Mountain ski center projects (09ST13ER) 44 (24702) ... 16,600,000 ................................ (re. $6,000) 45 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for zoos, botanical gardens 46 and aquaria program (09ZB13ER) (24823) ............................. 47 10,250,000 ........................................... (re. $15,000) 48 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 49 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 50 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 51 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 289 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 2 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 3 ments and agencies, according to the following: 4 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 5 any law to the contrary, not less than, $6,500,000 for municipal 6 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 7 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 8 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 9 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 10 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 11 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 12 existing recreational opportunities in the area; including $425,000 13 for Buffalo - area parks; and $300,000 for Niagara and Erie Historic 14 Preservation (09MP12ER) (24701) ... 13,000,000 .... (re. $1,188,000) 15 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 16 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 17 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state owned lands 18 acquired pursuant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environ- 19 mental conservation law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands 20 and easements under the jurisdiction of the department of environ- 21 mental conservation or the office of parks, recreation and historic 22 preservation for access opportunities for people with disabilities; 23 access to the State Forest Preserve; State reforestation, Wildlife 24 Management areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 25 construction and maintenance; Catskill and Adirondack campground 26 improvements to public access and sanitation facilities; environ- 27 mental education; conservation education facility improvements; 28 archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource surveys, 29 forest health surveys, interpretation, and inventories; Forest 30 Preserve and state forest unit management planning; conservation 31 easement public recreation planning; habitat restoration and 32 enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; water access facili- 33 ties and safety improvements; public beach facility development and 34 improvement; public access improvements at day use areas; state 35 historic site exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping 36 facility development, restoration and reconstruction; and (iii) 37 $500,000 for Belleayre Mountain ski center projects (09ST12ER) 38 (24702) ... 16,000,000 ................................ (re. $1,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 40 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 41 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 42 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 43 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 44 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 45 ments and agencies, according to the following: 46 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 47 any law to the contrary, not less than, $6,500,000 for municipal 48 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 49 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 50 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 51 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 290 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 2 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 3 existing recreational opportunities in the area; $250,000 for Olmst- 4 ed Park; $125,000 for Hyde Park; $250,000 for Darwin Martin House; 5 and $50,000 for Graycliff Manor (09MP11ER) (24701) ................. 6 13,000,000 .......................................... (re. $658,000) 7 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 8 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 9 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state owned lands 10 acquired pursuant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environ- 11 mental conservation law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands 12 and easements under the jurisdiction of the department of environ- 13 mental conservation or the office of parks, recreation and historic 14 preservation for access opportunities for people with disabilities; 15 access to the State Forest Preserve; State reforestation, Wildlife 16 Management areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 17 construction and maintenance; Catskill and Adirondack campground 18 improvements to public access and sanitation facilities; environ- 19 mental education; conservation education facility improvements; 20 archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource surveys, 21 forest health surveys, interpretation, and inventories; Forest 22 Preserve and state forest unit management planning; conservation 23 easement public recreation planning; habitat restoration and 24 enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; water access facili- 25 ties and safety improvements; public beach facility development and 26 improvement; public access improvements at day use areas; state 27 historic site exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping 28 facility development, restoration and reconstruction; and (iii) 29 $500,000 for Belleayre Mountain ski center projects (09ST11ER) 30 (24702) ... 16,228,000 ................................ (re. $3,000) 31 By chapter 99, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 32 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 33 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 34 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 35 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 36 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 37 ments and agencies, according to the following: 38 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 39 any law to the contrary, not less than, $6,716,000 for municipal 40 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 41 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 42 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 43 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 44 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 45 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 46 existing recreational opportunities in the area, and notwithstanding 47 any law to the contrary, $225,000 for Olmstead Park, $125,000 for 48 Hyde Park, $225,000 for Darwin Martin House and $125,000 for Gray- 49 cliff Manor (09MP10ER) (24701) ... 13,432,000 ..... (re. $1,449,000) 50 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 51 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 291 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state owned lands 2 acquired pursuant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environ- 3 mental conservation law and (ii) on state parks or state owned lands 4 and easements under the jurisdiction of the department of environ- 5 mental conservation or the office of parks, recreation and historic 6 preservation for access opportunities for people with disabilities; 7 access to the State Forest Preserve; State reforestation, Wildlife 8 Management areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 9 construction and maintenance; Catskill and Adirondack campground 10 improvements to public access and sanitation facilities; environ- 11 mental education; conservation education facility improvements; 12 archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource surveys, 13 forest health surveys, interpretation, and inventories; Forest 14 Preserve and state forest unit management planning; conservation 15 easement public recreation planning; habitat restoration and 16 enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; water access facili- 17 ties and safety improvements; public beach facility development and 18 improvement; public access improvements at day use areas; state 19 historic site exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping 20 facility development, restoration and reconstruction (09ST10ER) 21 (24702) ... 16,228,000 ............................... (re. $23,000) 22 The appropriation made by chapter 99, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as 23 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, is hereby 24 amended and reappropriated to read: 25 Local waterfront revitalization programs, notwithstanding any law to 26 the contrary[, not less than, $6,000,000 for waterfront revitaliza- 27 tion projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demograph- 28 ic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the areas 29 are densely populated and have sustained physical deterioration, 30 decay, neglect, or disinvestment, or where a substantial proportion 31 of the residential population is of low income or is otherwise 32 disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the existing recre- 33 ational opportunities in the area; and provided further this appro- 34 priation shall not be construed to restrict the use of any addi- 35 tional monies for such projects;] $550,000 for Buffalo Waterfront; 36 $300,000 for Niagara River Greenway; $250,000 for Hudson and Cham- 37 plain Docks; [and] $400,000 for the Beacon Institute including costs 38 incurred prior to April 1, 2011; $508,000 for the African American 39 Experience in the Adirondacks at Adirondack Experience, The Museum 40 on Blue Mountain Lake; $533,000 to the Hudson River Park Trust for 41 the purposes of an estuarium; $375,000 to the Office of Parks, 42 Recreation and Historic Preservation for payment to the United 43 States Army Corps of Engineers to serve as the non-federal match in 44 support of a study for the preservation and rehabilitation of the 45 Hudson-Athens Lighthouse; $500,000 for the Hudson River Estuary 46 Management Plan prepared pursuant to section 11-0306 of the environ- 47 mental conservation law, including projects to combat harmful algal 48 blooms some or all of which may be allocated to the New England 49 Interstate Water Pollution Control Commission or Cornell water 50 resources institute or department of natural resources for the 51 purposes of implementing the Hudson River Estuary Action agenda; 292 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 $1,471,000 to the Cornell University College of Agriculture and Life 2 Sciences, including but not limited to satellite research farms and 3 forests; $500,000 to the Finger Lakes Land Trust, Inc.; $250,000 to 4 the Lake George Park Commission; $990,000 to the New York City 5 Department of Parks and Recreation for the Flushing Meadows Corona 6 Park; $100,000 to the trust for public land for the Broome County 7 Connective Corridor; $200,000 to the Midatlantic Regional Seed bank; 8 $23,000 to the Sawkill Watershed Community; $25,000 to the Garden 9 City Department of Recreation and Parks; and $25,000 to the Climate 10 Jobs Institute at Cornell University's Industrial and Labor 11 Relations School (09WR10ER) (24700) ................................ 12 12,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,500,000) 13 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 14 502, section 5, of the laws of 2009: 15 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 16 any law to the contrary, not less than, $8,490,000 for municipal 17 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 18 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 19 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 20 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 21 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 22 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 23 existing recreational opportunities in the area, and notwithstanding 24 any law to the contrary, $500,000 for Olmstead Park (09MP09ER) 25 (24701) ... 20,813,000 ............................ (re. $1,894,000) 26 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 1, 27 section 4, of the laws of 2009: 28 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 29 any law to the contrary, not less than, $6,400,000 for municipal 30 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 31 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 32 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 33 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 34 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 35 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 36 existing recreational opportunities in the area, and notwithstanding 37 any law to the contrary, $50,000 from the heritage areas allocation 38 for the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to herit- 39 age area organizations designated in statute (09MP08ER) (24701) .... 40 19,225,000 ........................................ (re. $1,652,000) 41 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for state parks and land and 42 easement infrastructure, access and stewardship projects which shall 43 include capital projects: (i) on state parks and state owned lands 44 acquired pursuant to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environ- 45 mental conservation law; (ii) on state parks or state owned lands 46 and easements under the jurisdiction of the department of environ- 47 mental conservation or the office of parks, recreation and historic 48 preservation for access opportunities for people with disabilities; 49 access to the State Forest Preserve; State reforestation, Wildlife 50 Management areas and conservation easement lands; recreational trail 293 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 construction and maintenance; Catskill and Adirondack campground 2 improvements to public access and sanitation facilities; environ- 3 mental education; conservation education facility improvements; 4 archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource surveys, 5 forest health surveys, interpretation, and inventories; Forest 6 Preserve and state forest unit management planning; conservation 7 easement public recreation planning; habitat restoration and 8 enhancement; state fish hatchery improvements; water access facili- 9 ties and safety improvements; public beach facility development and 10 improvement; public access improvements at day use areas; state 11 historic site exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping 12 facility development, restoration and reconstruction; (iii) $750,000 13 from such amount for Belleayre Mountain ski center projects 14 (09ST08ER) (24702) ... 4,000,000 ..................... (re. $19,000) 15 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 16 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 17 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 18 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 19 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 20 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 21 ments and agencies, according to the following: 22 Parks, recreation and historic preservation projects, notwithstanding 23 any law to the contrary, not less than, $5,306,000 for municipal 24 parks projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 25 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 26 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 27 oration, decay, neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial 28 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 29 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 30 existing recreational opportunities in the area (09MP07ER) (24701) 31 ... 21,225,000 .................................... (re. $1,096,000) 32 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as added by chapter 108, 33 section 5, of the laws of 2006: 34 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 35 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 36 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 37 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 38 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 39 ments and agencies, including: (a) notwithstanding subdivision 7 of 40 section 92-s of the state finance law or any other law to the 41 contrary, $5,000,000 for services and expenses of the Hudson River 42 Park Trust for projects related to the development of the Hudson 43 River Park consistent with provisions of chapter 592 of the laws of 44 1998; provided, however, such funds shall not be available for 45 suballocation to any public benefit corporation or public authority 46 with the exception of the Hudson River Park Trust and shall be 47 available solely for the liabilities incurred by the Hudson River 48 Park Trust or by other state departments or agencies on behalf of 49 the Hudson River Park Trust and shall be available solely for the 50 liabilities incurred by the Hudson River Park Trust or by other 294 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 state departments or agencies on behalf of the Hudson River Park 2 Trust on or after April 1, 1999. Provided further that, the comp- 3 troller is hereby authorized and directed to release monies to the 4 Hudson River Park Trust in amounts set forth in a schedule approved 5 by the director of the budget; (b) notwithstanding any law to the 6 contrary, $15,000,000 for state parks and land infrastructure, 7 access and stewardship projects which shall include capital 8 projects: (i) on state parks and state owned lands acquired pursuant 9 to sections 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environmental conservation 10 law or (ii) on state parks or state owned lands under the jurisdic- 11 tion of the department of environmental conservation or the office 12 of parks, recreation and historic preservation for access opportu- 13 nities for people with disabilities; access to the State Forest 14 Preserve; recreational trail construction and maintenance; Catskill 15 and Adirondack campground improvements to public access and sanita- 16 tion facilities; conservation education facility improvements; 17 archeological, historic, cultural and natural resource surveys, 18 interpretation, and inventories; Forest Preserve and state forest 19 unit management planning; habitat restoration and enhancement; state 20 fish hatchery improvements; water access facilities and safety 21 improvements; public beach facility development and improvement; 22 public access improvements at day use areas; state historic site 23 exterior restoration; and cabin area and camping facility develop- 24 ment, restoration and reconstruction; and (iii) $750,000 from such 25 amount for Belleayre Mountain ski center projects; (c) notwithstand- 26 ing any law to the contrary, $5,000,000 for historic barns program; 27 (d) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $7,500,000 for zoos, 28 botanical gardens and aquaria program; (e) notwithstanding any law 29 to the contrary, not less than, $6,750,000 for waterfront revitali- 30 zation projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demo- 31 graphic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the 32 areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 33 oration, decay, neglect, or disinvestment, or where a substantial 34 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 35 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 36 existing recreational opportunities in the area; and provided 37 further this section shall not be construed to restrict the use of 38 any additional monies for such projects; (f) notwithstanding any law 39 to the contrary, not less than, $5,118,000 for municipal parks 40 projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demographic and 41 other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the areas are 42 densely populated and have sustained physical deterioration, decay, 43 neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial proportion of the 44 residential population is of low income or is otherwise disadvan- 45 taged and is underserved with respect to the existing recreational 46 opportunities in the area; and provided further this section shall 47 not be construed to restrict the use of any additional monies for 48 such projects and not less than $1,500,000 for the Albany Pine Bush 49 Preserve Discovery Center; (g) notwithstanding any law to the 50 contrary, $7,250,000 from the waterfront revitalization allocation 51 for the Beacon Institute including $5,000,000 for the development of 52 the upper satellite center associated with the Beacon Institute 295 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 located on the Troy waterfront; and (h) notwithstanding any law to 2 the contrary, $1,000,000 for waterfront revitalization and river- 3 front development projects in the county of Rensselaer and $300,000 4 for Sea Cliff, $300,000 for the town of Huntington, $100,000 for 5 Laurel Hollow, $100,000 for Asharoken, $100,000 for Lloyd Harbor and 6 $100,000 for Bayville; provided that such state assistance payment 7 shall not be construed to restrict the use of any additional monies 8 for such project or be considered a state assistance payment or 9 other assistance for the purposes of title 11 of article 54 of the 10 environmental conservation law and title 3 of article 56 of the 11 environmental conservation law; and provided further, however that 12 such state assistance payment shall reduce the total cost of such 13 project for purposes of calculating eligibility for further state 14 assistance payments (09E306ER) (24752) ............................. 15 79,970,000 ........................................ (re. $1,960,000) 16 PROJECT SCHEDULE 17 PROJECT AMOUNT 18 -------------------------------------------- 19 (thousands of dollars) 20 Local waterfront revitaliza- 21 tion programs ..................... 27,000 22 Parks, recreation and historic 23 preservation projects ............. 20,470 24 Stewardship projects ................ 15,000 25 Historic barn preservation ........... 5,000 26 Zoos, botanical gardens and 27 aquaria projects ................... 7,500 28 Hudson River Park .................... 5,000 29 -------------- 30 Total ............................. 79,970 31 ============== 32 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as added by chapter 62, 33 section 4, of the laws of 2005: 34 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 35 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 36 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 37 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 38 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 39 ments and agencies, including: (a) notwithstanding subdivision 7 of 40 section 92-s of the state finance law or any other law to the 41 contrary, $5,000,000 for services and expenses of the Hudson River 42 Park Trust for projects related to the development of the Hudson 43 River Park consistent with provisions of chapter 592 of the laws of 44 1998; provided, however, such funds shall not be available for 45 suballocation to any public benefit corporation or public authority 46 with the exception of the Hudson River Park Trust and shall be 47 available solely for the liabilities incurred by the Hudson River 48 Park Trust or by other state departments or agencies on behalf of 49 the Hudson River Park Trust and shall be available solely for the 50 liabilities incurred by the Hudson River Park Trust or by other 296 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 state departments or agencies on behalf of the Hudson River Park 2 Trust on or after April 1, 1999. Provided further that, the comp- 3 troller is hereby authorized and directed to release monies to the 4 Hudson River Park Trust in amounts set forth in a schedule approved 5 by the director of the budget; (b) notwithstanding any law to the 6 contrary, $6,500,000 for state parks and land infrastructure and 7 stewardship projects which shall include capital projects: (i) on 8 state parks and state owned lands acquired pursuant to sections 9 54-0303 and 56-0307 of the environmental conservation law or (ii) on 10 state parks or state owned lands under the jurisdiction of the 11 department of environmental conservation or the office of parks, 12 recreation and historic preservation for access opportunities for 13 people with disabilities; access to the State Forest Preserve; 14 recreational trail construction and maintenance; Catskill and 15 Adirondack campground improvements to public access and sanitation 16 facilities; conservation education facility improvements; archeolog- 17 ical, historic, cultural and natural resource surveys, interpreta- 18 tion, and inventories; Forest Preserve unit management planning; 19 habitat restoration and enhancement; water access facilities; public 20 beach facility development and improvement; public access improve- 21 ments at day use areas; state historic site exterior restoration; 22 and cabin area and camping facility development, restoration and 23 reconstruction; and include seven hundred fifty thousand dollars 24 from such amount for Belleayre Mountain ski center projects; (c) 25 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $750,000 for historic barns 26 program; (d) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $6,000,000 for 27 zoos, botanical gardens and aquaria program; (e) notwithstanding any 28 law to the contrary not less than, $3,563,000 for waterfront revi- 29 talization projects which are in or primarily serve areas where 30 demographic and other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that 31 the areas are densely populated and have sustained physical deteri- 32 oration, decay, neglect, or disinvestment, or where a substantial 33 proportion of the residential population is of low income or is 34 otherwise disadvantaged and is underserved with respect to the 35 existing recreational opportunities in the area; and provided 36 further this section shall not be construed to restrict the use of 37 any additional monies for such projects; (f) notwithstanding any law 38 to the contrary, not less than, $3,579,000 for municipal parks 39 projects which are in or primarily serve areas where demographic and 40 other relevant data for such areas demonstrate that the areas are 41 densely populated and have sustained physical deterioration, decay, 42 neglect or disinvestment or where a substantial proportion of the 43 residential population is of low income or is otherwise disadvan- 44 taged and is underserved with respect to the existing recreational 45 opportunities in the area; and provided further this section shall 46 not be construed to restrict the use of any additional monies for 47 such projects; (g) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 48 $1,000,000 from the waterfront revitalization allocation for the 49 rivers and estuaries center on the Hudson; and (h) notwithstanding 50 any law to the contrary, $1,000,000 for waterfront revitalization 51 and riverfront development projects in the county of Rensselaer and 52 $500,000 for Oyster Bay and $500,000 for the town of Huntington; 297 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 provided that such state assistance payment shall not be construed 2 to restrict the use of any additional monies for such project or be 3 considered a state assistance payment or other assistance for the 4 purposes of title 11 of article 54 of the environmental conservation 5 law and title 3 of article 56 of the environmental conservation law; 6 and provided further, however that such state assistance payment 7 shall reduce the total cost of such project for purposes of calcu- 8 lating eligibility for further state assistance payments (09E305ER) 9 (24752) ... 46,815,000 .............................. (re. $850,000) 10 PROJECT SCHEDULE 11 PROJECT AMOUNT 12 -------------------------------------------- 13 (thousands of dollars) 14 Local waterfront revitaliza- 15 tion programs ..................... 14,250 16 Parks, recreation and historic 17 preservation projects ............. 14,315 18 Stewardship projects ................. 6,500 19 Historic barn preservation ............. 750 20 Zoos, botanical gardens and 21 aquaria projects ................... 6,000 22 Hudson River Park .................... 5,000 23 -------------- 24 Total ............................. 46,815 25 ============== 26 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2011: 28 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 29 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 30 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 31 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 32 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 33 ments and agencies (09E304ER) (24752) .............................. 34 41,565,000 .......................................... (re. $911,000) 35 PROJECT SCHEDULE 36 PROJECT AMOUNT 37 -------------------------------------------- 38 (thousands of dollars) 39 Local waterfront revitaliza- 40 tion programs ..................... 12,500 41 Parks, recreation and historic 42 preservation projects ............. 12,565 43 Hudson River Park ................... 10,000 44 Stewardship projects ................. 5,750 45 Historic barns projects ................ 750 46 -------------- 47 Total ............................. 41,565 48 ============== 298 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as added by chapter 684, 2 section 2, of the laws of 2003: 3 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 4 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 5 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 6 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 7 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 8 ments and agencies (09E303ER) (24752) .............................. 9 45,665,000 .......................................... (re. $137,000) 10 Project Schedule 11 PROJECT AMOUNT 12 -------------------------------------------- 13 (thousands of dollars) 14 Local waterfront revitaliza- 15 tion projects ..................... 12,000 16 Parks, recreation and historic 17 preservation projects ............. 12,165 18 Hudson River Park ................... 15,000 19 Stewardship projects ................. 5,750 20 Historic barns projects ................ 750 21 -------------- 22 Total ............................. 45,665 23 ============== 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 25 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 26 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 27 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 28 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 29 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 30 ments and agencies. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 31 $11 million of this appropriation shall support capital projects, 32 excluding personal service costs, eligible and authorized for fund- 33 ing from any office of parks, recreation and historic preservation 34 state park infrastructure fund - 076 appropriation or reappropri- 35 ation, subject to the approval of the director of the budget. 36 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, such expenses shall be 37 paid in the first instance from the state park infrastructure fund - 38 076, then reimbursed from this appropriation, including the transfer 39 of expenses and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 40 1, 2002, up to the limit of $11 million (09E302ER) (24752) ......... 41 47,935,000 .......................................... (re. $404,000) 42 Project Schedule 43 PROJECT AMOUNT 44 -------------------------------------------- 45 (thousands of dollars) 46 Local waterfront revitaliza- 47 tion programs ...................... 6,685 48 Parks, recreation and historic 299 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 preservation projects .............. 7,250 2 Hudson River Park ................... 15,000 3 Stewardship projects ................. 7,000 4 State parks projects ................ 11,000 5 Historic barns projects .............. 1,000 6 -------------- 7 Total ............................. 47,935 8 ============== 9 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000, as amended by chapter 55, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 11 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 12 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 13 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 14 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 15 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 16 ments and agencies (09E300ER) (24752) .............................. 17 46,550,000 .......................................... (re. $736,000) 18 Project Schedule 19 PROJECT AMOUNT 20 -------------------------------------------- 21 (thousands of dollars) 22 Local waterfront revitaliza- 23 tion programs ...................... 7,068 24 Park, recreation and historic 25 preservation projects .............. 7,482 26 Hudson River Park ................... 20,000 27 Stewardship projects ................ 12,000 28 -------------- 29 Total ............................. 46,550 30 ============== 31 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 32 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 33 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 34 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 35 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 36 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 37 ments and agencies (09E399ER) (24752) .............................. 38 44,850,000 .......................................... (re. $202,000) 39 Project Schedule 40 PROJECT AMOUNT 41 -------------------------------------------- 42 (thousands of dollars) 43 Local waterfront revitaliza- 44 tion programs ...................... 4,975 45 Park, recreation and historic 46 preservation projects .............. 6,875 47 Hudson River Park ................... 21,000 48 Stewardship projects ................ 12,000 300 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 -------------- 2 Total ............................. 44,850 3 ============== 4 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998: 5 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 6 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 7 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 8 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 9 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 10 ments, agencies and public authorities (09E398ER) (24752) .......... 11 19,700,000 .......................................... (re. $259,000) 12 project schedule 13 PROJECT AMOUNT 14 -------------------------------------------- 15 (thousands of dollars) 16 Local waterfront revitaliza- 17 tion programs ...................... 5,600 18 Park, recreation and historic 19 preservation projects, 20 including $4,000,000 which 21 shall be made available for 22 services and expenses 23 related to development of 24 the Hudson River Park ............. 13,100 25 Coastal rehabilitation proj- 26 ects ............................... 1,000 27 -------------- 28 Total.............................. 19,700 29 ============== 30 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997, as amended by chapter 54, 31 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 32 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 33 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 34 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 35 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 36 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 37 ments and agencies (09E397ER) (24752) .............................. 38 31,800,000 .......................................... (re. $269,000) 39 project schedule 40 PROJECT AMOUNT 41 -------------------------------------------- 42 (thousands of dollars) 43 Local waterfront revitaliza- 44 tion programs ...................... 8,975 45 Park, recreation and historic 46 preservation projects ............. 14,525 47 Coastal rehabilitation proj- 48 ects .............................. 10,675 301 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 -------------- 2 Total ............................. 34,175 3 ============== 4 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1996, as amended by chapter 55, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 6 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 7 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 8 parks, recreation and historic preservation account in accordance 9 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 10 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 11 ments and agencies (09E396ER) (24752) .............................. 12 21,624,000 .......................................... (re. $563,000) 13 project schedule 14 PROJECT AMOUNT 15 -------------------------------------------- 16 (thousands of dollars) 17 Local waterfront revitaliza- 18 tion programs ...................... 3,000 19 Local waterfront revitaliza- 20 tion projects ...................... 1,500 21 Parks, recreation and historic 22 preservation projects .............. 8,000 23 Parks, recreation and historic 24 preservation projects .............. 8,500 25 Coastal rehabilitation proj- 26 ects ............................... 1,500 27 -------------- 28 Total ............................. 22,500 29 ============== 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1995, as amended by chapter 55, 31 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 32 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 33 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 34 parks, recreation and historic preservation account (71E395ER) 35 (24752) ... 6,340,000 ................................ (re. $16,000) 36 project schedule 37 PROJECT AMOUNT 38 -------------------------------------------- 39 (thousands of dollars) 40 Local waterfront revitaliza- 41 tion plans ......................... 1,300 42 Parks, recreation and historic 43 preservation projects .............. 4,000 44 Coastal rehabilitation proj- 45 ects ............................... 1,200 46 -------------- 47 Total .............................. 6,500 48 ============== 302 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Environmental Protection Fund 3 Solid Waste Account - 30452 4 Environment and Recreation Purpose 5 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is 6 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 7 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 8 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 9 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 10 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 11 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 12 following: 13 Non-hazardous landfill closure projects (09LC25ER) (24813) ........... 14 300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000) 15 Municipal waste reduction or recycling projects, including developing 16 secondary recycling markets in New York state and developing reuse, 17 repair and deconstruction opportunities through municipal and not- 18 for-profit grants. $5,000,000 of such amount shall be made available 19 for municipalities and not-for-profit food banks for projects for 20 food donation and the recycling of food scraps (09MR25ER) (24814) .. 21 21,300,000 ....................................... (re. $21,300,000) 22 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance (09SM25ER) (24816) . 23 650,000 ............................................. (re. $650,000) 24 Pesticide program, not less than $200,000 of which shall be for activ- 25 ities related to Long Island pesticide pollution prevention 26 (09PD25ER) (24818) ... 1,500,000 .................. (re. $1,500,000) 27 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the payment of the costs 28 associated with environmental justice projects and programs, includ- 29 ing but not limited to: monitoring of air quality; education and 30 outreach; (a) $3,800,000 for the connect kids program, including the 31 payment of transportation costs to swim instruction programs in the 32 State at facilities operated by State, municipal and not-for-profit 33 organizations, and for facilitating access in title 1 school 34 districts, municipalities, and not-for-profit organizations to 35 outdoor recreational activities, public lands and parks providing 36 environmental education opportunities in environmental justice, 37 inner city and underserved communities; (b) $4,000,000 of such 38 amount shall be made available for community impact and job training 39 grants. Community impact and job training grants shall be in or 40 affecting environmental justice communities in an amount of up to 41 [$100,000]$200,000 for community groups for projects that address an 42 environmental justice community's exposure to multiple environmental 43 harms and risks, including lead exposure and shall include implemen- 44 tation, studies, including air monitoring, to investigate the envi- 45 ronment, or related public health issues of the community, research 46 that will be used to expand the knowledge or understanding of the 47 affected community and ways to improve the resiliency of the 48 affected community. The results of the investigation shall be 49 disseminated to members of the affected community. Community groups 50 eligible for funding must provide services within the same community 51 as the environmental and/or related public health issues to be 303 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 addressed by the project. Such groups shall be primarily focused on 2 addressing the environmental and/or related public health issues of 3 the residents of the affected community and shall be comprised 4 primarily of members of the affected community; and (c) $1,142,000 5 for the college of environmental science and forestry center for 6 native peoples and the environment (09EJ25ER) (24713) .............. 7 14,300,000 ....................................... (re. $14,300,000) 8 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for natural resource damages 9 assessment, recovery, and restoration (09RD25ER) (24817) ........... 10 1,775,000 ......................................... (re. $1,775,000) 11 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the pollution prevention 12 institute, and including $250,000 for the department to contract 13 with the Northeast waste management officials' association for the 14 Interstate Chemicals Clearing house (09PP25ER) (24815) ............. 15 4,600,000 ......................................... (re. $4,600,000) 16 Environmental health for assessments, testing and actions including 17 but not limited to abatement to address suspected human exposure to 18 chemical, physical and microbiological agents, including contam- 19 inants in drinking water, including projects to combat harmful algal 20 blooms, including vector control for tick-borne illnesses such as 21 lyme disease; (a) including up to $500,000 for the CleanSweepNY 22 program; (b) $4,000,000 for children's environmental health centers, 23 including school and community childhood lead exposure assessment 24 conducted by such centers; (c) not more than $3,850,000 for programs 25 to expand and improve access to local, fresh, nutritional food to 26 nutritionally under-served neighborhoods, including but not limited 27 to the New York State Fresh Connect Program, expanded Supplemental 28 Nutrition Assistance Program access, expanded community supported 29 agriculture program benefits, and the development of expanded tech- 30 nological access for these communities; and (d) $1,000,000 to the 31 State University of New York at Stony Brook directly or through its 32 research foundation, to support research development and any associ- 33 ated testing or pilot projects towards the treatment of water to 34 remove contaminants of emerging concern (09EH25ER) (25703) ......... 35 11,250,000 ....................................... (re. $11,250,000) 36 Brownfield opportunity area grants as authorized pursuant to section 37 970-r of the general municipal law (09BO25ER) (25702) .............. 38 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 40 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 41 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 42 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 43 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 44 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 45 following: 46 Non-hazardous landfill closure projects (09LC24ER) (24813) ........... 47 300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000) 48 Municipal waste reduction or recycling projects, including developing 49 secondary recycling markets in New York state, and $2,500,000 of 50 such amount shall be made available for municipalities and not-for- 51 profit food banks for projects for food donation and the recycling 304 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of food scraps (09MR24ER) (24814) .................................. 2 19,000,000 ....................................... (re. $16,573,000) 3 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance (09SM24ER) (24816) 4 ... 650,000 ......................................... (re. $650,000) 5 Pesticide program, not less than $200,000 of which shall be for activ- 6 ities related to Long Island pesticide pollution prevention 7 (09PD24ER) (24818) ... 1,500,000 .................. (re. $1,331,000) 8 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 9 of any natural resource damages (09RD24ER) (24817) ................. 10 1,775,000 ......................................... (re. $1,775,000) 11 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the pollution prevention 12 institute, and including $250,000 for the department to contract 13 with the Northeast waste management officials' association for the 14 Interstate Chemicals Clearing house (09PP24ER) (24815) ............. 15 4,600,000 ......................................... (re. $4,261,000) 16 Environmental health for assessments, testing and actions including 17 but not limited to abatement to address suspected human exposure to 18 chemical, physical and microbiological agents, including contam- 19 inants in drinking water, including projects to combat harmful algal 20 blooms, including vector control for tick-borne illnesses such as 21 lyme disease; (a) including up to $500,000 for the CleanSweepNY 22 program; (b) $4,000,000 for children's environmental health centers, 23 including school and community childhood lead exposure assessment 24 conducted by such centers; (c) not more than $3,850,000 for programs 25 to expand and improve access to local, fresh, nutritional food to 26 nutritionally underserved neighborhoods, including but not limited 27 to the New York State Fresh Connect Program, expanded Supplemental 28 Nutrition Assistance Program access, expanded community supported 29 agriculture program benefits, and the development of expanded tech- 30 nological access for these communities; and (d) $1,000,000 to the 31 State University of New York at Stony Brook directly or through its 32 research foundation, to support research development and any associ- 33 ated testing or pilot projects towards the treatment of water to 34 remove contaminants of emerging concern (09EH24ER) (25703) ......... 35 11,250,000 ........................................ (re. $9,114,000) 36 Brownfield opportunity area grants as authorized pursuant to section 37 970-r of the general municipal law (09BO24ER) (25702) .............. 38 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 39 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is 40 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 41 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the payment of the costs 42 associated with environmental justice projects and programs, includ- 43 ing but not limited to: monitoring of air quality; education and 44 outreach; (a) $3,000,000 for the connect kids program, including the 45 payment of transportation costs to swim instruction programs in the 46 State at facilities operated by State, municipal and not-for-profit 47 organizations, and for facilitating access in title 1 school 48 districts, municipalities, and not-for-profit organizations to 49 outdoor recreational activities, public lands and parks providing 50 environmental education opportunities in environmental justice, 51 inner city and underserved communities; (b) $4,000,000 of such 305 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 amount shall be made available for community impact and job training 2 grants; including $500,000 of such amount shall be made available to 3 a not-for-profit organization for the purpose of awarding grants on 4 a competitive basis to community groups to build the capacity of 5 such groups, provided that up to ten percent may be made available 6 for administrative costs and/or technical assistance. Community 7 impact and job training grants shall be in or affecting environ- 8 mental justice communities in an amount of up to [$100,000]$200,000 9 for community groups for projects that address an environmental 10 justice community's exposure to multiple environmental harms and 11 risks, including lead exposure and shall include implementation, 12 studies, including air monitoring, to investigate the environment, 13 or related public health issues of the community, research that will 14 be used to expand the knowledge or understanding of the affected 15 community and ways to improve the resiliency of the affected commu- 16 nity. The results of the investigation shall be disseminated to 17 members of the affected community. Community groups eligible for 18 funding must provide services within the same community as the envi- 19 ronmental and/or related public health issues to be addressed by the 20 project. Such groups shall be primarily focused on addressing the 21 environmental and/or related public health issues of the residents 22 of the affected community and shall be comprised primarily of 23 members of the affected community; and (c) $1,142,000 for the 24 college of environmental science and forestry center for native 25 peoples and the environment (09EJ24ER) (24713) ..................... 26 13,000,000 ....................................... (re. $12,063,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 54, 28 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 29 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 30 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 31 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 32 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 33 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 34 following: 35 Non-hazardous landfill closure projects (09LC23ER) (24813) ........... 36 300,000 ............................................. (re. $298,000) 37 Municipal waste reduction or recycling projects, including developing 38 secondary recycling markets in New York state, and $2,500,000 of 39 such amount shall be made available for municipalities and not-for- 40 profit food banks for projects for food donation and the recycling 41 of food scraps (09MR23ER) (24814) .................................. 42 19,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,722,000) 43 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance (09SM23ER) (24816) 44 ... 650,000 ......................................... (re. $650,000) 45 Pesticide program, not less than $200,000 of which shall be for activ- 46 ities related to Long Island pesticide pollution prevention 47 (09PD23ER) (24818) ... 1,500,000 .................. (re. $1,500,000) 48 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 49 of any natural resource damages (09RD23ER) (24817) ................. 50 1,775,000 ......................................... (re. $1,388,000) 306 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Environmental health for assessments, testing and actions including 2 but not limited to abatement to address suspected human exposure to 3 chemical, physical and microbiological agents, including contam- 4 inants in drinking water, including projects to combat harmful algal 5 blooms, including vector control for tick-borne illnesses such as 6 lyme disease; including up to $500,000 for the CleanSweepNY program; 7 and $4,000,000 for children's environmental health centers, includ- 8 ing school and community childhood lead exposure assessment 9 conducted by such centers; and not more than $3,850,000 for programs 10 to expand and improve access to local, fresh, nutritional food to 11 nutritionally under-served neighborhoods, including but not limited 12 to the New York State Fresh Connect Program, expanded Supplemental 13 Nutrition Assistance Program access, expanded community supported 14 agriculture program benefits, and the development of expanded tech- 15 nological access for these communities; $1,000,000 to the State 16 University of New York at Stony Brook directly or through its 17 research foundation, to support research development and any associ- 18 ated testing or pilot projects towards the treatment of water to 19 remove contaminants of emerging concern; and $1,500,000 to the 20 United States Geological Survey for the Long Island Ground Water 21 study (09EH23ER) (25703) ... 12,750,000 ........... (re. $5,464,000) 22 Brownfield opportunity area grants as authorized pursuant to section 23 970-r of the general municipal law (09BO23ER) (25702) .............. 24 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 25 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 26 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is hereby 27 amended and reappropriated to read: 28 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the payment of the costs 29 associated with environmental justice projects and programs, includ- 30 ing but not limited to: monitoring of air quality; education and 31 outreach; $3,000,000 for the connect kids program facilitating 32 access in title 1 school districts, municipalities, and not-for-pro- 33 fit organizations to outdoor recreational activities, public lands 34 and parks providing environmental education opportunities in envi- 35 ronmental justice, inner city and underserved communities; 36 $4,000,000 of such amount shall be made available for community 37 impact and job training grants; including $500,000 of such amount 38 shall be made available to a not-for-profit organization for the 39 purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to community 40 groups to build the capacity of such groups, provided that up to ten 41 percent may be made available for administrative costs and/or tech- 42 nical assistance. Community impact and job training grants shall be 43 in or affecting environmental justice communities in an amount of up 44 to [$100,000]$200,000 for community groups for projects that address 45 an environmental justice community's exposure to multiple environ- 46 mental harms and risks, including lead exposure and shall include 47 implementation, studies, including air monitoring, to investigate 48 the environment, or related public health issues of the community, 49 research that will be used to expand the knowledge or understanding 50 of the affected community and ways to improve the resiliency of the 51 affected community. The results of the investigation shall be 307 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 disseminated to members of the affected community. Community groups 2 eligible for funding must provide services within the same community 3 as the environmental and/or related public health issues to be 4 addressed by the project. Such groups shall be primarily focused on 5 addressing the environmental and/or related public health issues of 6 the residents of the affected community and shall be comprised 7 primarily of members of the affected community; and $746,000 for the 8 college of environmental science and forestry center for native 9 peoples and the environment (09EJ23ER) (24713) ..................... 10 13,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,254,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 12 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 13 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 14 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 15 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 16 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 17 following: 18 Non-hazardous landfill closure projects, including $300,000 for Essex 19 county under an agreement with the department of environmental 20 conservation; and $150,000 for Hamilton county under an agreement 21 with the department of environmental conservation (09LC22ER) (24813) 22 ... 750,000 ......................................... (re. $450,000) 23 Municipal waste reduction or recycling projects, including developing 24 secondary recycling markets in New York state, and $2,500,000 of 25 such amount shall be made available for municipalities and not-for- 26 profit food banks for projects for food donation and the recycling 27 of food scraps (09MR22ER) (24814) .................................. 28 19,000,000 ....................................... (re. $12,315,000) 29 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance (09SM22ER) (24816) 30 ... 650,000 ......................................... (re. $650,000) 31 Pesticide program, not less than $200,000 of which shall be for activ- 32 ities related to Long Island pesticide pollution prevention 33 (09PD22ER) (24818) ... 1,500,000 .................. (re. $1,312,000) 34 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 35 of any natural resource damages (09RD22ER) (24817) ................. 36 1,775,000 ......................................... (re. $1,372,000) 37 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the pollution prevention 38 institute, and including $250,000 for the department to contract 39 with the Northeast waste management officials' association for the 40 Interstate Chemicals Clearing house (09PP22ER) (24815) ............. 41 4,250,000 ......................................... (re. $3,022,000) 42 Environmental health for assessments, testing and actions including 43 but not limited to abatement to address suspected human exposure to 44 chemical, physical and microbiological agents, including contam- 45 inants in drinking water, including projects to combat harmful algal 46 blooms, including vector control for tick-borne illnesses such as 47 lyme disease; including up to $500,000 for the CleanSweepNY program; 48 and $4,000,000 for children's environmental health centers, includ- 49 ing school and community childhood lead exposure assessment 50 conducted by such centers; and not more than $2,350,000 for programs 51 to expand and improve access to local, fresh, nutritional food to 308 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 nutritionally underserved neighborhoods, including but not limited 2 to the New York State Fresh Connect Program, expanded Supplemental 3 Nutrition Assistance Program access, expanded community supported 4 agriculture program benefits, and the development of expanded tech- 5 nological access for these communities; and $1,000,000 to the State 6 University of New York at Stony Brook directly or through its 7 research foundation, to support research development and any associ- 8 ated testing or pilot projects towards wastewater and the treatment 9 of water to remove 1,4 dioxane (09EH22ER) (25703) .................. 10 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,225,000) 11 Brownfield opportunity area grants as authorized pursuant to section 12 970-r of the general municipal law (09BO22ER) (25702) .............. 13 3,950,000 ......................................... (re. $3,950,000) 14 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022 is 15 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 16 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the payment of the costs 17 associated with environmental justice projects and programs, includ- 18 ing but not limited to: monitoring of air quality; education and 19 outreach; $3,000,000 for the connect kids program facilitating 20 access in title 1 school districts, municipalities, and not-for-pro- 21 fit organizations to outdoor recreational activities, public lands 22 and parks and providing environmental education opportunities in 23 environmental justice, inner city and underserved communities; and 24 $4,000,000 of such amount shall be made available for community 25 impact and job training grants; including $500,000 of such amount 26 shall be made available to a not-for-profit organization for the 27 purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to community 28 groups to build the capacity of such groups, provided that up to ten 29 percent may be made available for administrative costs and/or tech- 30 nical assistance. Community impact and job training grants shall be 31 in or affecting environmental justice communities in an amount of up 32 to [$100,000]$200,000 for community groups for projects that address 33 an environmental justice community's exposure to multiple environ- 34 mental harms and risks, including lead exposure and shall include 35 implementation, studies, including air monitoring, to investigate 36 the environment, or related public health issues of the community, 37 research that will be used to expand the knowledge or understanding 38 of the affected community and ways to improve the resiliency of the 39 affected community. The results of the investigation shall be 40 disseminated to members of the affected community. Community groups 41 eligible for funding must provide services within the same community 42 as the environmental and/or related public health issues to be 43 addressed by the project. Such groups shall be primarily focused on 44 addressing the environmental and/or related public health issues of 45 the residents of the affected community and shall be comprised 46 primarily of members of the affected community; and $300,000 to the 47 Adirondack North Country Association for the purposes of the Adiron- 48 dack diversity initiative (09EJ22ER) (24713) ....................... 49 13,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,700,000) 50 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 309 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 2 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 3 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 4 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 5 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 6 following: 7 Non-hazardous landfill closure projects, including $300,000 for Essex 8 county under an agreement with the department of environmental 9 conservation; $150,000 for Hamilton county under an agreement with 10 the department of environmental conservation; and $250,000 for 11 regional municipal solid waste management and waste transportation 12 planning, including for impacted environmental justice communities, 13 associated with impending landfill closures (09LC21ER) (24813) ..... 14 750,000 ............................................. (re. $400,000) 15 Municipal waste reduction or recycling projects, including developing 16 secondary recycling markets in New York state, and $2,000,000 of 17 such amount shall be made available for municipalities and not-for- 18 profit food banks for projects for food donation and the recycling 19 of food scraps (09MR21ER) (24814) .................................. 20 15,300,000 ........................................ (re. $6,868,000) 21 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance (09SM21ER) (24816) 22 ... 200,000 ......................................... (re. $176,000) 23 Pesticide program, not less than $200,000 of which shall be for activ- 24 ities related to Long Island pesticide pollution prevention 25 (09PD21ER) (24818) ... 1,500,000 .................... (re. $898,000) 26 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 27 of any natural resource damages (09RD21ER) (24817) ................. 28 1,775,000 ........................................... (re. $961,000) 29 Environmental health for assessments, testing and actions including 30 but not limited to abatement to address suspected human exposure to 31 chemical, physical and microbiological agents, including contam- 32 inants in drinking water, including projects to combat harmful algal 33 blooms, including vector control for tick-borne illnesses such as 34 lyme disease; including up to $500,000 for the CleanSweepNY program; 35 and $1,000,000 to the State University of New York at Stony Brook, 36 directly or through its research foundation, to support research 37 development and any associated testing or pilot projects towards the 38 treatment of water to remove 1,4-dioxane; and $2,000,000 for chil- 39 dren's environmental health centers, including school and community 40 childhood lead exposure assessment conducted by such centers; not 41 more than $625,000 for programs to expand and improve access to 42 local, fresh, nutritional food to nutritionally underserved neigh- 43 borhoods in New York State through the Fresh Connect Program; and 44 $500,000 to study environmental health impacts, including asthma, 45 caused by new york city airports (09EH21ER) (25703) ................ 46 6,500,000 ......................................... (re. $3,261,000) 47 Brownfield opportunity area grants as authorized pursuant to section 48 970-r of the general municipal law (09BO21ER) (25702) .............. 49 1,750,000 ......................................... (re. $1,750,000) 50 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021, is 51 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 310 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the payment of the costs 2 associated with environmental justice projects and programs, includ- 3 ing but not limited to: monitoring of air quality; education and 4 outreach; $2,000,000 for the connect kids program facilitating 5 access by title 1 schools to outdoor recreational activities, public 6 lands and parks; improvements to environmental quality; or environ- 7 mental job training, in environmental justice, inner city and under- 8 served communities, and which are undertaken by the state, or on 9 behalf of the state by municipalities, or not-for-profit corpo- 10 rations; and $3,000,000 of such amount shall be made available for 11 community impact and job training grants; including $500,000 of such 12 amount shall be made available to a not-for-profit organization for 13 the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to community 14 groups to build the capacity of such groups, provided that up to ten 15 percent may be made available for administrative costs and/or tech- 16 nical assistance. Community impact and job training grants shall be 17 in or affecting environmental justice communities in an amount of up 18 to [$100,000]$200,000 for community groups for projects that address 19 an environmental justice community's exposure to multiple environ- 20 mental harms and risks, including lead exposure and shall include 21 implementation, studies, including air monitoring, to investigate 22 the environment, or related public health issues of the community, 23 research that will be used to expand the knowledge or understanding 24 of the affected community and ways to improve the resiliency of the 25 affected community. The results of the investigation shall be 26 disseminated to members of the affected community. Community groups 27 eligible for funding must provide services within the same community 28 as the environmental and/or related public health issues to be 29 addressed by the project. Such groups shall be primarily focused on 30 addressing the environmental and/or related public health issues of 31 the residents of the affected community and shall be comprised 32 primarily of members of the affected community; and $250,000 to the 33 Adirondack North Country Association for the purposes of the Adiron- 34 dack diversity initiative (09EJ21ER) (24713) ....................... 35 8,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,494,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 37 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 38 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 39 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 40 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 41 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 42 following: 43 Municipal waste reduction or recycling projects, and $2,000,000 of 44 such amount shall be made available for municipalities and not-for- 45 profit food banks for projects for food donation and the recycling 46 of food scraps (09MR20ER) (24814) .................................. 47 15,312,000 ........................................ (re. $1,183,000) 48 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance (09SM20ER) (24816) 49 ... 200,000 ......................................... (re. $200,000) 311 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Pesticide program, not less than $200,000 of which shall be for activ- 2 ities related to Long Island pesticide pollution prevention 3 (09PD20ER) (24818) ... 1,800,000 .................. (re. $1,147,000) 4 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 5 of any natural resource damages (09RD20ER) (24817) ................. 6 2,025,000 ........................................... (re. $451,000) 7 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the pollution prevention 8 institute, and including $100,000 for the department to contract 9 with the Northeast waste management officials' association for the 10 Interstate Chemicals Clearing house (09PP20ER) (24815) ............. 11 4,000,000 ............................................ (re. $73,000) 12 Environmental health for assessments, testing and actions including 13 but not limited to abatement to address suspected human exposure to 14 chemical, physical and microbiological agents, including contam- 15 inants in drinking water, including projects to combat harmful algal 16 blooms, including vector control for tick-borne illnesses such as 17 lyme disease; including up to $500,000 for the CleanSweepNY program; 18 and $1,000,000 to the State University of New York at Stony Brook, 19 directly or through its research foundation, to support research 20 development and any associated testing or pilot projects towards the 21 treatment of water to remove 1,4-dioxane; and $2,000,000 for chil- 22 dren's environmental health centers, including school and community 23 childhood lead exposure assessment conducted by such centers and not 24 more than $625,000 for programs to expand and improve access to 25 local, fresh, nutritional food to nutritionally underserved neigh- 26 borhoods in New York State through the Fresh Connect Program 27 (09EH20ER) (25703) ... 6,500,000 .................. (re. $2,930,000) 28 Brownfield opportunity area grants as authorized pursuant to section 29 970-r of the general municipal law (09BO20ER) (25702) .............. 30 1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000) 31 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020, is 32 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 33 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the payment of the costs 34 associated with environmental justice projects and programs, includ- 35 ing but not limited to: monitoring of air quality; education and 36 outreach; $2,000,000 for the connect kids program facilitating 37 access by title 1 schools to outdoor recreational activities, public 38 lands and parks; improvements to environmental quality; or environ- 39 mental job training, in environmental justice, inner city and under- 40 served communities, and which are undertaken by the state, or on 41 behalf of the state by municipalities, or not-for-profit corpo- 42 rations; and $3,000,000 of such amount shall be made available for 43 community impact and job training grants; including $500,000 of such 44 amount shall be made available to a not-for-profit organization for 45 the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to community 46 groups to build the capacity of such groups, provided that up to ten 47 percent may be made available for administrative costs and/or tech- 48 nical assistance. Community impact and job training grants shall be 49 in or affecting to environmental justice communities in an amount of 50 up to [$100,000]$200,000 for community groups for projects that 51 address an environmental justice community's exposure to multiple 312 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 environmental harms and risks, including lead exposure and shall 2 include implementation, studies, including air monitoring, to inves- 3 tigate the environment, or related public health issues of the 4 community, research that will be used to expand the knowledge or 5 understanding of the affected community and ways to improve the 6 resiliency of the affected community. The results of the investi- 7 gation shall be disseminated to members of the affected community. 8 Community groups eligible for funding must provide services within 9 the same community as the environmental and/or related public health 10 issues to be addressed by the project. Such groups shall be primari- 11 ly focused on addressing the environmental and/or related public 12 health issues of the residents of the affected community and shall 13 be comprised primarily of members of the affected community; and 14 $250,000 to the Adirondack North Country Association for the 15 purposes of the Adirondack diversity initiative (09EJ20ER) (24713) 16 ... 7,000,000 ..................................... (re. $4,431,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 18 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 19 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 20 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 21 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 22 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 23 following: 24 Municipal waste reduction or recycling projects, and $2,000,000 of 25 such amount shall be made available for municipalities and not-for- 26 profit food banks for projects for food donation and the recycling 27 of food scraps (09MR19ER) (24814) .................................. 28 14,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,089,000) 29 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance (09SM19ER) (24816) 30 ... 200,000 ......................................... (re. $200,000) 31 Pesticide program, not less than $200,000 of which shall be for activ- 32 ities related to Long Island pesticide pollution prevention 33 (09PD19ER) (24818) ... 1,800,000 .................... (re. $841,000) 34 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 35 of any natural resource damages (09RD19ER) (24817) ................. 36 2,025,000 ......................................... (re. $1,120,000) 37 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the pollution prevention 38 institute, and including $100,000 for the department to contract 39 with the Northeast waste management officials' association for the 40 Interstate Chemicals Clearing house (09PP19ER) (24815) ............. 41 4,000,000 ........................................... (re. $293,000) 42 Environmental health for assessments, testing and actions including 43 but not limited to abatement to address suspected human exposure to 44 chemical, physical and microbiological agents, including contam- 45 inants in drinking water, including projects to combat harmful algal 46 blooms; including up to $500,000 for the CleanSweepNY program; and 47 $1,000,000 to the State University of New York at Stony Brook, 48 directly or through its research foundation, to support research 49 development and any associated testing or pilot projects towards the 50 treatment of water to remove 1,4-dioxane; and $2,000,000 for chil- 51 dren's environmental health centers, including school and community 313 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 childhood lead exposure assessment conducted by such centers and not 2 more than $625,000 for programs to expand and improve access to 3 local, fresh, nutritional food to nutritionally underserved neigh- 4 borhoods in New York State through the Fresh Connect Program 5 (09EH19ER) (25703) ................................................. 6 6,500,000 ........................................... (re. $780,000) 7 Brownfield opportunity area grants as authorized pursuant to section 8 970-r of the general municipal law (09BO19ER) (25702) .............. 9 1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000) 10 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, is 11 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 12 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the payment of the costs 13 associated with environmental justice projects and programs, includ- 14 ing but not limited to: monitoring of air quality; education and 15 outreach; $1,000,000 for the connect kids program facilitating 16 access by title 1 schools to outdoor recreational activities, public 17 lands and parks; improvements to environmental quality; or environ- 18 mental job training, in environmental justice, inner city and under- 19 served communities, and which are undertaken by the state, or on 20 behalf of the state by municipalities, or not-for-profit corpo- 21 rations; and $3,000,000 of such amount shall be made available for 22 community impact and job training grants; including $500,000 of such 23 amount shall be made available to a not-for-profit organization for 24 the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to community 25 groups to build the capacity of such groups, provided that up to ten 26 percent may be made available for administrative costs and/or tech- 27 nical assistance. Community impact and job training grants shall be 28 in or affecting to environmental justice communities in an amount of 29 up to [$100,000]$200,000 for community groups for projects that 30 address an environmental justice community's exposure to multiple 31 environmental harms and risks, including lead exposure and shall 32 include implementation, studies, including air monitoring, to inves- 33 tigate the environment, or related public health issues of the 34 community, research that will be used to expand the knowledge or 35 understanding of the affected community and ways to improve the 36 resiliency of the affected community. The results of the investi- 37 gation shall be disseminated to members of the affected community. 38 Community groups eligible for funding must provide services within 39 the same community as the environmental and/or related public health 40 issues to be addressed by the project. Such groups shall be primari- 41 ly focused on addressing the environmental and/or related public 42 health issues of the residents of the affected community and shall 43 be comprised primarily of members of the affected community; and 44 $250,000 to the Adirondack North Country Association for the 45 purposes of the Adirondack diversity initiative (09EJ19ER) (24713) 46 ... 7,000,000 ..................................... (re. $3,657,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 48 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 49 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 50 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 314 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 2 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 3 following: 4 Municipal waste reduction or recycling projects, and $2,000,000 of 5 such amount shall be made available for municipalities and not-for- 6 profit food banks for projects for food donation and the recycling 7 of food scraps (09MR18ER) (24814) ... 14,000,000 .... (re. $632,000) 8 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance (09SM18ER) (24816) 9 ... 149,000 ......................................... (re. $149,000) 10 Pesticide program, not less than $200,000 of which shall be for activ- 11 ities related to Long Island pesticide pollution prevention 12 (09PD18ER) (24818) ... 1,800,000 ..................... (re. $11,000) 13 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 14 of any natural resource damages (09RD18ER) (24817) ................. 15 2,025,000 ......................................... (re. $1,325,000) 16 Environmental health for assessments, testing and actions including 17 but not limited to abatement to address suspected human exposure to 18 chemical, physical and microbiological agents, including contam- 19 inants in drinking water, including projects to combat harmful algal 20 blooms; including up to $500,000 for the CleanSweepNY program; and 21 $1,000,000 to the State University of New York at Stony Brook, 22 directly or through its research foundation, to support research 23 development and any associated testing or pilot projects towards the 24 treatment of water to remove 1,4-dioxane; and $2,000,000 for chil- 25 dren's environmental health centers, including school and community 26 childhood lead exposure assessment conducted by such centers and not 27 more than $625,000 for programs to expand and improve access to 28 local, fresh, nutritional food to nutritionally underserved neigh- 29 borhoods in New York State through the Fresh Connect Program; 30 including up to $500,000 to the State University of New York at 31 Stony Brook to provide for a new laboratory testing facility for 32 PFOA and other chemicals (09EH18ER) (25703) ........................ 33 6,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,480,000) 34 Brownfield opportunity area grants as authorized pursuant to section 35 970-r of the general municipal law (09BO18ER) (25702) .............. 36 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,214,000) 37 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, is 38 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 39 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the payment of the costs 40 associated with environmental justice projects and programs, includ- 41 ing but not limited to: monitoring of air quality; education and 42 outreach; not more than $1,000,000 for the connect kids program 43 facilitating access by title 1 schools to outdoor recreational 44 activities, public lands and parks; improvements to environmental 45 quality; or environmental job training, in environmental justice, 46 inner city and underserved communities, and which are undertaken by 47 the state, or on behalf of the state by municipalities or not-for- 48 profit corporations; and $3,000,000 of such amount shall be made 49 available for community impact and job training grants; including 50 $500,000 of such amount shall be made available to a not-for-profit 51 organization for the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive 315 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 basis to community groups to build the capacity of such groups, 2 provided that up to ten percent may be made available for adminis- 3 trative costs and/or technical assistance. Community impact and job 4 training grants shall be in or affecting to environmental justice 5 communities in an amount of up to [$100,000]$200,000 for community 6 groups for projects that address an environmental justice communi- 7 ty's exposure to multiple environmental harms and risks, including 8 lead exposure and shall include implementation, studies, including 9 air monitoring, to investigate the environment, or related public 10 health issues of the community, research that will be used to expand 11 the knowledge or understanding of the affected community and ways to 12 improve the resiliency of the affected community. The results of the 13 investigation shall be disseminated to members of the affected 14 community. Community groups eligible for funding shall be located 15 within the same community as the environmental and/or related public 16 health issues to be addressed by the project. Such groups shall be 17 primarily focused on addressing the environmental and/or related 18 public health issues of the residents of the affected community and 19 shall be comprised primarily of members of the affected community 20 (09EJ18ER) (24713) ................................................. 21 7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,579,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 23 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 24 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 25 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 26 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 27 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 28 following: 29 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance (09SM17ER) (24816) 30 ... 500,000 ......................................... (re. $500,000) 31 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 32 of any natural resource damages (09RD17ER) (24817) ................. 33 3,235,000 ........................................... (re. $996,000) 34 Environmental health for assessments, testing and actions including 35 but not limited to abatement to address suspected human exposure to 36 chemical, physical and microbiological agents, including contam- 37 inants in drinking water; including up to $500,000 for the 38 Clean-SweepNY program; and $1,000,000 to the State University of New 39 York at Stony Brook, directly or through its research foundation, to 40 support research development and any associated testing or pilot 41 projects towards the treatment of water to remove 1,4-dioxane; and 42 $500,000 to land banks to assist with lead abatement; and $2,000,000 43 for children's environmental health centers, including school and 44 community childhood lead exposure assessment conducted by such 45 centers and not more than $625,000 for programs to expand and 46 improve access to local, fresh, nutritional food to nutritionally 47 underserved neighborhoods in New York State through the Fresh 48 Connect Program (09EH17ER) (25703) ... 6,500,000 .. (re. $1,390,000) 49 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, is 50 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 316 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the payment of the costs 2 associated with environmental justice projects and programs, includ- 3 ing but not limited to: monitoring of air quality; education and 4 outreach; no more than $500,000 for the community garden grant 5 program; not more than $1,000,000 for the connect kids program 6 facilitating access by title 1 schools to outdoor recreational 7 activities, public lands and parks; improvements to environmental 8 quality; or environmental job training, in environmental justice, 9 inner city and underserved communities, and which are undertaken by 10 the state, or on behalf of the state by municipalities or not-for- 11 profit corporations; and $3,000,000 of such amount shall be made 12 available for community impact and job training grants; including 13 $500,000 of such amount shall be made available to a not-for-profit 14 organization for the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive 15 basis to community groups to build the capacity of such groups, 16 provided that up to ten percent may be made available for adminis- 17 trative costs and/or technical assistance. Community impact and job 18 training grants shall be in or affecting environmental justice 19 communities in an amount of up to [$100,000]$200,000 for community 20 groups for projects that address an environmental justice communi- 21 ty's exposure to multiple environmental harms and risks, including 22 lead exposure and shall include implementation, studies, including 23 air monitoring, to investigate the environment, or related public 24 health issues of the community, research that will be used to expand 25 the knowledge or understanding of the affected community and ways to 26 improve the resiliency of the affected community. The results of the 27 investigation shall be disseminated to members of the affected 28 community. Community groups eligible for funding shall be located in 29 the same area as the environmental and/or related public health 30 issues to be addressed by the project. Such groups shall be primari- 31 ly focused on addressing the environmental and/or related public 32 health issues of the residents of the affected community and shall 33 be comprised primarily of members of the affected community; 34 $100,000 to the New York City Department of Parks and Recreation for 35 the Rivers Run Community Garden; $100,000 for the Variety Boys and 36 Girls Club of Queens; $20,000 to the Blue Bus Project, Inc.; $25,000 37 to the Harlem Valley Rail Trail Association; and $5,000 to the New 38 York City Department of Parks and Recreation for Prospect Park 39 (09EJ17ER) (24713) ... 8,000,000 .................. (re. $1,379,000) 40 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, is 41 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 42 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 43 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 44 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 45 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 46 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 47 following: 48 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance including productive 49 reuse of cathode ray tubes and energy conservation services projects 50 (09SM16ER) (24816) ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $1,000,000) 317 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the payment of the costs 2 associated with environmental justice projects and programs, includ- 3 ing but not limited to: monitoring of air quality; education and 4 outreach; not more than $500,000 for the connect kids program facil- 5 itating access by title 1 schools to outdoor recreational activ- 6 ities, public lands and parks; improvements to environmental quali- 7 ty; or environmental job training, in environmental justice, inner 8 city and underserved communities, and which are undertaken by the 9 state, or on behalf of the state by municipalities or not-for-profit 10 corporations; [and] $2,000,000 of such amount shall be made avail- 11 able for community impact and job training grants. Community impact 12 and job training grants shall be in or affecting environmental 13 justice communities in an amount of up to $50,000 for community 14 groups for projects that address an environmental justice communi- 15 ty's exposure to multiple environmental harms and risks, including 16 lead exposure and shall include implementation, studies, including 17 air monitoring, to investigate the environment, or related public 18 health issues of the community, research that will be used to expand 19 the knowledge or understanding of the affected community and ways to 20 improve the resiliency of the affected community. The results of the 21 investigation shall be disseminated to members of the affected 22 community. Community groups eligible for funding shall be located in 23 the same area as the environmental and/or related public health 24 issues to be addressed by the project. Such groups shall be primari- 25 ly focused on addressing the environmental and/or related public 26 health issues of the residents of the affected community and shall 27 be comprised primarily of members of the affected community; 28 $200,000 to El Puente de Williamsburg, Inc.; $200,000 to NYC H2O; 29 $200,000 to Hudson River Sloop Clearwater, Inc.; $100,000 to Ulster 30 County for the Shandaken Rail Trail project; $200,000 to Solar One, 31 Inc.; and $50,000 to New York State Arborists, ISA Chapter, Inc. 32 (09EJ16ER) (24713) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $2,884,000) 33 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 34 of any natural resource damages (09RD16ER) (24817) ................. 35 1,950,000 ........................................... (re. $504,000) 36 Environmental health for assessments, testing and actions including 37 but not limited to abatement to address suspected human exposure to 38 chemical, physical and microbiological agents, including contam- 39 inants in drinking water; and $2,000,000 for children's environ- 40 mental health centers, including school and community childhood lead 41 exposure assessment conducted by such centers (09EH16ER) (25703) ... 42 3,000,000 ............................................ (re. $72,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 44 section 1, of the laws of 2017: 45 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 46 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 47 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 48 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 49 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 50 following: 318 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance and energy conserva- 2 tion services projects (09SM15ER) (24816) .......................... 3 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $979,000) 4 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for community impact research 5 grants. Such grants shall be in or affecting environmental justice 6 communities in an amount of up to $50,000 for community groups for 7 projects that address an environmental justice community's exposure 8 to multiple environmental harms and risks. Such projects shall 9 include studies, including air monitoring, to investigate the envi- 10 ronment, or related public health issues of the community, research 11 that will be used to expand the knowledge or understanding of the 12 affected community and ways to improve the resiliency of the 13 affected community. The results of the investigation shall be 14 disseminated to members of the affected community. Community groups 15 eligible for funding shall be located in the same area as the envi- 16 ronmental and/or related public health issues to be addressed by the 17 project. Such groups shall be primarily focused on addressing the 18 environmental and/or related public health issues of the residents 19 of the affected community and shall be comprised primarily of 20 members of the affected community, $100,000 of which shall be made 21 available to the city of Buffalo for lead inspection kits in zip 22 codes of northeast Buffalo previously designated by the Erie County 23 department of health as "communities of concern" where children are 24 at exceptionally high risk for lead poisoning (09EJ15ER) (24713) ... 25 1,100,000 ........................................... (re. $241,000) 26 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 27 of any natural resource damages (09RD15ER) (24817) ................. 28 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $250,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 30 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 31 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 32 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 33 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 34 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 35 following: 36 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance and energy conserva- 37 tion services projects (09SM14ER) (24816) .......................... 38 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 39 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 40 of any natural resource damages (09RD14ER) (24817) ................. 41 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $138,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 43 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 44 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 45 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 46 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 47 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 48 following: 319 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance and energy conserva- 2 tion services projects (09SM13ER) (24816) .......................... 3 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $140,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 5 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 6 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 7 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 8 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 9 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 10 following: 11 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 12 of any natural resource damages (09RD12ER) (24817) ................. 13 175,000 ............................................... (re. $9,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 15 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 16 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 17 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 18 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 19 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 20 following: 21 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance and energy conserva- 22 tion services projects (09SM11ER) (24816) .......................... 23 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $247,000) 24 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 25 of any natural resource damages (09RD11ER) (24817) ................. 26 200,000 ............................................... (re. $1,000) 27 By chapter 99, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 28 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 29 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 30 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 31 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 32 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 33 following: 34 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance and energy conserva- 35 tion services projects (09SM10ER) (24816) .......................... 36 1,000,000 ............................................ (re. $46,000) 37 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 1, 38 section 4, of the laws of 2009: 39 Secondary materials regional marketing assistance and energy conserva- 40 tion services projects (09SM08ER) (24816) .......................... 41 2,500,000 ........................................... (re. $207,000) 42 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 43 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 44 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 45 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 46 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 320 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 location to other state departments and agencies, according to the 2 following: 3 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for assessment and recovery 4 of any natural resource damages to the Hudson River (09RD07ER) 5 (24817) ... 1,300,000 ................................. (re. $4,000) 6 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 55, 7 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 8 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 9 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 10 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 11 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 12 location to other state departments and agencies, including: (a) 13 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $1,300,000 for the assess- 14 ment and recovery of any natural resource damages to the Hudson 15 River; and (b) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $450,000 for 16 a Cornell University program to assess breast cancer and environ- 17 mental risk factors in New York State (09E206ER) (24751) ........... 18 23,770,500 ........................................ (re. $3,175,000) 19 project schedule 20 PROJECT AMOUNT 21 -------------------------------------------- 22 (thousands of dollars) 23 Non-hazardous landfill closure 24 projects ........................... 3,000 25 Municipal waste reduction or 26 recycling projects ................. 8,750 27 Secondary materials regional 28 marketing assistance and 29 energy conservation services 30 projects ........................... 8,750 31 Services and expenses of the 32 assessment and recovery of 33 any natural resource damages 34 to the Hudson River ................ 1,300 35 Pesticides program ................... 2,475 36 -------------- 37 Total ............................. 24,275 38 ============== 39 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 54, 40 section 1, of the laws of 2011: 41 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 42 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 43 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 44 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 45 location to other state departments and agencies, including: (a) 46 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $1,300,000 for the assess- 47 ment and recovery of any natural resource damages to the Hudson 48 River; and (b) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, $450,000 for 49 a Cornell University program to assess breast cancer and environ- 321 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 mental risk factors in New York State (09E205ER) (24751) ........... 2 18,750,000 .......................................... (re. $597,000) 3 project schedule 4 PROJECT AMOUNT 5 -------------------------------------------- 6 (thousands of dollars) 7 Non-hazardous landfill closure 8 projects ........................... 3,000 9 Municipal waste reduction or 10 recycling projects ................. 7,000 11 Secondary materials regional 12 marketing assistance and 13 energy conservation services 14 projects ........................... 7,000 15 Services and expenses of the 16 assessment and recovery of 17 any natural resource damages 18 to the Hudson River ................ 1,300 19 Pesticides program ................... 2,475 20 -------------- 21 Total ............................. 20,775 22 ============== 23 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004: 24 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 25 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 26 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 27 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 28 location to other state departments and agencies (09E204ER) (24751) 29 ... 16,775,000 ........................................ (re. $8,000) 30 project schedule 31 PROJECT AMOUNT 32 -------------------------------------------- 33 (thousands of dollars) 34 Municipal waste reduction or 35 recycling projects ................. 6,500 36 Secondary materials regional 37 marketing assistance and 38 energy conservation services 39 projects ........................... 6,500 40 Services and expenses of the 41 assessment and recovery of 42 any natural resource damages 43 to the Hudson River ................ 1,300 44 Pesticides program ................... 2,475 45 -------------- 46 Total ............................. 16,775 47 ============== 322 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as added by chapter 684, 2 section 2, of the laws of 2003: 3 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 4 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 5 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 6 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 7 location to other state departments and agencies (09E203ER) (24751) 8 ... 16,925,000 ...................................... (re. $637,000) 9 Project Schedule 10 PROJECT AMOUNT 11 -------------------------------------------- 12 (thousands of dollars) 13 Municipal waste reduction or 14 recycling projects ................. 6,500 15 Secondary materials regional 16 marketing assistance and 17 energy conservation services 18 projects ........................... 6,500 19 Services and expenses of the 20 assessment and recovery of 21 any natural resource damages 22 to the Hudson River ................ 1,300 23 Pesticides program ................... 2,625 24 -------------- 25 Total ............................. 16,925 26 ============== 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 28 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 29 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 30 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 31 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 32 location to other state departments and agencies (09E202ER) (24751) 33 ... 14,435,000 ...................................... (re. $134,000) 34 Project Schedule 35 PROJECT AMOUNT 36 -------------------------------------------- 37 (thousands of dollars) 38 Municipal waste reduction or 39 recycling projects ................ 5,255 40 Secondary materials regional 41 marketing assistance and 42 energy conservation services 43 projects .......................... 5,255 44 Services and expenses of the 45 assessment and recovery of 46 any natural resource damages 47 to the Hudson River ............... 1,300 48 Pesticides program .................. 2,625 49 ------------- 323 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Total ............................ 14,435 2 ============= 3 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000, as amended by chapter 55, 4 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 5 For services and expenses of projects and purposes authorized by 6 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 7 solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 8 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subal- 9 location to other state departments and agencies (09E200ER) (24751) 10 ... 22,025,000 ....................................... (re. $19,000) 11 Project Schedule 12 PROJECT AMOUNT 13 -------------------------------------------- 14 (thousands of dollars) 15 Non-hazardous landfill closure 16 projects ........................... 7,000 17 Municipal waste reduction or 18 recycling projects ................. 6,225 19 Secondary materials regional 20 marketing assistance and 21 energy conservation services 22 projects ........................... 5,000 23 Services and expenses of the 24 assessment and recovery of 25 any natural resource damages 26 to the Hudson River ................ 1,300 27 Pesticides program ................... 2,650 28 -------------- 29 Total ............................. 22,175 30 ============== 31 ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AND ENHANCEMENTS (CCP) 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Environmental Protection Fund 34 Open Space Account - 30454 35 Environmental Protection and Enhancements Purpose 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2002, as amended by chapter 55, 37 section 1, of the laws of 2003: 38 For supplemental services and expenses of projects and purposes, 39 including the payment of liabilities incurred during state fiscal 40 year 2001-02 for biodiversity stewardship and research, soil and 41 water conservation districts. Finger Lakes-Lake Ontario Watershed 42 Protection Alliance, Albany Pinebush Preserve Commission, Long 43 Island South Shore Estuary Reserve and Peconic Bay; authorized by 44 section 92-s of the state finance law to receive funding from the 45 open space account in accordance with a programmatic and financial 46 plan to be approved by the director of the budget, including subalo- 47 cation to other state departments and agencies including costs 324 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 related to the acquisition of the following properties: Long Island 2 Sound Coastal Area including Held Property, Long Island South Shore 3 Estuary Reserve, Peconic Pinelands Maritime Reserve Projects, Pine 4 Barrens Core Compatible Growth Area and Critical Resource Area, 5 Western Suffolk/Nassau Special Groundwater Protection Area Under- 6 hill, Inner City/Underserved Community Parks - including Bushwick 7 Inlet, Mount Loretto, Staten Island Greenbelt, Staten Island Wet 8 Woods, Fahnestock State Park, Great Swamp, Lundy Estate, Neversink 9 Highlands, Highlands Greenway Corridor, Mongaup Valley Wildlife 10 Management Area, Shunnemunk Mountain/Moodna Creek/Woodcock Mountain, 11 Sterling Forest, Shawangunk Mountains, Westchester Marine Corridor, 12 Beaverkill/Willowemoc, Hudson River Corridor Estuary/Greenway Trail, 13 Catskill Unfragmented Forest, Long Path, New York City Watershed 14 Lands-Croton, Taconic Ridge/Harlem Valley, Albany Pine Bush, Olana 15 Viewshed, Five Rivers Environmental Education Center, Tivoli 16 Preserve, Pilot Knob, Floodwood Camp, Lake Champlain Shoreline and 17 Wetlands, Wilton Wildlife Preserve and Park, National Lead/Tahawus, 18 Undeveloped Lake George Shore, Whitney Park, Recreational Trail 19 Linkages and Networks, Bog River/Beaver River Headwater Complex, 20 Eastern Lake Ontario Shoreline and Islands, Minnehaha Tract, Maumee 21 Swamp, Moose River Corridor, Tug Hill Core Forests and Headwater 22 Streams, Rome Sand Plains, Nelson Swamp, Genesee 23 Greenway/Recreationway, Genny-Green Trail/Link Trail, Northern 24 Montezuma Wetlands, Hemlock/Canadice/Honeoye Lakes, Allegany State 25 Park, Alder Bottom/French Creek, Great Lakes & Niagara River Access, 26 Shore Lands & Vistas, Salmon River Corridor, Braddock Bay, Clark 27 Reservation State Park, Chautauqua Lake Access, Shore Lands and 28 Vistas, Randolf Swamp, Eighteen Mile Creek/Hampton Brook Woods, 29 Delaware River Tailwaters, Statewide Small Projects, Working Forest 30 Lands/Conservation Easements - Cedarlands, Working Forest 31 Lands/Conservation Easements - Champion International Inc., Working 32 Forest Lands/Conservation Easements-Domtar Inc., Working Forest 33 Lands/Conservation Easements-Boeselager Forestry, and Working Forest 34 Lands/Conservation Easements-Clerical Medical Forestry (09E702EA) 35 (24716) ... 63,330,000 ............................... (re. $16,000) 36 Project Schedule 37 PROJECT AMOUNT 38 -------------------------------------------- 39 (thousands of dollars) 40 Land acquisition .................... 38,000 41 Hudson River Estuary Manage- 42 ment Plan .......................... 5,800 43 Biodiversity stewardship and 44 research ............................. 750 45 County agriculture and farm- 46 land protection activities ......... 8,000 47 Non-point source abatement and 48 control projects ................... 6,000 49 Soil and water conservation 50 districts .......................... 1,860 51 Finger Lakes-Lake Ontario 325 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Watershed Protection Alli- 2 ance ............................... 1,300 3 Albany Pine Bush Preserve 4 Commission ........................... 370 5 Long Island Central Pine 6 Barrens Planning ..................... 700 7 Long Island South Shore Estu- 8 ary Reserve .......................... 350 9 Peconic Bay ............................ 200 10 -------------- 11 Total ............................. 63,330 12 ============== 13 Capital Projects Funds - Other 14 Environmental Protection Fund 15 Parks, Recreation and Historic Preservation Account - 30453 16 Environmental Protection and Enhancements Purpose 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 18 For supplemental services and expenses of projects and purposes 19 authorized by section 92-s of the state finance law to receive fund- 20 ing from the parks, recreation and historic preservation account in 21 accordance with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by 22 the director of the budget, including suballocation to other state 23 departments and agencies. Notwithstanding any other law to the 24 contrary, $10 million of this appropriation shall support capital 25 projects, excluding personal service costs, eligible and authorized 26 for funding from any office of parks, recreation and historic pres- 27 ervation state parks infrastructure fund-076 appropriation or reap- 28 propriation, subject to the approval of the director of the budget. 29 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, such expenses shall be 30 paid in the first instance from the state parks infrastructure fund 31 - 076, then reimbursed from this appropriation, including the trans- 32 fer of expenses and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 33 April 1, 2002, up to the limit of $10 million (09E602EA) (24715) ... 34 47,750,000 ........................................ (re. $1,498,000) 35 Project Schedule 36 PROJECT AMOUNT 37 -------------------------------------------- 38 (thousands of dollars) 39 Local waterfront revitaliza- 40 tion programs ...................... 6,750 41 Parks, recreation and historic 42 preservation projects .............. 8,500 43 Hudson River Park ................... 15,000 44 Stewardship projects ................. 6,500 45 State parks projects ................ 10,000 46 Historic barns projects .............. 1,000 47 -------------- 48 Total ............................. 47,750 49 ============== 326 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000: 2 For services and expenses of projects to receive funding from the 3 parks, recreation, and historic preservation account, in accordance 4 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 5 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 6 ments, agencies, public benefit corporations and public authorities 7 (09E500EA) (24715) ... 10,000,000 ................. (re. $1,467,000) 8 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 9 For services and expenses of projects to receive funding from the 10 parks, recreation and historic preservation account, in accordance 11 with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by the direc- 12 tor of the budget, including suballocation to other state depart- 13 ments, agencies, public benefit corporations and public authorities 14 (09E699EA) (24715) ... 26,650,000 ................... (re. $858,000) 15 Capital Projects Funds - Other 16 Environmental Protection Fund 17 Solid Waste Account - 30452 18 Environmental Protection and Enhancements Purpose 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 20 For supplemental services and expenses of projects and purposes, 21 including the payment of liabilities incurred during state fiscal 22 year 2001-02 for natural resource damages and pesticides program, 23 authorized by section 92-s of the state finance law to receive fund- 24 ing from the solid waste account in accordance with a programmatic 25 and financial plan to be approved by the director of the budget, 26 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 27 (09E502EA) (24714) ... 13,920,000 ................... (re. $114,000) 28 Project Schedule 29 PROJECT AMOUNT 30 -------------------------------------------- 31 (thousands of dollars) 32 Municipal waste reduction or 33 recycling projects ................. 5,000 34 Secondary materials regional 35 marketing assistance and 36 energy conservation services 37 projects ........................... 4,995 38 Services and expenses of the 39 assessment and recovery of 40 any natural resource damages 41 to the Hudson River ................ 1,300 42 Pesticides program ................... 2,625 43 -------------- 44 Total ............................. 13,920 45 ============== 46 ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY BOND ACT FUND (CCP) 327 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Environmental Quality Bond Act Fund 3 Environmental Quality Bond Act Fund Account - 30670 4 Bond Proceeds Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1992, as amended by chapter 55, 6 section 1, of the laws of 1996: 7 The sum of $209,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary is 8 hereby appropriated from the "environmental quality bond act fund" 9 as established by section 97-d of the state finance law for payment 10 to the capital projects fund for disbursements from such fund as 11 certified by the state comptroller as: "Hazardous Waste Site Remedi- 12 ation Disbursements," "Municipal Landfill Closure Disbursements," 13 "Land Acquisition, Preservation and Improvement Disbursements," and 14 "Historic Preservation, Municipal Park and Urban Cultural Parks 15 Disbursements." The director of the budget is hereby authorized to 16 designate to the state comptroller appropriations made from the 17 capital projects fund in accordance with the provisions of article 18 52 of the environmental conservation law for the purposes heretofore 19 specified. The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each 20 month certify to the director of the budget, the chairman of the 21 senate finance committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and 22 means committee, the amounts disbursed from the appropriations 23 designated by the director of the budget for each of the purposes 24 herein enumerated for the month preceding such certification and 25 such certifications shall not exceed in the aggregate the moneys 26 appropriated therefor from the capital projects fund. A copy of each 27 such certification shall also be delivered to the public officers of 28 the respective state department or agency to which such capital 29 projects fund appropriations are made available (71109210) (80914) 30 ... 209,000,000 .................................. (re. $27,200,000) 31 ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY PROTECTION FUND (CCP) 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Environmental Quality Protection Fund 34 Environmental Quality Protection Account - 30640 35 Bond Proceeds Purpose 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1992, as amended by chapter 55, 37 section 1, of the laws of 1996: 38 The sum of $84,369,000, or so much thereof as may be necessary is 39 hereby appropriated from the "environmental quality protection fund" 40 as established by section 97-a of the state finance law for payment 41 to the capital projects fund for disbursements from such fund as 42 certified by the state comptroller as: "Water Quality Improvement 43 Disbursements," "State Air Quality Improvement Disbursements," 44 "Municipal Air Quality Improvement Disbursements," "Land Preserva- 45 tion and Improvement Disbursements," "Municipal Solid Waste Manage- 46 ment Disbursements," and "Park Lands Disbursements." 47 The director of the budget is hereby authorized to designate to the 48 state comptroller appropriations made from the capital projects fund 328 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 in accordance with the provisions of article 51 of the environmental 2 conservation law for the purposes heretofore specified. 3 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 4 to the director of the budget, the chairman of the senate finance 5 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means commit- 6 tee, the amounts disbursed from the appropriations designated by the 7 director of the budget for each of the purposes herein enumerated 8 for the month preceding such certification and such certifications 9 shall not exceed in the aggregate the moneys appropriated therefor 10 from the capital projects fund. A copy of each such certification 11 shall also be delivered to the public officers of the respective 12 state department or agency to which such capital projects fund 13 appropriations are made available (71059210) (80906) ............... 14 84,369,000 ....................................... (re. $14,622,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 9, of the laws of 1981, as amended by chapter 55, 16 section 1, of the laws of 1996: 17 The sum of seven hundred fifty-nine million nine hundred eighty-one 18 thousand two hundred eighty dollars ($759,981,280), or so much ther- 19 eof as may be necessary is hereby appropriated from the "environ- 20 mental quality protection fund" as established by section 97-a of 21 the state finance law for payment to the capital projects fund for 22 disbursements from such fund as certified by the state comptroller 23 as: "Water Quality Improvement Disbursements," "State Air Quality 24 Improvement Disbursements," "Municipal Air Quality Improvement 25 Disbursements," "Land Preservation and Improvement Disbursements," 26 "Municipal Solid Waste Management Disbursements," and "Park Lands 27 Disbursements." 28 The director of the budget is hereby authorized to designate to the 29 state comptroller appropriations made from the capital projects fund 30 in accordance with the provisions of article fifty-one of the envi- 31 ronmental conservation law for the purposes heretofore specified. 32 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 33 to the director of the budget, the chairman of the senate finance 34 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means commit- 35 tee, the amounts disbursed from the appropriations designated by the 36 director of the budget for each of the purposes herein enumerated 37 for the month preceding such certification and such certifications 38 shall not exceed in the aggregate the moneys appropriated therefor 39 from the capital projects fund. A copy of each such certification 40 shall also be delivered to the public officers of the respective 41 state department or agency to which such capital projects fund 42 appropriations are made available (01371610) (80906) ............... 43 ..................................................... (re. $533,000) 44 ENVIRONMENTAL RESTORATION - CLEAN WATER/CLEAN AIR (CCP) 45 Capital Projects Funds - Other 46 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 47 Environmental Restoration Purpose 48 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 329 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 2 environmental restoration projects in accordance with the provisions 3 of title 5 of article 56 of the environmental conservation law for 4 project costs, including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto 5 and for payment of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air 6 implementation fund for services and expenses of state departments 7 and agencies, including fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as 8 "Environmental Restoration Project Disbursements". The moneys appro- 9 priated herein may be suballocated to other state departments and 10 agencies. 11 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 12 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for environmental 13 restoration projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the 14 environmental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 15 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 16 budget. 17 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 18 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 19 environmental conservation, the chairman of the senate finance 20 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 21 the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for "Environmental 22 Restoration Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such 23 certification (09BA02W5) (24838) ................................... 24 75,000,000 .......................................... (re. $479,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2001: 26 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 27 environmental restoration projects in accordance with the provisions 28 of title 5 of article 56 of the environmental conservation law for 29 project costs, including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto 30 and for payment of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air 31 implementation fund for services and expenses of state departments 32 and agencies, including fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as 33 "Environmental Restoration Project Disbursements". The moneys appro- 34 priated herein may be suballocated to other state departments and 35 agencies. 36 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 37 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for environmental 38 restoration projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the 39 environmental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 40 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 41 budget. 42 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 43 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 44 environmental conservation, the chairman of the senate finance 45 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 46 the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for "Environmental 47 Restoration Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such 48 certification (09BA01W5) (24838) ... 25,000,000 ...... (re. $10,000) 49 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 330 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 2 environmental restoration projects in accordance with the provisions 3 of title 5 of article 56 of the environmental conservation law for 4 project costs, including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto 5 and for payment of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air 6 implementation fund for services and expenses of state departments 7 and agencies, including fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as 8 "Environmental Restoration Project Disbursements". The moneys appro- 9 priated herein may be suballocated to other state departments and 10 agencies. 11 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 12 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for environmental 13 restoration projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the 14 environmental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 15 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 16 budget. 17 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 18 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 19 environmental conservation, the chairman of the senate finance 20 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 21 the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for "Environmental 22 Restoration Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such 23 certification (09BA99W5) (24838) ... 10,000,000 ..... (re. $116,000) 24 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998: 25 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 26 environmental restoration projects in accordance with the provisions 27 of title 5 of article 56 of the environmental conservation law for 28 project costs, including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto 29 and for payment of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air 30 implementation fund for services and expenses of state departments 31 and agencies, including fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as 32 "Environmental Restoration Project Disbursements". The moneys appro- 33 priated herein may be suballocated to other state departments and 34 agencies. 35 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 36 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for environmental 37 restoration projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the 38 environmental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 39 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 40 budget. 41 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 42 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 43 environmental conservation, the chairman of the senate finance 44 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 45 the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for "Environmental 46 Restoration Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such 47 certification (09BA98W5) (24838) ... 10,000,000 ...... (re. $22,000) 48 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997: 49 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 50 environmental restoration projects in accordance with the provisions 331 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of title 5 of article 56 of the environmental conservation law for 2 project costs, including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto 3 and for payment of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air 4 implementation fund for services and expenses of state departments 5 and agencies, including fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as 6 "Environmental Restoration Project Disbursements". The moneys appro- 7 priated herein may be suballocated to other state departments and 8 agencies. 9 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 10 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for environmental 11 restoration projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the 12 environmental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 13 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 14 budget. 15 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 16 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 17 environmental conservation, the chairman of the senate finance 18 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 19 the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for "Environmental 20 Restoration Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such 21 certification (09BA97W5) (24838) ... 20,000,000 .. (re. $20,000,000) 22 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) 23 Capital Projects Funds - Other 24 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 25 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 27 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 28 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs 29 (09FM24MO) (81107) ... 9,500,000 .................. (re. $9,500,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 31 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 32 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs 33 (09FM23MO) (81107) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $6,000,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 35 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 36 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs 37 (09FM21MO) (81107) ... 6,000,000 .................... (re. $750,000) 38 FISH AND WILDLIFE (CCP) 39 Capital Projects Funds - Other 40 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 41 Fish and Wildlife Purpose 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 43 For the purchase of capital equipment and for the renovation, rehabil- 44 itation and reconstruction of the department of environmental 332 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 conservation's fish hatcheries including personal service, fringe 2 benefits and indirect costs (09HE2454) (24839) ..................... 3 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 5 For the purchase of capital equipment and for the renovation, rehabil- 6 itation and reconstruction of the department of environmental 7 conservation's fish hatcheries including personal service, fringe 8 benefits and indirect costs (09HE1354) (24839) ..................... 9 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 11 For the purchase of capital equipment and for the renovation, rehabil- 12 itation and reconstruction of the department of environmental 13 conservation's fish hatcheries including personal service, fringe 14 benefits and indirect costs (09HE1254) (24839) ..................... 15 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 17 For the purchase of capital equipment and for the renovation, rehabil- 18 itation and reconstruction of the department of environmental 19 conservation's fish hatcheries including personal services and 20 fringe benefits and indirect costs (09HE1154) (24839) .............. 21 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 22 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 23 For the purchase of capital equipment and for the renovation, rehabil- 24 itation and reconstruction of the department of environmental 25 conservation's fish hatcheries including personal services and 26 fringe benefits and indirect costs (09HE0954) (24839) .............. 27 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $136,000) 28 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 55, 29 section 1, of the laws of 2004: 30 For rehabilitation and improvements of fishing access sites including 31 personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs (09FA0354) 32 (24841) ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $409,000) 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 35 Habitat Conservation and Access Account - 32217 36 Fish and Wildlife Purpose 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 38 For services and expenses, including personal service, nonpersonal 39 service, fringe benefits and indirect costs related to management, 40 protection and restoration fish and wildlife habitat, and improve- 41 ment and development of public access for fish and wildlife related 42 recreation (09HC2554) (24718) ...................................... 43 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,902,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 333 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses, including personal service, nonpersonal 2 service, fringe benefits and indirect costs related to management, 3 protection and restoration fish and wildlife habitat, and improve- 4 ment and development of public access for fish and wildlife related 5 recreation (09HC2454) (24718) ...................................... 6 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,155,000) 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 9 Endangered and Threatened Species Mitigation Bank Fund - 32228 10 Fish and Wildlife Purpose 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 12 For services and expenses, related to the projects undertaken to 13 facilitate a net conservation benefit to endangered and threatened 14 species potentially impacted by a major renewable energy facility as 15 put forth in section 11-0535-c of environmental conservation law, 16 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 17 (09ES2554) (62034) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 19 For services and expenses, related to the projects undertaken to 20 facilitate a net conservation benefit to endangered and threatened 21 species potentially impacted by a major renewable energy facility as 22 put forth in section 11-0535-c of environmental conservation law, 23 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 24 (09ES2454) (62034) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 For services and expenses, related to the projects undertaken to 27 facilitate a net conservation benefit to endangered and threatened 28 species potentially impacted by a major renewable energy facility as 29 put forth in section 11-0535-c of environmental conservation law, 30 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 31 (09ES2354) (62034) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000) 32 LANDS AND FORESTS (CCP) 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 35 Lands and Forests Purpose 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 37 For services and expenses, including personal service, nonpersonal 38 service, indirect costs and fringe benefits related to the steward- 39 ship of newly acquired and existing state lands, for the implementa- 40 tion of Unit Management Plans, costs related to invasive species 41 management activities and for the development and implementation of 42 Green Certification for state forests, including suballocation to 43 other state departments and agencies (09LF2553) (25766) ............ 44 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000) 334 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 For the purchase and replacement of equipment and facility improve- 3 ments, including air monitoring, maintenance of facilities and emer- 4 gency response in support of public safety, including personal 5 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs (09PS2453) (24846) .... 6 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $656,000) 7 For services and expenses, including but not limited to personal 8 service, fringe benefits, and non-personal services, for the purpose 9 of awarding grants on a competitive basis for tree planting in 10 support of resilient reforestation and urban forests, including but 11 not limited to not-for-profit organizations and municipalities 12 (09TP2457) (24697) ... 15,000,000 ................ (re. $15,000,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 14 For the purchase and replacement of equipment and facility improve- 15 ments, including air monitoring, maintenance of facilities and emer- 16 gency response in support of public safety, including personal 17 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs (09PS2353) (24846) .... 18 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $472,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 20 For services and expenses, including personal service, nonpersonal 21 service, indirect costs and fringe benefits related to the steward- 22 ship of newly acquired and existing state lands, for the implementa- 23 tion of Unit Management Plans, costs related to invasive species 24 management activities and for the development and implementation of 25 Green Certification for state forests, including suballocation to 26 other state departments and agencies (09LF2253) (25766) ............ 27 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,264,000) 28 For the purchase and replacement of equipment and facility improve- 29 ments, including air monitoring, maintenance of facilities and emer- 30 gency response in support of public safety, including personal 31 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs (09PS2253) (24846) .... 32 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 34 For the purchase and replacement of equipment and facility improve- 35 ments, including air monitoring, maintenance of facilities and emer- 36 gency response in support of public safety, including personal 37 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs (09PS2153) (24846) .... 38 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $450,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 40 For the purchase and replacement of equipment and facility improve- 41 ments, including air monitoring, maintenance of facilities and emer- 42 gency response in support of public safety, including personal 43 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs (09PS2053) (24846) ... 44 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $840,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 46 For services and expenses, including personal service, non-personal 47 service, indirect costs and fringe benefits related to the steward- 335 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ship of newly acquired and existing state lands, for the implementa- 2 tion of Unit Management Plans, costs related to invasive species 3 management activities and for the development and implementation of 4 Green Certification for state forests, including suballocation to 5 other state departments and agencies (09LF1953) (25766) ............ 6 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,699,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 8 For services and expenses, including personal service, non-personal 9 service, indirect costs and fringe benefits related to the steward- 10 ship of newly acquired and existing state lands, for the implementa- 11 tion of Unit Management Plans, costs related to invasive species 12 management activities and for the development and implementation of 13 Green Certification for state forests, including suballocation to 14 other state departments and agencies (09LF1853) (25766) ............ 15 5,000,000 ............................................ (re. $33,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 17 For the purchase and replacement of equipment and facility improve- 18 ments, including air monitoring, maintenance of facilities and emer- 19 gency response in support of public safety, including personal 20 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs (09PS1753) (24846) .... 21 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $533,000) 22 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 23 For the purchase and replacement of equipment and facility improve- 24 ments, including air monitoring, maintenance of facilities and emer- 25 gency response in support of public safety, including personal 26 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs (09PS1653) (24846) .... 27 500,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 29 For the purchase and replacement of equipment and facility improve- 30 ments, including air monitoring, maintenance of facilities and emer- 31 gency response in support of public safety, including personal 32 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs (09PS1553) (24846) 33 2,500,000 ........................................... (re. $754,000) 34 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 35 For services and expenses, including necessary consultant costs, for 36 judgement or settlement payments related to land acquisition claims 37 or cases, pursuant to section 503 of the eminent domain procedure 38 law or article 78 of the civil practice law and rules (09AA0953) 39 (24848) ... 15,000,000 ........................... (re. $15,000,000) 40 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 41 For services and expenses, including necessary consultant costs, for 42 judgement or settlement payments related to land acquisition claims 43 or cases, pursuant to section 503 of the eminent domain procedure 44 law or article 78 of the civil practice law and rules (09AA0753) 45 (24848) ... 4,300,000 ............................. (re. $4,300,000) 336 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2001, as amended by chapter 55, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2003: 3 For the state's share of Federal Transportation Efficiency Act of the 4 21st Century program grants including personal services and fringe 5 benefits (09IT0153) (24850) ... 2,532,000 ......... (re. $2,325,000) 6 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000: 7 For services and expenses, including necessary consultant costs, for 8 judgement or settlement payments related to land acquisition claims 9 or cases brought before the court of claims or the supreme court, 10 pursuant to section 503 of the eminent domain procedure law or arti- 11 cle 78 of the civil practice law and rules (09AA0053) (24848) ...... 12 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1993: 14 For services and expenses including necessary consultant costs, for 15 judgment or settlement payments related to land acquisition claims 16 or cases brought before the court of claims or the supreme court, 17 pursuant to section 503 of the eminent domain procedure law or arti- 18 cle 78 of the civil practice law and rules (09AA9353) (24848) ...... 19 18,800,000 .......................................... (re. $596,000) 20 Capital Projects Funds - Other 21 Forest Preserve Expansion Fund 22 Forest Preserve Expansion Account - 31450 23 Lands and Forests Purpose 24 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1996: 25 For the acquisition of additional lands for the forest preserve within 26 either the Adirondack or Catskill parks, in accordance with the 27 provisions of section 97-e of the state finance law (09999653) 28 (24853) ... 20,000 ................................... (re. $20,000) 29 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 30 Federal Capital Projects Fund 31 ENCON Federal Capital Account - 31364 32 Lands and Forests Purpose 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 34 For the federal share of capital projects pursuant to lands and 35 forests resources purposes including the costs associated with the 36 acquisition of lands under the forest legacy program, including 37 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (09FL2553) 38 (24847) ... 1,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,000,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 40 For the federal share of capital projects pursuant to lands and 41 forests resources purposes including the costs associated with the 42 acquisition of lands under the forest legacy program, including 43 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (09FL2453) 44 (24847) ... 1,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,000,000) 337 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 For the federal share of capital projects pursuant to lands and 3 forests resources purposes including the costs associated with the 4 acquisition of lands under the forest legacy program, including 5 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (09FL2353) 6 (24847) ... 60,000,000 ........................... (re. $60,000,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 8 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 9 For the federal share of capital projects pursuant to lands and 10 forests resources purposes including the costs associated with the 11 acquisition of lands under the forest legacy program, including 12 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (09FL2253) 13 (24847) ... 50,000,000 ........................... (re. $25,000,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 15 For the federal share of capital projects pursuant to lands and 16 forests resources purposes including the costs associated with the 17 acquisition of lands under the forest legacy program, including 18 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (09FL1853) 19 (24847) ... 10,000,000 ........................... (re. $10,000,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 21 For the federal share of capital projects pursuant to lands and 22 forests resources purposes including the costs associated with the 23 acquisition of lands under the forest legacy program, including 24 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (09FL1753) 25 (24847) ... 10,000,000 ........................... (re. $10,000,000) 26 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 27 For the federal share of costs associated with the acquisition of 28 lands under the forest legacy program, including suballocation to 29 other state departments and agencies (09FL1653) (24847) ............ 30 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 32 For the federal share of costs associated with the acquisition of 33 lands under the forest legacy program, including suballocation to 34 other state departments and agencies (09FL1353) (24847) ............ 35 1,900,000 ........................................... (re. $639,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 37 For the federal share of costs associated with the acquisition of 38 lands under the forest legacy program, including suballocation to 39 other state departments and agencies (09FL1153) (24847) ............ 40 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,910,000) 41 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 42 For the federal share of costs associated with the acquisition of 43 lands under the forest legacy program, including suballocation to 44 other state departments and agencies (09FL0853) (24847) ............ 45 2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $208,000) 338 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 2 For the federal share of costs associated with the acquisition of 3 lands under the forest legacy program, including suballocation to 4 other state departments and agencies (09FL0753) (24847) ............ 5 2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $165,000) 6 Capital Projects Funds - Other 7 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 8 DEC Land Transfer Account - 32226 9 Lands and Forests Purpose 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 11 For services and capital expenses related to land acquisition through 12 the conveyances of real property in accordance with section 03-0301 13 of Environmental Conservation Law, section 49-0307 of Environmental 14 Conservation Law, sections 03-2 and 30-A of Public Lands Law, or any 15 other law authorizing the conveyance of state land (09LT2153) 16 (25740) ... 1,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,000,000) 17 MARINE RESOURCES (CCP) 18 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 19 Federal Capital Projects Fund 20 ENCON Federal Capital Account - 31364 21 Marine Projects Purpose 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 23 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to fish 24 and wildlife and marine resources purposes including the acquisition 25 of property including suballocation to other state departments and 26 agencies (09MR25A1) (24708) ... 1,000,000 ......... (re. $1,000,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 28 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to fish 29 and wildlife and marine resources purposes including the acquisition 30 of property including suballocation to other state departments and 31 agencies (09MR24A1) (24708) ... 1,000,000 ......... (re. $1,000,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 33 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to fish 34 and wildlife and marine resources purposes including the acquisition 35 of property including suballocation to other state departments and 36 agencies (09MR23A1) (24708) ........................................ 37 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,000,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 39 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to fish 40 and wildlife and marine resources purposes including the acquisition 41 of property including suballocation to other state departments and 42 agencies (09MR21A1) (24708) ... 10,000,000 ....... (re. $10,000,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 339 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to fish 2 and wildlife and marine resources purposes including the acquisition 3 of property including suballocation to other state departments and 4 agencies (09MR20A1) (24708) ... 10,000,000 ........ (re. $7,055,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 6 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to fish 7 and wildlife and marine resources purposes including the acquisition 8 of property including suballocation to other state departments and 9 agencies (09MR19A1) (24708) ... 10,000,000 ........ (re. $4,276,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 11 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to fish 12 and wildlife and marine resources purposes including the acquisition 13 of property including suballocation to other state departments and 14 agencies (09MR17A1) (24708) ... 5,000,000 ......... (re. $1,140,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 16 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to fish 17 and wildlife and marine resources purposes including the acquisition 18 of property including suballocation to other state departments and 19 agencies (09MR15A1) (24708) ... 5,000,000 ......... (re. $1,150,000) 20 NEW YORK WORKS (CCP) 21 Capital Projects Funds - Other 22 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 23 Flood Control Purpose 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2015: 26 For New York Works Infrastructure projects to improve and enhance 27 water management infrastructure and public safety with respect to 28 flood management, including but not limited to various dam safety 29 projects and the demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned 30 land; various flood protection projects including the state share of 31 federal sponsored flood control projects, and the maintenance of 32 flood control projects, including Western NY, Ithaca and Syracuse 33 Channel; the state share of various shore protection projects, 34 including Long Island Coastal Erosion projects and Coney Island/Sea 35 Gate Beach, including an advance payment by the state for the local 36 costs of various shore protection projects, including personal 37 service, non-personal service, fringe benefits and indirect costs 38 and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2012, 39 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 40 (09NY1263) (25769) ... 101,743,000 ................ (re. $5,175,000) 41 Capital Projects Funds - Other 42 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 43 Operational Services Purpose 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 340 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to New York Works 2 projects including but not limited to air monitoring infrastructure 3 investments; remediation of legacy environmental contamination; 4 investments in information technology; dam safety projects and the 5 demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned land; state-owned 6 flood protection projects; shore protection projects; state land 7 stewardship, public access and environmental and recreation infras- 8 tructure projects, vehicles and equipment; water quality improvement 9 projects, fish hatcheries; rehabilitation and improvements of vari- 10 ous department facilities and systems; and well plugging; up to 11 $10,000,000 for the Conklingville, Indian Lake, Sixth Lake and Old 12 Forge Dams; up to $5,000,000 for the Albany Pine Bush Preserve 13 Commission; including personal service, nonpersonal service and 14 fringe benefits, including suballocation to any other state depart- 15 ment, agency, public authority or public benefit corporation 16 (09NY2551) (25768) ... 90,000,000 ................ (re. $89,887,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 18 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to New York Works 19 projects including but not limited to air monitoring infrastructure 20 investments; remediation of legacy environmental contamination; 21 investments in information technology; dam safety projects and the 22 demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned land; state-owned 23 flood protection projects; shore protection projects; state land 24 stewardship, public access and environmental and recreation infras- 25 tructure projects, vehicles and equipment; water quality improvement 26 projects, fish hatcheries; rehabilitation and improvements of vari- 27 ous department facilities and systems; and well plugging; up to 28 $20,000,000 for the Conklingville, Sixth Lake and Old Forge Dams; 29 notwithstanding any law to the contrary, up to $1,500,000 to the 30 Town of North Elba for the Adirondack Loj Road resurfacing project; 31 including personal service, nonpersonal service and fringe benefits, 32 including suballocation to any other state department, agency, 33 public authority or public benefit corporation (09NY2451) (25768) 34 ... 90,000,000 ................................... (re. $79,643,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 36 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to New York Works 37 projects including but not limited to air monitoring infrastructure 38 investments; remediation of legacy environmental contamination; 39 investments in information technology; dam safety projects and the 40 demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned land; state-owned 41 flood protection projects; shore protection projects; state land 42 stewardship, public access and environmental and recreation infras- 43 tructure projects, vehicles and equipment; water quality improvement 44 projects, fish hatcheries; rehabilitation and improvements of vari- 45 ous department facilities and systems; and well plugging; up to 46 $20,000,000 for the Conklingville, Sixth Lake and Old Forge Dams; 47 including personal service, nonpersonal service and fringe benefits, 48 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 49 (09NY2351) (25768) ... 90,000,000 ................ (re. $80,744,000) 341 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 2 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to New York Works 3 projects including but not limited to air monitoring infrastructure 4 investments; remediation of legacy environmental contamination; 5 investments in information technology; dam safety projects and the 6 demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned land; state-owned 7 flood protection projects; shore protection projects; state land 8 stewardship, public access and environmental and recreation infras- 9 tructure projects including, notwithstanding any law to the contra- 10 ry, projects on lands being sought pursuant to state land acquisi- 11 tion policy under article 49 of the environmental conservation law, 12 for which the state provided a letter of intent to the town of North 13 Hudson and Essex county to acquire a conservation easement or other 14 interest and for which the fee owner of any such property authorizes 15 such project; vehicles and equipment; water quality improvement 16 projects, fish hatcheries; rehabilitation and improvements of vari- 17 ous department facilities and systems; and well plugging; up to 18 $20,000,000 for the Conklingville Dam; including personal service, 19 nonpersonal service and fringe benefits, including suballocation to 20 other state departments and agencies (09NY2251) (25768) ............ 21 90,000,000 ....................................... (re. $67,954,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 23 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to New York Works 24 projects including but not limited to air monitoring infrastructure 25 investments; remediation of legacy environmental contamination; 26 investments in information technology; dam safety projects and the 27 demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned land; state-owned 28 flood protection projects; shore protection projects; state land 29 stewardship, public access and environmental and recreation infras- 30 tructure projects including, notwithstanding any law to the contra- 31 ry, projects on lands being sought pursuant to state land acquisi- 32 tion policy under article 49 of the environmental conservation law, 33 for which the state provided a letter of intent to the town of North 34 Hudson and Essex county to acquire a conservation easement or other 35 interest and for which the fee owner of any such property authorizes 36 such project; vehicles and equipment; water quality improvement 37 projects, fish hatcheries; rehabilitation and improvements of vari- 38 ous department facilities and systems; and well plugging; up to 39 $20,000,000 for the Conklingville Dam; including personal service, 40 nonpersonal service and fringe benefits, including suballocation to 41 other state departments and agencies (09NY2151) (25768) ............ 42 75,250,000 ....................................... (re. $53,737,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 44 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to New York Works 45 projects including but not limited to air monitoring infrastructure 46 investments; remediation of legacy environmental contamination; 47 investments in information technology; dam safety projects and the 48 demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned land; state-owned 49 flood protection projects; shore protection projects; state land 50 stewardship, public access and environmental and recreation infras- 342 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 tructure projects including, notwithstanding any law to the contra- 2 ry, projects on lands being sought pursuant to state land acquisi- 3 tion policy under article 49 of the environmental conservation law, 4 for which the state provided a letter of intent to the town of North 5 Hudson and Essex county to acquire a conservation easement or other 6 interest and for which the fee owner of any such property authorizes 7 such project; vehicles and equipment; water quality improvement 8 projects, fish hatcheries; rehabilitation and improvements of vari- 9 ous department facilities and systems; and well plugging; including 10 personal service, nonpersonal service and fringe benefits, including 11 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (09NY2051) 12 (25768) ... 55,250,000 ........................... (re. $25,445,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 14 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to New York Works 15 projects including but not limited to air monitoring infrastructure 16 investments; remediation of legacy environmental contamination; 17 investments in information technology; dam safety projects and the 18 demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned land; state-owned 19 flood protection projects; shore protection projects; state land 20 stewardship, public access and environmental and recreation infras- 21 tructure projects including, notwithstanding any law to the contra- 22 ry, projects on lands being sought pursuant to state land acquisi- 23 tion policy under article 49 of the environmental conservation law, 24 for which the state provided a letter of intent to the town of North 25 Hudson and Essex county to acquire a conservation easement or other 26 interest and for which the fee owner of any such property authorizes 27 such project; vehicles and equipment; water quality improvement 28 projects, fish hatcheries; rehabilitation and improvements of vari- 29 ous department facilities and systems; and well plugging; including 30 personal service, non-personal service and fringe benefits, includ- 31 ing suballocation to other state departments and agencies (09NY1951) 32 (25768) ... 55,250,000 ........................... (re. $15,455,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 34 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to New York Works 35 projects including but not limited to air monitoring infrastructure 36 investments; remediation of legacy environmental contamination; 37 investments in information technology; dam safety projects and the 38 demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned land; state-owned 39 flood protection projects; shore protection projects; state land 40 stewardship, public access and environmental and recreation infras- 41 tructure projects including, notwithstanding any law to the contra- 42 ry, projects on lands being sought pursuant to state land acquisi- 43 tion policy under article 49 of the environmental conservation law, 44 for which the state provided a letter of intent to the town of North 45 Hudson and Essex county to acquire a conservation easement or other 46 interest and for which the fee owner of any such property authorizes 47 such project; vehicles and equipment; water quality improvement 48 projects, fish hatcheries; rehabilitation and improvements of vari- 49 ous department facilities and systems; and well plugging; including 50 personal service, non-personal service and fringe benefits, includ- 343 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ing suballocation to other state departments and agencies (09NY1851) 2 (25768) ... 40,000,000 ............................ (re. $7,959,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 4 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to New York Works 5 projects including but not limited to air monitoring infrastructure 6 investments; remediation of legacy environmental contamination; 7 investments in information technology; dam safety projects and the 8 demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned land; state-owned 9 flood protection projects; shore protection projects; state land 10 stewardship, public access and environmental and recreation infras- 11 tructure projects including, notwithstanding any law to the contra- 12 ry, projects on lands being sought pursuant to state land acquisi- 13 tion policy under article 49 of the environmental conservation law, 14 for which the state provided a letter of intent to the town of North 15 Hudson and Essex county to acquire a conservation easement or other 16 interest and for which the fee owner of any such property authorizes 17 such project; vehicles and equipment; water quality improvement 18 projects, fish hatcheries; rehabilitation and improvements of vari- 19 ous department facilities and systems; and well plugging; including 20 personal service, non-personal service and fringe benefits, includ- 21 ing suballocation to other state departments and agencies (09NY1751) 22 (25768) ... 70,000,000 ........................... (re. $15,584,000) 23 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 24 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to New York Works 25 projects including but not limited to air monitoring infrastructure 26 investments; remediation of legacy environmental contamination; 27 investments in information technology; dam safety projects and the 28 demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned land; state-owned 29 flood protection projects; shore protection projects; state land 30 stewardship, public access and environmental and recreation infras- 31 tructure projects; vehicles and equipment; water quality improvement 32 projects, fish hatcheries; and well plugging; including personal 33 service, non-personal service and fringe benefits, including subal- 34 location to other state departments and agencies (09NY1651) (25768) 35 ... 40,000,000 .................................... (re. $3,241,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 37 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to New York Works 38 projects, including but not limited to air monitoring infrastructure 39 investments; remediation of legacy environmental contamination; 40 investments in information technology; dam safety projects and the 41 demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned land; state-owned 42 flood protection projects; state land stewardship, public access and 43 environmental and recreation infrastructure projects; vehicles and 44 equipment related to stewardship and emergency preparedness; water 45 quality improvement projects; and fish hatcheries; including 46 personal service, nonpersonal service and fringe benefits, including 47 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (09NY1551) 48 (25768) ... 40,000,000 ............................ (re. $8,591,000) 344 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2015: 3 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to New York Works 4 projects, including but not limited to air monitoring infrastructure 5 investments; remediation of legacy environmental contamination; 6 investments in information technology; dam safety projects and the 7 demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned land; state-owned 8 flood protection projects; state land stewardship, public access and 9 environmental and recreation infrastructure projects; vehicles and 10 equipment related to stewardship and emergency preparedness; fish 11 hatcheries; and marine program infrastructure; including personal 12 service, nonpersonal service and fringe benefits, including suballo- 13 cation to other state departments and agencies (09NY1451) (25768) 14 ... 40,000,000 .................................... (re. $2,542,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 55, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 17 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to New York Works 18 projects, including but not limited to environmental restoration 19 projects; remediation of legacy environmental contamination; invest- 20 ments in information technology; State land stewardship and environ- 21 mental and recreation infrastructure projects; and water quality 22 improvement projects, including suballocation to other state depart- 23 ments and agencies. 24 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Department may enter into 25 agreements with municipalities to undertake environmental restora- 26 tion projects on behalf of a municipality upon request, provided 27 that the municipality shall provide ten percent of the total project 28 costs. Any and all moneys recovered or reimbursed through agreements 29 shall be deposited with the comptroller and credited to the account 30 of the fund from which the expenditures were made (09NY1351) (25768) 31 ... 40,000,000 .................................... (re. $3,387,000) 32 OPERATIONS (CCP) 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 35 Operational Services Purpose 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 37 For rehabilitation and improvements of various department facilities 38 and systems; including but not limited to services and expenses of 39 the Department for payment of various liabilities accrued heretofore 40 and hereafter to accrue, pursuant to Articles 15, 17, and 27 of the 41 Environmental Conservation Law; for projects and purposes required 42 by Executive Order 88, including design, construction, operation and 43 maintenance of all new buildings, and the development and purchase 44 of energy efficient equipment; for remedial activities at state- 45 owned facilities, including the compliance with state and federal 46 laws and regulations; for alterations, rehabilitation and improve- 47 ments at education camps and centers; campground modernization and 48 reconstruction; purchase of capital equipment and for the reno- 345 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 vation, rehabilitation and reconstruction of the department of envi- 2 ronmental conservation's fish hatcheries; for design and 3 construction of department facilities including personal service and 4 fringe benefits and indirect costs in accordance with a programmatic 5 and financial plan to be approved by the director of the budget 6 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 7 (09RI2551) (24855) ... 46,000,000 ................ (re. $45,995,000) 8 For services and expenses, including personal service, fringe bene- 9 fits, and non-personal services necessary for remedial activities to 10 plug or replug abandoned oil and gas wells including the surface 11 restoration of the affected land pursuant to article 23 of the envi- 12 ronmental conservation law (09OG2551) (25767) ...................... 13 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 14 For replacement of vehicles and heavy duty construction equipment; for 15 purchase and replacement of equipment and facility improvements, 16 including but not limited to air monitoring, maintenance of facili- 17 ties and emergency response in support of public safety, including 18 personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs (09EQ2551) 19 (24856) ... 9,000,000 ............................. (re. $9,000,000) 20 For services and expenses, including but not limited to personal 21 service, fringe benefits, and non-personal services related to adap- 22 tation and resiliency planning. All or a portion of the appropri- 23 ation may be suballocated to other state departments, agencies, or 24 authorities (09RP2551) (24698) ..................................... 25 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 27 For rehabilitation and improvements of various facilities and systems; 28 including but not limited to services and expenses of the Department 29 for payment of various liabilities accrued heretofore and hereafter 30 to accrue, pursuant to Articles 15, 17, and 27 of the Environmental 31 Conservation Law; including personal service and fringe benefits and 32 indirect costs in accordance with a programmatic and financial plan 33 to be approved by the director of the budget including suballocation 34 to other state departments and agencies (09RI2451) (24855) ......... 35 41,000,000 ....................................... (re. $40,998,000) 36 For services and expenses, including personal service, fringe bene- 37 fits, and non-personal services necessary for remedial activities to 38 plug or replug abandoned oil and gas wells including the surface 39 restoration of the affected land pursuant to article 23 of the envi- 40 ronmental conservation law (09OG2451) (25767) ...................... 41 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 42 For replacement of vehicles and heavy duty construction equipment 43 (09EQ2451) (24856) ... 1,200,000 .................. (re. $1,012,000) 44 For services and expenses, including but not limited to personal 45 service, fringe benefits, and non-personal services related to adap- 46 tation and resiliency planning. All or a portion of the appropri- 47 ation may be suballocated to other state departments, agencies, or 48 authorities (09RP2451) (24698) ..................................... 49 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 50 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 346 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For rehabilitation and improvements of various facilities and systems; 2 including but not limited to services and expenses of the Department 3 for payment of various liabilities accrued heretofore and hereafter 4 to accrue, pursuant to Articles 15, 17, and 27 of the Environmental 5 Conservation Law; including personal service and fringe benefits and 6 indirect costs in accordance with a programmatic and financial plan 7 to be approved by the director of the budget including suballocation 8 to other state departments and agencies (09RI2351) (24855) ......... 9 41,000,000 ....................................... (re. $28,734,000) 10 For services and expenses, including personal service, fringe bene- 11 fits, and non-personal services necessary for remedial activities to 12 plug or replug abandoned oil and gas wells including the surface 13 restoration of the affected land pursuant to article 23 of the envi- 14 ronmental conservation law (09OG2351) (25767) ...................... 15 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 16 For dam safety and the demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned 17 land, and for various dam safety projects including personal service 18 and fringe benefits (09DS2351) (24857) ............................. 19 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 For rehabilitation and improvements of various department facilities 22 and systems including personal service and fringe benefits and indi- 23 rect costs in accordance with a programmatic and financial plan to 24 be approved by the director of the budget including suballocation to 25 other state departments and agencies (09RI2251) (24855) ............ 26 26,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,929,000) 27 For services and expenses, including personal service, fringe bene- 28 fits, and non-personal services necessary for remedial activities to 29 plug or replug abandoned oil and gas wells including the surface 30 restoration of the affected land pursuant to article 23 of the envi- 31 ronmental conservation law (09OG2251) (25767) ...................... 32 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 34 For rehabilitation and improvements of various department facilities 35 and systems including personal service and fringe benefits and indi- 36 rect costs in accordance with a programmatic and financial plan to 37 be approved by the director of the budget including suballocation to 38 other state departments and agencies (09RI2151) (24855) ............ 39 24,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,440,000) 40 For services and expenses, including personal service, fringe bene- 41 fits, and non-personal services necessary for remedial activities to 42 plug or replug abandoned oil and gas wells including the surface 43 restoration of the affected land pursuant to article 23 of the envi- 44 ronmental conservation law (09OG2151) (25767) ...................... 45 500,000 ............................................. (re. $126,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 47 For services and expenses, including personal service and fringe bene- 48 fits, necessary for projects and purposes required by Executive 49 Order 88, including design, construction, operation and maintenance 347 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of all new buildings, and the development and purchase of energy 2 efficient equipment; for remedial activities at state-owned facili- 3 ties, including the compliance with state and federal laws and regu- 4 lations (09SF2051) (24859) ... 2,000,000 .......... (re. $2,000,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 6 For services and expenses, including personal service and fringe bene- 7 fits, necessary for projects and purposes required by Executive 8 Order 88, including design, construction, operation and maintenance 9 of all new buildings, and the development and purchase of energy 10 efficient equipment; for remedial activities at state-owned facili- 11 ties, including the compliance with state and federal laws and regu- 12 lations (09SF1751) (24859) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $1,000,000) 13 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 14 For services and expenses, including personal service and fringe bene- 15 fits, necessary for projects and purposes required by Executive 16 Order 88, including design, construction, operation and maintenance 17 of all new buildings, and the development and purchase of energy 18 efficient equipment; for remedial activities at state-owned facili- 19 ties, including the compliance with state and federal laws and regu- 20 lations (09SF1651) (24859) ... 900,000 .............. (re. $289,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 22 For services and expenses, including personal services and fringe 23 benefits, for design and construction of department facilities 24 (09DF1551) (24858) ... 750,000 ...................... (re. $622,000) 25 For services and expenses, including personal service, fringe bene- 26 fits, and non-personal services necessary for remedial activities to 27 plug or replug abandoned oil and gas wells including the surface 28 restoration of the affected land pursuant to article 23 of the envi- 29 ronmental conservation law (09OG1551) (25767) ...................... 30 500,000 ............................................. (re. $242,000) 31 For services and expenses, including personal service and fringe bene- 32 fits, necessary for projects and purposes required by Executive 33 Order 88, including design, construction, operation and maintenance 34 of all new buildings, and the development and purchase of energy 35 efficient equipment; for remedial activities at state-owned facili- 36 ties, including the compliance with state and federal laws and regu- 37 lations (09SF1551) (24859) ... 2,000,000 .......... (re. $1,257,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 39 For services and expenses, including personal services and fringe 40 benefits, for design and construction of department facilities 41 (09DF1451) (24858) ... 750,000 ...................... (re. $720,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 43 For dam safety and the demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned 44 land, and for various dam safety projects including personal service 45 and fringe benefits (09DS1251) (24857) ............................. 46 1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000) 348 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses, including personal service and fringe bene- 2 fits, necessary for projects and purposes required by Executive 3 Order 111, including design, construction, operation and maintenance 4 of all new buildings, and the development and purchase of energy 5 efficient equipment; for remedial activities at state-owned facili- 6 ties, including the compliance with state and federal laws and regu- 7 lations (09SF1251) (24859) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $70,000) 8 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 9 For dam safety and the demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned 10 land, and for various dam safety projects including personal 11 services and fringe benefits (09DS0951) (24857) .................... 12 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,753,000) 13 For services and expenses, including personal services and fringe 14 benefits, for design and construction of department facilities 15 (09DF0951) (24858) ... 450,000 ....................... (re. $34,000) 16 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 17 For dam safety and the demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned 18 land, and for various dam safety projects including personal 19 services and fringe benefits (09DS0851) (24857) .................... 20 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,910,000) 21 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 22 For dam safety and the demolition of unsafe structures on state-owned 23 land including personal services and fringe benefits (09DS0751) 24 (24857) ... 2,000,000 ............................... (re. $209,000) 25 Capital Projects Funds - Other 26 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 27 Financial Security Account - 32201 28 Operational Services Purpose 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 30 For services and expenses of the department to complete or remediate a 31 department-regulated project using the proceeds specified in the 32 project's required financial security arrangement when the terms of 33 that arrangement must be implemented. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law or terms of any financial 35 security instrument, any residuals may be available for department 36 capital projects (09431751) (24895) ................................ 37 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,330,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1994: 39 For services and expenses of the department to complete or remediate a 40 department-regulated project using the proceeds specified in the 41 project's required financial security arrangement when the terms of 42 that arrangement must be implemented. No portion of this appropri- 43 ation shall be available for projects for which financial security 44 proceeds have not been received (09439451) (24895) ................. 45 2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $427,000) 349 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Natural Resource Damages Fund 3 Natural Resource Damages Account - 31900(M) 4 Operational Services Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 6 For services and expenses related to restoration projects, replacement 7 acquisition projects or combinations thereof resulting from success- 8 ful natural resource damages claims including suballocation to other 9 state departments and agencies (09442351) (24860) .................. 10 26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $26,000,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 12 For services and expenses related to restoration projects, replacement 13 acquisition projects or combinations thereof resulting from success- 14 ful natural resource damages claims against the northrop grumman 15 corporation associated with the northrop grumman facility in Nassau 16 County, including suballocation to other state departments and agen- 17 cies (09442151) (24860) ... 47,500,000 ........... (re. $47,500,000) 18 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 19 For services and expenses related to restoration projects, replacement 20 acquisition projects or combinations thereof resulting from success- 21 ful natural resource damages claims including suballocation to other 22 state departments and agencies (09441651) (24860) .................. 23 26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $22,141,000) 24 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 54, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 26 For services and expenses related to restoration projects, replacement 27 acquisition projects or combinations thereof resulting from success- 28 ful natural resource damages claims, and suballocation to other 29 state departments and agencies (09440751) (24860) .................. 30 26,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,552,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1994, as amended by chapter 54, 32 section 1, of the laws of 2005: 33 For services and expenses related to restoration projects, replacement 34 acquisition projects or combinations thereof resulting from success- 35 ful natural resource damages claims. No portion of this appropri- 36 ation shall be available for projects for which recovered funds have 37 not been received including suballocation to the department of 38 health and the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation 39 (09449451) (24860) ... 23,503,000 ................... (re. $330,000) 40 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 41 Federal Capital Projects Fund 42 ENCON Federal Capital Account - 31364 43 Operational Services Purpose 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 350 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to Oper- 2 ational Services purposes including suballocation to other state 3 departments and agencies (09OF2451) (62035) ........................ 4 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 6 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to Oper- 7 ational Services purposes including suballocation to other state 8 departments and agencies (09OF2351) (62035) ........................ 9 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 10 PURE WATERS BOND FUND (CCP) 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Pure Waters Bond Fund 13 Pure Waters Bond Fund Account - 30620 14 Bond Proceeds Purpose 15 By chapter 54, section 8, of the laws of 1978, as amended by chapter 55, 16 section 1, of the laws of 1996: 17 The sum of two hundred sixty-three million thirty-five thousand nine 18 hundred sixty-one dollars ($263,035,961) or so much thereof as may 19 be necessary, is hereby appropriated from the proceeds of the sale 20 of bonds authorized pursuant to the provisions of chapter one 21 hundred and seventy-six of the laws of nineteen hundred sixty-five 22 known as the "Pure Waters Bond Act" for payment to the capital 23 projects fund as created by section ninety-three of the state 24 finance law for disbursements from such fund pursuant to appropri- 25 ations for the payment of the non-municipal share of the cost of 26 construction of sewage treatment works in the manner and to the 27 extent specified in section 17-1903 of the environmental conserva- 28 tion law. Such disbursements are hereinafter referred to as "Pure 29 Waters disbursements." 30 The director of the budget is hereby authorized to designate to the 31 state comptroller appropriations made from the capital projects fund 32 for purposes for which pure waters expenditures are authorized. The 33 state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify to 34 the director of the budget, the chairman of the senate finance 35 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means commit- 36 tee, the amounts disbursed from the appropriations designated by the 37 director of the budget from the capital construction fund for pure 38 waters disbursements for the month preceding such certification. 39 Such certifications shall not exceed in aggregate the moneys appro- 40 priated thereof from the capital projects fund. A copy of each such 41 certification shall also be delivered to the public officer of the 42 respective state department to which such capital projects fund 43 appropriations are made available (01354910) (80917) ............... 44 .................................................. (re. $14,530,000) 45 RECREATION (CCP) 46 Capital Projects Funds - Other 351 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 2 Recreation Purpose 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 4 For campground modernization and reconstruction including personal 5 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs (09CM1752) (24861) .... 6 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 8 For campground modernization and reconstruction including personal 9 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs (09CM1352) (24861)..... 10 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $140,000) 11 SOLID AND HAZARDOUS WASTE MANAGEMENT (CCP) 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 14 Hazardous Waste Purpose 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 16 For payment by the state, as reimbursement or as an advance from 17 responsible parties or volunteers for remedial and monitoring work 18 at sites contaminated with hazardous waste. No portion of this 19 appropriation shall be available for expenditure until a party or 20 parties either responsible for a site or volunteering to cleanup a 21 site have entered into an agreement with the commissioner of the 22 department of environmental conservation or the commissioner's 23 designee, and which agreement is approved by the director of the 24 budget, providing for repayment to the state of an amount equal to 25 the amount disbursed from this appropriation. A copy of such agree- 26 ment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 27 senate finance committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means 28 committee. 29 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 30 troller is authorized to repay settlements or advances for specified 31 remedial and monitoring projects from this fund with monies of the 32 hazardous waste remedial fund received for such projects pursuant to 33 consent orders and agreements to address sites contaminated with 34 hazardous waste. 35 The director of the budget shall certify to the comptroller the 36 specific portions of this appropriation for which monies have been 37 received pursuant to such consent orders and agreements (09AD25F7) 38 (24868) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 40 For payment by the state, as reimbursement or as an advance from 41 responsible parties or volunteers for remedial and monitoring work 42 at sites contaminated with hazardous waste. No portion of this 43 appropriation shall be available for expenditure until a party or 44 parties either responsible for a site or volunteering to cleanup a 45 site have entered into an agreement with the commissioner of the 46 department of environmental conservation or the commissioner's 352 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 designee, and which agreement is approved by the director of the 2 budget, providing for repayment to the state of an amount equal to 3 the amount disbursed from this appropriation. A copy of such agree- 4 ment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 5 senate finance committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means 6 committee. 7 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 8 troller is authorized to repay settlements or advances for specified 9 remedial and monitoring projects from this fund with monies of the 10 hazardous waste remedial fund received for such projects pursuant to 11 consent orders and agreements to address sites contaminated with 12 hazardous waste. 13 The director of the budget shall certify to the comptroller the 14 specific portions of this appropriation for which monies have been 15 received pursuant to such consent orders and agreements (09AD24F7) 16 (24868) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 18 For payment by the state, as reimbursement or as an advance from 19 responsible parties or volunteers for remedial and monitoring work 20 at sites contaminated with hazardous waste. No portion of this 21 appropriation shall be available for expenditure until a party or 22 parties either responsible for a site or volunteering to cleanup a 23 site have entered into an agreement with the commissioner of the 24 department of environmental conservation or the commissioner's 25 designee, and which agreement is approved by the director of the 26 budget, providing for repayment to the state of an amount equal to 27 the amount disbursed from this appropriation. A copy of such agree- 28 ment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 29 senate finance committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means 30 committee. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 32 troller is authorized to repay settlements or advances for specified 33 remedial and monitoring projects from this fund with monies of the 34 hazardous waste remedial fund received for such projects pursuant to 35 consent orders and agreements to address sites contaminated with 36 hazardous waste. 37 The director of the budget shall certify to the comptroller the 38 specific portions of this appropriation for which monies have been 39 received pursuant to such consent orders and agreements (09AD23F7) 40 (24868) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 42 For payment by the state, as reimbursement or as an advance from 43 responsible parties or volunteers for remedial and monitoring work 44 at sites contaminated with hazardous waste. No portion of this 45 appropriation shall be available for expenditure until a party or 46 parties either responsible for a site or volunteering to cleanup a 47 site have entered into an agreement with the commissioner of the 48 department of environmental conservation or the commissioner's 49 designee, and which agreement is approved by the director of the 50 budget, providing for repayment to the state of an amount equal to 353 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the amount disbursed from this appropriation. A copy of such agree- 2 ment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 3 senate finance committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means 4 committee. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 6 troller is authorized to repay settlements or advances for specified 7 remedial and monitoring projects from this fund with monies of the 8 hazardous waste remedial fund received for such projects pursuant to 9 consent orders and agreements to address sites contaminated with 10 hazardous waste. 11 The director of the budget shall certify to the comptroller the 12 specific portions of this appropriation for which monies have been 13 received pursuant to such consent orders and agreements (09AD22F7) 14 (24868) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 16 For payment by the state, as reimbursement or as an advance from 17 responsible parties or volunteers for remedial and monitoring work 18 at sites contaminated with hazardous waste. No portion of this 19 appropriation shall be available for expenditure until a party or 20 parties either responsible for a site or volunteering to cleanup a 21 site have entered into an agreement with the commissioner of the 22 department of environmental conservation or the commissioner's 23 designee, and which agreement is approved by the director of the 24 budget, providing for repayment to the state of an amount equal to 25 the amount disbursed from this appropriation. A copy of such agree- 26 ment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 27 senate finance committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means 28 committee. 29 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 30 troller is authorized to repay settlements or advances for specified 31 remedial and monitoring projects from this fund with monies of the 32 hazardous waste remedial fund received for such projects pursuant to 33 consent orders and agreements to address sites contaminated with 34 hazardous waste. 35 The director of the budget shall certify to the comptroller the 36 specific portions of this appropriation for which monies have been 37 received pursuant to such consent orders and agreements (09AD21F7) 38 (24868) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $13,842,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 40 For payment by the state, as reimbursement or as an advance from 41 responsible parties or volunteers for remedial and monitoring work 42 at sites contaminated with hazardous waste. No portion of this 43 appropriation shall be available for expenditure until a party or 44 parties either responsible for a site or volunteering to cleanup a 45 site have entered into an agreement with the commissioner of the 46 department of environmental conservation or the commissioner's 47 designee, and which agreement is approved by the director of the 48 budget, providing for repayment to the state of an amount equal to 49 the amount disbursed from this appropriation. A copy of such agree- 50 ment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 354 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 senate finance committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means 2 committee. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 4 troller is authorized to repay settlements or advances for specified 5 remedial and monitoring projects from this fund with monies of the 6 hazardous waste remedial fund received for such projects pursuant to 7 consent orders and agreements to address sites contaminated with 8 hazardous waste. The director of the budget shall certify to the 9 comptroller the specific portions of this appropriation for which 10 monies have been received pursuant to such consent orders and agree- 11 ments (09AD20F7) (24868) ... 20,000,000 ........... (re. $9,981,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 13 For payment by the state, as reimbursement or as an advance from 14 responsible parties or volunteers for remedial and monitoring work 15 at sites contaminated with hazardous waste. No portion of this 16 appropriation shall be available for expenditure until a party or 17 parties either responsible for a site or volunteering to cleanup a 18 site have entered into an agreement with the commissioner of the 19 department of environmental conservation or the commissioner's 20 designee, and which agreement is approved by the director of the 21 budget, providing for repayment to the state of an amount equal to 22 the amount disbursed from this appropriation. A copy of such agree- 23 ment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 24 senate finance committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means 25 committee. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 27 troller is authorized to repay settlements or advances for specified 28 remedial and monitoring projects from this fund with monies of the 29 hazardous waste remedial fund received for such projects pursuant to 30 consent orders and agreements to address sites contaminated with 31 hazardous waste. 32 The director of the budget shall certify to the comptroller the 33 specific portions of this appropriation for which monies have been 34 received pursuant to such consent orders and agreements (09AD19F7) 35 (24868) ... 20,000,000 ............................ (re. $1,194,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 37 For payment by the state, as reimbursement or as an advance from 38 responsible parties or volunteers for remedial and monitoring work 39 at sites contaminated with hazardous waste. No portion of this 40 appropriation shall be available for expenditure until a party or 41 parties either responsible for a site or volunteering to cleanup a 42 site have entered into an agreement with the commissioner of the 43 department of environmental conservation or the commissioner's 44 designee, and which agreement is approved by the director of the 45 budget, providing for repayment to the state of an amount equal to 46 the amount disbursed from this appropriation. A copy of such agree- 47 ment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 48 senate finance committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means 49 committee. 355 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 2 troller is authorized to repay settlements or advances for specified 3 remedial and monitoring projects from this fund with monies of the 4 hazardous waste remedial fund received for such projects pursuant to 5 consent orders and agreements to address sites contaminated with 6 hazardous waste. 7 The director of the budget shall certify to the comptroller the 8 specific portions of this appropriation for which monies have been 9 received pursuant to such consent orders and agreements (09AD18F7) 10 (24868) ... 16,000,000 .............................. (re. $290,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 12 For payment by the state, as reimbursement or as an advance from 13 responsible parties or volunteers for remedial and monitoring work 14 at sites contaminated with hazardous waste. No portion of this 15 appropriation shall be available for expenditure until a party or 16 parties either responsible for a site or volunteering to cleanup a 17 site have entered into an agreement with the commissioner of the 18 department of environmental conservation or the commissioner's 19 designee, and which agreement is approved by the director of the 20 budget, providing for repayment to the state of an amount equal to 21 the amount disbursed from this appropriation. A copy of such agree- 22 ment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 23 senate finance committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means 24 committee. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 26 troller is authorized to repay settlements or advances for specified 27 remedial and monitoring projects from this fund with monies of the 28 hazardous waste remedial fund received for such projects pursuant to 29 consent orders and agreements to address sites contaminated with 30 hazardous waste. 31 The director of the budget shall certify to the comptroller the 32 specific portions of this appropriation for which monies have been 33 received pursuant to such consent orders and agreements (09AD17F7) 34 (24868) ... 16,000,000 ............................ (re. $3,935,000) 35 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 36 For payment by the state, as reimbursement or as an advance from 37 responsible parties or volunteers for remedial and monitoring work 38 at sites contaminated with hazardous waste. No portion of this 39 appropriation shall be available for expenditure until a party or 40 parties either responsible for a site or volunteering to cleanup a 41 site have entered into an agreement with the commissioner of the 42 department of environmental conservation or the commissioner's 43 designee, and which agreement is approved by the director of the 44 budget, providing for repayment to the state of an amount equal to 45 the amount disbursed from this appropriation. A copy of such agree- 46 ment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 47 senate finance committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means 48 committee. 49 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 50 troller is authorized to repay settlements or advances for specified 356 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 remedial and monitoring projects from this fund with monies of the 2 hazardous waste remedial fund received for such projects pursuant to 3 consent orders and agreements to address sites contaminated with 4 hazardous waste. The director of the budget shall certify to the 5 comptroller the specific portions of this appropriation for which 6 monies have been received pursuant to such consent orders and agree- 7 ments (09AD16F7) (24868) ... 8,000,000 ............ (re. $2,494,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 9 For payment by the state, as reimbursement or as an advance from 10 responsible parties or volunteers for remedial and monitoring work 11 at sites contaminated with hazardous waste. No portion of this 12 appropriation shall be available for expenditure until a party or 13 parties either responsible for a site or volunteering to cleanup a 14 site have entered into an agreement with the commissioner of the 15 department of environmental conservation or the commissioner's 16 designee, and which agreement is approved by the director of the 17 budget, providing for repayment to the state of an amount equal to 18 the amount disbursed from this appropriation. A copy of such agree- 19 ment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 20 senate finance committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means 21 committee. 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 23 troller is authorized to repay settlements or advances for specified 24 remedial and monitoring projects from this fund with monies of the 25 hazardous waste remedial fund received for such projects pursuant to 26 consent orders and agreements to address sites contaminated with 27 hazardous waste. 28 The director of the budget shall certify to the comptroller the 29 specific portions of this appropriation for which monies have been 30 received pursuant to such consent orders and agreements (09AD15F7) 31 (24868) ... 8,000,000 ............................... (re. $574,000) 32 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 55, 33 section 1, of the laws of 2010: 34 For payment by the state, as reimbursement or as an advance from 35 responsible parties for remedial and monitoring work at inactive 36 hazardous waste disposal sites or from volunteers for the voluntary 37 cleanup of contaminated brownfield sites. No portion of this appro- 38 priation shall be available for expenditure until a party or parties 39 either responsible for a site or volunteering to cleanup a site have 40 entered into an agreement with the commissioner of the department of 41 environmental conservation or the commissioner's designee, and which 42 agreement is approved by the director of the budget, providing for 43 repayment to the state of an amount equal to the amount disbursed 44 from this appropriation. A copy of such agreement shall be filed 45 with the state comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance 46 committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means committee. 47 Nothwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 48 troller is authorized to repay settlements or advances for specified 49 inactive hazardous waste remedial projects and voluntary cleanup 50 projects from this fund with monies of the hazardous waste remedial 357 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 fund received for such projects pursuant to inactive hazardous waste 2 site remediation consent orders and voluntary cleanup agreements. 3 The director of the budget shall certify to the comptroller the 4 specific portions of this appropriation for which monies have been 5 received pursuant to such consent orders and voluntary cleanup 6 agreements (09AD08F7) (24868) ...................................... 7 10,000,000 ........................................... (re. $28,000) 8 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 55, 9 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 10 For services and expenses for the Town of Smithtown/Kings Park Psychi- 11 atric Center Rehabilitation including suballocation to other state 12 departments and agencies (09KP06F7) (24865) ........................ 13 25,000,000 .......................................... (re. $360,000) 14 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 55, 15 section 1, of the laws of 2006: 16 For payment by the state, as reimbursement or as an advance from 17 responsible parties for remedial and monitoring work at inactive 18 hazardous waste disposal sites or from volunteers for the voluntary 19 cleanup of contaminated brownfield sites. No portion of this appro- 20 priation shall be available for expenditure until a party or parties 21 either responsible for a site or volunteering to cleanup a site have 22 entered into an agreement with the commissioner of the department of 23 environmental conservation or the commission's designee, and which 24 agreement is approved by the director of the budget, providing for 25 repayment to the state of an amount equal to the amount disbursed 26 from this appropriation. A copy of such agreement shall be filed 27 with the state comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance 28 committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means committee. 29 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 30 troller is authorized to repay settlements or advances for specified 31 inactive hazardous waste remedial projects and voluntary cleanup 32 projects from this fund with monies of the hazardous waste remedial 33 fund received for such projects pursuant to inactive hazardous waste 34 site remediation consent orders and voluntary cleanup agreements. 35 The director of the budget shall certify to the comptroller the 36 specific portions of this appropriation for which monies have been 37 received pursuant to such consent orders and voluntary cleanup 38 agreements (09AD04F7) (24868) ... 30,000,000 ........ (re. $196,000) 39 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 40 For payment by the state, as an advance for remedial and monitoring 41 work at inactive hazardous waste disposal sites. No portion of this 42 appropriation shall be available for expenditure until a party or 43 parties responsible for a site have entered into an agreement with 44 the commissioner of the department of environmental conservation, 45 and which agreement is approved by the director of the budget, 46 providing for repayment to the state of an amount equal to the 47 amount disbursed from this appropriation. A copy of such agreement 48 shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 358 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 senate finance committee and chairman of the assembly ways and means 2 committee. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the comp- 4 troller is authorized to repay advances for specified inactive 5 hazardous waste remedial projects from this fund with moneys of the 6 hazardous waste remedial fund received for such projects pursuant to 7 inactive hazardous waste site remediation consent orders. The direc- 8 tor of the budget shall certify to the comptroller the specific 9 portions of this appropriation for which moneys have been received 10 pursuant to such consent orders (09AD99F7) (24868) ................. 11 60,000,000 .......................................... (re. $918,000) 12 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998: 13 For payment by the state, as an advance for remedial and monitoring 14 work at inactive hazardous waste disposal sites (09AD98F7) (24868) 15 ... 30,000,000 ...................................... (re. $164,000) 16 Capital Projects Fund - Other 17 Hazardous Waste Remedial Fund 18 Environmental Restoration Projects Account - 31504 19 Hazardous Waste Purpose 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 21 For services and expenses related to environmental restoration 22 projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the environ- 23 mental conservation law (09ER19F7) (25738) ......................... 24 3,100,000 ........................................... (re. $402,000) 25 Capital Projects Funds - Other 26 Hazardous Waste Remedial Fund 27 Hazardous Waste Cleanup Account - 31506 28 Hazardous Waste Purpose 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 30 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 31 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 32 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 33 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 34 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 35 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 36 conservation law, including personal service and fringe benefits of 37 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 38 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 39 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, provided that a 40 portion of such amount may be available for environmental restora- 41 tion projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the envi- 42 ronmental conservation law. None of this appropriation may be 43 expended for any purposes authorized in title 12 of article 27 of 44 the environmental conservation law (09HB25F7) (24863) .............. 45 125,000,000 ..................................... (re. $112,485,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 359 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 2 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 3 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 4 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 5 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 6 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 7 conservation law, including personal service and fringe benefits of 8 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 9 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 10 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, provided that a 11 portion of such amount may be available for environmental restora- 12 tion projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the envi- 13 ronmental conservation law. None of this appropriation may be 14 expended for any purposes authorized in title 12 of article 27 of 15 the environmental conservation law (09HB24F7) (24863) .............. 16 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $65,062,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 18 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 19 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 20 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 21 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 22 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 23 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 24 conservation law, including personal service and fringe benefits of 25 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 26 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 27 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, provided that a 28 portion of such amount may be available for environmental restora- 29 tion projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the envi- 30 ronmental conservation law. None of this appropriation may be 31 expended for any purposes authorized in title 12 of article 27 of 32 the environmental conservation law (09HB23F7) (24863) .............. 33 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $38,969,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 35 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 36 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 37 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 38 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 39 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 40 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 41 conservation law, including personal service and fringe benefits of 42 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 43 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 44 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, provided that a 45 portion of such amount may be available for environmental restora- 46 tion projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the envi- 47 ronmental conservation law. None of this appropriation may be 48 expended for any purposes authorized in title 12 of article 27 of 49 the environmental conservation law (09HB22F7) (24863) .............. 50 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $37,366,000) 360 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 2 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 3 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 4 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 5 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 6 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 7 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 8 conservation law, including personal service and fringe benefits of 9 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 10 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 11 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, provided that a 12 portion of such amount may be available for environmental restora- 13 tion projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the envi- 14 ronmental conservation law. None of this appropriation may be 15 expended for any purposes authorized in title 12 of article 27 of 16 the environmental conservation law (09HB21F7) (24863) .............. 17 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $27,838,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 19 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 20 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 21 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 22 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 23 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 24 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 25 conservation law, including personal service and fringe benefits of 26 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 27 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 28 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, provided that a 29 portion of such amount may be available for environmental restora- 30 tion projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the envi- 31 ronmental conservation law. None of this appropriation may be 32 expended for any purposes authorized in title 12 of article 27 of 33 the environmental conservation law (09HB20F7) (24863) .............. 34 100,000,000 ....................................... (re. $4,089,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 36 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 37 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 38 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 39 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 40 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 41 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 42 conservation law, including personal service and fringe benefits of 43 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 44 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 45 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, provided that a 46 portion of such amount may be available for environmental restora- 47 tion projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the envi- 48 ronmental conservation law. None of this appropriation may be 49 expended for any purposes authorized in title 12 of article 27 of 361 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the environmental conservation law (09HB19F7) (24863) .............. 2 100,000,000 ....................................... (re. $7,149,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 4 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 5 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 6 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 7 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 8 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 9 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 10 conservation law, including personal service and fringe benefits of 11 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 12 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 13 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, provided that a 14 portion of such amount may be available for environmental restora- 15 tion projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the envi- 16 ronmental conservation law. None of this appropriation may be 17 expended for any purposes authorized in title 12 of article 27 of 18 the environmental conservation law (09HB18F7) (24863) .............. 19 100,000,000 ....................................... (re. $8,385,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 21 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 22 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 23 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 24 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 25 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 26 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 27 conservation law, including personal service and fringe benefits of 28 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 29 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 30 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, provided that a 31 portion of such amount may be available for environmental restora- 32 tion projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the envi- 33 ronmental conservation law. None of this appropriation may be 34 expended for any purposes authorized in title 12 of article 27 of 35 the environmental conservation law (09HB17F7) (24863) .............. 36 100,000,000 ....................................... (re. $7,577,000) 37 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 38 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 39 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 40 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 41 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 42 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 43 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 44 conservation law, including personal service and fringe benefits of 45 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 46 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 47 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, provided that a 48 portion of such amount may be available for environmental restora- 49 tion projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the envi- 362 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ronmental conservation law (09HB16F7) (24863) ...................... 2 100,000,000 ......................................... (re. $878,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 4 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 5 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 6 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 7 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 8 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 9 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 10 conservation law, including personal service and fringe benefits of 11 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 12 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 13 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, provided that a 14 portion of such amount may be available for environmental restora- 15 tion projects in accordance with title 5 of article 56 of the envi- 16 ronmental conservation law (09HB15F7) (24863) ...................... 17 100,000,000 ....................................... (re. $1,090,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 19 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 20 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 21 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 22 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 23 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 24 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 25 conservation law, including personal service and fringe benefits of 26 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 27 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 28 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (09HB12F7) 29 (24863) ... 120,000,000 ........................... (re. $2,806,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 31 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 32 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 33 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 34 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 35 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 36 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 37 conservation law, including personal services and fringe benefits of 38 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 39 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 40 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (09HB11F7) 41 (24863) ... 120,000,000 .............................. (re. $39,000) 42 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 43 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 44 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 45 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 46 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 47 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 48 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 363 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 conservation law, including personal services and fringe benefits of 2 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 3 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 4 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (09HB10F7) 5 (24863) ... 120,000,000 .............................. (re. $74,000) 6 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 7 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 8 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 9 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 10 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 11 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 12 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 13 conservation law, including personal services and fringe benefits of 14 the departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 15 including suballocations to the departments of health and law and 16 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (09HB06F7) 17 (24863) ... 120,000,000 ............................. (re. $503,000) 18 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 19 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 20 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 21 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 22 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 23 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 24 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 25 conservation law, including personal services and related fringe 26 benefits of the departments of environmental conservation, health 27 and law and including suballocations to the departments of health 28 and law and including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto 29 (09HB05F7) (24863) ... 120,000,000 .................. (re. $265,000) 30 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 55, 31 section 1, of the laws of 2005: 32 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 33 remediation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of 34 the environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state 35 finance law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated 36 with the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat 37 sites as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental 38 conservation law, including personal services and related fringe 39 benefits of the departments of environmental conservation, health 40 and law and including suballocations to the departments of health 41 and law and including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto 42 (09HB04F7) (24863) ... 120,222,000 .................. (re. $400,000) 43 SCHEDULE 44 Personal service .............................. 15,855,844 45 Nonpersonal service .............................. 975,871 46 Fringe benefits ................................ 5,746,290 47 Maintenance undistributed 364 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 hazardous waste remedial program at the 3 department of health and for suballocation 4 to the department of health .................. 5,880,163 5 For services and expenses related to the 6 hazardous waste remedial program at the 7 department of law and for suballocation to 8 the department of law .......................... 763,832 9 For payment of the state share of the costs 10 of hazardous waste site remediation 11 projects in accordance with title 13 of 12 article 27 of the environmental conserva- 13 tion law and section 97-b of the state 14 finance law and for payment of state costs 15 associated with the remediation of offsite 16 contamination at significant threat sites 17 as provided for in section 27-1411 of the 18 environmental conservation law, including 19 costs incidental and appurtenant thereto .... 91,000,000 20 -------------- 21 Available for maintenance undistributed ....... 97,643,995 22 -------------- 23 Total of schedule .......................... 120,222,000 24 ============== 25 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 1, 26 part I, section 5, of the laws of 2003: 27 For payment of the state share of costs of hazardous waste site reme- 28 diation projects, in accordance with title 13 of article 27 of the 29 environmental conservation law and section 97-b of the state finance 30 law, for projects, and for payment of state costs associated with 31 the remediation of offsite contamination at significant threat sites 32 as provided for in section 27-1411 of the environmental conservation 33 law, including personal services and related fringe benefits of the 34 departments of environmental conservation, health and law and 35 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (09HB03F7) 36 (24863) ... 120,000,000 ............................. (re. $320,000) 37 SCHEDULE 38 Personal service .............................. 15,700,000 39 Nonpersonal service .............................. 966,325 40 Fringe benefits ................................ 5,689,680 41 Maintenance undistributed 42 For services and expenses related to the 43 hazardous waste remedial program at the 44 department of health and for suballocation 45 to the department of health .................. 5,880,163 46 For services and expenses related to the 47 hazardous waste remedial program at the 365 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 department of law and for suballocation to 2 the department of law .......................... 763,832 3 For payment of the state share of the costs 4 of hazardous waste site remediation 5 projects in accordance with title 13 of 6 article 27 of the environmental conserva- 7 tion law and section 97-b of the state 8 finance law and for payment of state costs 9 associated with the remediation of offsite 10 contamination at significant threat sites 11 as provided for in section 27-1411 of the 12 environmental conservation law, including 13 costs incidental and appurtenant thereto .... 91,000,000 14 -------------- 15 Available for maintenance undistributed ..... 97,643,995 16 -------------- 17 Total of schedule ........................ 120,000,000 18 ============== 19 Capital Projects Funds - Other 20 Hazardous Waste Remedial Fund 21 Hazardous Waste Remediation Oversight and Assistance Account - 31505 22 Hazardous Waste Purpose 23 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is 24 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 25 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 26 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 27 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 28 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 29 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 30 incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (09BC25F7) (24867) ................. 31 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,922,000) 32 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is 33 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 34 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 35 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 36 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 37 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 38 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 39 incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (09BC24F7) (24867) ................. 40 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,385,000) 41 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, is 42 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 43 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 44 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 45 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 46 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 47 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 366 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (09BC23F7) (24867) ................. 2 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,587,000) 3 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, is 4 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 5 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 6 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 7 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 8 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 9 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 10 incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (09BC22F7) (24867) ................. 11 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,500,000) 12 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021, is 13 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 14 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 15 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 16 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 17 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 18 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 19 incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (09BC21F7) (24867) ................. 20 6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,236,000) 21 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020, is 22 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 23 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 24 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 25 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 26 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 27 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 28 incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (09BC20F7) (24867) ................. 29 6,000,000 ........................................... (re. $937,000) 30 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, is 31 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 32 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 33 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 34 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 35 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 36 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 37 incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (09BC19F7) (24867) ................. 38 6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,033,000) 39 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, is 40 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 41 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 42 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 43 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 44 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 45 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 46 incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (09BC18F7) (24867) ................. 47 6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,004,000) 367 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as 2 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, is hereby 3 amended and reappropriated to read: 4 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 5 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 6 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 7 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 8 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 9 incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (09BC17F7) (24867) ................. 10 6,000,000 ........................................... (re. $928,000) 11 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, is 12 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 13 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 14 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 15 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 16 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 17 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 18 incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (09BC16F7) (24867) ................. 19 6,000,000 ........................................... (re. $562,000) 20 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, is 21 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 22 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 23 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 24 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 25 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 26 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 27 incurred prior to April 1, 2015 (09BC15F7) (24867) ................. 28 6,000,000 ........................................... (re. $630,000) 29 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, is 30 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 31 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 32 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 33 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 34 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 35 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 36 incurred prior to April 1, 2014 (09BC14F7) (24867) ................. 37 6,000,000 ........................................... (re. $439,000) 38 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, is 39 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 40 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 41 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 42 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 43 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 44 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 45 incurred prior to April 1, 2013 (09BC13F7) (24867) ................. 46 6,000,000 ........................................... (re. $629,000) 368 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, is 2 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 3 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 4 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 5 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 6 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 7 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 8 incurred prior to April 1, 2012 (09BC12F7) (24867) ................. 9 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,405,000) 10 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, is 11 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 12 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 13 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 14 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 15 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 16 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 17 incurred prior to April 1, 2011 (09BC11F7) (24867) ................. 18 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,564,000) 19 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010, is 20 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 21 For the following purposes: non-bondable services and expenses associ- 22 ated with the brownfield cleanup and hazardous waste remediation 23 projects; and, suballocation to other state departments and agen- 24 cies; and for other brownfield site cleanup hazardous waste purposes 25 (09TG10F7) (24866) ... 2,250,000 .................. (re. $1,609,000) 26 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 27 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 28 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 29 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 30 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 31 incurred prior to April 1, 2010 (09BC10F7) (24867) ................. 32 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,414,000) 33 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, is 34 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 35 For the following purposes: non-bondable services and expenses associ- 36 ated with the brownfield cleanup and hazardous waste remediation 37 projects; and, suballocation to other state departments and agen- 38 cies; and for other brownfield site cleanup hazardous waste purposes 39 (09TG09F7) (24866) ... 2,250,000 .................. (re. $2,250,000) 40 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 41 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 42 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 43 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 44 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 45 incurred prior to April 1, 2009 (09BC09F7) (24867) ................. 46 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,462,000) 47 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, is 48 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 369 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the following purposes: non-bondable services and expenses associ- 2 ated with the brownfield cleanup and hazardous waste remediation 3 projects; and, suballocation to other state departments and agen- 4 cies; and for other brownfield site cleanup hazardous waste purposes 5 (09TG08F7) (24866) ... 2,250,000 .................. (re. $2,250,000) 6 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 7 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 8 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 9 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 10 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 11 incurred prior to April 1, 2008 (09BC08F7) (24867) ................. 12 10,275,000 ........................................ (re. $2,022,000) 13 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007, is 14 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 15 For the following purposes: non-bondable services and expenses associ- 16 ated with the brownfield cleanup and hazardous waste remediation 17 projects; and, suballocation to other state departments and agen- 18 cies; and for other brownfield site cleanup hazardous waste purposes 19 (09TG07F7) (24866) ... 2,250,000 .................... (re. $386,000) 20 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 21 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 22 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 23 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 24 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 25 incurred prior to April 1, 2007 (09BC07F7) (24867) ................. 26 9,375,000 ......................................... (re. $3,417,000) 27 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, is 28 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 29 For the following purposes pursuant to a memorandum of understanding 30 to be executed by the governor, the temporary president of the 31 senate and the speaker of the assembly: non-bondable services and 32 expenses associated with the brownfield cleanup and hazardous waste 33 remediation projects; grants authorized pursuant to section 970-r of 34 the general municipal law; technical assistance grants pursuant to 35 titles 13 and 14 of article 27 of the environmental conservation 36 law; services and expenses associated with negotiating and oversee- 37 ing implementation of brownfield site cleanup agreements in accord- 38 ance with title 14 of article 27 of the environmental conservation 39 law; including personal services and fringe benefits of the depart- 40 ment of environmental conservation including costs incidental and 41 appurtenant thereto including suballocation to other state depart- 42 ments and agencies; and for other brownfield site cleanup hazardous 43 waste purposes (09HT06F7) (81096) .................................. 44 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 45 For the non-personal services, personal services and fringe benefits 46 of the department of environmental conservation including suballo- 47 cation to the department of health related to the brownfield cleanup 48 program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environmental 49 conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including costs 370 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 incurred prior to April 1, 2006 (09BC06F7) (24867) ................. 2 7,375,000 ........................................... (re. $702,000) 3 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, is 4 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 5 For the following purposes pursuant to a memorandum of understanding 6 to be executed by the governor, the temporary president of the 7 senate and the speaker of the assembly: non-bondable services and 8 expenses associated with the brownfield cleanup and hazardous waste 9 remediation projects; grants authorized pursuant to section 970-r of 10 the general municipal law; technical assistance grants pursuant to 11 titles 13 and 14 of article 27 of the environmental conservation 12 law; services and expenses associated with negotiating and oversee- 13 ing implementation of brownfield site cleanup agreements in accord- 14 ance with title 14 of article 27 of the environmental conservation 15 law; including personal services and related fringe benefits of the 16 department of environmental conservation including costs incidental 17 and appurtenant thereto including suballocation to other state 18 departments and agencies; and for other brownfield site cleanup 19 hazardous waste purposes (09HT05F7) (81096) ........................ 20 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 21 For the non-personal services, personal services and related fringe 22 benefits of the department of environmental conservation including 23 suballocation to the department of health related to the brownfield 24 cleanup program pursuant to title 14 of article 27 of the environ- 25 mental conservation law and the voluntary cleanup program including 26 costs incurred prior to April 1, 2005 (09BC05F7) (24867) ........... 27 14,217,000 ........................................ (re. $1,762,000) 28 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 55, 29 section 1, of the laws of 2009: 30 For the following purposes pursuant to a memorandum of understanding 31 to be executed by the governor, the temporary president of the 32 senate and the speaker of the assembly: non-bondable services and 33 expenses associated with the brownfield cleanup and hazardous waste 34 remediation projects; grants authorized pursuant to section 970-r of 35 the general municipal law; technical assistance grants pursuant to 36 titles 13 and 14 of article 27 of the environmental conservation 37 law; services and expenses associated with negotiating and oversee- 38 ing implementation of brownfield site cleanup agreements in accord- 39 ance with title 14 of article 27 of the environmental conservation 40 law; including personal services and related fringe benefits of the 41 department of environmental conservation including costs incidental 42 and appurtenant thereto including suballocation to other state 43 departments and agencies; and for other brownfield site cleanup 44 hazardous waste purposes (09HT04F7) (81096) ........................ 45 15,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,340,000) 46 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 55, 47 section 1, of the laws of 2009: 48 For the following purposes pursuant to a Memorandum of Understanding 49 to be executed by the Governor, the temporary president of the 371 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Senate and the speaker of the Assembly: non-bondable services and 2 expenses associated with brownfield clean up and hazardous waste 3 remediation projects; grants authorized pursuant to section 970-r of 4 the general municipal law; technical assistance grants pursuant to 5 titles 13 and 14 of article 27 of the environmental conservation 6 law; services and expenses associated with negotiating and oversee- 7 ing implementation of brownfield site cleanup agreements in accord- 8 ance with title 14 of article 27 of the environmental conservation 9 law; including personal services and related fringe benefits of the 10 department of environmental conservation including costs incidental 11 and appurtenant thereto including suballocation to other state 12 departments and agencies; and for other brownfield site cleanup 13 hazardous waste purposes (09HT03F7) (81096) ........................ 14 15,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,371,000) 15 Capital Projects Funds - Other 16 Hazardous Waste Remedial Fund 17 Hazardous Waste Remediation Site Investigation and Construction 18 Account - 31501 19 Hazardous Waste Purpose 20 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 21 For services and expenses related to Hazardous Waste Program, includ- 22 ing personal service, fringe benefits and non-bondable services and 23 expenses related to hazardous waste remediation projects (09IN16F7) 24 (25709) ... 2,000,000 ............................. (re. $2,000,000) 25 SOLID AND HAZARDOUS WASTE MANAGEMENT - EQBA 86 (CCP) 26 Capital Projects Funds - Other 27 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 28 Hazardous Waste Purpose 29 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 30 For payment of the state's share of the costs of hazardous waste site 31 remediation projects, in accordance with the provisions of title 3 32 of article 52 of the environmental conservation law, for projects, 33 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, and for payment 34 of reimbursements to the hazardous waste remedial fund for services 35 and expenses of the departments of environmental conservation, law 36 and health, including fringe benefits (09HW99F7) (24870) ........... 37 37,625,000 .......................................... (re. $579,000) 38 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997: 39 For payment of the state's share of the costs of hazardous waste site 40 remediation projects, in accordance with the provisions of title 3 41 of article 52 of the environmental conservation law, for projects, 42 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (09HW97F7) 43 (24870) ... ... 30,000,000 ........................ (re. $501,000) 44 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1996: 372 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of the state's share of the costs of hazardous waste site 2 remediation projects, in accordance with the provisions of title 3 3 of article 52 of the environmental conservation law, for projects, 4 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (09HW96F7) 5 (24870) ... ... 32,800,000 ........................ (re. $228,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1995: 7 For payment of the state's share of the costs of hazardous waste site 8 remediation projects, in accordance with the provisions of title 3 9 of article 52 of the environmental conservation law, for projects, 10 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (09HW95F7) 11 (24870) ... ... 66,000,000 ...................... (re. $1,065,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1994: 13 For payment of the state's share of the costs of hazardous waste site 14 remediation projects, in accordance with the provisions of title 3 15 of article 52 of the environmental conservation law, for projects, 16 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (09HW94F7) 17 (24870) ... ... 150,000,000 .................... (re. $11,785,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1993: 19 For payment of the state's share of the costs of hazardous waste site 20 remediation projects, in accordance with the provisions of title 3 21 of article 52 of the environmental conservation law, for projects, 22 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (09HW93F7) 23 (24870) ... ... 140,000,000 ..................... (re. $1,182,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1992: 25 For payment of the state's share of the costs of hazardous waste site 26 remediation projects, in accordance with the provisions of title 3 27 of article 52 of the environmental conservation law, for projects, 28 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (09HW92F7) 29 (24870) ... ... 204,000,000 ..................... (re. $1,256,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1991, as amended by chapter 54, 31 section 3, of the laws of 1992: 32 For payment of the state's share of the costs of hazardous waste site 33 remediation projects, in accordance with the provisions of title 3 34 of article 52 of the environmental conservation law, for projects, 35 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (091691F7) 36 (24870) ... ... 110,000,000 ....................... (re. $601,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1990, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 3, of the laws of 1991: 39 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 40 remediation projects, in accordance with the provisions of title 3 41 of article 52 of the environmental conservation law, for projects, 42 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (095390F7) 43 (24870) ... ... 173,575,000 ....................... (re. $375,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1989, as amended by chapter 54, 45 section 3, of the laws of 1990: 373 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 2 remediation projects, in accordance with the provisions of title 3 3 of article 52 of the environmental conservation law, for projects, 4 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto (095489F7) 5 (24870) ... ... 26,000,000 ...................... (re. $1,198,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1987, as amended by chapter 54, 7 section 3, of the laws of 1990: 8 For payment of the state share of the costs of hazardous waste site 9 remediation projects, in accordance with the provisions of title 10 three of article fifty-two of the environmental conservation law, 11 for projects, including the transfer of obligations from capital 12 projects appropriations funded from the hazardous waste remedial 13 fund - 312 and including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, 14 (095887F7) (24870) ... ... 100,000,000 .......... (re. $1,231,000) 15 SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT (CCP) 16 Capital Projects Funds - Other 17 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 18 Solid Waste Management Purpose 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 20 For services and capital expenses related to the waste management and 21 cleanup program as put forth in section 27-1915 of environmental 22 conservation law, including suballocation to other state departments 23 and agencies (09WT2556) (25730) ... 4,000,000 ..... (re. $4,000,000) 24 For pre-closure and post-closure costs associated with Adirondack 25 landfills pursuant to agreements with Essex county (09EX2556) 26 (24872) ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 28 For services and capital expenses related to the waste management and 29 cleanup program as put forth in section 27-1915 of environmental 30 conservation law, including suballocation to other state departments 31 and agencies (09WT2456) (25730) ... 3,000,000 ..... (re. $3,000,000) 32 For pre-closure and post-closure costs associated with Adirondack 33 landfills pursuant to agreements with Essex county (09EX2456) 34 (24872) ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 36 For services and capital expenses related to the waste management and 37 cleanup program as put forth in section 27-1915 of environmental 38 conservation law, including suballocation to other state departments 39 and agencies (09WT2356) (25730) ... 4,000,000 ..... (re. $3,801,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 41 For services and capital expenses related to the waste management and 42 cleanup program as put forth in section 27-1915 of environmental 43 conservation law, including suballocation to other state departments 44 and agencies (09WT2256) (25730) ... 4,000,000 ..... (re. $4,000,000) 374 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 2 For services and capital expenses related to the waste management and 3 cleanup program as put forth in section 27-1915 of environmental 4 conservation law, including suballocation to other state departments 5 and agencies (09WT2156) (25730) ... 4,000,000 ..... (re. $4,000,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 7 For services and capital expenses related to the waste management and 8 cleanup program as put forth in article 27-1915 of environmental 9 conservation law, including suballocation to other state departments 10 and agencies (09WT2056) (25730) ... 4,000,000 ..... (re. $3,328,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 12 For services and capital expenses related to the waste management and 13 cleanup program as put forth in article 27-1915 of environmental 14 conservation law, including suballocation to other state departments 15 and agencies (09WT1956) (25730) ... 4,000,000 ..... (re. $3,190,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 17 For pre-closure and post-closure costs associated with Adirondack 18 landfills pursuant to agreements with Essex county (09EX1856) 19 (24872) ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $413,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 21 For pre-closure and post-closure costs associated with Adirondack 22 landfills pursuant to agreements with Essex county (09EX1756) 23 (24872) ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $217,000) 24 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 25 For pre-closure and post-closure costs associated with Adirondack 26 landfills pursuant to agreements with Essex county (09EX1656) 27 (24872) ... 500,000 ................................... (re. $3,000) 28 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 29 For post-closure costs associated with the state-owned Rush Landfill 30 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 31 (09RL0956) (24871) ... 50,000 ......................... (re. $7,000) 32 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 33 For post-closure costs associated with the state-owned Rush Landfill 34 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 35 (09RL0856) (24871) ... 50,000 ......................... (re. $2,000) 36 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 37 For post-closure costs associated with the state-owned Rush Landfill 38 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 39 (09RL0756) (24871) ... 350,000 ....................... (re. $38,000) 40 Capital Projects Funds - Other 41 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 42 New York Environmental Protection and Spill Remediation Account - 43 32219 375 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Solid Waste Management Purposes 2 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 3 For services and capital expenses associated with costs incurred under 4 Article 12 of the Navigation Law, and for cleanup, investigation, 5 and removal of petroleum spills, including prior year liabilities 6 (09OS2556) (25720) ... 21,200,000 ................ (re. $21,199,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 8 For services and capital expenses associated with costs incurred under 9 Article 12 of the Navigation Law, and for cleanup, investigation, 10 and removal of petroleum spills, including prior year liabilities 11 (09OS2456) (25720) ... 21,200,000 ................ (re. $18,099,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 For services and capital expenses associated with costs incurred under 14 Article 12 of the Navigation Law, and for cleanup, investigation, 15 and removal of petroleum spills, including prior year liabilities 16 (09OS2356) (25720) ... 21,200,000 ................. (re. $6,297,000) 17 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 18 Federal Capital Projects Fund 19 ENCON Federal Capital Account - 31364(M) 20 Hazardous Waste Purpose 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 22 For the federal share of the cleanup of hazardous waste sites pursuant 23 to the provision of the federal comprehensive environmental 24 response, compensation and liability act of 1980 reauthorization or 25 amendments thereto including suballocation to other state depart- 26 ments and agencies (09FS25F7) (24873) .............................. 27 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 29 For the federal share of the cleanup of hazardous waste sites pursuant 30 to the provision of the federal comprehensive environmental 31 response, compensation and liability act of 1980 reauthorization or 32 amendments thereto including suballocation to other state depart- 33 ments and agencies (09FS24F7) (24873) .............................. 34 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 36 For the federal share of the cleanup of hazardous waste sites pursuant 37 to the provision of the federal comprehensive environmental 38 response, compensation and liability act of 1980 reauthorization or 39 amendments thereto including suballocation to other state depart- 40 ments and agencies (09FS23F7) (24873) .............................. 41 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 43 For the federal share of the cleanup of hazardous waste sites pursuant 44 to the provision of the federal comprehensive environmental 376 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 response, compensation and liability act of 1980 reauthorization or 2 amendments thereto including suballocation to other state depart- 3 ments and agencies (09FS18F7) (24873) .............................. 4 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $22,825,000) 5 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 6 For the federal share of the cleanup of hazardous waste sites pursuant 7 to the provision of the federal comprehensive environmental 8 response, compensation and liability act of 1980 reauthorization or 9 amendments thereto including suballocation to other state depart- 10 ments and agencies (09FS16F7) (24873) .............................. 11 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $26,705,000) 12 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 13 Federal Capital Projects Fund 14 ENCON Federal Capital Account - 31364 15 Solid Waste Management Purpose 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 17 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to mate- 18 rials management resources purposes including suballocation to other 19 state departments and agencies (09MF2556) (62036) .................. 20 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to mate- 23 rials management resources purposes including suballocation to other 24 state departments and agencies (09MF2456) (62036) .................. 25 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 27 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to mate- 28 rials management resources purposes including suballocation to other 29 state departments and agencies (09MF2356) (62036) .................. 30 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 31 WATER RESOURCES (CCP) 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 34 Flood Control Purpose 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 36 For the state's share including personal service, nonpersonal service, 37 fringe benefits and indirect costs of various shore protection 38 projects including suballocation to other state departments and 39 agencies (09W12563) (24880) ... 4,900,000 ......... (re. $4,900,000) 40 For various new and existing flood protection projects including the 41 state share of federal sponsored flood control projects, and the 42 maintenance of existing flood control projects; for coastal erosion 43 hazard area mapping of the state's Atlantic Ocean and Great Lakes 44 coastlines and the state share of costs associated with matching 377 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 federal funds for a statewide flood plain map modernization program; 2 for the state share of costs associated with the installation and/or 3 reinstallation, upgrade, monitoring and maintenance of a statewide 4 network of stream flow gauges, including personal service, nonper- 5 sonal service, fringe benefits and indirect costs, including subal- 6 location to other state departments and agencies (09FL2563) (24881) 7 ... 10,000,000 ................................... (re. $10,000,000) 8 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 9 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 10 available until the respective municipality has entered into an 11 agreement with the commissioner of the department of environmental 12 conservation, and such agreement is approved by the director of the 13 budget (09AD2563) (24887) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 14 For services and expenses of the non-federal share of the Army Corps 15 of Engineers Fire Island to Montauk Point project, including but not 16 limited to the placement of suitable material to support shorelines, 17 beach berms, and dunes at appropriate intervals, periodic renourish- 18 ment of such material, and the elevation of structures within flood- 19 plains (09FI2563) (62052) .......................................... 20 1,300,368,000 ................................. (re. $1,300,368,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 For the state's share including personal service, nonpersonal service, 23 fringe benefits and indirect costs of various shore protection 24 projects including suballocation to other state departments and 25 agencies (09W12463) (24880) ... 1,700,000 ......... (re. $1,700,000) 26 For various new and existing flood protection projects including the 27 state share of federal sponsored flood control projects, and the 28 maintenance of existing flood control projects; for coastal erosion 29 hazard area mapping of the state's Atlantic Ocean and Great Lakes 30 coastlines and the state share of costs associated with matching 31 federal funds for a statewide flood plain map modernization program; 32 for the state share of costs associated with the installation and/or 33 reinstallation, upgrade, monitoring and maintenance of a statewide 34 network of stream flow gauges, including personal service, nonper- 35 sonal service, fringe benefits and indirect costs, including subal- 36 location to other state departments and agencies (09FL2463) (24881) 37 ... 11,000,000 .................................... (re. $7,944,000) 38 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 39 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 40 available until the respective municipality has entered into an 41 agreement with the commissioner of the department of environmental 42 conservation, and such agreement is approved by the director of the 43 budget (09AD2463) (24887) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 44 For the state's share of the Army Corps of Engineers Mamaroneck Sheld- 45 rake Flood Risk Management Project (09MA2463) (24698) .............. 46 10,850,000 ....................................... (re. $10,850,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 48 For the state's share including personal service, nonpersonal service, 49 fringe benefits and indirect costs of various shore protection 378 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 projects including suballocation to other state departments and 2 agencies (09W12363) (24880) ... 1,700,000 ......... (re. $1,700,000) 3 For various new and existing flood protection projects including the 4 state share of federal sponsored flood control projects, and the 5 maintenance of existing flood control projects; for coastal erosion 6 hazard area mapping of the state's Atlantic Ocean and Great Lakes 7 coastlines and the state share of costs associated with matching 8 federal funds for a statewide flood plain map modernization program; 9 for the state share of costs associated with the installation and/or 10 reinstallation, upgrade, monitoring and maintenance of a statewide 11 network of stream flow gauges, including personal service, nonper- 12 sonal service, fringe benefits and indirect costs, including subal- 13 location to other state departments and agencies (09FL2363) (24881) 14 ... 5,000,000 ..................................... (re. $4,360,000) 15 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 16 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 17 available until the respective municipality has entered into an 18 agreement with the commissioner of the department of environmental 19 conservation, and such agreement is approved by the director of the 20 budget (09AD2363) (24887) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $3,731,000) 21 For the state's share of the Army Corps of Engineers Mamaroneck Sheld- 22 rake Flood Risk Management Project (09MA2363) (24689) .............. 23 17,500,000 ....................................... (re. $17,500,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 25 For the state's share including personal service, nonpersonal service, 26 fringe benefits and indirect costs of various shore protection 27 projects including suballocation to other state departments and 28 agencies (09W12263) (24880) ... 1,700,000 ......... (re. $1,700,000) 29 For various new and existing flood protection projects including the 30 state share of federal sponsored flood control projects, and the 31 maintenance of existing flood control projects; for coastal erosion 32 hazard area mapping of the state's Atlantic Ocean and Great Lakes 33 coastlines and the state share of costs associated with matching 34 federal funds for a statewide flood plain map modernization program; 35 for the state share of costs associated with the installation and/or 36 reinstallation, upgrade, monitoring and maintenance of a statewide 37 network of stream flow gauges, including personal service, nonper- 38 sonal service, fringe benefits and indirect costs, including subal- 39 location to other state departments and agencies (09FL2263) (24881) 40 ... 5,000,000 ..................................... (re. $2,587,000) 41 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 42 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 43 available until the respective municipality has entered into an 44 agreement with the commissioner of the department of environmental 45 conservation, and such agreement is approved by the director of the 46 budget (09AD2263) (24887) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 48 For the state's share including personal service, nonpersonal service, 49 fringe benefits and indirect costs of various shore protection 379 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 projects including suballocation to other state departments and 2 agencies (09W12163) (24880) ... 1,000,000 ......... (re. $1,000,000) 3 For various new and existing flood protection projects including the 4 state share of federal sponsored flood control projects, and the 5 maintenance of existing flood control projects; for coastal erosion 6 hazard area mapping of the state's Atlantic Ocean and Great Lakes 7 coastlines and the state share of costs associated with matching 8 federal funds for a statewide flood plain map modernization program; 9 for the state share of costs associated with the installation and/or 10 reinstallation, upgrade, monitoring and maintenance of a statewide 11 network of stream flow gauges, including personal service, nonper- 12 sonal service, fringe benefits and indirect costs, including subal- 13 location to other state departments and agencies (09FL2163) (24881) 14 ... 3,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,302,000) 15 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 16 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 17 available until the respective municipality has entered into an 18 agreement with the commissioner of the department of environmental 19 conservation, and such agreement is approved by the director of the 20 budget (09AD2163) (24887) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 22 For the state's share including personal service, nonpersonal service, 23 fringe benefits and indirect costs of various shore protection 24 projects including suballocation to other state departments and 25 agencies (09W12063) (24880) ... 1,000,000 ......... (re. $1,000,000) 26 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 27 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 28 available until the respective municipality has entered into an 29 agreement with the commissioner of the department of environmental 30 conservation, and such agreement is approved by the director of the 31 budget (09AD2063) (24887) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 33 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 34 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 35 available until the respective municipality has entered into an 36 agreement with the commissioner of the department of environmental 37 conservation, and such agreement is approved by the director of the 38 budget (09AD1963) (24887) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 40 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 41 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 42 available until the respective municipality has entered into an 43 agreement with the commissioner of the department of environmental 44 conservation, and such agreement is approved by the director of the 45 budget (09AD1863) (24887) ... 3,000,000 ........... (re. $3,000,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 47 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 48 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 380 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 available until the respective municipality has entered into an 2 agreement with the commissioner of the department of environmental 3 conservation, and such agreement is approved by the director of the 4 budget (09AD1763) (24887) ... 3,000,000 ........... (re. $3,000,000) 5 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 6 For various new and existing flood protection projects including the 7 state share of federal sponsored flood control projects, and the 8 maintenance of existing flood control projects; for coastal erosion 9 hazard area mapping of the state's Atlantic Ocean and Great Lakes 10 coastlines and the state share of costs associated with matching 11 federal funds for a statewide flood plain map modernization program; 12 for the state share of costs associated with the installation and/or 13 reinstallation, upgrade, monitoring and maintenance of a statewide 14 network of stream flow gauges, including personal service, non-per- 15 sonal service, fringe benefits and indirect costs, including subal- 16 location to other state departments and agencies (09FL1663) (24881) 17 ... 2,250,000 ....................................... (re. $138,000) 18 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 19 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 20 available until the respective municipality has entered into an 21 agreement with the commissioner of the department of environmental 22 conservation, and such agreement is approved by the director of the 23 budget (09AD1663) (24887) ... 3,000,000 ........... (re. $3,000,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 25 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 26 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 27 available until the respective municipality has entered into an 28 agreement with the commissioner of the department of environmental 29 conservation, and such agreement is approved by the director of the 30 budget (09AD1563) (24887) ... 3,000,000 ........... (re. $3,000,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 32 For the state's share including personal service, nonpersonal service, 33 fringe benefits and indirect costs of various shore protection 34 projects including suballocation to other state departments and 35 agencies (09W11263) (24880) ... 1,000,000 ......... (re. $1,000,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 37 For the state's share including personal services, fringe benefits and 38 indirect costs of various shore protection projects including subal- 39 location to other state departments and agencies (09W11163) (24880) 40 ... 1,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000,000) 41 For various new and existing flood protection projects including the 42 state share of federal sponsored flood control projects, and the 43 maintenance of existing flood control projects including personal 44 services and fringe benefits, including suballocation to other state 45 departments and agencies (09FL1163) (24881) ........................ 46 1,000,000 ............................................. (re. $1,000) 47 For services and expenses for the state share of costs associated with 48 matching federal funds for a statewide flood plain map modernization 381 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 program, including suballocation to other state departments and 2 agencies (09FP1163) (24883) ... 834,000 ............. (re. $834,000) 3 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 4 For various new and existing flood protection projects including the 5 state share of federal sponsored flood control projects, and the 6 maintenance of existing flood control projects including personal 7 services and fringe benefits, including suballocation to other state 8 departments and agencies (09FL1063) (24881) ........................ 9 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $178,000) 10 For services and expenses for the state share of costs associated with 11 matching federal funds for a statewide flood plain map modernization 12 program, including suballocation to other state departments and 13 agencies (09FP1063) (24883) ... 834,000 ............. (re. $834,000) 14 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 15 For the state's share including personal services, fringe benefits and 16 indirect costs of various shore protection projects including subal- 17 location to other state departments and agencies (09W10963) (24880) 18 ... 1,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000,000) 19 For services and expenses for the state share of costs associated with 20 matching federal funds for a statewide flood plain map modernization 21 program, including suballocation to other state departments and 22 agencies (09FP0963) (24883) ... 834,000 ............. (re. $834,000) 23 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 24 For services and expenses for the state share of costs associated with 25 matching federal funds for a statewide flood plain map modernization 26 program, including suballocation to other state departments and 27 agencies (09FP0863) (24883) ... 834,000 .............. (re. $95,000) 28 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 29 For various dam safety projects (09FD0763) (24884) ................... 30 300,000 ............................................. (re. $261,000) 31 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 32 For services and expenses for the state share of costs associated with 33 matching federal funds for a statewide flood plain map modernization 34 program, including suballocation to other state departments and 35 agencies (09FP0663) (24883) ... 834,000 ............. (re. $145,000) 36 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 37 For the state's share including personal services, fringe benefits and 38 indirect costs of various shore protection projects including subal- 39 location to other state departments and agencies (09W10563) (24880) 40 ... 800,000 ......................................... (re. $328,000) 41 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004: 42 For the state's share including personal services, fringe benefits and 43 indirect costs of various shore protection projects including subal- 44 location to other state departments and agencies (09W10463) (24880) 45 ... 1,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000,000) 382 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 2 For the state's share of federally funded flood control projects 3 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. No 4 portion of this appropriation shall be available until the federal 5 share of such projects is appropriated (09FC0363) (24723) .......... 6 2,359,000 ......................................... (re. $1,563,000) 7 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 8 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 9 available until the respective county has entered into an agreement 10 with the commissioner of the department of environmental conserva- 11 tion, and such agreement is approved by the director of the budget 12 (09AD0363) (24887) ... 895,000 ...................... (re. $150,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 14 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 15 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 16 available until the respective county has entered into an agreement 17 with the commissioner of the department of environmental conserva- 18 tion, and such agreement is approved by the director of the budget 19 (09AD0263) (24887) ... 1,955,000 ..................... (re. $18,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2001: 21 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 22 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 23 available until the respective county has entered into an agreement 24 with the commissioner of the department of environmental conserva- 25 tion, and such agreement is approved by the director of the budget 26 (09070163) (24887) ... 1,275,000 ...................... (re. $3,000) 27 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000: 28 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 29 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 30 available until the respective county has entered into an agreement 31 with the commissioner of the department of environmental conserva- 32 tion, and such agreement is approved by the director of the budget 33 (09A10063) (24887) ... 1,275,000 ..................... (re. $22,000) 34 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 35 For an advance payment by the state for the local costs of various 36 shore protection projects. No portion of this appropriation shall be 37 available until the respective county has entered into an agreement 38 with the commissioner of the department of environmental conserva- 39 tion, and such agreement is approved by the director of the budget 40 (09A29963) (24887) ... 880,000 ...................... (re. $333,000) 41 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999, as amended by chapter 55, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2009: 43 For the state's share of shore protection projects including Shinne- 44 cock Inlet, coastal erosion of Coney Island, coastal erosion of 45 Westhampton, West of Shinnecock, Orchard Beach and the Rockaway 46 Beach Nourishment Project (09W29963) (25892) ....................... 47 3,750,000 ........................................... (re. $147,000) 383 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as amended by chapter 55, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2009: 3 For the state's share of shore protection projects including Shinne- 4 cock Inlet, coastal erosion of Coney Island, coastal erosion of 5 Westhampton, West of Shinnecock, Orchard Beach and the Jones Inlet 6 Beach Nourishment Project (09W39863) (25889) ....................... 7 490,000 ............................................. (re. $490,000) 8 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as amended by chapter 55, 9 section 1, of the laws of 2010: 10 For the state's share of shore protection projects including Shinne- 11 cock Inlet, coastal erosion of Coney Island, coastal erosion of 12 Westhampton, West of Shinnecock, Orchard Beach and the Shinnecock 13 Inlet project including suballocation to the department of state 14 (09W49863) (25886) ... 2,183,000 .................... (re. $130,000) 15 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997, as amended by chapter 16 108, section 5, of the laws of 2006: 17 For various dam safety projects (09009763) (24884) ................... 18 500,000 .............................................. (re. $72,000) 19 For costs associated with storm damage reduction and beach nourishment 20 projects on Long Beach Barrier Island in the communities of Point 21 Lookout and Lido Beach (09099763) (25893) .......................... 22 7,600,000 ......................................... (re. $7,600,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1994, as amended by chapter 55, 24 section 1, of the laws of 2009: 25 For the state's share of shore protection projects including Shinne- 26 cock Inlet, coastal erosion of Coney Island, coastal erosion of 27 Westhampton, West of Shinnecock, Orchard Beach and the Jones Inlet 28 Beach nourishment project (09539463) (25889) ....................... 29 840,000 ............................................. (re. $611,000) 30 For the state's share of shore protection projects including Shinne- 31 cock Inlet, coastal erosion of Coney Island, coastal erosion of 32 Westhampton, West of Shinnecock, Orchard Beach and coastal erosion 33 shore monitoring systems (09A69463) (25895) ........................ 34 1,400,000 ........................................... (re. $900,000) 35 For the state's share of shore protection projects including Shinne- 36 cock Inlet, coastal erosion of Coney Island, coastal erosion of 37 Westhampton, West of Shinnecock, Orchard Beach and coastal erosion 38 sand bypassing projects at Asharoken Beach and the LILCO Jetties 39 (09A79463) (25894) ... 1,000,000 ..................... (re. $65,000) 40 For the state's share of shore protection projects including Shinne- 41 cock Inlet, coastal erosion of Coney Island, coastal erosion of 42 Westhampton, West of Shinnecock, Orchard Beach and sand bypassing 43 projects at the Long Island South Shore Inlets (09A19463) (25897) 44 ... 1,450,000 ........................................ (re. $55,000) 45 For the state's share of shore protection projects including Shinne- 46 cock Inlet, coastal erosion of Coney Island, coastal erosion of 47 Westhampton, West of Shinnecock, Orchard Beach and coastal erosion 48 evacuation route projects at Bayville, Rockaway and Long Beach 49 (09A49463) (25698) ... 2,000,000 .................... (re. $226,000) 384 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 Water Resources Purpose 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 5 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 6 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 7 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 8 law (09DA2557) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 9 For payment of a portion of the state's match for federal capitaliza- 10 tion grants for the water pollution control revolving fund 11 (09RF2557) (24874) ... 89,000,000 ................ (re. $89,000,000) 12 For services and expenses including personal service, fringe benefits, 13 and nonpersonal service for the water pollution control revolving 14 fund and related water quality activities including suballocation to 15 other state departments and agencies (09SR2557) (25707) ............ 16 3,500,000 ......................................... (re. $3,465,000) 17 For services and expenses including personal service, fringe benefits, 18 and nonpersonal service for the Excelsior Conservation Corps program 19 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 20 (09CC2557) (25708) ... 200,000 ...................... (re. $200,000) 21 The sum of $500,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the costs of clean 22 water infrastructure projects, including services, expenses, and 23 indirect costs, including but not limited to the following: projects 24 as authorized by the New York state water infrastructure improvement 25 act of 2017; for New York state intermunicipal water infrastructure 26 projects pursuant to section 1285-s of the public authorities law; 27 for water quality improvement projects, including nonagricultural 28 nonpoint source abatement and control projects, municipal wastewater 29 treatment projects, and municipal separate storm sewer system 30 projects, and for the proper management of road salt; for green 31 infrastructure projects; for land acquisition projects, including 32 projects for source water protection pursuant to title 33 of article 33 15 of the environmental conservation law; for state assistance 34 payments, services, and expenses to soil and water conservation 35 districts for the cost of water quality protection projects awarded 36 on a competitive basis prioritizing financial need and hardship, 37 intended to assist concentrated animal feeding operations; for the 38 remediation of sites, including for investigation, mitigation and 39 remediation of solid waste sites, pursuant to titles 12 and 13 of 40 article 27 of the environmental conservation law and consistent with 41 the provisions of section 97-b of the state finance law, provided 42 however that no more than $5,000,000 of such appropriation may be 43 expended for investigation, mitigation and remediation of solid 44 waste sites; for replacement of lead drinking water service lines 45 pursuant to section 1114 of the public health law; for New York City 46 for water quality projects located within the New York City 47 watershed; for a program to upgrade or replace septic systems and 48 cesspools pursuant to section 1285-u of the public authorities law; 49 for water infrastructure emergency assistance pursuant to section 50 1285-t of the public authorities law; to support municipal water 51 quality infrastructure programs which may otherwise not qualify for 385 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 state support, or may require additional state support; for a 2 program to provide state assistance for the testing and remediation 3 of emerging contaminants in private drinking water wells; for the 4 development of information technology systems related to water qual- 5 ity pursuant to section 3-0315 of the environmental conservation 6 law. All or a portion of the appropriation may be provided to the 7 environmental facilities corporation or suballocated to any other 8 state department, agency, public authority, or public benefit corpo- 9 ration (09CW2557) (25722) .......................................... 10 500,000,000 ..................................... (re. $500,000,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 12 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 13 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 14 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 15 law (09DA2457) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 16 For payment of a portion of the state's match for federal capitaliza- 17 tion grants for the water pollution control revolving fund 18 (09RF2457) (24874) ... 85,000,000 ................ (re. $85,000,000) 19 For services and expenses including personal service, fringe benefits, 20 and nonpersonal service for the water pollution control revolving 21 fund and related water quality activities including suballocation to 22 other state departments and agencies (09SR2457) (25707) ............ 23 3,500,000 ......................................... (re. $3,500,000) 24 For services and expenses including personal service, fringe benefits, 25 and nonpersonal service for the Excelsior Conservation Corps program 26 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 27 (09CC2457) (25708) ... 200,000 ...................... (re. $200,000) 28 The sum of $500,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the costs of clean 29 water infrastructure projects, including services, expenses, and 30 indirect costs, including but not limited to the following: projects 31 as authorized by the New York state water infrastructure improvement 32 act of 2017; for New York state intermunicipal water infrastructure 33 projects pursuant to section 1285-s of the public authorities law; 34 for water quality improvement projects, including nonagricultural 35 nonpoint source abatement and control projects, municipal wastewater 36 treatment projects, and municipal separate storm sewer system 37 projects, and for the proper management of road salt; for green 38 infrastructure projects; for land acquisition projects, including 39 projects for source water protection pursuant to title 33 of article 40 15 of the environmental conservation law; for state assistance 41 payments, services, and expenses to soil and water conservation 42 districts for the cost of water quality protection projects awarded 43 on a competitive basis prioritizing financial need and hardship, 44 intended to assist concentrated animal feeding operations; for the 45 remediation of sites, including for investigation, mitigation and 46 remediation of solid waste sites, pursuant to titles 12 and 13 of 47 article 27 of the environmental conservation law and consistent with 48 the provisions of section 97-b of the state finance law, provided 49 however that no more than $5,000,000 of such appropriation may be 50 expended for investigation, mitigation and remediation of solid 51 waste sites; for replacement of lead drinking water service lines 386 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 pursuant to section 1114 of the public health law; for New York City 2 for water quality projects located within the New York City 3 watershed; for a program to upgrade or replace septic systems and 4 cesspools pursuant to section 1285-u of the public authorities law; 5 for water infrastructure emergency assistance pursuant to section 6 1285-t of the public authorities law; to support municipal water 7 quality infrastructure programs which may otherwise not qualify for 8 state support, or may require additional state support; for the 9 development of information technology systems related to water qual- 10 ity pursuant to section 3-0315 of the environmental conservation 11 law. All or a portion of the appropriation may be provided to the 12 environmental facilities corporation or suballocated to any other 13 state department, agency, public authority, or public benefit corpo- 14 ration (09CW2457) (25722) .......................................... 15 500,000,000 ..................................... (re. $500,000,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 17 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 18 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 19 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 20 law (09DA2357) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 21 For payment of a portion of the state's match for federal capitaliza- 22 tion grants for the water pollution control revolving fund 23 (09RF2357) (24874) ... 60,000,000 ................ (re. $19,877,000) 24 For services and expenses including personal service, fringe benefits, 25 and nonpersonal service for the water pollution control revolving 26 fund and related water quality activities including suballocation to 27 other state departments and agencies (09SR2357) (25707) ............ 28 5,500,000 ......................................... (re. $3,293,000) 29 For the state's share of shore protection or coastal erosion projects, 30 including the Army Corp of Engineers South Shore of Staten Island 31 Project (09SI2357) (25721) ... 74,000,000 ........ (re. $74,000,000) 32 The sum of $500,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the costs of clean 33 water infrastructure projects, including services, expenses, and 34 indirect costs, including but not limited to the following: projects 35 as authorized by the New York state water infrastructure improvement 36 act of 2017; for New York state intermunicipal water infrastructure 37 projects pursuant to section 1285-s of the public authorities law; 38 for water quality improvement projects, including nonagricultural 39 nonpoint source abatement and control projects, municipal wastewater 40 treatment projects, and municipal separate storm sewer system 41 projects, and for the proper management of road salt; for green 42 infrastructure projects; for land acquisition projects, including 43 projects for source water protection pursuant to title 33 of article 44 15 of the environmental conservation law; for state assistance 45 payments, services, and expenses to soil and water conservation 46 districts for the cost of water quality protection projects awarded 47 on a competitive basis prioritizing financial need and hardship, 48 intended to assist concentrated animal feeding operations; for the 49 remediation of sites, including for investigation, mitigation and 50 remediation of solid waste sites, pursuant to titles 12 and 13 of 51 article 27 of the environmental conservation law and consistent with 387 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the provisions of section 97-b of the state finance law, provided 2 however that no more than $5,000,000 of such appropriation may be 3 expended for investigation, mitigation and remediation of solid 4 waste sites; for replacement of lead drinking water service lines 5 pursuant to section 1114 of the public health law; for New York City 6 for water quality projects located within the New York City 7 watershed; for a program to upgrade or replace septic systems and 8 cesspools pursuant to section 1285-u of the public authorities law; 9 for water infrastructure emergency assistance pursuant to section 10 1285-t of the public authorities law; to support municipal water 11 quality infrastructure programs which may otherwise not qualify for 12 state support, or may require additional state support; for the 13 development of information technology systems related to water qual- 14 ity pursuant to section 3-0315 of the environmental conservation 15 law. All or a portion of the appropriation may be provided to the 16 environmental facilities corporation or suballocated to any other 17 department or state agency (09CW2357) (25722) ...................... 18 500,000,000 ..................................... (re. $500,000,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 20 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 21 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 22 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 23 law (09DA2257) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 24 For the expansion of the Huntington Station Sewer Treatment Center 25 Network, in the hamlet of Huntington Station in Suffolk County 26 (09HU2257) (62029) ... 22,000,000 ................ (re. $22,000,000) 27 For upgrades and improvements at North Tonawanda Wastewater Treatment 28 Plant in Niagara County (09TO2257) (62030) ......................... 29 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 30 For the Great Neck Water Pollution Control District for the Manhasset 31 Sewer Installation Project (09MH2257) (62031) ...................... 32 5,000,000 ........................................... (re. $178,000) 33 For payment of a portion of the state's match for federal capitaliza- 34 tion grants for the water pollution control revolving fund 35 (09RF2257) (24874) ... 55,000,000 ................ (re. $16,313,000) 36 For services and expenses including personal service, fringe benefits, 37 and nonpersonal service for the water pollution control revolving 38 fund and related water quality activities including suballocation to 39 other state departments and agencies (09SR2257) (25707) ............ 40 5,500,000 ........................................... (re. $483,000) 41 The sum of $500,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the costs of clean 42 water infrastructure projects, including services, expenses, and 43 indirect costs, including but not limited to the following: projects 44 as authorized by the New York state water infrastructure improvement 45 act of 2017; for New York state intermunicipal water infrastructure 46 projects pursuant to section 1285-s of the public authorities law; 47 for water quality improvement projects, including nonagricultural 48 nonpoint source abatement and control projects, municipal wastewater 49 treatment projects, and municipal separate storm sewer system 50 projects, and for the proper management of road salt; for green 51 infrastructure projects; for land acquisition projects, including 388 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 projects for source water protection pursuant to title 33 of article 2 15 of the environmental conservation law; for state assistance 3 payments, services, and expenses to soil and water conservation 4 districts for the cost of water quality protection projects awarded 5 on a competitive basis prioritizing financial need and hardship, 6 intended to assist concentrated animal feeding operations; for the 7 remediation of sites, including for investigation, mitigation and 8 remediation of solid waste sites, pursuant to titles 12 and 13 of 9 article 27 of the environmental conservation law and consistent with 10 the provisions of section 97-b of the state finance law, provided 11 however that no more than $5,000,000 of such appropriation may be 12 expended for investigation, mitigation and remediation of solid 13 waste sites; for replacement of lead drinking water service lines 14 pursuant to section 1114 of the public health law; for New York City 15 for water quality projects located within the New York City 16 watershed; for a program to upgrade or replace septic systems and 17 cesspools pursuant to section 1285-u of the public authorities law; 18 for water infrastructure emergency assistance pursuant to section 19 1285-t of the public authorities law; to support municipal water 20 quality infrastructure programs which may otherwise not qualify for 21 state support, or may require additional state support; for the 22 development of information technology systems related to water qual- 23 ity pursuant to section 3-0315 of the environmental conservation 24 law. All or a portion of the appropriation may be provided to the 25 environmental facilities corporation or suballocated to any other 26 department or state agency (09CW2257) (25722) ...................... 27 500,000,000 ..................................... (re. $500,000,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 29 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 30 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 31 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 32 law (09DA2157) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 33 The sum of $500,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the costs of clean 34 water infrastructure projects, including services, expenses, and 35 indirect costs, including but not limited to the following: projects 36 as authorized by the New York state water infrastructure improvement 37 act of 2017; for New York state intermunicipal water infrastructure 38 projects pursuant to section 1285-s of the public authorities law; 39 for water quality improvement projects, including nonagricultural 40 nonpoint source abatement and control projects, municipal wastewater 41 treatment projects, and municipal separate storm sewer system 42 projects, and for the proper management of road salt; for green 43 infrastructure projects; for land acquisition projects, including 44 projects for source water protection pursuant to title 33 of article 45 15 of the environmental conservation law; for state assistance 46 payments, services, and expenses to soil and water conservation 47 districts for the cost of water quality protection projects awarded 48 on a competitive basis prioritizing financial need and hardship, 49 intended to assist concentrated animal feeding operations; for the 50 remediation of sites pursuant to titles 12 and 13 of article 27 of 51 the environmental conservation law and consistent with the 389 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 provisions of section 97-b of the state finance law, provided howev- 2 er that no more than $5,000,000 of such appropriation may be 3 expended for investigation, mitigation and remediation of solid 4 waste sites; for replacement of lead drinking water service lines 5 pursuant to section 1114 of the public health law; for New York City 6 for water quality projects located within the New York City 7 watershed; for a program to upgrade or replace septic systems and 8 cesspools pursuant to section 1285-u of the public authorities law; 9 for water infrastructure emergency assistance pursuant to section 10 1285-t of the public authorities law; to support municipal water 11 quality infrastructure programs which may otherwise not qualify for 12 state support, or may require additional state support; for the 13 development of information technology systems related to water qual- 14 ity pursuant to section 3-0315 of the environmental conservation 15 law. All or a portion of the appropriation may be provided to the 16 environmental facilities corporation or suballocated to any other 17 department or state agency (09CW2157) (25722) ...................... 18 500,000,000 ..................................... (re. $477,017,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 20 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 21 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 22 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 23 law (09DA2057) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 24 For services and expenses including personal service, fringe benefits, 25 and nonpersonal service for the Excelsior Conservation Corps program 26 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 27 (09CC2057) (25708) ... 200,000 ...................... (re. $136,000) 28 The sum of $500,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the costs of clean 29 water infrastructure projects, including services, expenses, and 30 indirect costs, including but not limited to the following: projects 31 as authorized by the New York state water infrastructure improvement 32 act of 2017; for New York state intermunicipal water infrastructure 33 projects pursuant to section 1285-s of the public authorities law; 34 for water quality improvement projects, including nonagricultural 35 nonpoint source abatement and control projects, municipal wastewater 36 treatment projects, and municipal separate storm sewer system 37 projects, and for the proper management of road salt; for green 38 infrastructure projects; for land acquisition projects, including 39 projects for source water protection pursuant to title 33 of article 40 15 of the environmental conservation law; for state assistance 41 payments, services, and expenses to soil and water conservation 42 districts for the cost of water quality protection projects awarded 43 on a competitive basis prioritizing financial need and hardship, 44 intended to assist concentrated animal feeding operations; for the 45 remediation of sites pursuant to titles 12 and 13 of article 27 of 46 the environmental conservation law and consistent with the 47 provisions of section 97-b of the state finance law, provided howev- 48 er that no more than 5,000,000 of such appropriation may be expended 49 for investigation, mitigation and remediation of solid waste sites; 50 for replacement of lead drinking water service lines pursuant to 51 section 1114 of the public health law; for New York City for water 390 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 quality projects located within the New York City watershed; for a 2 program to upgrade or replace septic systems and cesspools pursuant 3 to section 1285-u of the public authorities law; for water infras- 4 tructure emergency assistance pursuant to section 1285-t of the 5 public authorities law; to support municipal water quality infras- 6 tructure programs which may otherwise not qualify for state support, 7 or may require additional state support; for the development of 8 information technology systems related to water quality pursuant to 9 section 3-0315 of the environmental conservation law. All or a 10 portion of the appropriation may be provided to the environmental 11 facilities corporation or suballocated to any other department or 12 state agency (09CW2057) (25722) .................................... 13 500,000,000 ..................................... (re. $419,410,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 15 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 16 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 17 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 18 law (09DA1957) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 19 The sum of $500,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the costs of clean 20 water infrastructure projects, including services, expenses, and 21 indirect costs, including but not limited to the following: projects 22 as authorized by the New York state water infrastructure improvement 23 act of 2017; for New York state intermunicipal water infrastructure 24 projects pursuant to section 1285-s of the public authorities law; 25 for water quality improvement projects, including nonagricultural 26 nonpoint source abatement and control projects, municipal wastewater 27 treatment projects, and municipal separate storm sewer system 28 projects, and for the proper management of road salt; for green 29 infrastructure projects; for land acquisition projects, including 30 projects for source water protection pursuant to title 33 of article 31 15 of the environmental conservation law; for state assistance 32 payments, services, and expenses to soil and water conservation 33 districts for the cost of water quality protection projects awarded 34 on a competitive basis prioritizing financial need and hardship, 35 intended to assist concentrated animal feeding operations; for the 36 remediation of sites pursuant to titles 12 and 13 of article 27 of 37 the environmental conservation law and consistent with the 38 provisions of section 97-b of the state finance law, provided howev- 39 er that no more than 5,000,000 of such appropriation may be expended 40 for investigation, mitigation and remediation of solid waste sites; 41 for replacement of lead drinking water service lines pursuant to 42 section 1114 of the public health law; for New York City for water 43 quality projects located within the New York City watershed; for a 44 program to upgrade or replace septic systems and cesspools pursuant 45 to section 1285-u of the public authorities law; for water infras- 46 tructure emergency assistance pursuant to section 1285-t of the 47 public authorities law; to support municipal water quality infras- 48 tructure programs which may otherwise not qualify for state support, 49 or may require additional state support; for the development of 50 information technology systems related to water quality pursuant to 51 section 3-0315 of the environmental conservation law. All or a 391 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 portion of the appropriation may be provided to the environmental 2 facilities corporation or suballocated to any other department or 3 state agency (09CW1957) (25722) .................................... 4 500,000,000 ..................................... (re. $312,914,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 6 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 7 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 8 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 9 law (09DA1857) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 11 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 12 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 13 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 14 law (09DA1757) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 17 For the state's share of shore protection or coastal erosion projects, 18 including the Army Corp of Engineers South Shore of Staten Island 19 Project (09SI1757) (25721) ... 151,000,000 ...... (re. $109,286,000) 20 The sum of $2,500,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the capital costs 21 of clean water infrastructure projects, including services, 22 expenses, and indirect costs, as follows: not less than 23 $1,000,000,000 to the environmental facilities corporation for 24 projects authorized by the New York state water infrastructure 25 improvement act of 2017; not less than $150,000,000 to the environ- 26 mental facilities corporation for New York state intermunicipal 27 water infrastructure projects pursuant to section 1285-s of the 28 public authorities law; not less than $245,000,000 for water quality 29 improvement projects, including nonagricultural nonpoint source 30 abatement and control projects, municipal wastewater treatment 31 projects, and municipal separate storm sewer system projects, and 32 including up to $25,000,000 of such amount for projects for the 33 proper management of road salt; up to $50,000,000 for green infras- 34 tructure projects; $110,000,000 for land acquisition projects for 35 source water protection pursuant to title 33 of article 15 of the 36 environmental conservation law, including suballocation to the 37 department of agriculture and markets; up to $50,000,000 for subal- 38 location to the department of agriculture and markets for state 39 assistance payments, services, and expenses to soil and water 40 conservation districts for the cost of water quality protection 41 projects awarded on a competitive basis prioritizing financial need 42 and hardship, intended to assist concentrated animal feeding oper- 43 ations; up to $130,000,000 for the remediation of sites pursuant to 44 titles 12 and 13 of article 27 of the environmental conservation law 45 and consistent with the provisions of section 97-b of the state 46 finance law, provided however that no more than $25,000,000 of such 47 appropriation may be expended for investigation, mitigation and 48 remediation of solid waste sites; not less than $20,000,000 for 49 suballocation to the department of health for replacement of lead 392 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 drinking water service lines pursuant to section 1114 of the public 2 health law; $200,000,000 for New York City for water quality 3 projects located within the New York City watershed; not less than 4 $75,000,000 to the environmental facilities corporation for a 5 program to upgrade or replace septic systems and cesspools pursuant 6 to section 1285-u of the public authorities law; up to $10,000,000 7 to the environmental facilities corporation for water infrastructure 8 emergency assistance pursuant to section 1285-t of the public 9 authorities law; $100,000,000 to the environmental facilities corpo- 10 ration to support municipal water quality infrastructure programs 11 which may otherwise not qualify for state support, or may require 12 additional state support; and up to $10,000,000 for the development 13 of information technology systems related to water quality pursuant 14 to section 3-0315 of the environmental conservation law including 15 suballocation to the department of health (09CW1757) (25722) ....... 16 2,500,000,000 ................................. (re. $1,173,136,000) 17 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 18 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 19 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 20 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 21 law (09DA1657) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 22 The sum of $200,000,000 is hereby appropriated over a multi-year peri- 23 od for the capital costs of water quality infrastructure projects as 24 authorized by the New York state water infrastructure improvement 25 act of 2015. Up to $100,000,000 shall be available from this appro- 26 priation in state fiscal year 2016-17, with no less than $10,000,000 27 available for water quality infrastructure projects for compliance 28 with environmental and public health laws and regulations related to 29 water quality; and up to an additional $100,000,000 shall be avail- 30 able in state fiscal year 2017-18, with no less than $10,000,000 31 available for water quality infrastructure projects for compliance 32 with environmental and public health laws and regulations related to 33 water quality. All or a portion of the funds may be suballocated or 34 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 35 (09WW1657) (25765) ... 200,000,000 ............... (re. $17,500,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 37 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 38 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 39 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 40 law (09DA1557) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 42 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 43 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 44 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 45 law (09DA1457) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 47 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 48 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 393 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 2 law (09DA1357) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 4 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 5 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 6 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 7 law (09DA1257) (24878) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 8 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 9 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 10 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 11 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 12 law (09DA0757) (24878) ... 350,000 .................. (re. $349,000) 13 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 14 An advance for costs incurred relating to work required for the safety 15 of dams and other structures impounding water, to be reimbursed in 16 accordance with section 15-0507 of the environmental conservation 17 law (09DA0657) (24878) ... 300,000 .................. (re. $300,000) 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 20 [Fire Island Project Account] 21 Renourishment Account - 33232 22 Flood Control Purpose 23 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is 24 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 25 For payment by the state for the local costs of the Army Corps of 26 Engineers Fire Island to Montauk Point project pursuant to section 27 40-a of the state finance law, including but not limited to the 28 placement of suitable material to support shorelines, beach berms, 29 and dunes at appropriate intervals, periodic renourishment of such 30 material, and the elevation of structures within floodplains. No 31 portion of this appropriation shall be available until the respec- 32 tive municipality has entered into an agreement with the commission- 33 er of the department of environmental conservation, and such agree- 34 ment is approved by the director of the budget (09FZ2563) (62053) 35 ... 430,334,000 ................................. (re. $430,334,000) 36 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 37 Federal Capital Projects Fund 38 SRF Capitalization Grants Account - 31359 39 Water Resources Purpose 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 41 For federal capitalization grants for the water pollution control 42 revolving fund (09SF2557) (24876) .................................. 43 471,000,000 ..................................... (re. $471,000,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 394 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For federal capitalization grants for the water pollution control 2 revolving fund (09SF2457) (24876) .................................. 3 448,000,000 ..................................... (re. $448,000,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 5 For federal capitalization grants for the water pollution control 6 revolving fund (09SF2357) (24876) .................................. 7 430,000,000 ..................................... (re. $220,970,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 9 For federal capitalization grants for the water pollution control 10 revolving fund (09SF2257) (24876) .................................. 11 383,500,000 ...................................... (re. $26,123,000) 12 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 13 Federal Capital Projects Fund 14 ENCON Federal Capital Account - 31364 15 Water Resources Purpose 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 17 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to water 18 resources purposes including suballocation to other state depart- 19 ments and agencies (09WF2557) (62037) .............................. 20 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to water 23 resources purposes including suballocation to other state depart- 24 ments and agencies (09WF2457) (62037) .............................. 25 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 27 For the federal share of capital projects undertaken pursuant to water 28 resources purposes including suballocation to other state depart- 29 ments and agencies (09WF2357) (62037) .............................. 30 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 31 WATER RESOURCES - CLEAN WATER/CLEAN AIR (CCP) 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 34 Water Resources Purpose 35 Water Quality Improvement Projects 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 37 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 38 clean water projects in accordance with the provisions of title 3 of 39 article 56 of the environmental conservation law for project cost, 40 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto and for payment 41 of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air implementation fund 42 for services and expenses of state departments and agencies, includ- 395 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ing fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as "Clean Water Project 2 Disbursements". 3 The moneys appropriated herein may be suballocated to all state 4 departments and agencies. Further, moneys herein appropriated may be 5 suballocated only to public authorities and public benefit corpo- 6 rations specifically authorized by paragraph (1) of subdivision 1 of 7 section 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law to enter into 8 contracts for state assistance payments for the state share of costs 9 for clean water projects, provided however, that moneys herein 10 appropriated pursuant to paragraph (i) of subdivision 1 of section 11 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law for state facility 12 projects may be suballocated to any public authority or public bene- 13 fit corporation. 14 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 15 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for clean water quali- 16 ty projects in accordance with title 3 of article 56 of the environ- 17 mental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 18 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 19 budget. The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each 20 month certify to the director of the division of the budget, the 21 commissioner of environmental conservation, the chairman of the 22 senate finance committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and 23 means committee the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for 24 "Clean Water Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such 25 certification (09BA0257) (24712) ... 46,918,000 ... (re. $1,956,000) 26 Project Schedule 27 PROJECT AMOUNT 28 -------------------------------------------- 29 (thousands of dollars) 30 Hudson River water quality 31 improvement projects ............... 1,334 32 Long Island Sound water quali- 33 ty improvement projects ........... 21,000 34 New York Harbor water quality 35 improvement projects ............... 1,142 36 Finger Lakes water quality 37 improvement projects ............... 3,372 38 Peconic and South Shore Estu- 39 ary water quality improve- 40 ment projects ...................... 7,500 41 State facility projects .............. 1,881 42 Municipal wastewater treatment 43 improvement projects and 44 municipal flood control 45 projects ........................... 2,575 46 Dam safety projects .................. 4,000 47 State parks projects ................. 1,814 48 Municipal parks projects and 49 historic preservation and 50 heritage area projects ............. 2,300 51 -------------- 396 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Total ............................. 46,918 2 ============== 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2001: 4 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 5 clean water projects in accordance with the provisions of title 3 of 6 article 56 of the environmental conservation law for project cost, 7 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto and for payment 8 of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air implementation fund 9 for services and expenses of state departments and agencies, includ- 10 ing fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as "Clean Water Project 11 Disbursements". 12 The moneys appropriated herein may be suballocated to all state 13 departments and agencies. Further, moneys herein appropriated may be 14 suballocated only to public authorities and public benefit corpo- 15 rations specifically authorized by paragraph (1) of subdivision 1 of 16 section 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law to enter into 17 contracts for state assistance payments for the state share of costs 18 for clean water projects, provided however, that moneys herein 19 appropriated pursuant to paragraph (i) of subdivision 1 of section 20 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law for state facility 21 projects may be suballocated to any public authority or public bene- 22 fit corporation. 23 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 24 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for clean water quali- 25 ty projects in accordance with title 3 of article 56 of the environ- 26 mental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 27 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 28 budget. 29 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 30 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 31 environmental conservation, the chairman of the senate finance 32 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 33 the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for "Clean Water 34 Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such certification 35 (09BA0157) (24712) ... 87,582,000 ................. (re. $7,399,000) 36 Project Schedule 37 PROJECT AMOUNT 38 -------------------------------------------- 39 (thousands of dollars) 40 Hudson River water quality 41 improvement projects ............... 2,800 42 Long Island Sound water quali- 43 ty improvement projects ........... 50,000 44 Lake Champlain water quality 45 improvement projects ............... 1,000 46 Onondaga Lake water quality 47 improvement projects ............... 9,912 48 New York Harbor water quality 49 improvement projects ............... 1,500 50 Finger Lakes water quality 397 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 improvement projects ............... 3,500 2 Peconic and South Shore Estu- 3 ary water quality improve- 4 ment projects ...................... 2,000 5 State facility projects .............. 1,400 6 Open space land conservation 7 projects ........................... 3,470 8 State parks projects ................. 4,000 9 Municipal parks projects and 10 historic preservation and 11 heritage area projects ............. 8,000 12 -------------- 13 Total ............................. 87,582 14 ============== 15 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000: 16 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 17 clean water projects in accordance with the provisions of title 3 of 18 article 56 of the environmental conservation law for project cost, 19 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto and for payment 20 of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air implementation fund 21 for services and expenses of state departments and agencies, includ- 22 ing fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as "Clean Water Project 23 Disbursements". 24 The moneys appropriated herein may be suballocated to all state 25 departments and agencies. Further, moneys herein appropriated may be 26 suballocated only to public authorities and public benefit corpo- 27 rations specifically authorized by paragraph (1) of subdivision 1 of 28 section 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law to enter into 29 contracts for state assistance payments for the state share of costs 30 for clean water projects, provided however, that moneys herein 31 appropriated pursuant to paragraph (i) of subdivision 1 of section 32 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law for state facility 33 projects may be suballocated to any public authority or public bene- 34 fit corporation. 35 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 36 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for clean water quali- 37 ty projects in accordance with title 3 of article 56 of the environ- 38 mental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 39 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 40 budget. 41 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 42 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 43 environmental conservation, the chairman of the senate finance 44 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 45 the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for "Clean Water 46 Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such certification 47 (09BA0057) (24712) ... 104,500,000 ................ (re. $8,712,000) 48 Project Schedule 49 PROJECT AMOUNT 50 -------------------------------------------- 398 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 (thousands of dollars) 2 Hudson River water quality 3 improvement projects ............... 2,000 4 Long Island Sound water quali- 5 ty improvement projects ........... 30,000 6 Lake Champlain water quality 7 improvement projects ............... 1,000 8 Onondaga Lake water quality 9 improvement projects .............. 15,000 10 New York Harbor water quality 11 improvement projects ............... 2,000 12 Finger Lakes water quality 13 improvement projects ............... 3,500 14 Peconic and South Shore Estu- 15 ary water quality improve- 16 ment projects ...................... 2,000 17 State facility projects .............. 2,500 18 Municipal wastewater treatment 19 improvement projects and 20 municipal flood control 21 projects ........................... 2,000 22 Dam safety projects .................. 2,000 23 Open space land conservation 24 projects .......................... 30,000 25 State parks projects ................. 4,500 26 Municipal parks projects and 27 historic preservation and 28 heritage area projects ............. 8,000 29 -------------- 30 Total ............................ 104,500 31 ============== 32 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 33 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 34 clean water projects in accordance with the provisions of title 3 of 35 article 56 of the environmental conservation law for project cost, 36 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto and for payment 37 of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air implementation fund 38 for services and expenses of state departments and agencies, includ- 39 ing fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as "Clean Water Project 40 Disbursements". 41 The moneys appropriated herein may be suballocated to all state 42 departments and agencies. Further, moneys herein appropriated may be 43 suballocated only to public authorities and public benefit corpo- 44 rations specifically authorized by paragraph (1) of subdivision one 45 of section 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law to enter 46 into contracts for state assistance payments for the state share of 47 costs for clean water projects, provided however, that moneys herein 48 appropriated pursuant to paragraph (i) of subdivision 1 of section 49 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law for state facility 50 projects may be suballocated to any public authority or public bene- 51 fit corporation. 399 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 2 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for clean water quali- 3 ty projects in accordance with title 3 of article 56 of the environ- 4 mental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 5 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 6 budget. 7 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 8 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 9 environmental conservation, the chairman of the senate finance 10 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 11 the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for "Clean Water 12 Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such certification 13 (09BA9957) (24712) ... 188,000,000 ................ (re. $4,550,000) 14 Project Schedule 15 PROJECT AMOUNT 16 -------------------------------------------- 17 (thousands of dollars) 18 Hudson River water quality 19 improvement projects ............... 4,000 20 Long Island Sound water quali- 21 ty improvement projects ........... 50,000 22 Lake Champlain water quality 23 improvement projects ............... 2,000 24 Onondaga Lake water quality 25 improvement projects .............. 20,000 26 New York Harbor water quality 27 improvement projects ............... 2,000 28 Great Lakes water quality 29 improvement projects ............... 1,000 30 Finger Lakes water quality 31 improvement projects ............... 7,000 32 Peconic and South Shore Estu- 33 ary water quality improve- 34 ment projects ...................... 7,000 35 State facility projects .............. 5,000 36 Municipal wastewater treatment 37 improvement projects and 38 municipal flood control 39 projects ........................... 2,000 40 Environmental compliance 41 assistance projects-water 42 quality ........................... 26,000 43 Dam safety projects .................. 2,000 44 Open space land conservation 45 projects .......................... 40,000 46 State parks projects ................ 10,000 47 Municipal parks projects and 48 historic preservation and 49 heritage area projects ............ 10,000 50 -------------- 51 Total ............................ 188,000 400 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ============== 2 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 3 clean water projects in accordance with the provisions of title 3 of 4 article 56 of the environmental conservation law for project costs, 5 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto and for payment 6 of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air implementation fund 7 for services and expenses of state departments and agencies, includ- 8 ing fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as "Clean Water Project 9 Disbursements". The moneys appropriated herein may be suballocated 10 to all state departments and agencies. Further, moneys herein appro- 11 priated may be suballocated only to public authorities and public 12 benefit corporations specifically authorized by paragraph (1) of 13 subdivision 1 of section 56-0303 of the environmental conservation 14 law to enter into contracts for state assistance payments for the 15 state share of costs for clean water projects, provided however, 16 that moneys herein appropriated pursuant to paragraph (i) of subdi- 17 vision 1 of section 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law 18 for state facility projects may be suballocated to any public 19 authority or public benefit corporation. 20 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 21 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for clean water quali- 22 ty projects in accordance with title 3 of article 56 of the environ- 23 mental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 24 approval of availability of the director of the division of the 25 budget. 26 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 27 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 28 environmental conservation, the chairman of the senate finance 29 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 30 the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for "Clean Water 31 Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such certification 32 (09B29957) (25888) ... 8,000,000 .................... (re. $434,000) 33 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998: 34 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 35 clean water projects in accordance with the provisions of title 3 of 36 article 56 of the environmental conservation law for project costs, 37 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto and for payment 38 of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air implementation fund 39 for services and expenses of state departments and agencies, includ- 40 ing fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as "Clean Water Project 41 Disbursements". 42 The moneys appropriated herein may be suballocated to all state 43 departments and agencies. Further, moneys herein appropriated may be 44 suballocated only to public authorities and public benefit corpo- 45 rations specifically authorized by paragraph (1) of subdivision one 46 of section 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law to enter 47 into contracts for state assistance payments for the state share of 48 costs for clean water projects, provided however, that moneys herein 49 appropriated pursuant to paragraph (i) of subdivision one of section 50 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law for state facility 401 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 projects may be suballocated to any public authority or public bene- 2 fit corporation. 3 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 4 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for clean water quali- 5 ty projects in accordance with title 3 of article 56 of the environ- 6 mental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 7 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 8 budget. 9 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 10 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 11 environmental conservation, the chairman of the senate finance 12 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 13 the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for "Clean Water 14 Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such certification 15 (09BA9857) (24712) ... 149,000,000 ................ (re. $1,154,000) 16 project schedule 17 PROJECT AMOUNT 18 -------------------------------------------- 19 (thousands of dollars) 20 Hudson River water quality 21 improvement projects ............... 5,000 22 Long Island Sound water quali- 23 ty improvement projects ........... 15,000 24 Lake Champlain water quality 25 improvement projects ............... 5,000 26 Onondaga Lake water quality 27 improvement projects .............. 20,000 28 New York Harbor water quality 29 improvement projects ............... 2,000 30 Great Lakes water quality 31 improvement projects ............... 2,000 32 Finger Lakes water quality 33 improvement projects ............... 5,000 34 Peconic and South Shore Estu- 35 ary water quality improve- 36 ment projects ...................... 5,000 37 State facility projects .............. 5,000 38 Municipal wastewater treatment 39 improvement projects and 40 municipal flood control 41 projects ........................... 6,000 42 Municipal wastewater treatment 43 improvement projects and 44 municipal flood control 45 projects .......................... 15,000 46 Environmental compliance 47 assistance projects-water 48 quality ............................ 2,000 49 Dam safety projects .................. 2,000 50 Open space land conservation 402 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 projects .......................... 40,000 2 State parks projects ................ 10,000 3 Municipal parks projects and 4 historic preservation and 5 heritage area projects ............ 10,000 6 -------------- 7 Total ............................ 149,000 8 ============== 9 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 10 clean water projects in accordance with the provisions of title 3 of 11 article 56 of the environmental conservation law for project costs, 12 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto and for payment 13 of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air implementation fund 14 for services and expenses of state departments and agencies, includ- 15 ing fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as "Clean Water Project 16 Disbursements". The moneys appropriated herein may be suballocated 17 to all state departments and agencies. Further, moneys herein appro- 18 priated may be suballocated only to public authorities and public 19 benefit corporations specifically authorized by paragraph (1) of 20 subdivision one of section 56-0303 of the environmental conservation 21 law to enter into contracts for state assistance payments for the 22 state share of costs for clean water projects, provided however, 23 that moneys herein appropriated pursuant to paragraph (i) of subdi- 24 vision one of section 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law 25 for state facility projects may be suballocated to any public 26 authority or public benefit corporation. 27 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 28 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for clean water quali- 29 ty projects in accordance with title 3 of article 56 of the environ- 30 mental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 31 approval of availability of the director of the division of budget. 32 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certi- 33 fy to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner 34 of environmental conservation, the chairman of the senate finance 35 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 36 the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for "Clean Water 37 Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such certification 38 (09B29857) (25888) ... 15,000,000 .................... (re. $68,000) 39 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997: 40 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 41 clean water projects in accordance with the provisions of title 3 of 42 article 56 of the environmental conservation law for project costs, 43 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto and for payment 44 of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air implementation fund 45 for services and expenses of state departments and agencies, includ- 46 ing fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as "Clean Water Project 47 Disbursements". 48 The moneys appropriated herein may be suballocated to all state 49 departments and agencies. Further, moneys herein appropriated may be 50 suballocated only to public authorities and public benefit corpo- 403 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 rations specifically authorized by paragraph (1) of subdivision one 2 of section 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law to enter 3 into contracts for state assistance payments for the state share of 4 costs for clean water projects, provided however, that moneys herein 5 appropriated pursuant to paragraph (i) of subdivision one of section 6 56-0303 of the environmental conservation law for state facility 7 projects may be suballocated to any public authority or public bene- 8 fit corporation. 9 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 10 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for clean water quali- 11 ty projects in accordance with title 3 of article 56 of the environ- 12 mental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 13 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 14 budget. 15 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 16 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 17 environmental conservation, the chairman of the senate finance 18 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 19 the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for "Clean Water 20 Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such certification 21 (09BA9757) (24712) ... 101,000,000 ................ (re. $1,839,000) 22 project schedule 23 PROJECT AMOUNT 24 -------------------------------------------- 25 (thousands of dollars) 26 Hudson River water quality 27 improvement projects ............... 2,000 28 Long Island Sound water quali- 29 ty improvement projects ........... 14,000 30 Lake Champlain water quality 31 improvement projects ............... 2,000 32 Onondaga Lake water quality 33 improvement projects .............. 10,000 34 New York Harbor water quality 35 improvement projects ............... 3,000 36 Great Lakes water quality 37 improvement projects ............... 2,000 38 Finger Lakes water quality 39 improvement projects ............... 2,000 40 Peconic and South Shore Estu- 41 ary water quality improve- 42 ment projects ...................... 2,000 43 Other water bodies water qual- 44 ity improvement projects ........... 2,000 45 State facility projects .............. 5,000 46 Municipal wastewater treatment 47 improvement projects and 48 municipal flood control 49 projects .......................... 15,000 50 Environmental compliance 51 assistance projects-water 404 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 quality ............................ 2,000 2 Dam safety projects .................. 5,000 3 Open space land conservation 4 projects .......................... 20,000 5 State parks projects ................ 10,000 6 Municipal parks projects and 7 historic preservation and 8 heritage area projects ............. 5,000 9 -------------- 10 Total ............................ 101,000 11 ============== 12 By chapter 413, section 27, of the laws of 1996, as amended by chapter 13 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997: 14 For state assistance payments for the state share of the costs of 15 clean water projects in accordance with the provisions of title 3 of 16 article 56 of the environmental conservation law for project costs, 17 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto and for payment 18 of reimbursements to the clean water/clean air implementation fund 19 for services and expenses of state departments and agencies, includ- 20 ing fringe benefits, hereinafter referred to as "Clean Water Project 21 Disbursements". The moneys appropriated herein may be suballocated 22 to the environmental facilities corporation, other state depart- 23 ments, agencies, and public authorities. 24 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, moneys 25 hereby appropriated shall be available for clean water quality 26 projects in accordance with title 3 of article 56 of the environ- 27 mental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 28 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 29 budget. The state comptroller at the commencement of each month 30 shall certify to the director of the division of the budget, the 31 commissioner of environmental conservation, the chairman of the 32 senate finance committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and 33 means committee the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for 34 "Clean Water Project Disbursements" for the month preceding such 35 certification (09BA9657) (25888) ... 75,000,000 ... (re. $2,681,000) 405 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 60,192,000 611,243,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 60,192,000 611,243,000 8 ================ ================ 9 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISION (CCP) .................... 7,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Division for Youth Facilities Improvement Fund 13 OCF Improvement Projects Account - 31701 14 Preparation of Plans Purpose 15 For payment of design and construction 16 management account of the centralized 17 services fund of the New York state office 18 of general services or to the dormitory 19 authority of the state of New York for the 20 purpose of preparation and review of 21 plans, specifications, estimates, 22 services, construction management and 23 supervision, inspection studies, 24 appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 25 mental impact statements and for the cost 26 of consultant design service (25GS2630) 27 (81088) ...................................... 7,000,000 28 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) .................. 6,433,000 29 -------------- 30 Capital Projects Funds - Other 31 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 32 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 33 For the maintenance and operation of various 34 facilities and systems including personal 35 services, fringe benefits and indirect 36 costs. Notwithstanding any other law to 37 the contrary, all or a portion of the 38 funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 39 cated or transferred to any department, 40 agency, or public authority (25FM26MO) 41 (81107) ...................................... 6,433,000 406 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENT OF YOUTH FACILITIES (CCP) ....... 28,759,000 2 -------------- 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 5 Administration Purpose 6 For the preparation and review of plans, 7 specifications, estimates, studies, 8 inspections, appraisals and surveys, and 9 payment of personal service and nonper- 10 sonal service, including fringe benefits 11 and indirect costs related to the adminis- 12 tration and security of capital projects 13 provided by the office of children and 14 family services for new and reappropriated 15 projects (25AD2650) (14041) .................... 934,000 16 Capital Projects Funds - Other 17 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 18 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 19 For alterations and improvements to youth 20 facilities, including the preparation of 21 designs, plans, specifications, and esti- 22 mates for the preservation of existing 23 facilities and programs, including liabil- 24 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2026 25 (25GM2603) (14021) ........................... 1,725,000 26 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda 27 Indian Community House pursuant to chapter 28 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T32603) (14022) ..... 100,000 29 Capital Projects Funds - Other 30 Division for Youth Facilities Improvement Fund 31 OCF Improvement Projects Account - 31701 32 Environmental Protection or Improvements Purpose 33 For payment of the cost of construction, 34 reconstruction and improvements, including 35 the preparation of designs, plans, spec- 36 ifications and estimates for environmental 37 protection or improvements at various 38 youth facilities, including liabilities 39 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 (25EN2606) 40 (14043) ...................................... 5,000,000 41 Capital Projects Funds - Other 42 Division for Youth Facilities Improvement Fund 43 OCF Improvement Projects Account - 31701 407 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Health and Safety Purpose 2 For payment of the cost of construction, 3 reconstruction and improvements, including 4 the preparation of designs, plans, spec- 5 ifications and estimates, for health and 6 safety improvements to existing youth 7 facilities and programs, including liabil- 8 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2026 9 (25012601) (14042) ........................... 6,000,000 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 Division for Youth Facilities Improvement Fund 12 OCF Improvement Projects Account - 31701 13 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 14 For payment of the cost of construction, 15 reconstruction and improvements, including 16 the preparation of designs, plans, spec- 17 ifications, and estimates for the preser- 18 vation of existing facilities and 19 programs, including liabilities incurred 20 prior to April 1, 2026 (25032603) (14023) ... 15,000,000 21 PROGRAM IMPROVEMENT OR PROGRAM CHANGE (CCP) ................. 18,000,000 22 -------------- 23 Capital Projects Funds - Other 24 Division for Youth Facilities Improvement Fund 25 OCF Improvement Projects Account - 31701 26 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 27 For payment of the cost of construction, 28 reconstruction, security and other 29 improvements, including the preparation of 30 designs, plans, specifications and esti- 31 mates related to improvements or changes 32 to existing facilities or programs, 33 including liabilities incurred prior to 34 April 1, 2026 (25082608) (14051) ............ 18,000,000 408 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 CHILD CARE CAPITAL PROGRAM 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 5 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is 6 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 7 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and projects as 8 herein specified in accordance with the following: 9 Notwithstanding section 1680-g of the public authorities law and any 10 other law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein shall be for 11 grants administered by the dormitory authority of the state of New 12 York for payment of capital costs of design, construction, recon- 13 struction, rehabilitation, and equipment for existing or proposed 14 child care facilities; and the acquisition of equipment or other 15 capital assets with a useful life of not less than ten years 16 purchased for installation onto infrastructure that is owned or 17 controlled by the grant recipient; provided that in cases involving 18 the acquisition of non-fixed equipment and capital assets such 19 assets shall solely be used by the grant recipient. Individual 20 grants shall be in the amount no less than $50,000 and are to be 21 awarded on a competitive basis to eligible child care facilities 22 through a request for proposals and application process determined 23 by the office of children and family services and the dormitory 24 authority of the state of New York. 25 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, within amounts appro- 26 priated herein, up to $25,000,000 may be made available to counties 27 and municipalities [for child care construction, maintenance, and 28 repair projects]. 29 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 30 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 31 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 32 (25CC25CC)(60581) ... 100,000,000 ............... (re. $100,000,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 34 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 35 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and projects as 36 herein specified in accordance with the following: Notwithstanding 37 section 1680-g of the public authorities law and any other law to 38 the contrary, funds appropriated herein shall be for grants adminis- 39 tered by the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 40 payment of capital costs of design, construction, reconstruction, 41 rehabilitation, and equipment for existing or proposed child care 42 facilities; and the acquisition of equipment or other capital assets 43 with a useful life of not less than ten years purchased for instal- 44 lation onto infrastructure that is owned or controlled by the grant 45 recipient; provided that in cases involving the acquisition of non- 46 fixed equipment and capital assets such assets shall solely be used 47 by the grant recipient. Individual grants shall be in the amount no 409 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 less than $50,000 and are to be awarded on a competitive basis to 2 eligible child care facilities through a request for proposals and 3 application process determined by the office of children and family 4 services and the dormitory authority of the state of New York. 5 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 6 the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred 7 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 8 (25CC22CC)(60581) .................................................. 9 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $36,270,000) 10 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISION (CCP) 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Preparation of Plans Purpose 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 15 For payment of the cost of development, preparation, and review of 16 plans, schematics, specifications, estimates, studies, inspections, 17 appraisals and surveys, related to facilities overseen by the office 18 of children and family services and/or related projects (25DS2503) 19 (60646) ... 1,500,000 ............................. (re. $1,498,000) 20 Capital Projects Funds - Other 21 Division for Youth Facilities Improvement Fund 22 OCF Improvement Projects Account - 31701 23 Preparation of Plans Purpose 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 25 For payment of design and construction management account of the 26 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 27 services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 28 the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifications, 29 estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 30 inspection studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 31 impact statements and for the cost of consultant design service 32 (25GS2530) (81088) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $6,295,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 34 For payment of design and construction management account of the 35 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 36 services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 37 the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifications, 38 estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 39 inspection studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 40 impact statements and for the cost of consultant design service 41 (25GS2430) (81088) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $2,456,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 410 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of design and construction management account of the 2 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 3 services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 4 the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifications, 5 estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 6 inspection studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 7 impact statements and for the cost of consultant design service 8 (25GS2330) (81088) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $2,399,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 10 For payment of design and construction management account of the 11 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 12 services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 13 the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifications, 14 estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 15 inspection studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 16 impact statements and for the cost of consultant design service 17 (25GS2230) (81088) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $4,904,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 19 For payment of design and construction management account of the 20 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 21 services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 22 the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifications, 23 estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 24 inspection studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 25 impact statements and for the cost of consultant design service 26 (25GS2130) (81088) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $4,358,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 28 For payment of design and construction management account of the 29 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 30 services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 31 the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifications, 32 estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 33 inspection studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 34 impact statements and for the cost of consultant design service 35 (25GS2030) (81088) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $7,000,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 37 For payment of design and construction management account of the 38 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 39 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 40 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 41 vision, inspection studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 42 ronmental impact statements and for the cost of consultant design 43 service (25GS1930) (81088) ... 7,000,000 .......... (re. $1,249,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 411 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of design and construction management account of the 2 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 3 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 4 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 5 vision, inspection studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 6 ronmental impact statements and for the cost of consultant design 7 service (25GS1830) (81088) ... 7,000,000 .......... (re. $3,949,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 9 For payment of design and construction management account of the 10 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 11 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 12 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 13 vision, inspection studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 14 ronmental impact statements and for the cost of consultant design 15 service (25GS1730) (81088) ... 7,000,000 .......... (re. $7,000,000) 16 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 17 For payment of design and construction management account of the 18 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 19 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 20 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 21 vision, inspection studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 22 ronmental impact statements and for the cost of consultant design 23 service (25GS1630) (81088) ... 7,000,000 .......... (re. $2,066,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 25 For payment of design and construction management account of the 26 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 27 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 28 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 29 vision, inspection studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 30 ronmental impact statements and for the cost of consultant design 31 service (25GS1530) (81088) ... 7,000,000 ............ (re. $648,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 33 For payment of design and construction management account of the 34 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 35 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 36 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 37 vision, inspection studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 38 ronmental impact statements and for the cost of consultant design 39 service (25GS1430) (81088) ... 7,000,000 .......... (re. $3,699,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 41 For payment of design and construction management account of the 42 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 43 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 44 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 45 vision, inspection studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 412 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ronmental impact statements and for the cost of consultant design 2 service (25GS1330) (81088) ... 7,000,000 ............ (re. $187,000) 3 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) 4 Capital Projects Funds - Other 5 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 6 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 8 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 9 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 10 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 11 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 12 any department, agency, or public authority (25FM25MO) (81107) ..... 13 6,433,000 ......................................... (re. $4,461,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 15 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 16 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 17 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 18 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 19 any department, agency, or public authority (25FM24MO) (81107) ..... 20 6,433,000 ........................................... (re. $674,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 22 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 23 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 24 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 25 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 26 department, agency, or public authority (25FM23MO) (81107) ......... 27 6,392,000 ......................................... (re. $1,591,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 29 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 30 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 31 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 32 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 33 department, agency, or public authority (25FM22MO) (81107) ......... 34 5,871,000 ........................................... (re. $456,000) 35 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENT OF YOUTH FACILITIES (CCP) 36 Capital Projects Funds - Other 37 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 38 Administration Purpose 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 40 For the preparation and review of plans, specifications, estimates, 41 studies, inspections, appraisals and surveys, and payment of 413 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 personal service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits 2 and indirect costs related to the administration and security of 3 capital projects provided by the office of children and family 4 services for new and reappropriated projects (25AD2550) (14041) .... 5 934,000 ............................................. (re. $686,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 7 For the preparation and review of plans, specifications, estimates, 8 studies, inspections, appraisals and surveys, and payment of 9 personal service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits 10 and indirect costs related to the administration and security of 11 capital projects provided by the office of children and family 12 services for new and reappropriated projects (25AD2450) (14041) .... 13 934,000 ............................................. (re. $114,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 15 For the preparation and review of plans, specifications, estimates, 16 studies, inspections, appraisals and surveys, and payment of 17 personal service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits 18 and indirect costs related to the administration and security of 19 capital projects provided by the office of children and family 20 services for new and reappropriated projects (25AD2350) (14041) .... 21 897,000 ............................................. (re. $236,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 23 For the preparation and review of plans, specifications, estimates, 24 studies, inspections, appraisals and surveys, and payment of 25 personal service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits 26 and indirect costs related to the administration and security of 27 capital projects provided by the office of children and family 28 services for new and reappropriated projects (25AD2250) (14041) .... 29 894,000 ............................................. (re. $249,000) 30 Capital Projects Funds - Other 31 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 32 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 34 For alterations and improvements to youth facilities, including the 35 preparation of designs, plans, specifications, and estimates for the 36 preservation of existing facilities and programs, including liabil- 37 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (25GM2503) (14021) ........... 38 1,725,000 ......................................... (re. $1,516,000) 39 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 40 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T32503) (14022) ..... 41 100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 43 For alterations and improvements to youth facilities, including the 44 preparation of designs, plans, specifications, and estimates for the 414 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 preservation of existing facilities and programs, including liabil- 2 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (25GM2403) (14021) ........... 3 1,725,000 ........................................... (re. $867,000) 4 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 5 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T32403) (14022) ..... 6 100,000 .............................................. (re. $99,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 8 For alterations and improvements to youth facilities, including the 9 preparation of designs, plans, specifications, and estimates for the 10 preservation of existing facilities and programs, including liabil- 11 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (25GM2303) (14021) ........... 12 1,725,000 ........................................... (re. $679,000) 13 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 14 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T32303) (14022) ..... 15 100,000 .............................................. (re. $93,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 17 For alterations and improvements to youth facilities, including the 18 preparation of designs, plans, specifications, and estimates for the 19 preservation of existing facilities and programs, including liabil- 20 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (25GM2203) (14021) ........... 21 1,725,000 ........................................... (re. $882,000) 22 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 23 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T32203) (14022) ..... 24 100,000 .............................................. (re. $29,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 26 For alterations and improvements to youth facilities, including the 27 preparation of designs, plans, specifications, and estimates for the 28 preservation of existing facilities and programs, including liabil- 29 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (25GM2103) (14021) ........... 30 1,725,000 ........................................... (re. $189,000) 31 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 32 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T32103) (14022) ..... 33 100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 35 For alterations and improvements to youth facilities, including the 36 preparation of designs, plans, specifications, and estimates for the 37 preservation of existing facilities and programs, including liabil- 38 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (25GM2003) (14021) ........... 39 1,725,000 ......................................... (re. $1,195,000) 40 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 41 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T32003) (14022) ..... 42 100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 44 For alterations and improvements to youth facilities, including the 45 preparation of designs, plans, specifications, and estimates for the 415 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 preservation of existing facilities and programs, including liabil- 2 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (25GM1903) (14021) ........... 3 1,725,000 ........................................... (re. $446,000) 4 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 5 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T31903) (14022) ..... 6 100,000 .............................................. (re. $64,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 8 For alterations and improvements to youth facilities, including the 9 preparation of designs, plans, specifications, and estimates for the 10 preservation of existing facilities and programs, including liabil- 11 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (25GM1803) (14021) ........... 12 1,725,000 ........................................... (re. $643,000) 13 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 14 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T31803) (14022) ..... 15 100,000 ............................................... (re. $5,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 17 For alterations and improvements to youth facilities, including the 18 preparation of designs, plans, specifications, and estimates for the 19 preservation of existing facilities and programs, including liabil- 20 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (25GM1703) (14021) ........... 21 1,725,000 ........................................... (re. $682,000) 22 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 23 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T31703) (14022) ..... 24 100,000 .............................................. (re. $63,000) 25 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 26 For alterations and improvements to youth facilities, including the 27 preparation of designs, plans, specifications, and estimates for the 28 preservation of existing facilities and programs, including liabil- 29 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (25GM1603) (14021) ........... 30 1,725,000 ........................................... (re. $372,000) 31 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 32 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T31603) (14022) ..... 33 100,000 .............................................. (re. $58,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 35 For alterations and improvements to youth facilities, including the 36 preparation of designs, plans, specifications, and estimates for the 37 preservation of existing facilities and programs, including liabil- 38 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2015 (25GM1503) (14021) ........... 39 1,725,000 ........................................... (re. $437,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 41 For alterations and improvements to youth facilities, including the 42 preparation of designs, plans, specifications, and estimates for the 43 preservation of existing facilities and programs, including liabil- 44 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2014 (25GM1403) (14021) ........... 45 1,725,000 ......................................... (re. $1,237,000) 416 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 2 For alterations and improvements to youth facilities, including the 3 preparation of designs, plans, specifications, and estimates for the 4 preservation of existing facilities and programs, including liabil- 5 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2013 (25GM1303) (14021) ........... 6 1,725,000 ........................................... (re. $901,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 8 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 9 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T31203) (14022) ..... 10 100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 12 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 13 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T31103) (14022) ..... 14 100,000 .............................................. (re. $51,000) 15 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 16 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 17 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T30903) (14022) ..... 18 325,000 ............................................. (re. $325,000) 19 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 20 For the cost of maintaining the Tonawanda Indian Community House 21 pursuant to chapter 549 of the laws of 1936 (25T30803) (14022) ..... 22 325,000 ............................................. (re. $325,000) 23 Capital Projects Funds - Other 24 Division for Youth Facilities Improvement Fund 25 OCF Improvement Projects Account - 31701 26 Environmental Protection or Improvements Purpose 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 28 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 29 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 30 and estimates for environmental protection or improvements at vari- 31 ous youth facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 32 1, 2025 (25EN2506) (14043) ......................................... 33 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 35 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 36 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 37 and estimates for environmental protection or improvements at vari- 38 ous youth facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 39 1, 2024 (25EN2406) (14043) ......................................... 40 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,953,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 417 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 2 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 3 and estimates for environmental protection or improvements at vari- 4 ous youth facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 5 1, 2023 (25EN2306) (14043) ......................................... 6 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,758,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 8 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 9 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 10 and estimates for environmental protection or improvements at vari- 11 ous youth facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 12 1, 2022 (25EN2206) (14043) ......................................... 13 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,616,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 15 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 16 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 17 and estimates for environmental protection or improvements at vari- 18 ous youth facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 19 1, 2021 (25EN2106) (14043) ... 5,000,000 .......... (re. $4,030,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 21 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 22 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 23 and estimates for environmental protection or improvements at vari- 24 ous youth facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 25 1, 2020 (25EN2006) (14043) ... 5,000,000 .......... (re. $5,000,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 27 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 28 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 29 and estimates for environmental protection or improvements at vari- 30 ous youth facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 31 1, 2019 (25EN1906) (14043) ... 5,000,000 .......... (re. $2,352,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 33 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 34 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 35 and estimates for environmental protection or improvements at vari- 36 ous youth facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 37 1, 2018 (25EN1806) (14043) ... 5,000,000 .......... (re. $2,745,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 39 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 40 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 41 and estimates for environmental protection or improvements at vari- 42 ous youth facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 43 1, 2017 (25EN1706) (14043) ... 5,000,000 .......... (re. $5,000,000) 418 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 2 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 3 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 4 and estimates for environmental protection or improvements at vari- 5 ous youth facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 6 1, 2016 (25EN1606) (14043) ... 5,000,000 .......... (re. $1,940,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 8 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 9 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 10 and estimates for environmental protection or improvements at vari- 11 ous youth facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 12 1, 2015 (25EN1506) (14043) ... 5,000,000 .......... (re. $4,930,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 14 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 15 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 16 and estimates for environmental protection or improvements at vari- 17 ous youth facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 18 1, 2014 (25EN1406) (14043) ... 5,000,000 .......... (re. $4,477,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 20 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 21 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 22 and estimates for environmental protection or improvements at vari- 23 ous youth facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 24 1, 2013 (25EN1306) (14043) ... 5,000,000 .......... (re. $2,864,000) 25 Capital Projects Funds - Other 26 Division for Youth Facilities Improvement Fund 27 OCF Improvement Projects Account - 31701 28 Health and Safety Purpose 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 30 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 31 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 32 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing youth 33 facilities and programs, including liabilities incurred prior to 34 April 1, 2025 (25012501) (14042) ................................... 35 6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $6,000,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 37 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 38 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 39 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing youth 40 facilities and programs, including liabilities incurred prior to 41 April 1, 2024 (25012401) (14042) ................................... 42 6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,646,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 419 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 2 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 3 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing youth 4 facilities and programs, including liabilities incurred prior to 5 April 1, 2023 (25012301) (14042) ................................... 6 6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,583,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 8 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 9 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 10 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing youth 11 facilities and programs, including liabilities incurred prior to 12 April 1, 2022 (25012201) (14042) ................................... 13 6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,591,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 15 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 16 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 17 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing youth 18 facilities and programs, including liabilities incurred prior to 19 April 1, 2021 (25012101) (14042) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $4,916,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 21 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 22 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 23 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing youth 24 facilities and programs, including liabilities incurred prior to 25 April 1, 2020 (25012001) (14042) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $4,615,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 27 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 28 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 29 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing youth 30 facilities and programs, including liabilities incurred prior to 31 April 1, 2019 (25011901) (14042) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $1,845,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 33 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 34 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 35 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing youth 36 facilities and programs, including liabilities incurred prior to 37 April 1, 2018 (25011801) (14042) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $5,052,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 39 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 40 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 41 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing youth 42 facilities and programs, including liabilities incurred prior to 43 April 1, 2017 (25011701) (14042) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $6,000,000) 420 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 2 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 3 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 4 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing youth 5 facilities and programs, including liabilities incurred prior to 6 April 1, 2016 (25011601) (14042) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $1,892,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 8 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 9 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 10 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing youth 11 facilities and programs, including liabilities incurred prior to 12 April 1, 2015 (25011501) (14042) ... 6,000,000 ...... (re. $831,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 14 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 15 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 16 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing youth 17 facilities and programs, including liabilities incurred prior to 18 April 1, 2014 (25011401) (14042) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $4,858,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 20 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 21 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 22 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing youth 23 facilities and programs, including liabilities incurred prior to 24 April 1, 2013 (25011301) (14042) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $3,158,000) 25 Capital Projects Funds - Other 26 Division for Youth Facilities Improvement Fund 27 OCF Improvement Projects Account - 31701 28 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 30 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 31 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications, 32 and estimates for the preservation of existing facilities and 33 programs, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 34 (25032503) (14023) ................................................. 35 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 37 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 38 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications, 39 and estimates for the preservation of existing facilities and 40 programs, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 41 (25032403) (14023) ................................................. 42 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $14,274,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 421 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 2 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications, 3 and estimates for the preservation of existing facilities and 4 programs, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 5 (25032303) (14023) ................................................. 6 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $11,020,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 8 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 9 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications, 10 and estimates for the preservation of existing facilities and 11 programs, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 12 (25032203) (14023) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $6,444,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 14 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 15 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications, 16 and estimates for the preservation of existing facilities and 17 programs, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 18 (25032103) (14023) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $2,964,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 20 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 21 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications, 22 and estimates for the preservation of existing facilities and 23 programs, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 24 (25032003) (14023) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $7,000,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 26 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 27 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications, 28 and estimates for the preservation of existing facilities and 29 programs, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 30 (25031903) (14023) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $1,540,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 32 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 33 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications, 34 and estimates for the preservation of existing facilities and 35 programs, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 36 (25031803) (14023) ... 7,000,000 .................... (re. $723,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 38 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 39 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications, 40 and estimates for the preservation of existing facilities and 41 programs, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 42 (25031703) (14023) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $7,000,000) 43 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 422 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 2 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications, 3 and estimates for the preservation of existing facilities and 4 programs, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 5 (25031603) (14023) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $1,253,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 7 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 8 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications, 9 and estimates for the preservation of existing facilities and 10 programs, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2015 11 (25031503) (14023) ... 7,000,000 .................... (re. $295,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 13 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 14 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications, 15 and estimates for the preservation of existing facilities and 16 programs, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014 17 (25031403) (14023) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $4,916,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 19 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 20 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications, 21 and estimates for the preservation of existing facilities and 22 programs, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2013 23 (25031303) (14023) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $3,620,000) 24 Capital Projects Funds - Other 25 Division for Youth Facilities Improvement Fund 26 OCF Improvement Projects Account - 31701 27 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 29 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 30 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 31 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new and 32 existing capital projects and programs including, but not limited 33 to, preparation of plans, administration, maintenance and improve- 34 ment of existing facilities of any state agency, new facilities, 35 energy conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health 36 and safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 37 improvement or program changes associated with the raising the age 38 of juvenile jurisdiction, including to the extent feasible, the 39 reuse of a facility of any state agency or a new facility, provided, 40 however, that expenditures from this appropriation are pursuant to 41 part WWW of chapter 59 of the laws of 2017 and no expenditures may 42 be made from this appropriation until a plan of projects has been 43 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 44 provision of law to the contrary, money hereby appropriated may be 45 suballocated or transferred to the department of corrections and 423 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 community supervision or any other agency for expenses related to 2 this program (25RA1808) (13913) ... 50,000,000 ... (re. $49,995,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 4 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 5 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 6 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 7 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new and 8 existing capital projects and programs including, but not limited 9 to, preparation of plans, administration, maintenance and improve- 10 ment of existing facilities of any state agency, new facilities, 11 energy conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health 12 and safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 13 improvement or program changes associated with the raising the age 14 of juvenile jurisdiction, including to the extent feasible, the 15 reuse of a facility of any state agency or a new facility, provided, 16 however, that expenditures from this appropriation are pursuant to 17 part WWW of chapter 59 of the laws of 2017 and no expenditures may 18 be made from this appropriation until a plan of projects has been 19 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 20 provision of law to the contrary, money hereby appropriated may be 21 suballocated or transferred to the department of corrections and 22 community supervision or any other agency for expenses related to 23 this program (25RA1708) (13913) ... 110,000,000 .. (re. $61,689,000) 24 PROGRAM IMPROVEMENT OR PROGRAM CHANGE (CCP) 25 Capital Projects Funds - Other 26 Division for Youth Facilities Improvement Fund 27 OCF Improvement Projects Account - 31701 28 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 30 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, security and 31 other improvements, including the preparation of designs, plans, 32 specifications and estimates related to improvements or changes to 33 existing facilities or programs, including liabilities incurred 34 prior to April 1, 2025 (25082508) (14051) .......................... 35 18,000,000 ....................................... (re. $18,000,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 37 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, security and 38 other improvements, including the preparation of designs, plans, 39 specifications and estimates related to improvements or changes to 40 existing facilities or programs, including liabilities incurred 41 prior to April 1, 2024 (25082408) (14051) .......................... 42 18,000,000 ....................................... (re. $17,683,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 424 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, security and 2 other improvements, including the preparation of designs, plans, 3 specifications and estimates related to improvements or changes to 4 existing facilities or programs, including liabilities incurred 5 prior to April 1, 2023 (25082308) (14051) .......................... 6 18,000,000 ....................................... (re. $16,532,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 8 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, security and 9 other improvements, including the preparation of designs, plans, 10 specifications and estimates related to improvements or changes to 11 existing facilities or programs, including liabilities incurred 12 prior to April 1, 2022 (25082208) (14051) .......................... 13 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,265,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 15 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, security and 16 other improvements, including the preparation of designs, plans, 17 specifications and estimates related to improvements or changes to 18 existing facilities or programs, including liabilities incurred 19 prior to April 1, 2021 (25082108) (14051) .......................... 20 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,977,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 22 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, security and 23 other improvements, including the preparation of designs, plans, 24 specifications and estimates related to improvements or changes to 25 existing facilities or programs, including liabilities incurred 26 prior to April 1, 2020 (25082008) (14051) .......................... 27 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 29 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, security and 30 other improvements, including the preparation of designs, plans, 31 specifications and estimates related to improvements or changes to 32 existing facilities or programs, including liabilities incurred 33 prior to April 1, 2019 (25081908) (14051) .......................... 34 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,000,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 36 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, security and 37 other improvements, including the preparation of designs, plans, 38 specifications and estimates related to improvements or changes to 39 existing facilities or programs, including liabilities incurred 40 prior to April 1, 2018 (25081808) (14051) .......................... 41 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,835,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 43 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, security and 44 other improvements, including the preparation of designs, plans, 425 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 specifications and estimates related to improvements or changes to 2 existing facilities or programs, including liabilities incurred 3 prior to April 1, 2017 (25081708) (14051) .......................... 4 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 5 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 6 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, security and 7 other improvements, including the preparation of designs, plans, 8 specifications and estimates related to improvements or changes to 9 existing facilities or programs, including liabilities incurred 10 prior to April 1, 2016 (25081608) (14051) .......................... 11 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,812,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 13 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, security and 14 other improvements, including the preparation of designs, plans, 15 specifications and estimates related to improvements or changes to 16 existing facilities or programs, including liabilities incurred 17 prior to April 1, 2015 (25081508) (14051) .......................... 18 10,000,000 .......................................... (re. $108,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 20 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, security and 21 other improvements, including the preparation of designs, plans, 22 specifications and estimates related to improvements or changes to 23 existing facilities or programs, including liabilities incurred 24 prior to April 1, 2014 (25081408) (14051) .......................... 25 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,454,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 27 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, security and 28 other improvements, including the preparation of designs, plans, 29 specifications and estimates related to improvements or changes to 30 existing facilities or programs, including liabilities incurred 31 prior to April 1, 2013 (25081308) (14051) .......................... 32 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,189,000) 426 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 153,000,000 464,516,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 153,000,000 464,516,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SUPPORTED HOUSING PROGRAM (CCP) ............................ 153,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Homeless Housing Grants Purpose 14 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 15 of law, funds appropriated herein shall be 16 used for the preparation and review of 17 proposals, specifications, estimates, 18 studies, inspections, appraisals and 19 surveys, and payment of personal service 20 and nonpersonal service, including fringe 21 benefits and indirect costs related to 22 implementing the provisions of the home- 23 less housing and assistance program in 24 accordance with title 1 of article 2-A of 25 the social services law provided by the 26 office of temporary and disability assist- 27 ance for new and reappropriated projects 28 (27OP26G5) (52334) ........................... 2,000,000 29 Capital Projects Funds - Other 30 Housing Program Fund 31 Department of Social Services Account - 31853 32 Homeless Housing Grants Purpose 33 For services and expenses, including the 34 payments on contracts executed prior to 35 April 1, 2026, related to implementing the 36 provisions of the homeless housing and 37 assistance program in accordance with 38 title 1 of article 2-A of the social 39 services law, including costs incurred 40 through individual or joint contracts with 41 any entity where such contract will result 42 in expedited homeless project development, 43 and including, without deposit to the 427 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 homeless housing and assistance account, 2 payments to any entity for technical 3 assistance required to approve contracts. 4 Up to $1,000,000 of the amount appropriated 5 herein may be used for purposes of neces- 6 sary health and safety improvements to 7 existing emergency shelters located in 8 local social services districts with a 9 population of less than five million. 10 Notwithstanding any inconsistent 11 provisions of law, such funds shall be 12 disbursed pursuant to contracts made in 13 accordance with the terms and conditions 14 established by the homeless housing and 15 assistance corporation. 16 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 17 of law, up to two percent of the appropri- 18 ation for any fiscal year may be used to 19 pay for technical assistance in support of 20 project development and operation, support 21 services development, architecture and 22 engineering, legal services and financial 23 services and may be provided by individ- 24 uals and not-for-profit or business corpo- 25 rations. No funds shall be expended from 26 this appropriation until the director of 27 the budget has approved a financial plan 28 submitted by the office of temporary and 29 disability assistance on behalf of the 30 homeless housing and assistance program in 31 such detail as required by the budget 32 director (270326G5) (52220) ................ 141,000,000 33 For the development of permanent, emergency 34 and transitional housing for persons 35 living with HIV or AIDS in accordance with 36 article 2-A of the social services law 37 including the payment of liabilities prior 38 to April 1, 2026; provided, however, that 39 if an insufficient number of viable 40 proposals for persons living with HIV or 41 AIDS are received, the balance of funding 42 can be used for the development of perma- 43 nent, emergency and transitional housing 44 for other priority need populations as 45 determined by the commissioner of the 46 office of temporary and disability assist- 47 ance and approved by the director of the 48 budget. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 49 provision of law, up to two percent of the 50 appropriation for any fiscal year may be 428 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 used to pay for technical assistance in 2 support of project development and opera- 3 tion, support services development, archi- 4 tecture and engineering, legal services 5 and financial services and may be provided 6 by individuals and not-for-profit or busi- 7 ness corporations (270826G5) (52309) ......... 5,000,000 8 For the development of permanent, emergency 9 and transitional housing for veterans in 10 accordance with article 2-A of the social 11 services law including the payment of 12 liabilities prior to April 1, 2026; 13 provided, however, that if an insufficient 14 number of viable proposals for veterans 15 are received, the balance of funding can 16 be used for the development of permanent, 17 emergency and transitional housing for 18 other priority need populations as deter- 19 mined by the commissioner of the office of 20 temporary and disability assistance and 21 approved by the director of the budget. 22 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 23 of law, up to two percent of the appropri- 24 ation for any fiscal year may be used to 25 pay for technical assistance in support of 26 project development and operation, support 27 services development, architecture and 28 engineering, legal services and financial 29 services and may be provided by individ- 30 uals and not-for-profit or business corpo- 31 rations (27VT26G5) (52357) ................... 5,000,000 429 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 SUPPORTED HOUSING PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Homeless Housing Grants Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated 7 herein shall be used for the preparation and review of proposals, 8 specifications, estimates, studies, inspections, appraisals and 9 surveys, and payment of personal service and nonpersonal service, 10 including fringe benefits and indirect costs related to implementing 11 the provisions of the homeless housing and assistance program in 12 accordance with title 1 of article 2-A of the social services law 13 provided by the office of temporary and disability assistance for 14 new and reappropriated projects (27OP25G5) (52334) ................. 15 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 17 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated 18 herein shall be used for the preparation and review of proposals, 19 specifications, estimates, studies, inspections, appraisals and 20 surveys, and payment of personal service and nonpersonal service, 21 including fringe benefits and indirect costs related to implementing 22 the provisions of the homeless housing and assistance program in 23 accordance with title 1 of article 2-A of the social services law 24 provided by the office of temporary and disability assistance for 25 new and reappropriated projects (27OP24G5) (52334) ................. 26 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 28 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated 29 herein shall be used for the preparation and review of proposals, 30 specifications, estimates, studies, inspections, appraisals and 31 surveys, and payment of personal service and nonpersonal service, 32 including fringe benefits and indirect costs related to implementing 33 the provisions of the homeless housing and assistance program in 34 accordance with title 1 of article 2-A of the social services law 35 provided by the office of temporary and disability assistance for 36 new and reappropriated projects (27OP23G5) (52334) ................. 37 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,797,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 39 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated 40 herein shall be used for the preparation and review of proposals, 41 specifications, estimates, studies, inspections, appraisals and 42 surveys, and payment of personal service and nonpersonal service, 43 including fringe benefits and indirect costs related to implementing 44 the provisions of the homeless housing and assistance program in 45 accordance with title 1 of article 2-A of the social services law 430 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 provided by the office of temporary and disability assistance for 2 new and reappropriated projects (27OP22G5) (52334) ................. 3 2,000,000 ............................................ (re. $19,000) 4 Capital Projects Funds - Other 5 Housing Program Fund 6 Department of Social Services Account - 31853 7 Homeless Housing Grants Purpose 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 9 For services and expenses, including the payments on contracts 10 executed prior to April 1, 2025, related to implementing the 11 provisions of the homeless housing and assistance program in accord- 12 ance with title 1 of article 2-A of the social services law, includ- 13 ing costs incurred through individual or joint contracts with any 14 entity where such contract will result in expedited homeless project 15 development, and including, without deposit to the homeless housing 16 and assistance account, payments to any entity for technical assist- 17 ance required to approve contracts. 18 Up to $1,000,000 of the amount appropriated herein may be used for 19 purposes of necessary health and safety improvements to existing 20 emergency shelters located in local social services districts with a 21 population of less than five million. Notwithstanding any inconsist- 22 ent provisions of law, such funds shall be disbursed pursuant to 23 contracts made in accordance with the terms and conditions estab- 24 lished by the homeless housing and assistance corporation. 25 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, up to two percent 26 of the appropriation for any fiscal year may be used to pay for 27 technical assistance in support of project development and opera- 28 tion, support services development, architecture and engineering, 29 legal services and financial services and may be provided by indi- 30 viduals and not-for-profit or business corporations. No funds shall 31 be expended from this appropriation until the director of the budget 32 has approved a financial plan submitted by the office of temporary 33 and disability assistance on behalf of the homeless housing and 34 assistance program in such detail as required by the budget director 35 (270325G5) (52220) ................................................. 36 141,000,000 ..................................... (re. $141,000,000) 37 For the development of permanent, emergency and transitional housing 38 for persons living with HIV or AIDS in accordance with article 2-A 39 of the social services law including the payment of liabilities 40 prior to April 1, 2025; provided, however, that if an insufficient 41 number of viable proposals for persons living with HIV or AIDS are 42 received, the balance of funding can be used for the development of 43 permanent, emergency and transitional housing for other priority 44 need populations as determined by the commissioner of the office of 45 temporary and disability assistance and approved by the director of 46 the budget. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, up to 47 two percent of the appropriation for any fiscal year may be used to 48 pay for technical assistance in support of project development and 431 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 operation, support services development, architecture and engineer- 2 ing, legal services and financial services and may be provided by 3 individuals and not-for-profit or business corporations (270825G5) 4 (52309) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,000,000) 5 For the development of permanent, emergency and transitional housing 6 for veterans in accordance with article 2-A of the social services 7 law including the payment of liabilities prior to April 1, 2025; 8 provided, however, that if an insufficient number of viable 9 proposals for veterans are received, the balance of funding can be 10 used for the development of permanent, emergency and transitional 11 housing for other priority need populations as determined by the 12 commissioner of the office of temporary and disability assistance 13 and approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any 14 inconsistent provision of law, up to two percent of the appropri- 15 ation for any fiscal year may be used to pay for technical assist- 16 ance in support of project development and operation, support 17 services development, architecture and engineering, legal services 18 and financial services and may be provided by individuals and not- 19 for-profit or business corporations (27VT25G5) (52357) ............. 20 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 For services and expenses, including the payments on contracts 23 executed prior to April 1, 2024, related to implementing the 24 provisions of the homeless housing and assistance program in accord- 25 ance with title 1 of article 2-A of the social services law, includ- 26 ing costs incurred through individual or joint contracts with any 27 entity where such contract will result in expedited homeless project 28 development, and including, without deposit to the homeless housing 29 and assistance account, payments to any entity for technical assist- 30 ance required to approve contracts. 31 Up to $1,000,000 of the amount appropriated herein may be used for 32 purposes of necessary health and safety improvements to existing 33 emergency shelters located in local social services districts with a 34 population of less than five million. Notwithstanding any inconsist- 35 ent provisions of law, such funds shall be disbursed pursuant to 36 contracts made in accordance with the terms and conditions estab- 37 lished by the homeless housing and assistance corporation. 38 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, up to two percent 39 of the appropriation for any fiscal year may be used to pay for 40 technical assistance in support of project development and opera- 41 tion, support services development, architecture and engineering, 42 legal services and financial services and may be provided by indi- 43 viduals and not-for-profit or business corporations. No funds shall 44 be expended from this appropriation until the director of the budget 45 has approved a financial plan submitted by the office of temporary 46 and disability assistance on behalf of the homeless housing and 47 assistance program in such detail as required by the budget director 48 (270324G5) (52220) ... 116,000,000 .............. (re. $116,000,000) 432 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the development of permanent, emergency and transitional housing 2 for persons living with HIV or AIDS in accordance with article 2-A 3 of the social services law including the payment of liabilities 4 prior to April 1, 2024; provided, however, that if an insufficient 5 number of viable proposals for persons living with HIV or AIDS are 6 received, the balance of funding can be used for the development of 7 permanent, emergency and transitional housing for other priority 8 need populations as determined by the commissioner of the office of 9 temporary and disability assistance and approved by the director of 10 the budget. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, up to 11 two percent of the appropriation for any fiscal year may be used to 12 pay for technical assistance in support of project development and 13 operation, support services development, architecture and engineer- 14 ing, legal services and financial services and may be provided by 15 individuals and not-for-profit or business corporations (270824G5) 16 (52309) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,000,000) 17 For the development of permanent, emergency and transitional housing 18 for veterans in accordance with article 2-A of the social services 19 law including the payment of liabilities prior to April 1, 2024; 20 provided, however, that if an insufficient number of viable 21 proposals for veterans are received, the balance of funding can be 22 used for the development of permanent, emergency and transitional 23 housing for other priority need populations as determined by the 24 commissioner of the office of temporary and disability assistance 25 and approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any 26 inconsistent provision of law, up to two percent of the appropri- 27 ation for any fiscal year may be used to pay for technical assist- 28 ance in support of project development and operation, support 29 services development, architecture and engineering, legal services 30 and financial services and may be provided by individuals and not- 31 for-profit or business corporations (27VT24G5) (52357) ............. 32 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 34 For services and expenses, including the payments on contracts 35 executed prior to April 1, 2023, related to implementing the 36 provisions of the homeless housing and assistance program in accord- 37 ance with title 1 of article 2-A of the social services law, includ- 38 ing costs incurred through individual or joint contracts with any 39 entity where such contract will result in expedited homeless project 40 development, and including, without deposit to the homeless housing 41 and assistance account, payments to any entity for technical assist- 42 ance required to approve contracts. 43 Up to $1,000,000 of the amount appropriated herein may be used for 44 purposes of necessary health and safety improvements to existing 45 emergency shelters located in local social services districts with a 46 population of less than five million. Notwithstanding any inconsist- 47 ent provisions of law, such funds shall be disbursed pursuant to 48 contracts made in accordance with the terms and conditions estab- 49 lished by the homeless housing and assistance corporation. 433 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, up to two percent 2 of the appropriation for any fiscal year may be used to pay for 3 technical assistance in support of project development and opera- 4 tion, support services development, architecture and engineering, 5 legal services and financial services and may be provided by indi- 6 viduals and not-for-profit or business corporations. No funds shall 7 be expended from this appropriation until the director of the budget 8 has approved a financial plan submitted by the office of temporary 9 and disability assistance on behalf of the homeless housing and 10 assistance program in such detail as required by the budget director 11 (270323G5) (52220) ... 116,000,000 .............. (re. $116,000,000) 12 For the development of permanent, emergency and transitional housing 13 for persons living with HIV or AIDS in accordance with article 2-A 14 of the social services law including the payment of liabilities 15 prior to April 1, 2023; provided, however, that if an insufficient 16 number of viable proposals for persons living with HIV or AIDS are 17 received, the balance of funding can be used for the development of 18 permanent, emergency and transitional housing for other priority 19 need populations as determined by the commissioner of the office of 20 temporary and disability assistance and approved by the director of 21 the budget. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, up to 22 two percent of the appropriation for any fiscal year may be used to 23 pay for technical assistance in support of project development and 24 operation, support services development, architecture and engineer- 25 ing, legal services and financial services and may be provided by 26 individuals and not-for-profit or business corporations (270823G5) 27 (52309) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,000,000) 28 For the development of permanent, emergency and transitional housing 29 for veterans in accordance with article 2-A of the social services 30 law including the payment of liabilities prior to April 1, 2023; 31 provided, however, that if an insufficient number of viable 32 proposals for veterans are received, the balance of funding can be 33 used for the development of permanent, emergency and transitional 34 housing for other priority need populations as determined by the 35 commissioner of the office of temporary and disability assistance 36 and approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any 37 inconsistent provision of law, up to two percent of the appropri- 38 ation for any fiscal year may be used to pay for technical assist- 39 ance in support of project development and operation, support 40 services development, architecture and engineering, legal services 41 and financial services and may be provided by individuals and not- 42 for-profit or business corporations (27VT23G5) (52357) ............. 43 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 45 For services and expenses, including the payments on contracts 46 executed prior to April 1, 2022, related to implementing the 47 provisions of the homeless housing and assistance program in accord- 48 ance with title 1 of article 2-A of the social services law, includ- 49 ing costs incurred through individual or joint contracts with any 434 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 entity where such contract will result in expedited homeless project 2 development, and including, without deposit to the homeless housing 3 and assistance account, payments to any entity for technical assist- 4 ance required to approve contracts. 5 Up to $1,000,000 of the amount appropriated herein may be used for 6 purposes of necessary health and safety improvements to existing 7 emergency shelters located in local social services districts with a 8 population of less than five million. Notwithstanding any inconsist- 9 ent provisions of law, such funds shall be disbursed pursuant to 10 contracts made in accordance with the terms and conditions estab- 11 lished by the homeless housing and assistance corporation. 12 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, up to two percent 13 of the appropriation for any fiscal year may be used to pay for 14 technical assistance in support of project development and opera- 15 tion, support services development, architecture and engineering, 16 legal services and financial services and may be provided by indi- 17 viduals and not-for-profit or business corporations. No funds shall 18 be expended from this appropriation until the director of the budget 19 has approved a financial plan submitted by the office of temporary 20 and disability assistance on behalf of the homeless housing and 21 assistance program in such detail as required by the budget director 22 (270322G5) (52220) ... 116,000,000 ............... (re. $45,700,000) 23 For the development of permanent, emergency and transitional housing 24 for persons living with HIV or AIDS in accordance with article 2-A 25 of the social services law including the payment of liabilities 26 prior to April 1, 2022; provided, however, that if an insufficient 27 number of viable proposals for persons living with HIV or AIDS are 28 received, the balance of funding can be used for the development of 29 permanent, emergency and transitional housing for other priority 30 need populations as determined by the commissioner of the office of 31 temporary and disability assistance and approved by the director of 32 the budget. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, up to 33 two percent of the appropriation for any fiscal year may be used to 34 pay for technical assistance in support of project development and 35 operation, support services development, architecture and engineer- 36 ing, legal services and financial services and may be provided by 37 individuals and not-for-profit or business corporations (270822G5) 38 (52309) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,000,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 40 For the development of permanent, emergency and transitional housing 41 for persons living with HIV or AIDS in accordance with article 2-A 42 of the social services law including the payment of liabilities 43 prior to April 1, 2021; provided, however, that if an insufficient 44 number of viable proposals for persons living with HIV or AIDS are 45 received, the balance of funding can be used for the development of 46 permanent, emergency and transitional housing for other priority 47 need populations as determined by the commissioner of the office of 48 temporary and disability assistance and approved by the director of 49 the budget. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, up to 435 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 two percent of the appropriation for any fiscal year may be used to 2 pay for technical assistance in support of project development and 3 operation, support services development, architecture and engineer- 4 ing, legal services and financial services and may be provided by 5 individuals and not-for-profit or business corporations (270821G5) 6 (52309) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,000,000) 436 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 53,066,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 0 53,066,000 8 ================ ================ 9 IT MODERNIZATION (CCP) 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 12 Financial Services IT Modernization Fund 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 For services and expenses, and costs associated with an information 15 technology modernization project, including the payment of liabil- 16 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2024. 17 Funds from the assessments to defray operating expenses authorized by 18 Section 206 of Financial Services Law may be transferred into the 19 financial services IT modernization fund (FSIT2408) (32449) ........ 20 60,000,000 ....................................... (re. $53,066,000) 437 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 460,429,000 1,246,954,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 460,429,000 1,246,954,000 8 ================ ================ 9 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISION (CCP) ................... 25,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Preparation of Plans Purpose 14 For payment to the design and construction 15 management account of the centralized 16 services fund of the New York state office 17 of general services for the purpose of 18 preparation and review of plans, specifi- 19 cations, estimates, services, construction 20 management and supervision, inspection, 21 studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and 22 environmental impact statements, value 23 engineering, life cycle costing, or, for 24 the costs of consultant services to 25 perform said purposes to be used for the 26 rehabilitation, erection, construction, 27 reconstruction, alteration, or improvement 28 of new or existing facilities or programs, 29 including the payment of liabilities 30 incurred prior to April 1, 2026, providing 31 that moneys hereby appropriated shall be 32 available to the office net of disallow- 33 ances, refunds, rebates, reimbursements, 34 and credits (05062630) (81088) .............. 25,000,000 35 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) ................. 95,650,000 36 -------------- 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 39 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 40 For the maintenance and operation of various 41 facilities and systems including personal 42 services, nonpersonal services, fringe 43 benefits and indirect costs. Notwith- 44 standing any other law to the contrary, 438 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 all or a portion of the funds appropriated 2 herein may be suballocated or transferred 3 to any department, agency, or public 4 authority (05FM26MO) (81107) ................ 95,650,000 5 FLOOD RECOVERY (CCP) ........................................ 15,000,000 6 -------------- 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 9 Flood Recovery Purpose 10 For services and expenses associated with 11 repairing, restoring, or replacing state- 12 owned structures and their contents in 13 accordance with section 203-a of the exec- 14 utive law. Notwithstanding any other 15 provision of the law to the contrary, the 16 office of general services in consultation 17 with the division of homeland security and 18 emergency services shall, upon approval of 19 the budget director, suballocate or trans- 20 fer the funding appropriated herein to any 21 other state department or agency maintain- 22 ing or in control of such state-owned 23 structures and their contents in an amount 24 not less than the limits of coverage that 25 would be applicable if such state-owned 26 structures and their contents had been 27 covered by standard flood insurance poli- 28 cies, as defined in 44 CFR 59.1 (05FR26FR) 29 (26245) ..................................... 15,000,000 30 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENT OF REAL PROPERTY FACILITIES 31 (CCP) .................................................... 307,779,000 32 -------------- 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 35 Energy Conservation Purpose 36 For the payment of the costs of energy 37 conservation projects for existing facili- 38 ties including the payment of liabilities 39 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 (05132605) 40 (81036) ...................................... 2,000,000 41 Capital Projects Funds - Other 42 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 43 Health and Safety Purpose 439 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For payment of the cost of demolition, 2 alterations and improvements for health 3 and safety to existing facilities, includ- 4 ing the payment of liabilities incurred 5 prior to April 1, 2026 (05072601) (81028) ... 21,900,000 6 Capital Projects Funds - Other 7 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 8 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 9 For payment of the cost of alterations and 10 improvements and minor rehabilitation and 11 improvements for the preservation of 12 existing facilities, including the payment 13 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 14 2026 (05012603) (81010) ..................... 42,447,000 15 For payment of the costs of alterations, 16 improvements and rehabilitation for the 17 preservation of various facilities 18 throughout the state, including the 19 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 20 April 1, 2026 (05NR2603) (26217) ........... 170,432,000 21 For payment of the cost of alterations, 22 improvements and rehabilitation, including 23 design, consultants, furniture, moving, 24 and technology, for the preservation of 25 various facilities throughout the state, 26 including the payment of liabilities 27 incurred prior to April 1, 2026. 28 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule 29 or regulation to the contrary, of the 30 amounts appropriated herein, $25,000,000 31 may be made available for expenses that 32 will result in the reduction of vacant and 33 underutilized space within buildings owned 34 and leased by the office of general 35 services. The office of general services 36 shall submit a utilization plan to the 37 division of the budget and no expenditures 38 may be made from this appropriation until 39 the plan has been approved by the division 40 of the budget (05OS2603) (26247) ............ 25,000,000 41 Capital Projects Funds - Other 42 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 43 Preventive Maintenance Purpose 44 For preventive maintenance on state facili- 45 ties including personal services, nonper- 46 sonal services, fringe benefits and the 47 contractual services provided by private 48 firms, including the payment of liabil- 440 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2026 2 (050926PM) (26224) .......................... 46,000,000 3 SUSTAINABILITY (CCP) ........................................ 17,000,000 4 -------------- 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other 6 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 7 Energy Conservation Purpose 8 For services and expenses related to the 9 conversion of light duty vehicles in the 10 New York state fleet to electric vehicles 11 (05602605) (26248) .......................... 17,000,000 441 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISION (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Preparation of Plans Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 7 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 8 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 9 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 10 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 11 ronmental impact statements, value engineering, life cycle costing, 12 or, for the costs of consultant services to perform said purposes to 13 be used for the rehabilitation, erection, construction, recon- 14 struction, alteration, or improvement of new or existing facilities 15 or programs, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 16 April 1, 2025, providing that moneys hereby appropriated shall be 17 available to the office net of disallowances, refunds, rebates, 18 reimbursements, and credits (05062530) (81088) ..................... 19 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $13,898,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 22 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 23 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 24 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 25 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 26 ronmental impact statements, value engineering, life cycle costing, 27 or, for the costs of consultant services to perform said purposes to 28 be used for the rehabilitation, erection, construction, recon- 29 struction, alteration, or improvement of new or existing facilities 30 or programs, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 31 April 1, 2024, providing that moneys hereby appropriated shall be 32 available to the office net of disallowances, refunds, rebates, 33 reimbursements, and credits (05062430) (81088) ..................... 34 16,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,338,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 36 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 37 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 38 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 39 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 40 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 41 ronmental impact statements, value engineering, life cycle costing, 42 or, for the costs of consultant services to perform said purposes to 43 be used for the rehabilitation, erection, construction, recon- 44 struction, alteration, or improvement of new or existing facilities 45 or programs, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 46 April 1, 2023, providing that moneys hereby appropriated shall be 47 available to the office net of disallowances, refunds, rebates, 442 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 reimbursements, and credits (05062330) (81088) ..................... 2 15,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,395,000) 3 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 4 For payment of a marketing and redevelopment study concerning the most 5 appropriate uses of the J N Adam developmental center (the center), 6 located in the town of Perrysburg, county of Cattaraugus, and an 7 analysis of the historic significance of the buildings comprising 8 the center, in consultation with the commissioner of the office for 9 people with developmental disabilities, the empire state development 10 corporation, the office of parks, recreation and historic preserva- 11 tion, and the department of environmental conservation. Copies of 12 such study and analysis shall be provided to the governor, temporary 13 president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, and state and 14 local officials representing the county of Cattaraugus, town of 15 Perrysburg, and city of Buffalo (05JN1630) (26206) ................. 16 235,000 ............................................. (re. $220,000) 17 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 20 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 22 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 23 including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits 24 and indirect costs. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 25 all or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 26 cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 27 (05FM25MO) (81107) ... 92,650,000 ................ (re. $70,336,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 29 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 30 including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits 31 and indirect costs. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 32 all or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 33 cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 34 (05FM24MO) (81107) ... 85,397,000 ................ (re. $15,648,000) 35 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 36 supplemented by transfers in accordance with state finance law, is 37 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 38 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 39 including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits 40 and indirect costs. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 41 all or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 42 cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 43 (05FM23MO) (81107) ... [83,739,000] 84,438,000 .... (re. $8,845,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 45 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 443 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 2 including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits 3 and indirect costs. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 4 all or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 5 cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 6 (05FM22MO) (81107) ... 72,605,000 ................ (re. $13,776,000) 7 FLOOD RECOVERY (CCP) 8 Capital Projects Funds - Other 9 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 10 Flood Recovery Purpose 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 12 For services and expenses associated with repairing, restoring, or 13 replacing state-owned structures and their contents in accordance 14 with section 203-a of the executive law. Notwithstanding any other 15 provision of the law to the contrary, the office of general services 16 in consultation with the division of homeland security and emergency 17 services shall, upon approval of the budget director, suballocate or 18 transfer the funding appropriated herein to any other state depart- 19 ment or agency maintaining or in control of such state-owned struc- 20 tures and their contents in an amount not less than the limits of 21 coverage that would be applicable if such state-owned structures and 22 their contents had been covered by standard flood insurance poli- 23 cies, as defined in 44 CFR 59.1 (05FR25FR) (26245) ................. 24 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For services and expenses associated with repairing, restoring, or 27 replacing state-owned structures and their contents in accordance 28 with section 203-a of the executive law. Notwithstanding any other 29 provision of the law to the contrary, the office of general services 30 in consultation with the division of homeland security and emergency 31 services shall, upon approval of the budget director, suballocate or 32 transfer the funding appropriated herein to any other state depart- 33 ment or agency maintaining or in control of such state-owned struc- 34 tures and their contents in an amount not less than the limits of 35 coverage that would be applicable if such state-owned structures and 36 their contents had been covered by standard flood insurance poli- 37 cies, as defined in 44 CFR 59.1 (05FR24FR) (26245) ................. 38 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 54, 40 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 41 For services and expenses associated with repairing, restoring, or 42 replacing state-owned structures and their contents in accordance 43 with section 203-a of the executive law. Notwithstanding any other 44 provision of the law to the contrary, the office of general services 45 in consultation with the division of homeland security and emergency 46 services shall, upon approval of the budget director, suballocate or 47 transfer the funding appropriated herein to any other state depart- 444 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ment or agency maintaining or in control of such state-owned struc- 2 tures and their contents in an amount not less than the limits of 3 coverage that would be applicable if such state-owned structures and 4 their contents had been covered by standard flood insurance poli- 5 cies, as defined in 44 CFR 59.1 (05FR23FR) (26245) ................. 6 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 8 For services and expenses associated with repairing, restoring, or 9 replacing state-owned structures and their contents in accordance 10 with section 203-a of the executive law. Notwithstanding any other 11 provision of the law to the contrary, the office of general services 12 in consultation with the division of homeland security and emergency 13 services shall, upon approval of the budget director, suballocate or 14 transfer the funding appropriated herein to any other state depart- 15 ment or agency maintaining or in control of such state-owned struc- 16 tures and their contents in an amount not less than the limits of 17 coverage that would be applicable if such state-owned structures and 18 their contents had been covered by standard flood insurance poli- 19 cies, as defined in 44 CFR 59.1 (05FR22FR) (26245) ................. 20 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 22 For services and expenses associated with repairing, restoring, or 23 replacing state-owned structures and their contents in accordance 24 with section 203-a of the executive law. Notwithstanding any other 25 provision of the law to the contrary, the office of general services 26 in consultation with the division of homeland security and emergency 27 services shall, upon approval of the budget director, suballocate or 28 transfer the funding appropriated herein to any other state depart- 29 ment or agency maintaining or in control of such state-owned struc- 30 tures and their contents in an amount not less than the limits of 31 coverage that would be applicable if such state-owned structures and 32 their contents had been covered by standard flood insurance poli- 33 cies, as defined in 44 CFR 59.1 (05FR21FR) (26245) ................. 34 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 36 For services and expenses associated with repairing, restoring, or 37 replacing state-owned structures and their contents in accordance 38 with section 203-A of the executive law. Notwithstanding any other 39 provision of the law to the contrary, the office of general services 40 in consultation with the division of homeland security and emergency 41 services shall, upon approval of the budget director, suballocate or 42 transfer the funding appropriated herein to any other state depart- 43 ment or agency maintaining or in control of such state-owned struc- 44 tures and their contents in an amount not less than the limits of 45 coverage that would be applicable if such state-owned structures and 46 their contents had been covered by standard flood insurance poli- 47 cies, as defined in 44 CFR 59.1 (05FR20FR) (26245) ................. 48 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 445 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 2 For services and expenses associated with repairing, restoring, or 3 replacing state-owned structures and their contents in accordance 4 with section 203-A of the executive law. Notwithstanding any other 5 provision of the law to the contrary, the office of general services 6 in consultation with the division of homeland security and emergency 7 services shall, upon approval of the budget director, suballocate or 8 transfer the funding appropriated herein to any other state depart- 9 ment or agency maintaining or in control of such state-owned struc- 10 tures and their contents in an amount not less than the limits of 11 coverage that would be applicable if such state-owned structures and 12 their contents had been covered by standard flood insurance poli- 13 cies, as defined in 44 CFR 59.1 (05FR19FR) (26245) ................. 14 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 16 For services and expenses associated with repairing, restoring, or 17 replacing state-owned structures and their contents in accordance 18 with section 203-A of the executive law. Notwithstanding any other 19 provision of the law to the contrary, the office of general services 20 in consultation with the division of homeland security and emergency 21 services shall, upon approval of the budget director, suballocate or 22 transfer the funding appropriated herein to any other state depart- 23 ment or agency maintaining or in control of such state-owned struc- 24 tures and their contents in an amount not less than the limits of 25 coverage that would be applicable if such state-owned structures and 26 their contents had been covered by standard flood insurance poli- 27 cies, as defined in 44 CFR 59.1 (05FR18FR) (26245) ................. 28 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 30 For services and expenses associated with repairing, restoring, or 31 replacing state-owned structures and their contents in accordance 32 with section 203-A of the executive law. Notwithstanding any other 33 provision of the law to the contrary, the office of general services 34 in consultation with the division of homeland security and emergency 35 services shall, upon approval of the budget director, suballocate or 36 transfer the funding appropriated herein to any other state depart- 37 ment or agency maintaining or in control of such stateowned struc- 38 tures and their contents in an amount not less than the limits of 39 coverage that would be applicable if such state-owned structures and 40 their contents had been covered by standard flood insurance poli- 41 cies, as defined in 44 CFR 59.1 (05FR17FR) (26245) ................. 42 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 43 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENT OF REAL PROPERTY FACILITIES (CCP) 44 Capital Projects Funds - Other 45 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 46 Economic Development Purpose 47 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 446 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses related to the redevelopment of the Governor 2 Averell Harriman State Office Building Campus, including the costs 3 of demolition and site preparation, and for services provided by the 4 design and construction account of the centralized services fund of 5 the New York state office of general services (05060609) (26225) ... 6 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,491,000) 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 9 Energy Conservation Purpose 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 11 For the payment of the costs of energy conservation projects for 12 existing facilities including the payment of liabilities incurred 13 prior to April 1, 2025 (05132505) (81036) .......................... 14 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 16 For the payment of the costs of energy conservation projects for 17 existing facilities including the payment of liabilities incurred 18 prior to April 1, 2024 (05132405) (81036) .......................... 19 9,400,000 ......................................... (re. $9,400,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 21 For the payment of the costs of energy conservation projects for 22 existing facilities including the payment of liabilities incurred 23 prior to April 1, 2023 (05132305) (81036) .......................... 24 7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $7,000,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 26 For the payment of the costs of energy conservation projects for 27 existing facilities including the payment of liabilities incurred 28 prior to April 1, 2022 (05132205) (81036) .......................... 29 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,504,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 31 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 32 For services and expenses related to the design and construction of a 33 microgrid and/or an efficient energy system, to operate to the 34 extent possible on renewable energy to provide heating, cooling, 35 and/or electricity for the Empire State Plaza Complex and the design 36 and construction of other energy-efficient initiatives for the 37 Empire State Plaza Complex, including the payment of liabilities 38 incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (05CG1705) (26246) ................. 39 87,600,000 ....................................... (re. $20,848,000) 40 Capital Projects Funds - Other 41 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 42 Health and Safety Purpose 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 447 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of the cost of demolition, alterations and improvements 2 for health and safety to existing facilities, including the payment 3 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (05072501) (81028) 4 ... 9,250,000 ..................................... (re. $9,250,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For payment of the cost of demolition, alterations and improvements 7 for health and safety to existing facilities, including the payment 8 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (05072401) (81028) 9 ... 9,750,000 ..................................... (re. $7,403,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 11 For payment of the cost of demolition, alterations and improvements 12 for health and safety to existing facilities, including the payment 13 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (05072301) (81028) 14 ... 11,000,000 .................................... (re. $4,795,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 16 For payment of the cost of demolition, alterations and improvements 17 for health and safety to existing facilities, including the payment 18 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (05072201) (81028) 19 ... 7,040,000 ..................................... (re. $3,159,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 21 For payment of the cost of demolition, alterations and improvements 22 for health and safety to existing facilities, including the payment 23 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (05072101) (81028) 24 ... 7,600,000 ....................................... (re. $589,000) 25 Capital Projects Funds - Other 26 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 27 New Facilities Purpose 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 29 For services and expenses related to the design and construction of 30 state facilities, including payment of liabilities incurred prior to 31 April 1, 2009. Amounts appropriated herein may be transferred from 32 this appropriation to any other capital projects appropriation made 33 to any other state department or agency, for the purpose of 34 constructing a facility that will benefit multiple state agencies 35 (05AA0907) (26223) ... 10,000,000 ................ (re. $10,000,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 37 For services and expenses related to the design and construction of 38 state facilities, including payment of liabilities incurred prior to 39 April 1, 2008. Amounts appropriated herein may be transferred from 40 this appropriation to any other capital projects appropriation made 41 to any other state department or agency, for the purpose of 42 constructing a facility that will benefit multiple state agencies 43 (05AA0807) (26223) ... 10,000,000 ................ (re. $10,000,000) 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 448 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses related to the design and construction of 2 state facilities, including payment of liabilities incurred prior to 3 April 1, 2007. Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law, 4 funds may be transferred from this appropriation to any other capi- 5 tal projects appropriation made to a state department or agency, for 6 the purpose of constructing a facility that will benefit multiple 7 state agencies (05AA0707) (26223) .................................. 8 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,000,000) 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 11 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 13 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and minor 14 rehabilitation and improvements for the preservation of existing 15 facilities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 16 April 1, 2025 (05012503) (81010) ................................... 17 15,952,000 ....................................... (re. $15,135,000) 18 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 19 tation for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 20 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 21 1, 2025 (05NR2503) (26217) ......................................... 22 228,045,000 ..................................... (re. $217,457,000) 23 For payment of the cost of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 24 tation, including design, consultants, furniture, moving, and tech- 25 nology, for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 26 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 27 1, 2025. 28 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the 29 contrary, of the amounts appropriated herein, $25,000,000 may be 30 made available for expenses that will result in the reduction of 31 vacant and underutilized space within buildings owned and leased by 32 the office of general services. The office of general services shall 33 submit a utilization plan to the division of the budget and no 34 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until the plan has 35 been approved by the division of the budget (05OS2503) (26247) ..... 36 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,822,000) 37 The sum of $25,000,000 is hereby appropriated for plans, design, 38 construction, renovation, administration, and other costs incurred 39 for buildings, structures, and various facilities within the City of 40 Albany. Funds appropriated herein shall be for, including but not 41 limited to, the acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, 42 design, construction, renovation, administration, and other costs 43 incidental thereto (05CA2503) (26452) .............................. 44 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,966,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 46 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and minor 47 rehabilitation and improvements for the preservation of existing 48 facilities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 449 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 April 1, 2024 (05012403) (81010) ................................... 2 36,300,000 ....................................... (re. $25,670,000) 3 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 4 tation for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 5 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 6 1, 2024 (05NR2403) (26217) ... 9,800,000 .......... (re. $9,800,000) 7 For payment of the cost of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 8 tation, including design, consultants, furniture, moving, and tech- 9 nology, for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 10 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 11 1, 2024. 12 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the 13 contrary, of the amounts appropriated herein, $25,000,000 may be 14 made available for expenses that will result in the reduction of 15 vacant and underutilized space within buildings owned and leased by 16 the office of general services. The office of general services shall 17 submit a utilization plan to the division of the budget and no 18 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until the plan has 19 been approved by the division of the budget (05OS2403) (26247) ..... 20 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $18,852,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 22 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and minor 23 rehabilitation and improvements for the preservation of existing 24 facilities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 25 April 1, 2023 (05012303) (81010) ................................... 26 24,300,000 ....................................... (re. $17,287,000) 27 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 28 tation for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 29 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 30 1, 2023 (05NR2303) (26217) ......................................... 31 25,600,000 ....................................... (re. $25,600,000) 32 For payment of the cost of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 33 tation, including design, consultants, furniture, moving, and tech- 34 nology, for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 35 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 36 1, 2023. 37 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the 38 contrary, of the amounts appropriated herein, $25,000,000 may be 39 made available for expenses that will result in the reduction of 40 vacant and underutilized space within buildings owned and leased by 41 the office of general services. The office of general services shall 42 submit a utilization plan to the division of the budget and no 43 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until the plan has 44 been approved by the division of the budget (05OS2303) (26247) ..... 45 25,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,659,000) 46 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and mainte- 47 nance rehabilitation for the Legislative Library (05142303) (26249) 48 ... 3,000,000 ..................................... (re. $3,000,000) 49 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 450 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and minor 2 rehabilitation and improvements for the preservation of existing 3 facilities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 4 April 1, 2022 (05012203) (81010) ................................... 5 20,320,000 ....................................... (re. $12,369,000) 6 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 7 tation for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 8 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 9 1, 2022 (05NR2203) (26217) ... 63,660,000 ........ (re. $38,168,000) 10 For payment of the cost of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 11 tation, including design, consultants, furniture, moving, and tech- 12 nology, for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 13 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 14 1, 2022. 15 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the 16 contrary, of the amounts appropriated herein, $25,000,000 may be 17 made available for expenses that will result in the reduction of 18 vacant and underutilized space within buildings owned and leased by 19 the office of general services. The office of general services shall 20 submit a utilization plan to the division of the budget and no 21 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until the plan has 22 been approved by the division of the budget (05OS2203) (26247) ..... 23 25,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,015,000) 24 For payment of the cost of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 25 tation, including design, consultants, furniture, moving, and tech- 26 nology, for the preservation of various facilities in the Empire 27 State plaza, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 28 April 1, 2022 (05SR2203) (26243) ................................... 29 175,500,000 ..................................... (re. $114,156,000) 30 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and mainte- 31 nance rehabilitation for the Legislative Library (05142203) (26249) 32 ... 3,000,000 ..................................... (re. $2,812,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 34 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and minor 35 rehabilitation and improvements for the preservation of existing 36 facilities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 37 April 1, 2021 (05012103) (81010) ................................... 38 28,600,000 ....................................... (re. $19,229,000) 39 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 40 tation for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 41 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 42 1, 2021 (05NR2103) (26217) ... 17,400,000 ........... (re. $869,000) 43 For payment of the cost of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 44 tation, including design, consultants, furniture, moving, and tech- 45 nology, for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 46 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 47 1, 2021. 48 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the 49 contrary, of the amounts appropriated herein, $25,000,000 may be 50 made available for expenses that will result in the reduction of 51 vacant and underutilized space within buildings owned and leased by 451 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the office of general services. The office of general services shall 2 submit a utilization plan to the division of the budget and no 3 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until the plan has 4 been approved by the division of the budget (05OS2103) (26247) ..... 5 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,666,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 7 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and minor 8 rehabilitation and improvements for the preservation of existing 9 facilities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 10 April 1, 2020 (05012003) (81010) ................................... 11 29,400,000 ........................................ (re. $3,336,000) 12 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 13 tation for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 14 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 15 1, 2020 (05NR2003) (26217) ... 30,400,000 ......... (re. $5,096,000) 16 For payment of the cost of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 17 tation, including design, consultants, furniture, moving, and tech- 18 nology, for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 19 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 20 1, 2020. 21 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the 22 contrary, of the amounts appropriated herein, $25,000,000 may be 23 made available for expenses that will result in the reduction of 24 vacant and underutilized space within buildings owned and leased by 25 the office of general services. The office of general services shall 26 submit a utilization plan to the division of the budget and no 27 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until the plan has 28 been approved by the division of the budget (05OS2003) (26247) ..... 29 50,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,736,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 31 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and minor 32 rehabilitation and improvements for the preservation of existing 33 facilities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 34 April 1, 2019 (05011903) (81010) ................................... 35 31,500,000 ....................................... (re. $10,337,000) 36 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 37 tation for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 38 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 39 1, 2019 (05NR1903) (26217) ... 20,000,000 ......... (re. $8,857,000) 40 For payment of the cost of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 41 tation, including design, consultants, furniture, moving, and tech- 42 nology, for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 43 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 44 1, 2019. 45 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the 46 contrary, of the amounts appropriated herein, $25,000,000 may be 47 made available for expenses that will result in the reduction of 48 vacant and underutilized space within buildings owned and leased by 49 the office of general services. The office of general services shall 50 submit a utilization plan to the division of the budget and no 452 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until the plan has 2 been approved by the division of the budget (05OS1903) (26247) ..... 3 50,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,397,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 5 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and minor 6 rehabilitation and improvements for the preservation of existing 7 facilities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 8 April 1, 2018 (05011803) (81010) ................................... 9 25,500,000 ........................................ (re. $5,760,000) 10 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and mainte- 11 nance rehabilitation for the state capitol and the legislative 12 office building (05AR1803) (26207) ................................. 13 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 14 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and mainte- 15 nance rehabilitation for the state capitol and the legislative 16 office building (05SR1803) (26210) ................................. 17 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,188,000) 18 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 19 tation for the preservation of various facilities throughout the 20 state, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 21 1, 2018 (05NR1803) (26217) ... 26,100,000 ......... (re. $6,773,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 23 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and minor 24 rehabilitation and improvements for the preservation of existing 25 facilities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 26 April 1, 2017 (05011703) (81010) ................................... 27 22,400,000 ........................................ (re. $7,884,000) 28 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 29 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and minor 30 rehabilitation and improvements for the preservation of existing 31 facilities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 32 April 1, 2016 (05011603) (81010) ................................... 33 25,800,000 ........................................ (re. $3,746,000) 34 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 35 tation for the preservation of the state capitol building, including 36 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 37 (05CR1603) (26216) ... 200,000 ...................... (re. $200,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 39 For payment of the cost of alterations and improvements and minor 40 rehabilitation and improvements for the preservation of existing 41 facilities, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 42 April 1, 2015 (05031503) (81010) ... 42,720,000 ... (re. $5,475,000) 43 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 44 tation for the preservation of the state capitol building, including 45 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2015 46 (05CR1503) (26216) ... 200,000 ...................... (re. $200,000) 47 For payment of the cost of design and related services, demolition, 48 alterations, improvements, and rehabilitation at the Harriman state 453 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 office campus, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior 2 to April 1,2015 (05HC1503) (26203) ................................. 3 152,000,000 ...................................... (re. $40,757,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 5 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 6 tation for the preservation of the state capitol building, including 7 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014 8 (05CR1403) (26216) ... 200,000 ...................... (re. $200,000) 9 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 55, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 11 For services and expenses of the correctional officers' memorial fund 12 established pursuant to chapter 55 of the laws of 2014. Funds herein 13 shall be for the construction of such correctional officers' memori- 14 al on the New York state empire state plaza (05CM1403) (39706) ..... 15 300,000 .............................................. (re. $30,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 17 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 18 tation for the preservation of the state capitol building, including 19 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2013 20 (05CR1303) (26216) ... 10,000,000 ................ (re. $10,000,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 22 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 23 tation for the preservation of the state Capitol Building (05CR1203) 24 (26216) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 26 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 27 tation for the preservation of the state Capitol Building (05CR1103) 28 (26216) ... 650,000 ................................. (re. $650,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 30 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 31 tation for the preservation of the state Capitol Building (05CR1003) 32 (26216) ... 3,650,000 ............................. (re. $3,650,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 34 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 35 tation for the preservation of the state Capitol Building (05CR0903) 36 (26216) ... 15,000,000 ........................... (re. $13,960,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 38 For the payment of the costs of alterations, improvement and rehabili- 39 tation for the preservation of Hearing Room C located in the Legis- 40 lative Office Building (05LC0803) (26219) .......................... 41 1,075,000 ........................................... (re. $137,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 454 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of the costs of alterations, improvements and rehabili- 2 tation for the preservation of Hearing Rooms B and C located in the 3 Legislative Office Building (05LL0603) (26221) ..................... 4 1,645,000 ............................................ (re. $98,000) 5 For payment of the state's share of costs of alterations and improve- 6 ments for preservation of facilities at the Binghamton Governmental 7 Complex, including but not limited to repair and rehabilitation of 8 parking garage facilities. The state's share of such costs shall be 9 determined pursuant to a written tripartite agreement between the 10 state of New York, Broome County, and the city of Binghamton. All or 11 part of this amount may be used for payment to the design and 12 construction management account of the centralized services fund of 13 the New York state office of general services for services rendered 14 (05BP0603) (26222) ... 6,200,000 .................. (re. $1,160,000) 15 Advance for costs of alterations and improvements for preservation of 16 facilities at the Binghamton Governmental Complex, including but not 17 limited to repair and rehabilitation of parking garage facilities. 18 All or part of this amount may be used for payment to the design and 19 construction management account of the centralized services fund of 20 the New York state office of general services for services rendered. 21 No portion of this appropriation shall be available until the divi- 22 sion of the budget has reviewed and approved a repayment agreement 23 with the city of Binghamton and Broome county. Such agreement, at 24 the minimum, shall provide for reimbursement to the state by the 25 city of Binghamton and Broome county for their respective shares of 26 all design and construction disbursements (05BL0603) (26230) ....... 27 5,800,000 ............................................ (re. $59,000) 28 Capital Projects Funds - Other 29 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 30 Preventive Maintenance Purpose 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 32 For preventive maintenance on state facilities including personal 33 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contractual 34 services provided by private firms, including the payment of liabil- 35 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (050925PM) (26224) ........... 36 46,000,000 ....................................... (re. $36,770,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 38 For preventive maintenance on state facilities including personal 39 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contractual 40 services provided by private firms, including the payment of liabil- 41 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (050924PM) (26224) ........... 42 36,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,579,000) 43 SUSTAINABILITY (CCP) 44 Capital Projects Funds - Other 45 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 46 Energy Conservation Purpose 455 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 2 For services and expenses related to the conversion of light duty 3 vehicles in the New York state fleet to electric vehicles (05602505) 4 (26248) ... 17,000,000 ........................... (re. $17,000,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to the conversion of light duty 7 vehicles in the New York state fleet to electric vehicles (05602405) 8 (26248) ... 17,000,000 ........................... (re. $17,000,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 10 For services and expenses related to the conversion of light duty 11 vehicles in the New York state fleet to electric vehicles (05602305) 12 (26248) ... 17,000,000 ........................... (re. $17,000,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 14 For services and expenses related to the conversion of light duty 15 vehicles in the New York state fleet to electric vehicles (05602205) 16 (26248) ... 17,000,000 ............................ (re. $9,899,000) 17 Capital Projects Funds - Other 18 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 19 Sustainability Purpose 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 21 For payments on sustainability projects at various facilities through- 22 out the State, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior 23 to April 1, 2009 (050109SU) (26226) ................................ 24 13,300,000 ....................................... (re. $10,343,000) 456 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 1,185,464,000 5,999,347,000 6 Capital Projects Funds - Federal ... 237,500,000 1,295,870,000 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 1,422,964,000 7,295,217,000 9 ================ ================ 10 ALL PAYERS CLAIMS DATABASE (CCP) ............................ 13,794,000 11 -------------- 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 14 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 15 For grants, services and expenses related to 16 the establishment, support, and adminis- 17 tration of an all payers claim database, 18 including but not limited to technology, 19 equipment, software, personal service, 20 fringe benefits, and indirect costs. For 21 purposes of the program, all such activ- 22 ities are deemed to constitute a capital 23 expenditure. No expenditures related to 24 this appropriation shall be made without a 25 plan, prepared by the commissioner of 26 health and approved by the director of the 27 budget, detailing sufficient resources are 28 available to support such expenditures 29 (12AP2608) (26624) .......................... 13,794,000 30 EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES MODERNIZATION (CCP) ............... 3,200,000 31 -------------- 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 34 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 35 For services and expenses related to the 36 administration of the state emergency 37 medical services task force in accordance 38 with section 3032 of the public health 39 law. Expenditures shall be subject to a 40 plan, prepared by the commissioner of 41 health and approved by the director of the 42 budget (12EM2608) ............................ 3,200,000 457 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) ................. 12,266,000 2 -------------- 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 5 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 6 For services and expenses of a quality 7 program for adult care facilities. Such 8 program shall be targeted at facilities 9 with a high population of residents who 10 receive supplemental security income, as 11 defined in subchapter XVI of chapter 7 of 12 title 42 of the United States Code, state 13 supplemental payments, Medicaid (with 14 respect to residents in an assisted living 15 program), or safety net assistance, as 16 defined in section 159 of the social 17 services law, and used to support capital 18 improvement projects that will enhance the 19 physical environment of the facility and 20 promote a higher quality of life for resi- 21 dents, in accordance with a plan approved 22 by the residents' council, the department 23 of health, and the director of the budget, 24 provided however that such expenditures 25 shall not be used to supplant the obli- 26 gations of facility operator to provide a 27 safe comfortable living environment for 28 residents in a good state of repair and 29 sanitation. The department of health, 30 subject to the approval of the director of 31 the division of budget, shall develop an 32 allocation methodology taking into account 33 financial status of the facility, resident 34 needs, and the population of residents who 35 receive supplemental security income, 36 state supplemental payments, Medicaid 37 (with respect to residents in an assisted 38 living program), or safety net assistance. 39 Such allocation shall serve as the basis 40 of distribution to eligible facilities 41 (12EQ26MO) ................................... 3,266,000 42 For the maintenance and operation of various 43 facilities and systems including personal 44 services, fringe benefits, and indirect 45 costs. Notwithstanding any other law to 46 the contrary, all or a portion of the 47 funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 48 cated or transferred to any department, 49 agency, or public authority (12FM26MO) 50 (81107) ...................................... 9,000,000 458 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 GRANTS FOR FOOD BANKS (CCP) ................................. 10,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 5 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 6 For services and expenses related to the New 7 York providing local access to essential 8 sustenance initiative for the provision of 9 competitive grants to organizations that 10 provide food relief services, including 11 but not limited to not-for-profit food 12 banks, food pantries, community-based 13 organizations, and municipalities. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of 15 law, the dormitory authority of the state 16 of New York, is authorized to administer a 17 grant program, which shall be awarded on a 18 competitive basis through a request for 19 applications process and eligibility 20 criteria determined by the department of 21 health in consultation with the dormitory 22 authority of the state of New York. Grants 23 may be used for any applicable expenses 24 including but not limited to general 25 project development costs, the acquisi- 26 tion, design, construction, improvement, 27 or renovation of sites, the purchase of 28 equipment, and other costs necessary to 29 effectuate the initiative. All or a 30 portion of the funds appropriated hereby 31 may be suballocated or transferred to any 32 department, agency, public benefit corpo- 33 ration, or public authority (12FB26A4) ...... 10,000,000 34 IT INITIATIVES PROGRAM (CCP) ................................ 10,000,000 35 -------------- 36 Capital Projects Funds - Other 37 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 38 Health Care IT Capital Account - 32216 39 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 40 For services and expenses related to infor- 41 mation technology projects undertaken by 42 the department of health, including the 43 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 44 April 1, 2026 pursuant to a plan that 45 addresses information technology security 46 and data management, prepared by the 47 department of health, developed in consul- 459 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 tation with the office of information 2 technology services, and approved by the 3 director of the budget. Upon the request 4 of the commissioner of the department of 5 health and approval of the director of the 6 division of the budget, all or a portion 7 of the funds appropriated hereby may be 8 suballocated or transferred to the office 9 of information technology services 10 (12IT2608) (51919) .......................... 10,000,000 11 LABORATORIES AND RESEARCH (CCP) ............................. 10,300,000 12 -------------- 13 Capital Projects Funds - Other 14 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 15 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 16 To maintain and improve existing facilities 17 including preparation of plans, 18 construction projects, the payment of 19 insurance fees, and for payment to the 20 design and construction management account 21 of the centralized services fund of the 22 New York state office of general services. 23 Upon the request of the commissioner of 24 the department of health and approval of 25 the director of the division of the budg- 26 et, funds of this appropriation may be 27 transferred to the dormitory authority of 28 the state of New York for capital projects 29 (12592603) (29780) .......................... 10,300,000 30 HEALTH CARE FACILITY TRANSFORMATION PROGRAM (CCP) ........ 1,000,000,000 31 -------------- 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 34 Health Care System Improvement Purpose 35 For payments and grants to support health 36 care facility transformation statewide, to 37 be made available in accordance with the 38 health care safety-net transformation 39 program established in section 2825-I of 40 the public health law. A portion of the 41 funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 42 cated or transferred to any department, 43 agency, or public authority (12SN26HE) 44 (26668) .................................. 1,000,000,000 460 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) ... 63,904,000 2 -------------- 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 5 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 6 For minor alterations, improvements, 7 construction projects, the payment of 8 insurance fees and preventive maintenance 9 of St. Albans Nursing Home, Helen Hayes 10 Hospital, Oxford Nursing Home, Batavia 11 Nursing Home, and Montrose Nursing Home 12 including preparation of plans and for 13 payment to the design and construction 14 management account of the centralized 15 services fund of the New York state office 16 of general services. Upon the request of 17 the commissioner of the department of 18 health and approval of the director of the 19 division of the budget, funds of this 20 appropriation may be transferred to the 21 dormitory authority of the state of New 22 York for capital projects (12602603) 23 (81010) ..................................... 12,600,000 24 The sum of $51,304,000 is hereby appropri- 25 ated to support capital expenses of the 26 Roswell Park cancer institute corporation. 27 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, all 28 or a portion of funds appropriated herein 29 may be transferred to the Roswell Park 30 cancer institute corporation, subject to a 31 plan developed by Roswell Park cancer 32 institute corporation, submitted to the 33 department of health, and approved by the 34 director of the budget (12RP2603) (26665) ... 51,304,000 35 REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH CARE IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM (CCP) .......... 10,000,000 36 -------------- 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 39 Health Care System Improvement Purpose 40 Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 41 112 and 163 of the state finance law, and 42 sections 142 and 143 of the economic 43 development law, for grants for capital 44 projects at reproductive health facili- 45 ties, including support for infrastructure 46 improvements, modernization and safety and 47 security. The department of health and the 461 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 dormitory authority may enter into an 2 agreement, subject to the approval of the 3 director of the budget, for the purposes 4 of administering the funds made available 5 pursuant to this appropriation. Notwith- 6 standing any section of law to the contra- 7 ry, recipients of such grants shall be 8 entitled to use funds awarded in accord- 9 ance with this appropriation to purchase 10 commodities, services, capital improve- 11 ments and technology through centralized 12 contracts established by the office of 13 general services under section 163 of the 14 state finance law, and such recipients 15 shall be deemed for such purpose to be 16 authorized users within the meaning of 17 paragraph k of subdivision 1 of section 18 163 of the state finance law (12SS26HE) 19 (59096) ..................................... 10,000,000 20 STATEWIDE HEALTH INFORMATION NETWORK FOR NEW YORK (CCP) ..... 30,000,000 21 -------------- 22 Capital Projects Funds - Other 23 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 24 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 25 For grants, services and expenses including 26 contracts for the New York eHealth Colla- 27 borative for the purpose of supporting and 28 administering the statewide health infor- 29 mation network for New York, including but 30 not limited to qualified entities certi- 31 fied by the department, technology, equip- 32 ment, software, personal service, fringe 33 benefits, and indirect costs. For purposes 34 of the program, all such activities are 35 deemed to constitute a capital expendi- 36 ture. Provided, however, that $2,500,000 37 shall be used for modernizing health 38 reporting systems. No expenditures related 39 to this appropriation shall be made with- 40 out a plan, prepared by the commissioner 41 of health and approved by the director of 42 the budget, detailing sufficient resources 43 are available to support such expendi- 44 tures. Use of such funds shall not be 45 subject to the requirements of section 163 46 of the state finance law. (12SH2608) 47 (26628) ..................................... 30,000,000 462 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 WATER RESOURCES (CCP) ...................................... 259,500,000 2 -------------- 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 5 Water Resources Purpose 6 For payment of a portion of the state's 7 match for the safe drinking water revolv- 8 ing fund (12SM2657) (26888) ................. 20,000,000 9 For services and expenses including 10 contracts related to the laboratory test- 11 ing of public drinking water for chemical 12 compounds and emerging contaminants 13 defined pursuant to section 1112 of the 14 public health law (12EC2657) (59062) ......... 2,000,000 15 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 16 Federal Capital Projects Fund 17 Safe Drinking Water Revolving Account - 31360 18 Water Resources Purpose 19 For federal grants for the safe drinking 20 water revolving fund (12022657) (26888) .... 215,000,000 21 For services and expenses of the state 22 revolving funds program (12DW2657) (26666) .. 22,500,000 463 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 All or a portion of the disbursements made pursuant to the reappropri- 2 ations made hereinafter from the capital projects fund may be eligi- 3 ble for reimbursement from proceeds of bonds issued by the dormitory 4 authority. The dormitory authority and the department of health 5 shall report quarterly to the director of the budget the amounts 6 expended from appropriations which are eligible for reimbursement 7 from the proceeds of the bonds. The director of the budget shall 8 review these reports and then certify to the comptroller amounts 9 expended from these appropriations which are reimbursable from bond 10 proceeds. Until such time as the dormitory authority determines that 11 amounts expended from these appropriations are not reimbursable from 12 bond proceeds, all such expenditures shall be considered to be reim- 13 bursable from bond proceeds. 14 CAPITAL RESTRUCTURING FINANCING PROGRAM FOR HEALTH CARE AND RELATED 15 FACILITIES (CCP) 16 Capital Projects Funds - Other 17 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 18 Health Care System Improvement Purpose 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 21 An advance for payments and grants establishing the capital restruc- 22 turing financing program for health care and related facilities 23 licensed pursuant to public health law or mental hygiene law, 24 including general hospitals, nursing homes, clinics, residential 25 health care facilities, diagnostic and treatment centers, and clin- 26 ics licensed pursuant to the public health law or the mental hygiene 27 law, assisted living programs, primary care providers, and home care 28 providers certified or licensed pursuant to article thirty-six of 29 this chapter and other primary care providers, to support capital 30 projects that will improve the quality, financial viability, and 31 efficiency of the health care delivery system in New York state, 32 including necessary support to facilitate restructuring, closures, 33 conversions and consolidations within the health care delivery 34 system including funding intended to maintain facility viability, 35 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 36 priation to a facility until a facility specific plan has been 37 submitted to the department of health and has been approved by the 38 director of the budget. Up to $75,000,000 of this appropriation may 39 be suballocated to the state university of New York, provided howev- 40 er that these funds shall be used for eligible project costs of the 41 ambulatory care integration project awarded to upstate university 42 hospital pursuant to request for applications number 1504100252 and 43 in accordance with an agreement between the department of health and 44 the state university construction fund and approved by the director 45 of the budget (12CR14HE) (26626) ................................... 46 1,200,000,000 ................................... (re. $244,541,000) 47 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT (CCP) 464 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 New Facilities Purpose 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 5 The sum of $967,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 6 expenses of a life sciences laboratory public health initiative in 7 the Capital District pursuant to a plan developed by the commission- 8 er of the New York State department of health, and subject to the 9 approval of the director of the division of the budget, for the 10 acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, design, 11 construction, renovation, administration, and other costs incidental 12 thereto, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 13 April 1, 2023. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may 14 be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 15 authority (12262309) (85501) ... 967,000,000 .... (re. $967,000,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 17 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 18 The sum of $600,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 19 expenses of a life sciences laboratory and public health initiative 20 in the Capital District to develop life science research, inno- 21 vation, and infrastructure, including but not limited to the acqui- 22 sition of real property, preparation of plans, design, construction, 23 renovation, administration, and other costs incidental thereto, 24 including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 25 2018. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 26 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 27 authority (12251809) (85501) ....................................... 28 600,000,000 ..................................... (re. $472,880,000) 29 HEALTH CARE FACILITY TRANSFORMATION PROGRAM (CCP) 30 Capital Projects Funds - Other 31 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 32 Health Care System Improvement Purpose 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 34 For payments and grants to support health care facility transformation 35 statewide, to be made available in accordance with the health care 36 safety-net transformation program established in section 2825-I of 37 the public health law. A portion of the funds appropriated herein 38 may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or 39 public authority (12SN25HE) (26668) ................................ 40 1,000,000,000 ................................. (re. $1,000,000,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 54, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 43 For payments and grants to support health care facility transformation 44 statewide, made available pursuant to section 2825-h of the public 45 health law. 465 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, within amounts appro- 2 priated herein, notwithstanding section one hundred sixty-three of 3 the state finance law and without a competitive process, up to 4 $20,000,000 shall be made available for grant awards to institutions 5 and facilities that carry out the research and treatment of rare 6 diseases, with a portion of this amount awarded to Empire State ALS 7 Alliance to support Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis (ALS) research and 8 treatment. 9 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, within amounts appro- 10 priated herein, up to $300,000,000 may be suballocated to the state 11 university of New York for the purposes of supporting capital 12 improvements at the state university of New York hospital at Brook- 13 lyn and/or the state university health science center at Brooklyn 14 pursuant to a transformation plan approved by the director of the 15 budget. 16 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a portion of the funds 17 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 18 department, agency, or public authority 19 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, funds shall be avail- 20 able for payment in accordance with the health care safety-net 21 transformation program established in 2825-I of the public health 22 law as contained in budget bill A8807/S8307 as submitted by the 23 governor for the 2024-2025 state fiscal year. (12SW23HE) (26668) ... 24 990,000,000 ..................................... (re. $990,000,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 27 For payments and grants to support health care facility transformation 28 statewide, made available pursuant to section 2825-g of the public 29 health law. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a portion 30 of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred 31 to any department, agency, or public authority 32 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, funds shall be avail- 33 able for payment in accordance with the health care safety-net 34 transformation program established in 2825-I of the public health 35 law as contained in budget bill A8807/S8307 as submitted by the 36 governor for the 2024-2025 state fiscal year. (12SW22HE) (26668) ... 37 1,600,000,000 ................................. (re. $1,445,149,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 39 314, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 40 For payments and grants to support health care facility transformation 41 statewide. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance law or 42 any other provision of law to the contrary, this appropriation may 43 be used to fund payments and or grants, including up to $5,000,000 44 to regional perinatal care centers or other health providers to 45 establish telehealth applications, made by the commissioner of 46 health in his or her sole discretion, without a competitive bid or 47 request for proposal process, to eligible applicants as determined 48 by the commissioner of health for the purposes that strengthen and 49 protect continued access to health care services in communities 50 including but not limited to children's residential treatment facil- 466 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ities. Such purposes may include debt retirement and capital 2 projects or non-capital projects that facilitate health care trans- 3 formation activities including, merger, consolidation, acquisition 4 or other activities intended to: create financially sustainable 5 systems of care; preserve or expand essential health care services; 6 modernize obsolete facility physical plants and infrastructure; 7 foster participation in alternative payment arrangements, including 8 but not limited to contracts with managed care plans and accountable 9 care organizations; increase the quality of resident care or experi- 10 ence in residential health care facilities; or improve health infor- 11 mation technology infrastructure, including telehealth, to strength- 12 en the acute, post-acute care, primary care, and longterm care 13 continuum. Grants shall not be available to support general operat- 14 ing expenses. 15 The commissioner and the president of the dormitory authority of the 16 state of New York shall enter into an agreement, subject to the 17 approval of the director of the budget, and subject to section 18 1680-r of the public authorities law, for the purposes of awarding, 19 distributing, and administering the funds made available pursuant to 20 this appropriation. 21 In determining awards for eligible applicants under this appropri- 22 ation, the commissioner of health shall consider criteria including, 23 but not limited to: 24 (a) The extent to which the proposed project will contribute to the 25 integration of health care services or the long term sustainability 26 of the applicant or preservation of essential health services in the 27 community or communities served by the applicant; 28 (b) The extent to which the proposed project or purpose is aligned 29 with delivery system reform incentive payment ("DSRIP") program 30 goals and objectives; 31 (c) The geographic distribution of funds; 32 (d) The relationship between the proposed project and identified 33 community need; 34 (e) The extent to which the applicant has access to alternative 35 financing; 36 (f) The extent to which the proposed project furthers the development 37 of primary care and other outpatient services; 38 (g) The extent to which the proposed project benefits medicaid enrol- 39 lees and uninsured individuals; 40 (h) The extent to which the applicant has engaged the community 41 affected by the proposed project and the manner in which community 42 engagement has shaped such project; and 43 (i) The extent to which the proposed project addresses potential risk 44 to patient safety and welfare. 45 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary, and 46 upon approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner may 47 award up to $300,000,000 of the funds made available pursuant to 48 this appropriation for unfunded project applications submitted in 49 response to the request for applications number 17648 issued by the 50 department on January 8, 2018 pursuant to section 2825-e of the 51 public health law. 467 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Authorized amounts to be awarded pursuant to applications submitted in 2 response to the request for application number 17648 shall be 3 awarded no later than September 1, 2019. 4 The department shall provide a report on a quarterly basis to the 5 chairs of the senate finance, assembly ways and means, and senate 6 health and assembly health committees, until such time as the 7 department determines that the projects that receive funding pursu- 8 ant to this appropriation are substantially complete. Such reports 9 shall be submitted no later than sixty days after the close of the 10 quarter, and shall include, for each award, the name of the appli- 11 cant, a description of the project or purpose, the amount of the 12 award, disbursement date, and status of achievement of process and 13 performance metrics and milestones pursuant to subdivision 6 of 14 section 2825-f of the public health law. 15 Within amounts appropriated herein, a minimum of $45,000,000 shall be 16 made available for grant awards to residential health care facili- 17 ties, up to $20,000,000 may be made available for grant awards made 18 pursuant to paragraphs (l) and (m) of subdivision 3 of section 461-l 19 of the social services law, pursuant to criteria to be determined by 20 the commissioner and a minimum of $60,000,000 shall be made avail- 21 able for grant awards to community-based health care providers which 22 shall be defined as a diagnostic and treatment center licensed or 23 granted an operating certificate under article 28 of the public 24 health law, a mental health clinic licensed or granted an operating 25 certificate under article 31 of the mental hygiene law, a substance 26 use disorder treatment clinic licensed or granted an operating 27 certificate under article 32 of the mental hygiene law, a primary 28 care provider, a home care provider certified or licensed pursuant 29 to article 36 of the public health law, a facility granted an oper- 30 ating certificate under article 16 of the mental hygiene law or 31 hospices licensed or granted an operating certificate pursuant to 32 article 40 of the public health law. 33 The dormitory authority may issue bonds for such purposes up to the 34 amount appropriated herein. No expenditures may be made from this 35 appropriation to a facility until a facility specific plan has been 36 submitted to the department of health and has been approved by the 37 director of the budget (12SW18HE) (26668) .......................... 38 525,000,000 ..................................... (re. $242,873,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as transferred by chapter 40 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 41 For payments and grants to support health care facility transformation 42 statewide for capital, non-operational works. Notwithstanding 43 section 163 of the state finance law or any other provision of law 44 to the contrary, this appropriation may be used to fund payments and 45 or grants made by the commissioner of health in his or her sole 46 discretion, without a competitive bid or request for proposal proc- 47 ess, to eligible applicants as determined by the commissioner of 48 health for purposes in support of essential health care services. 49 Such purposes may include debt retirement and capital projects or 50 non-capital projects that facilitate health care transformation, 51 including mergers, consolidation, acquisition or other corporate 468 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 restructuring activities intended to create a financially sustaina- 2 ble system of care that promotes a patient-centered model of health 3 care delivery or preserves or expands essential health care 4 services. Grants shall not be available to support general operating 5 expenses. 6 The commissioner and the president of the dormitory authority of the 7 state of New York shall enter into an agreement, subject to the 8 approval of the director of the budget, and subject to section 9 1680-r of the public authorities law, for the purposes of awarding, 10 distributing, and administering the funds made available pursuant to 11 this appropriation. 12 In determining awards for eligible applicants under this appropri- 13 ation, the commissioner of health shall consider stakeholder, commu- 14 nity, and legislative input pursuant to subdivision 4-a of section 15 2825-e of the public health law criteria including, but not limited 16 to: 17 (a) the extent to which the proposed project will contribute to the 18 integration of health care services or the long term sustainability 19 of the applicant or preservation of essential health services in the 20 community or communities served by the applicant; 21 (b) The extent to which the proposed project or purpose is aligned 22 with delivery system reform incentive payment ("DSRIP") program 23 goals and objectives; 24 (c) Consideration of geographic distribution of funds; 25 (d) The relationship between the proposed project and identified 26 community need; 27 (e) The extent to which the applicant has access to alternative 28 financing; 29 (f) The extent that the proposed project furthers the development of 30 primary care and other outpatient services; 31 (g) The extent to which the proposed project benefits medicaid enrol- 32 lees and uninsured individuals; 33 (h) The extent to which the applicant has engaged the community 34 affected by the proposed capital project and the manner in which 35 community engagement has shaped such capital project; and 36 (i) The extent to which the proposed project addresses potential risk 37 to patient safety and welfare. 38 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary, and 39 upon approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 40 health may award up to $300,000,000 of the funds made available 41 pursuant to this appropriation for unfunded project applications 42 submitted in response to the request for applications number 43 1607010255 issued by the department on July 20, 2016 pursuant to 44 section 2825-d of the public health law. 45 The department shall provide a report on a quarterly basis to the 46 chairs of the senate finance, assembly ways and means, and senate 47 health and assembly health committees. Such reports shall be submit- 48 ted no later than 60 days after the close of the quarter, and shall 49 include, for each award, the name of the applicant, a description of 50 the project or purpose, the amount of the award, disbursement date, 51 and status of achievement of process and performance metrics and 469 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 milestones pursuant to subdivision 5 of section 2825-e of the public 2 health law. 3 Within amounts appropriated herein, the director of the budget is 4 authorized to make a determination to fund up to $200,000,000 for 5 grant awards which are not eligible to be funded with the proceeds 6 of bonds issued pursuant to section 1680-r of the public authorities 7 law. 8 Within amounts appropriated herein, $50,000,000 shall be made avail- 9 able for grant awards to Montefiore medical center, and a minimum of 10 $75,000,000 shall be made available for grant awards to community- 11 based health care providers which shall be defined as a diagnostic 12 and treatment center licensed or granted an operating certificate 13 under article 28 of the public health law, a mental health clinic 14 licensed or granted an operating certificate under article 31 of the 15 mental hygiene law, an alcohol and substance abuse treatment clinic 16 licensed or granted an operating certificate under article 32 of the 17 mental hygiene law, a primary care provider, or a home care provider 18 certified or licensed pursuant to article 36 of public health law. 19 The dormitory authority may issue bonds for such purposes up to the 20 amount appropriated herein. No expenditures may be made from this 21 appropriation to a facility until a facility specific plan has been 22 submitted to the department of health and has been approved by the 23 director of the budget (12SW17HE) (26668) .......................... 24 500,000,000 ..................................... (re. $120,661,000) 25 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2017: 27 For payments and grants to support health care facility transformation 28 statewide for capital, non-operational works. Notwithstanding 29 section 163 of the state finance law or any other provision of law 30 to the contrary, this appropriation may be used to fund payments and 31 or grants made by the commissioner of health in his or her sole 32 discretion, without a competitive bid or request for proposal proc- 33 ess, to eligible applicants as determined by the commissioner of 34 health for purposes in support of essential health care services. 35 Such purposes may include renovating or replacing inefficient or 36 outdated facilities as part of a merger, consolidation, acquisition 37 or other significant corporate restructuring activity that is part 38 of an overall transformation plan intended to create a financially 39 sustainable system of care that promotes a patient-centered model of 40 health care delivery aimed at improving the overall health and 41 wellbeing of a community. Eligible applicants shall be those deemed 42 by the commissioner to be a provider that fulfills or will fulfill a 43 health care need for acute inpatient, outpatient, primary, home care 44 or residential health care services in a community. The commissioner 45 and the president of the dormitory authority of the state of New 46 York shall enter into an agreement, subject to the approval of the 47 director of the budget, and subject to section 1680-r of the public 48 authorities law, for the purposes of awarding, distributing, and 49 administering the funds made available pursuant to this appropri- 50 ation. In determining awards for eligible applicants under this 470 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 appropriation, the commissioner of health and the president of the 2 authority shall consider criteria including, but not limited to: 3 (a) the extent to which the proposed capital project will contribute 4 to the integration of health care services and long term sustaina- 5 bility of the applicant or preservation of essential health services 6 in the community or communities served by the applicant; 7 (b) the extent to which the proposed project or purpose is aligned 8 with delivery system reform incentive payment ("DSRIP") program 9 goals and objectives; 10 (c) consideration of geographic distribution of funds; 11 (d) the relationship between the proposed capital project and identi- 12 fied community need; 13 (e) the extent to which the applicant has access to alternative 14 financing; 15 (f) the extent that the proposed capital project furthers the develop- 16 ment of primary care and other outpatient services; 17 (g) the extent to which the proposed capital project benefits medicaid 18 enrollees and uninsured individuals; 19 (h) the extent to which the applicant has engaged the community 20 affected by the proposed capital project and the manner in which 21 community engagement has shaped such capital project; and 22 (i) the extent to which the proposed capital project addresses poten- 23 tial risk to patient safety and welfare. 24 Disbursement of awards made pursuant to this appropriation shall be 25 conditioned on the awardee achieving certain process and performance 26 metrics and milestones as determined in the sole discretion of the 27 commissioner. Such metrics and milestones shall be structured to 28 ensure that the health care transformation and provider sustainabil- 29 ity goals of the project are achieved, and such metrics and mile- 30 stones shall be included in grant disbursement agreements or other 31 contractual documents as required by the commissioner. 32 The department shall provide a report on a quarterly basis to the 33 chairs of the senate finance, assembly ways and means, senate health 34 and assembly health committees. Such reports shall be submitted no 35 later than sixty days after the close of the quarter, and shall 36 include, for each award, the name of the applicant, a description of 37 the project or purpose, the amount of the award, disbursement date, 38 and status of achievement of process and performance metrics and 39 milestones pursuant to subdivision 5 of section 2825-b of the public 40 health law. Within amounts appropriated herein, up to $5,000,000 may 41 be made available for the purchase of mammography equipped vehicles, 42 and a minimum of $30,000,000 shall be made available for community- 43 based health care providers which shall be defined as a diagnostic 44 and treatment center licensed or granted an operating certificate 45 under article twenty-eight of the public health law, a mental health 46 clinic licensed or granted an operating certificate under article 47 thirty-one of the mental hygiene law, an alcohol and substance abuse 48 treatment clinic licensed or granted an operating certificate under 49 article thirty-two of the mental hygiene law, primary care provid- 50 ers, or a home care provider certified or licensed pursuant to arti- 51 cle 36 of the Public Health Law. The dormitory authority may issue 52 bonds for such purposes in an amount appropriated herein. No expend- 471 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 itures may be made from this appropriation to a facility until a 2 facility specific plan has been submitted to the department of 3 health and has been approved by the director of the budget 4 (12SW16HE) (26668) ... 200,000,000 ............... (re. $25,198,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 6 For payments and grants to support health care facility transformation 7 within the county of Kings, for capital, non-operational works serv- 8 ing communities whose residents are experiencing significant levels 9 of health care disparities, health care needs and other risk 10 factors. Funding will be awarded in the discretion of the commis- 11 sioner of health, without a competitive bid or request for proposal 12 process, for purposes in support of essential health care services. 13 Such purposes may include renovating or replacing inefficient or 14 outdated facilities as part of a merger, consolidation, acquisition 15 or other significant corporate restructuring activity intended to 16 create a financially sustainable system of care that promotes a 17 patient-centered model of health care delivery aimed at improving 18 the overall health and well-being of a community. The dormitory 19 authority may issue bonds for such purposes in an amount appropri- 20 ated herein. No expenditures may be made from this appropriation to 21 a facility until a facility specific plan has been submitted to the 22 department of health and has been approved by the director of the 23 budget (12BK15HE) (26928) ... 700,000,000 ....... (re. $227,886,000) 24 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) 25 Capital Projects Funds - Other 26 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 27 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 29 For services and expenses of a quality program for adult care facili- 30 ties. Such program shall be targeted at facilities with a high popu- 31 lation of residents who receive supplemental security income, as 32 defined in subchapter XVI of chapter 7 of title 42 of the United 33 States Code, state supplemental payments, Medicaid (with respect to 34 residents in an assisted living program), or safety net assistance, 35 as defined in section 159 of the social services law, and used to 36 support capital improvement projects that will enhance the physical 37 environment of the facility and promote a higher quality of life for 38 residents, in accordance with a plan approved by the residents' 39 council, the department, and the director of the budget, provided 40 however that such expenditures shall not be used to supplant the 41 obligations of facility operator to provide a safe comfortable 42 living environment for residents in a good state of repair and sani- 43 tation. The department, subject to the approval of the director of 44 the division of budget, shall develop an allocation methodology 45 taking into account financial status of the facility, resident 46 needs, and the population of residents who receive supplemental 47 security income, state supplemental payments, Medicaid (with respect 48 to residents in an assisted living program), or safety net assist- 472 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ance. Such allocation shall serve as the basis of distribution to 2 eligible facilities (12EQ25MO) ... 3,266,000 ...... (re. $3,266,000) 3 IT INITIATIVES PROGRAM (CCP) 4 Capital Projects Funds - Other 5 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 6 Health Care IT Capital Account - 32216 7 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 9 For services and expenses related to information technology projects 10 undertaken by the department of health, including the payment of 11 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 pursuant to a plan that 12 addresses information technology security and data management, 13 prepared by the department of health, developed in consultation with 14 the office of information technology services, and approved by the 15 director of the budget. Upon the request of the commissioner of the 16 department of health and approval of the director of the division of 17 the budget, all or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 18 suballocated or transferred to the office of information technology 19 services (12IT2508) (51919) ... 10,000,000 ........ (re. $9,202,000) 20 HEALTH CARE DATA MODERNIZATION 21 Capital Projects Funds - Other 22 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 23 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 25 For services and expense related to the development and implementation 26 of an electronic health record connectivity incentive program. Use 27 of such funds shall not be subject to the requirements of section 28 163 of the state finance law (12EH2308) (59061) .................... 29 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $30,000,000) 30 LABORATORIES AND RESEARCH (CCP) 31 Capital Projects Funds - Other 32 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 33 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 35 To maintain and improve existing facilities including preparation of 36 plans, construction projects, the payment of insurance fees, and for 37 payment to the design and construction management account of the 38 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 39 services. Upon the request of the commissioner of the department of 40 health and approval of the director of the division of the budget, 41 funds of this appropriation may be transferred to the dormitory 42 authority of the state of New York for capital projects (12592503) 43 (29780) ... 10,000,000 ............................ (re. $8,725,000) 473 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 To maintain and improve existing facilities including preparation of 3 plans and for payment to the design and construction management 4 account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 5 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 6 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 7 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 8 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 9 projects (12592403) (29780) ........................................ 10 12,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,891,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 12 To maintain and improve existing facilities including preparation of 13 plans and for payment to the design and construction management 14 account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 15 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 16 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 17 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 18 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 19 projects (12592303) (29780) ........................................ 20 12,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,099,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 22 To maintain and improve existing facilities including preparation of 23 plans and for payment to the design and construction management 24 account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 25 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 26 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 27 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 28 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 29 projects (12592203) (29780) ........................................ 30 12,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,888,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 32 To maintain and improve existing facilities including preparation of 33 plans and for payment to the design and construction management 34 account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 35 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 36 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 37 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 38 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 39 projects (12592103) (29780) ... 8,000,000 ............ (re. $45,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 41 To maintain and improve existing facilities including preparation of 42 plans and for payment to the design and construction management 43 account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 44 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 45 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 46 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 47 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 48 projects (12592003) (29780) ... 8,000,000 ............ (re. $97,000) 474 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 3 To maintain and improve existing facilities including preparation of 4 plans and for payment to the design and construction management 5 account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 6 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 7 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 8 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 9 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 10 projects (12591903) (29780) ... 9,940,000 ............ (re. $12,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 12 To maintain and improve existing facilities including preparation of 13 plans and for payment to the design and construction management 14 account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 15 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 16 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 17 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 18 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 19 projects (12591703) (29780) ... 8,000,000 ............ (re. $16,000) 20 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) 21 Capital Projects Funds - Other 22 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 23 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 24 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is 25 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 26 For minor alterations, improvements, construction projects, the 27 payment of insurance fees and preventive maintenance of St. Albans 28 Nursing Home, Helen Hayes Hospital, Oxford Nursing Home, Batavia 29 Nursing Home, and Montrose Nursing Home including preparation of 30 plans and for payment to the design and construction management 31 account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 32 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 33 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 34 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 35 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 36 projects (12602503) (81010) ........................................ 37 12,600,000 ....................................... (re. $12,107,000) 38 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, $50,000,000 is hereby 39 appropriated for the purposes of supporting capital improvements at 40 the Nassau [University Medical Center] Health Care Corporation, 41 pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budget (12NU2503) 42 (59139) ... 50,000,000 ........................... (re. $50,000,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 44 For minor alterations, improvements and preventive maintenance of St. 45 Albans Nursing Home, Helen Hayes Hospital, Oxford Nursing Home, 46 Batavia Nursing Home, and Montrose Nursing Home including prepara- 47 tion of plans and for payment to the design and construction manage- 475 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ment account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 2 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 3 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 4 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 5 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 6 projects (12602403) (81010) ........................................ 7 7,600,000 ......................................... (re. $7,600,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 9 For minor alterations, improvements and preventive maintenance of St. 10 Albans Nursing Home, Helen Hayes Hospital, Oxford Nursing Home, 11 Batavia Nursing Home, and Montrose Nursing Home including prepara- 12 tion of plans and for payment to the design and construction manage- 13 ment account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 14 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 15 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 16 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 17 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 18 projects (12602303) (81010) ........................................ 19 7,600,000 ......................................... (re. $7,399,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 For minor alterations, improvements and preventive maintenance of St. 22 Albans Nursing Home, Helen Hayes Hospital, Oxford Nursing Home, 23 Batavia Nursing Home, and Montrose Nursing Home including prepara- 24 tion of plans and for payment to the design and construction manage- 25 ment account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 26 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 27 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 28 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 29 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 30 projects (12602203) (81010) ........................................ 31 7,600,000 ......................................... (re. $1,904,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 33 For minor alterations, improvements and preventive maintenance of St. 34 Albans Nursing Home, Helen Hayes Hospital, Oxford Nursing Home, 35 Batavia Nursing Home, and Montrose Nursing Home including prepara- 36 tion of plans and for payment to the design and construction manage- 37 ment account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 38 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 39 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 40 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 41 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 42 projects (12602103) (81010) ... 7,600,000 ......... (re. $4,404,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 44 For minor alterations, improvements and preventive maintenance of St. 45 Albans Nursing Home, Helen Hayes Hospital, Oxford Nursing Home, 46 Batavia Nursing Home, and Montrose Nursing Home including prepara- 47 tion of plans and for payment to the design and construction manage- 48 ment account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 476 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 2 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 3 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 4 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 5 projects (12602003) (81010) ... 7,600,000 ......... (re. $1,513,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 7 For minor alterations, improvements and preventive maintenance of St. 8 Albans Nursing Home, Helen Hayes Hospital, Oxford Nursing Home, 9 Batavia Nursing Home, and Montrose Nursing Home including prepara- 10 tion of plans and for payment to the design and construction manage- 11 ment account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 12 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 13 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 14 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 15 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 16 projects (12601903) (81010) ... 7,600,000 ......... (re. $2,076,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 18 For minor alterations, improvements and preventive maintenance of St. 19 Albans Nursing Home, Helen Hayes Hospital, Oxford Nursing Home, 20 Batavia Nursing Home, and Montrose Nursing Home including prepara- 21 tion of plans and for payment to the design and construction manage- 22 ment account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 23 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 24 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 25 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 26 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 27 projects (12601803) (81010) ... 7,600,000 ......... (re. $2,192,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 29 For minor alterations, improvements and preventive maintenance of St. 30 Albans Nursing Home, Helen Hayes Hospital, Oxford Nursing Home, 31 Batavia Nursing Home, and Montrose Nursing Home including prepara- 32 tion of plans and for payment to the design and construction manage- 33 ment account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 34 office of general services. Upon the request of the commissioner of 35 the department of health and approval of the director of the divi- 36 sion of the budget, funds of this appropriation may be transferred 37 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for capital 38 projects (12601703) (81010) ... 7,600,000 ......... (re. $2,705,000) 39 REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH CARE IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM (CCP) 40 Capital Projects Funds - Other 41 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 42 Health Care System Improvement Purpose 43 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is 44 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 45 [For competitive] Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 112 and 46 163 of the state finance law, and sections 142 and 143 of the 477 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 economic development law, for grants for capital projects at repro- 2 ductive health facilities, including support for infrastructure 3 improvements, modernization and safety and security. The department 4 of health and the dormitory authority may enter into an agreement, 5 subject to the approval of the director of the budget, for the 6 purposes of administering the funds made available pursuant to this 7 appropriation. Notwithstanding any section of law to the contrary, 8 recipients of such grants shall be entitled to use funds awarded in 9 accordance with this appropriation to purchase commodities, 10 services, capital improvements and technology through centralized 11 contracts established by the office of general services under 12 section 163 of the state finance law, and such recipients shall be 13 deemed for such purpose to be authorized users within the meaning of 14 paragraph k of subdivision 1 of section 163 of the state finance 15 law. (12SS25HE) (59096) ............................................ 16 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 17 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 18 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is hereby 19 amended and reappropriated to read: 20 [For competitive] Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 112 and 21 163 of the state finance law, and sections 142 and 143 of the 22 economic development law, for grants for capital projects at repro- 23 ductive health facilities, including support for infrastructure 24 improvements, modernization and safety and security. The department 25 of health and the dormitory authority may enter into an agreement, 26 subject to the approval of the director of the budget, for the 27 purposes of administering the funds made available pursuant to this 28 appropriation. Notwithstanding any section of law to the contrary, 29 recipients of such grants shall be entitled to use funds awarded in 30 accordance with this appropriation to purchase commodities, 31 services, capital improvements and technology through centralized 32 contracts established by the office of general services under 33 section 163 of the state finance law, and such recipients shall be 34 deemed for such purpose to be authorized users within the meaning of 35 paragraph k of subdivision 1 of section 163 of the state finance 36 law. (12SS24HE) (59096) ............................................ 37 18,300,000 ....................................... (re. $18,300,000) 38 VETERANS AFFAIRS (CCP) 39 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 40 Federal Capital Projects Fund 41 Department of Veterans Affairs Grants Account - 31360 42 Veterans Affairs Purpose 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 44 For federal grant support to department of health facilities including 45 minor alterations, improvements, and preventive maintenance. For 46 services and expenses for payment of liabilities accrued heretofore 47 and hereafter to accrue (120122VA) (29601) ......................... 48 5,569,000 ......................................... (re. $5,277,000) 478 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 2 For federal grant support to department of health facilities including 3 minor alterations, improvements, and preventive maintenance. For 4 services and expenses for payment of liabilities accrued heretofore 5 and hereafter to accrue (120120VA) (29601) ......................... 6 6,000,000 ........................................... (re. $184,000) 7 WATER RESOURCES (CCP) 8 Capital Projects Funds - Other 9 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 10 Water Resources Purpose 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 12 For payment of a portion of the state's match for the safe drinking 13 water revolving fund (12SM2557) (26888) ............................ 14 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $30,000,000) 15 For services and expenses including contracts related to the laborato- 16 ry testing of public drinking water for chemical compounds and 17 emerging contaminants defined pursuant to section 1112 of the public 18 health law (12EC2557) (59062) ...................................... 19 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For payment of a portion of the state's match for the safe drinking 22 water revolving fund (12SM2457) (26888) ............................ 23 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $30,000,000) 24 For services and expenses including contracts related to the laborato- 25 ry testing of public drinking water for chemical compounds and 26 emerging contaminants defined pursuant to section 1112 of the public 27 health law (12EC2457) (59062) ...................................... 28 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 30 For services and expenses including contracts related to the laborato- 31 ry testing of public drinking water for chemical compounds and 32 emerging contaminants defined pursuant to section 1112 of the public 33 health law (12EC2357) (59062) ...................................... 34 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,984,000) 35 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 36 Federal Capital Projects Fund 37 Safe Drinking Water Revolving Account - 31360 38 Water Resources Purpose 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 40 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 41 (12022557) (26888) ... 300,000,000 .............. (re. $300,000,000) 42 For services and expenses of the state revolving funds program 43 (12DW2557) (26666) ... 22,500,000 ................ (re. $22,500,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 479 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 2 (12022457) (26888) ... 300,000,000 .............. (re. $207,947,000) 3 For services and expenses of the state revolving funds program 4 (12DW2457) (26666) ... 30,000,000 ................ (re. $28,429,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 6 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 7 (12022357) (26888) ... 300,000,000 .............. (re. $197,660,000) 8 For services and expenses of the state revolving funds program 9 (12DW2357) (26666) ... 30,000,000 ................ (re. $20,192,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 11 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 12 (12022257) (26888) ... 300,000,000 .............. (re. $205,955,000) 13 For services and expenses of the state revolving funds program 14 (12DW2257) (26666) ... 30,000,000 ................ (re. $14,201,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 16 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 17 (12022157) (26888) ... 70,000,000 ................ (re. $31,909,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 19 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 20 (12022057) (26888) ... 70,000,000 ................ (re. $32,228,000) 21 For services and expenses of the state revolving funds program 22 (12DW2057) (26666) ... 7,000,000 ..................... (re. $12,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 24 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 25 (12021957) (26888) ... 70,000,000 ................ (re. $32,252,000) 26 For services and expenses of the state revolving funds program 27 (12DW1957) (26666) ... 7,000,000 ..................... (re. $25,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 29 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 30 (12021857) (26888) ... 70,000,000 ................ (re. $31,895,000) 31 For services and expenses of the state revolving funds program 32 (12DW1857) (26666) ... 7,000,000 .................... (re. $168,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 34 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 35 (12021757) (26888) ... 70,000,000 ................ (re. $36,770,000) 36 For services and expenses of the state revolving funds program 37 (12DW1757) (26666) ... 7,000,000 .................... (re. $369,000) 38 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 39 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 40 (12021657) (26888) ... 70,000,000 ................ (re. $34,087,000) 41 For services and expenses of the state revolving funds program 42 (12DW1657) (26666) ... 7,000,000 ..................... (re. $14,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 480 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 2 (12021557) (26888) ... 70,000,000 ................ (re. $26,134,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 4 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 5 (12021457) (26888) ... 70,000,000 ................ (re. $30,761,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 7 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 8 (12021357) (26888) ... 70,000,000 ................ (re. $14,641,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 10 For federal grants for the safe drinking water revolving fund 11 (12021057) (26888) ... 157,183,000 ............... (re. $22,260,000) 481 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 177,600,000 212,073,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 177,600,000 212,073,000 8 ================ ================ 9 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISION (CCP) .................. 170,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 New Facilities Purpose 14 For the cost of studies, planning, design, 15 construction, reconstruction, renovation, 16 and equipment related to the development 17 of a centralized state emergency oper- 18 ations center facility including related 19 departmental administrative costs 20 (EROC2607) (30349) ......................... 150,000,000 21 For grants to volunteer fire departments, 22 including but not limited to, 23 construction, renovation and/or purchase 24 of facilities or equipment. Notwithstand- 25 ing any inconsistent provision of law, all 26 or a portion of these funds may be subal- 27 located or transferred to any department, 28 agency, or public authority (ERVF2607) 29 (30805) ..................................... 20,000,000 30 EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT (CCP) ................................... 4,600,000 31 -------------- 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 34 Health and Safety Purpose 35 For equipment to expand statewide urban 36 search and rescue capabilities, including 37 but not limited to the purchase of equip- 38 ment for distribution to municipalities 39 (ERSR2601) ................................... 4,600,000 40 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENT OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) ..... 3,000,000 41 -------------- 42 Capital Projects Funds - Other 482 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 2 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 3 Alterations and improvements for the preser- 4 vation of facilities including liabilities 5 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 (ERPF2603) 6 (81108) ...................................... 3,000,000 483 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISION (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 New Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For grants to volunteer fire departments, including but not limited 7 to, construction, renovation and/or purchase of facilities or equip- 8 ment. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, all or a 9 portion of these funds may be suballocated or transferred to any 10 department, agency, or public authority (ERVF2507) (30805) ......... 11 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $25,000,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 For the cost of studies, planning, design, construction, recon- 14 struction, renovation, and equipment related to the development of a 15 centralized state emergency operations center facility including 16 related departmental administrative cost (EROC2307)(30349) ......... 17 80,000,000 ....................................... (re. $80,000,000) 18 For the cost of studies, planning, design, construction, recon- 19 struction, renovation, and equipment related to the development of 20 the state academy of fire science including related departmental 21 administrative cost (ERBM2307) (30804) ............................. 22 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,788,000) 23 For grants to volunteer fire departments, including but not limited 24 to, construction, renovation and/or purchase of facilities or equip- 25 ment. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, all or a 26 portion of these funds may be suballocated or transferred to any 27 department, agency, or public authority (ERVF2307) (30805) ......... 28 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,451,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 30 For the cost of studies, site acquisition, planning, design, 31 construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment related to 32 the development of centralized state public safety training facili- 33 ties including related departmental administrative costs incurred 34 prior to April 1, 2022 (ERNF2207) (81007) .......................... 35 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 36 For the cost of studies, planning, design, construction, recon- 37 struction, renovation, and equipment related to the development of 38 centralized state emergency operations center facility including 39 related departmental administrative cost (EROC2207) (30349) ........ 40 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $23,062,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 42 For the cost of studies, site acquisitions, planning, design, 43 construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment related to 44 the development of centralized state public safety training facili- 45 ties including related departmental administrative costs incurred 46 prior to April 1, 2019 (ERNF1907) (81007) .......................... 47 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,216,000) 484 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 2 For the cost of studies, site acquisitions, planning, design, 3 construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment related to 4 the development of centralized state public safety training facili- 5 ties including related departmental administrative costs incurred 6 prior to April 1, 2010 (ERNF1007) (81007) .......................... 7 42,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,356,000) 8 DISASTER ASSISTANCE (CCP) 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 11 Disaster Assistance Purpose 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 For services and expenses related to the purchase and distribution of 14 emergency flood protection equipment to municipalities including but 15 not limited to response equipment and flood barrier technology 16 (EREP24DA) (30809) ... 15,000,000 ................ (re. $14,463,000) 17 INTEROPERABLE COMMUNICATIONS (CCP) 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 20 Program Improvement Purpose 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 22 For projects designed to advance completion of a fully interoperable 23 statewide public safety communications network. Expenditures from 24 this appropriation shall reduce appropriations for grants from the 25 statewide public safety communications account for the same purpose 26 by an equivalent amount, and such appropriation authority in such 27 account shall then be deemed to have lapsed to the extent of such 28 reduction (ERCN1508) (30337) ... 15,000,000 ...... (re. $13,313,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 30 For projects designed to advance completion of a fully interoperable 31 statewide public safety communications network. Expenditures from 32 this appropriation shall reduce appropriations for grants from the 33 statewide public safety communications account for the same purpose 34 by an equivalent amount, and such appropriation authority in such 35 account shall then be deemed to have lapsed to the extent of such 36 reduction (ERCN1408) (30337) ... 15,000,000 ......... (re. $340,000) 37 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENT OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) 38 Capital Projects Funds - Other 39 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 40 Health and Safety Purpose 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 485 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Alterations and improvements for health and safety including liabil- 2 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (ERHS1701) (81028) ........... 3 2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $158,000) 4 Capital Projects Funds - Other 5 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 6 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 8 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 9 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (ERPF2503) 10 (81108) ... 3,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,962,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 12 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 13 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (ERPF2403) 14 (81108) ... 6,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,625,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 16 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 17 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (ERPF2303) 18 (81108) ... 3,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,000,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 20 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 21 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (ERPF2203) 22 (81108) ... 3,000,000 ............................. (re. $2,801,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 24 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 25 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (ERPF1903) 26 (81108) ... 3,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,223,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 28 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 29 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (ERPF1803) 30 (81108) ... 3,000,000 ............................... (re. $277,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 32 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 33 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (ERPF1703) 34 (81108) ... 1,000,000 ................................ (re. $38,000) 486 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 1,155,800,000 7,148,219,000 6 Capital Projects Funds - Federal ... 0 10,100,000 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 1,155,800,000 7,158,319,000 9 ================ ================ 10 ACCESS TO HOME (CCP) ......................................... 5,000,000 11 -------------- 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Housing Program Fund 14 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 15 New Facilities Purpose 16 For allocation as follows: For contract with 17 eligible applicants to provide financial 18 assistance for the actual costs of an 19 access to home program pursuant to article 20 XXV of the private housing finance law 21 (08052607) (31409) ........................... 1,000,000 22 For additional funding for the access to 23 home program. For allocation as follows: 24 For contract with eligible applicants to 25 provide financial assistance for the actu- 26 al costs of an access to home program 27 pursuant to article XXV of the private 28 housing finance law. The amounts appropri- 29 ated herein may be suballocated or trans- 30 ferred to any state department, agency, or 31 public authority for the purposes stated 32 herein ....................................... 4,000,000 33 AFFORDABLE HOUSING (CCP) ................................... 250,000,000 34 -------------- 35 Capital Projects Funds - Other 36 Housing Program Fund 37 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 38 New Facilities Purpose 39 For services and expenses related to the 40 creation and preservation of affordable 41 housing. 42 Notwithstanding any other law to the contra- 43 ry, the amounts appropriated herein may be 44 suballocated or transferred to any state 487 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 department, agency or public authority for 2 the purposes stated herein (08512607) ...... 250,000,000 3 AFFORDABLE HOUSING CORPORATION (CCP) ........................ 26,000,000 4 -------------- 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other 6 Housing Program Fund 7 Affordable Housing Corporation Account - 31852 8 New Facilities Purpose 9 For allocation as follows: For deposit in 10 the affordable housing development account 11 created pursuant to section 59-b of the 12 private housing finance law for the 13 purposes of carrying out the provisions of 14 article XIX of the private housing finance 15 law. No funds shall be expended from this 16 appropriation until the director of the 17 budget has approved a financial plan 18 submitted by the affordable housing corpo- 19 ration in such detail as required by the 20 director of the budget. Up to 5 percent 21 of the funds appropriated herein may be 22 used for administrative purposes 23 (08012607) (31424) .......................... 26,000,000 24 GREEN AFFORDABLE PRE-ELECTRIFICATION PROGRAM (CCP) ........... 3,000,000 25 -------------- 26 Capital Projects Funds - Other 27 Housing Program Fund 28 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 29 For allocation as follows: For the purpose 30 of funding green rehabilitation projects 31 including but not limited to the repair of 32 structural deficiencies, health hazards, 33 or code violations which make a building 34 or property ineligible or unsuitable for 35 energy efficiency, electrification, weath- 36 erization, and insulation improvements 37 necessary for compliance with building 38 codes or participation in local, state, or 39 federal programs. Such grants should be 40 provided only to owners or tenants of a 41 residential building who would be ineligi- 42 ble for, or have been denied, any local, 43 state, or federal incentives, assistance, 44 subsidies, grants, or loans for improve- 45 ments or projects relating to energy 46 savings, greenhouse gas reductions, 488 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 climate change adaptation and resiliency 2 due to structural deficiencies, health 3 hazards, or code violations which make the 4 building or property ineligible or unsuit- 5 able for such improvements or projects, 6 excluding the installation or updating of 7 fossil fuel-based equipment. Funding 8 should be prioritized for projects located 9 in disadvantaged communities as defined in 10 section 75-0101 of the environmental 11 conservation law and the application proc- 12 ess shall be coordinated in consultation 13 with the New York state energy research 14 and development authority to facilitate a 15 streamlined application process that also 16 accommodates concurrent applications for 17 other funding available through relevant 18 state energy efficiency and electrifica- 19 tion programs. Notwithstanding any other 20 law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 21 ated herein may be suballocated or trans- 22 ferred to any state department, agency or 23 public authority for the purposes stated 24 herein ....................................... 3,000,000 25 HOMES FOR WORKING FAMILIES PROGRAM (CCP) .................... 14,000,000 26 -------------- 27 Capital Projects Funds - Other 28 Housing Program Fund 29 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 30 New Facilities Purpose 31 For allocation as follows: For the purpose 32 of maximizing the state's utilization of 33 federal low income housing tax credits in 34 conjunction with the issuance of tax 35 exempt bonds used to finance affordable 36 housing construction. The amounts appro- 37 priated herein may be suballocated or 38 transferred to any state department, agen- 39 cy, or public authority for the purposes 40 stated herein. Up to 5 percent of the 41 funds appropriated herein may be used for 42 administrative purposes (08032607) (31423) .. 14,000,000 43 HOUSING OPPORTUNITIES PROGRAM FOR THE ELDERLY (CCP) .......... 4,000,000 44 -------------- 45 Capital Projects Funds - Other 46 Housing Program Fund 47 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 48 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 489 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For allocation as follows: For contracts 2 with not-for-profit corporations or muni- 3 cipalities to provide state financial 4 assistance to administer emergency home 5 repairs programs which provide grants and 6 loans in an amount not to exceed $10,000 7 per unit for the cost of correcting any 8 condition which poses a threat to the 9 life, health or safety of a low income 10 elderly homeowner pursuant to article XXIX 11 of the private housing finance law. No 12 funds shall be expended from this appro- 13 priation until the director of the budget 14 has approved a financial plan submitted by 15 the housing trust fund corporation on 16 behalf of the housing opportunities for 17 the elderly program in such detail as 18 required by the director of the budget. 19 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated 20 herein may be used for administrative 21 purposes (08082603) (31422) .................. 1,400,000 22 For additional funding for the housing 23 opportunities program for the elderly. For 24 allocation as follows: For contracts with 25 not-for-profit corporations or munici- 26 palities to provide state financial 27 assistance to administer emergency home 28 repairs programs which provide grants and 29 loans in an amount not to exceed $10,000 30 per unit for the cost of correcting any 31 condition which poses a threat to the 32 life, health or safety of a low income 33 elderly homeowner pursuant to article XXIX 34 of the private housing finance law. No 35 funds shall be expended from this appro- 36 priation until the director of the budget 37 has approved a financial plan submitted by 38 the housing trust fund corporation on 39 behalf of the housing opportunities for 40 the elderly program in such detail as 41 required by the director of the budget. 42 The amounts appropriated herein may be 43 suballocated or transferred to any state 44 department, agency, or public authority 45 for the purposes stated herein ............... 2,600,000 46 HOUSING PROGRAM (CCP) ...................................... 186,000,000 47 -------------- 48 Capital Projects Funds - Other 49 Housing Program Fund 50 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 490 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 New Facilities Purpose 2 In support of a comprehensive, statewide 3 multi-year housing program. Notwithstand- 4 ing any other law to the contrary, the 5 amounts appropriated herein may be subal- 6 located or transferred to any state 7 department, agency, or public authority 8 for the purposes stated herein. 9 Funds appropriated shall support the devel- 10 opment of supportive housing units 11 throughout the state (08112607) (30904) .... 186,000,000 12 INFILL HOUSING PROGRAM (CCP) ................................ 30,000,000 13 -------------- 14 Capital Projects Funds - Other 15 Housing Program Fund 16 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 17 New Facilities Purpose 18 For services and expenses of an infill hous- 19 ing program. Funds shall be for the 20 construction, preservation, or rehabili- 21 tation of small infill homes in areas 22 outside of the city of New York with 23 priority given to projects in the cities 24 of Buffalo, Rochester, Syracuse, Albany, 25 and Binghamton. Notwithstanding any other 26 law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 27 ated herein may be suballocated or trans- 28 ferred to any state department, agency, or 29 public authority for the purposes stated 30 herein ...................................... 30,000,000 31 LAND BANKS (CCP) ............................................ 40,000,000 32 -------------- 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Housing Program Fund 35 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 36 New Facilities Purpose 37 For services and expenses of a land banks 38 program. Funds shall be for the redevelop- 39 ment of blighted and abandoned properties. 40 Notwithstanding any other law to the 41 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 42 may be suballocated or transferred to any 43 state department, agency, or public 44 authority for the purposes stated herein .... 40,000,000 491 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 LEAD ABATEMENT PROGRAM (CCP) ................................ 20,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Housing Program Fund 5 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 6 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 7 For services and expenses of a lead abate- 8 ment program to be administered through 9 the housing trust fund corporation. Funds 10 may be used to support lead abatement 11 outside the city of New York. The amounts 12 appropriated herein may be suballocated or 13 transferred to any state department, agen- 14 cy, or public authority for the purposes 15 stated herein (08302603) (31542) ............ 20,000,000 16 LOW INCOME HOUSING TRUST FUND (CCP) ......................... 44,200,000 17 -------------- 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Housing Program Fund 20 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 21 New Facilities Purpose 22 For allocation as follows: For deposit in 23 the housing trust fund account created 24 pursuant to section 59-a of the private 25 housing finance law for the purposes of 26 carrying out the provisions of article 27 XVIII of the private housing finance law 28 including up to $300,000 to offset housing 29 trust fund corporation costs of adminis- 30 tering the low income housing trust fund 31 program established by such article. No 32 funds shall be expended from this appro- 33 priation until the director of the budget 34 has approved a financial plan submitted by 35 the housing trust fund corporation on 36 behalf of the housing trust fund program 37 in such detail as required by the director 38 of the budget. 39 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated 40 herein may be used for administrative 41 purposes (08042607) (31421) ................. 44,200,000 42 MAIN STREET PROGRAM (CCP) .................................... 4,200,000 43 -------------- 44 Capital Projects Funds - Other 45 Housing Program Fund 492 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 2 New Facilities Purpose 3 For allocation as follows: For contract with 4 not-for-profit corporations and munici- 5 palities to provide state fiscal assist- 6 ance to administer main street or downtown 7 revitalization projects for communities 8 pursuant to article XXVI of the private 9 housing finance law. The receipt of fund- 10 ing from this appropriation to a munici- 11 pality may be conditioned upon a certif- 12 ication by the division of housing and 13 community renewal that such municipality 14 is a pro-housing community (08062607) 15 (31413) ...................................... 4,200,000 16 MANUFACTURED HOME ADVANTAGE PROGRAM (CCP) .................... 5,000,000 17 -------------- 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Housing Program Fund 20 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 21 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 22 For allocation as follows: For the purposes 23 of a mobile and manufactured home advan- 24 tage program to fund loans and grants for 25 the acquisition, demolition, or replace- 26 ment and/or repair of mobile or manufac- 27 tured homes and/or mobile or manufactured 28 home parks. No funds shall be expended 29 from this appropriation until the director 30 of the budget has approved a financial 31 plan submitted by the administering agency 32 in such detail as required by the director 33 of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 34 law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 35 ated herein may be suballocated or trans- 36 ferred to any state department, agency, or 37 public authority for the purposes stated 38 herein (08212607) (30917) .................... 5,000,000 39 MITCHELL-LAMA PRESERVATION PROGRAM (CCP) .................... 85,000,000 40 -------------- 41 Capital Projects Funds - Other 42 Housing Program Fund 43 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 44 New Facilities Purpose 493 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses of a Mitchell-Lama 2 preservation program to preserve and 3 improve Mitchell-Lama properties located 4 outside of the city of New York. Notwith- 5 standing any other law to the contrary, 6 the amounts appropriated herein may be 7 suballocated or transferred to any state 8 department, agency, or public authority 9 for the purposes stated herein .............. 25,000,000 10 For services and expenses of a Mitchell-Lama 11 preservation program to preserve and 12 improve Mitchell-Lama properties located 13 in the city of New York, pursuant to a 14 plan approved by the director of the budg- 15 et. Notwithstanding any other law to the 16 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 17 may be suballocated or transferred to any 18 state department, agency, or public 19 authority for the purposes stated herein .... 60,000,000 20 MODULAR AND STARTER HOMES(CCP) ............................. 100,000,000 21 -------------- 22 Capital Projects Funds - Other 23 Housing Program Fund 24 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 25 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 26 For services and expenses of the modular and 27 starter homes program to fund the develop- 28 ment of starter and modular homes. 29 Notwithstanding any other law to the contra- 30 ry, the amounts appropriated herein may be 31 suballocated or transferred to any state 32 department, agency or public authority for 33 the purposes stated herein (08432607) 34 (64405) .................................... 100,000,000 35 NEW YORK CITY HOUSING AUTHORITY PROGRAM (CCP) .............. 140,000,000 36 -------------- 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 Housing Program Fund 39 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 40 New Facilities Purpose 41 For capital projects and other improvements 42 at housing developments owned or operated 43 by the New York city housing authority. 44 Notwithstanding any other law to the 45 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 46 may be suballocated or transferred to any 494 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 state department, agency, or public 2 authority for the purposes stated herein ... 140,000,000 3 PUBLIC HOUSING MODERNIZATION PROGRAM (CCP) ................... 6,400,000 4 -------------- 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other 6 Housing Program Fund 7 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 8 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 9 For allocation as follows: For services and 10 expenses of a public housing modernization 11 program. Of the amount appropriated here- 12 in, the sum of $400,000 may be allocated 13 for capital project activities associated 14 with article XII of the public housing 15 law. No funds shall be expended from this 16 appropriation until the director of the 17 budget has approved a financial plan 18 submitted by the housing trust fund corpo- 19 ration on behalf of the public housing 20 modernization program in such detail as 21 required by the director of the budget. 22 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated 23 herein may be used for administrative 24 purposes (08052603) (31420) .................. 6,400,000 25 PUBLIC HOUSING PROGRAM (CCP) ................................ 75,000,000 26 -------------- 27 Capital Projects Funds - Other 28 Housing Program Fund 29 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 30 New Facilities Purpose 31 For services and expenses of a public hous- 32 ing program. Funds appropriated herein 33 should be used for the purpose of substan- 34 tial rehabilitation or moderate rehabili- 35 tation and/or the demolition and replace- 36 ment through new construction of 37 site-specific multi-family rental housing 38 currently owned by federally supervised or 39 state-supervised public housing authori- 40 ties outside New York City. Notwithstand 41 ing any other law to the contrary, the 42 amounts appropriated herein may be subal- 43 located or transferred to any state 44 department, agency, or public authority 45 for the purposes stated herein .............. 75,000,000 495 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 RESILIENT AND READY (CCP) ................................... 50,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Housing Program Fund 5 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 6 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 7 For services and expenses of the resilient 8 and ready fund for home repairs and perma- 9 nent retrofits. Notwithstanding any other 10 law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 11 ated herein may be suballocated or trans- 12 ferred to any state department, agency or 13 public authority for the purposes stated 14 herein (08322603) (31316) ................... 50,000,000 15 REST OF STATE VACANT APARTMENT REPAIR AND REHABILITATION 16 PROGRAM (CCP) ............................................. 40,000,000 17 -------------- 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Housing Program Fund 20 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 21 New Facilities Purpose 22 For the purpose of a vacant apartment repair 23 and rehabilitation program outside of the 24 city of New York. Such capital grants 25 shall be limited to properties with five 26 units or less and shall not exceed $75,000 27 per unit. The amounts appropriated herein 28 may be suballocated or transferred to any 29 state department, agency, or public 30 authority for the purposes stated herein .... 40,000,000 31 SMALL RENTAL HOUSING DEVELOPMENT INITIATIVE (CCP) ........... 10,000,000 32 -------------- 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Housing Program Fund 35 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 36 New Facilities Purpose 37 For services and expenses of a small rental 38 housing development initiative for capital 39 developments under twenty units in munici- 40 palities with populations less than 41 100,000. Notwithstanding any other law to 42 the contrary, the amounts appropriated 43 herein may be suballocated or transferred 44 to any state department, agency, or public 45 authority for the purposes stated herein .... 10,000,000 496 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 USDA 515 RENTAL PROPERTIES PRESERVATION PROGRAM (CCP) ....... 10,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Housing Program Fund 5 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 6 New Facilities Purpose 7 For services and expenses of preserving USDA 8 515 rental properties authorized under 9 Section 515 of the Housing Act of 1949 (42 10 U.S.C. 1485). Notwithstanding any other 11 law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 12 ated herein may be suballocated or trans- 13 ferred to any state department, agency, or 14 public authority for the purposes stated 15 herein ...................................... 10,000,000 16 ROSENDALE GREEN SOCIAL HOUSING DEMONSTRATION (CCP) ........... 8,000,000 17 -------------- 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Housing Program Fund 20 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 21 New Facilities Purpose 22 For services and expenses of Rosendale Green 23 Social Housing Demonstration. Notwith- 24 standing any other law to the contrary, 25 the amounts appropriated herein may be 26 suballocated or transferred to any state 27 department, agency, or public authority 28 for the purposes stated herein ............... 8,000,000 497 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ACCESS TO HOME (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Housing Program Fund 4 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 5 New Facilities Purpose 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 7 For allocation as follows: For contract with eligible applicants to 8 provide financial assistance for the actual costs of an access to 9 home program pursuant to article XXV of the private housing finance 10 law (08052507) (31409) ... 1,000,000 .............. (re. $1,000,000) 11 For additional funding for the access to home program. For allocation 12 as follows: For contract with eligible applicants to provide finan- 13 cial assistance for the actual costs of an access to home program 14 pursuant to article XXV of the private housing finance law. The 15 amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 16 any state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes 17 stated herein (08AC2507) (31300) ................................... 18 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 20 For allocation as follows: For contract with eligible applicants to 21 provide financial assistance for the actual costs of an access to 22 home program pursuant to article XXV of the private housing finance 23 law (08052407) (31409) ... 1,000,000 ................ (re. $835,000) 24 For additional funding for the access to home program. For allocation 25 as follows: For contract with eligible applicants to provide finan- 26 cial assistance for the actual costs of an access to home program 27 pursuant to article XXV of the private housing finance law. The 28 amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 29 any state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes 30 stated herein (08AC2407) (31300) ... 3,000,000 .... (re. $2,720,000) 31 ADAPTIVE REUSE AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROGRAM (CCP) 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Housing Program Fund 34 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 35 New Facilities Purpose 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 37 151, section 2, of the laws of 2021: 38 To support the creation of the adaptive reuse affordable housing 39 program to finance conversion of commercial properties and hotel 40 properties in the city of New York for the purposes of creating 41 permanent affordable residential housing. The amounts appropriated 42 herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state department, 43 agency, or public authority for purposes stated herein (08232107) 44 (31491) ... 100,000,000 .......................... (re. $44,300,000) 45 AFFORDABLE HOUSING CORPORATION (CCP) 498 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Housing Program Fund 3 Affordable Housing Corporation Account - 31852 4 New Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For allocation as follows: For deposit in the affordable housing 7 development account created pursuant to section 59-b of the private 8 housing finance law for the purposes of carrying out the provisions 9 of article XIX of the private housing finance law. No funds shall be 10 expended from this appropriation until the director of the budget 11 has approved a financial plan submitted by the affordable housing 12 corporation in such detail as required by the director of the budg- 13 et. 14 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 15 administrative purposes (08012507) (31424) ......................... 16 26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $26,000,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 18 For allocation as follows: For deposit in the affordable housing 19 development account created pursuant to section 59-b of the private 20 housing finance law for the purposes of carrying out the provisions 21 of article XIX of the private housing finance law. No funds shall be 22 expended from this appropriation until the director of the budget 23 has approved a financial plan submitted by the affordable housing 24 corporation in such detail as required by the director of the budg- 25 et. 26 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 27 administrative purposes (08012407) (31424) ......................... 28 26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $26,000,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 30 For allocation as follows: For deposit in the affordable housing 31 development account created pursuant to section 59-b of the private 32 housing finance law for the purposes of carrying out the provisions 33 of article XIX of the private housing finance law. No funds shall be 34 expended from this appropriation until the director of the budget 35 has approved a financial plan submitted by the affordable housing 36 corporation in such detail as required by the director of the budg- 37 et. 38 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 39 administrative purposes (08012307) (31424) ......................... 40 26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $26,000,000) 41 For additional funding for the affordable housing corporation program. 42 For allocation as follows: For deposit in the affordable housing 43 development account created pursuant to section 59-b of the private 44 housing finance law for the purposes of carrying out the provisions 45 of article XIX of the private housing finance law. No funds shall be 46 expended from this appropriation until the director of the budget 47 has approved a financial plan submitted by the affordable housing 48 corporation in such detail as required by the director of the budg- 49 et. The amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or trans- 499 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for the 2 purposes stated herein (08312307)(31399) ........................... 3 14,500,000 ....................................... (re. $10,500,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 5 For allocation as follows: For deposit in the affordable housing 6 development account created pursuant to section 59-b of the private 7 housing finance law for the purposes of carrying out the provisions 8 of article XIX of the private housing finance law. No funds shall be 9 expended from this appropriation until the director of the budget 10 has approved a financial plan submitted by the affordable housing 11 corporation in such detail as required by the director of the budg- 12 et. 13 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 14 administrative purposes (08012207) (31424) ......................... 15 26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $26,000,000) 16 For additional funding for the affordable housing corporation program. 17 For allocation as follows: For deposit in the affordable housing 18 development account created pursuant to section 59-b of the private 19 housing finance law for the purposes of carrying out the provisions 20 of article XIX of the private housing finance law. No funds shall be 21 expended from this appropriation until the director of the budget 22 has approved a financial plan submitted by the affordable housing 23 corporation in such detail as required by the director of the budg- 24 et. The amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or trans- 25 ferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for the 26 purposes stated herein (08LA2207) (31399) .......................... 27 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 29 For allocation as follows: For deposit in the affordable housing 30 development account created pursuant to section 59-b of the private 31 housing finance law for the purposes of carrying out the provisions 32 of article XIX of the private housing finance law. No funds shall be 33 expended from this appropriation until the director of the budget 34 has approved a financial plan submitted by the affordable housing 35 corporation in such detail as required by the director of the budg- 36 et. 37 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 38 administrative purposes (08012107) (31424) ......................... 39 26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,701,000) 40 Notwithstanding section 59-b of the private housing finance law, funds 41 appropriated herein may be used to fund the vacant property program 42 for renovation projects of vacant and blighted homes for the 43 purposes of creating affordable housing for first-time homebuyers. 44 The amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred 45 to any state department, agency, or public authority for the 46 purposes stated herein (08242107) (31492) .......................... 47 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,100,000) 48 CITY OF YES FOR HOUSING OPPORTUNITY (CCP) 500 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Housing Program Fund 3 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 4 New Facilities Purpose 5 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is 6 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 7 In support of the city of New York's city of yes for housing opportu- 8 nity program for affordable housing programs in the city of New 9 York. 10 For services and expenses of purposes to stimulate the development, 11 stabilization, and preservation of affordable housing in the city of 12 New York. 13 1. A total of $500,000,000 shall be made available for the purposes of 14 capital subsidies to fund the new construction of affordable housing 15 in the city of New York. 16 2. A total of $200,000,000 shall be made available for the purposes of 17 capital projects and other improvements at housing developments 18 owned or operated by the New York city housing authority. 19 3. A total of $80,000,000 shall be made available for the purposes of 20 capital projects and other improvements to preserve Mitchell-Lama 21 properties in the city of New York. 22 4. A total of $50,000,000 shall be made available for services and 23 expenses of a mixed-income revolving loan fund program to fund the 24 development of mixed-income housing in the city of New York. 25 5. A total of $50,000,000 shall be made available for the purposes of 26 initiatives which promote homeownership and the development of 27 rental housing among families of low and moderate income in the city 28 of New York. Of the amount appropriated herein, up to $25,000,000 29 shall be allocated for services and expenses of the New York housing 30 for the future homeownership program and $25,000,000 shall be allo- 31 cated for services and expenses of the New York housing for the 32 future rental program. 33 6. A total of $50,000,000 shall be made available for the purposes of 34 capital projects and other improvements to construct or preserve 35 supportive housing in the city of New York. Of the amount appropri- 36 ated herein, up to $30,000,000 shall be used for the construction or 37 preservation of supportive housing for adults, youth, or young 38 adults re-entering the community from incarceration or juvenile 39 justice placement, and up to $20,000,000 shall be used for the 40 construction or preservation of supportive housing for seniors. 41 7. A total of $50,000,000 shall be made available for services and 42 expenses of lead abatement, and mold and asbestos remediation. Of 43 the amount appropriated herein, up to $20,000,000 shall be allocated 44 for lead abatement activities and up to $30,000,000 shall be allo- 45 cated for mold and asbestos remediation activities. 46 8. A total of [$20,0000,000] $20,000,000 shall be made available for 47 the purposes of capital projects and other improvements to preserve 48 affordable housing in the city of New York, including but not limit- 49 ed to, the stabilization and preservation of existing one hundred 50 percent affordable or supportive multifamily rental properties 51 subject to regulatory agreement with one more municipal, state or 501 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 federal housing agencies by addressing capital needs, emergency 2 repairs and conditions that pose a threat to life, health and safe- 3 ty, or habitation of residents. 4 Funding will be pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the 5 budget. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts 6 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state 7 department, agency or public authority for the purposes stated here- 8 in (08402507) (31359) ... 1,000,000,000 ....... (re. $1,000,000,000) 9 For services and expenses of capital projects and other improvements 10 at housing developments owned or operated by the New York city hous- 11 ing authority for purposes of rehabilitating vacant units to be 12 returned to occupancy. Funding will be pursuant to a plan approved 13 by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other law to the 14 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or 15 transferred to any state department, agency or public authority for 16 the purposes stated herein (08462507) (31547) ...................... 17 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $25,000,000) 18 FARMWORKER HOUSING PROGRAM (CCP) 19 Capital Projects Fund - Other 20 Housing Program Fund 21 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 23 For services and expenses of the farmworker housing program. 24 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 25 ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart- 26 ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein 27 (08472507) (64401) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000) 28 GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF STORM RECOVERY (CCP) 29 Capital Projects Funds - Other 30 Housing Program Fund 31 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 32 New Facilities Purpose 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 34 For allocation as follows: For the purpose of capital projects and 35 other improvements in support of recovery and rebuilding efforts in 36 areas of New York state impacted by natural disasters to be adminis- 37 tered by the housing trust fund corporation by means of the gover- 38 nor's office of storm recovery. No funds shall be expended from this 39 appropriation until the director of the budget has approved a finan- 40 cial plan submitted by the housing trust fund corporation on behalf 41 of the governor's office of storm recovery in such detail as 42 required by the director of the budget. The amounts appropriated 43 herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state department, 44 agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein 45 (08202307) (30915) ... 28,000,000 ................ (re. $28,000,000) 502 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 2 For allocation as follows: For the purpose of capital projects and 3 other improvements in support of recovery and rebuilding efforts in 4 areas of New York state impacted by natural disasters to be adminis- 5 tered by the housing trust fund corporation by means of the gover- 6 nor's office of storm recovery. No funds shall be expended from this 7 appropriation until the director of the budget has approved a finan- 8 cial plan submitted by the housing trust fund corporation on behalf 9 of the governor's office of storm recovery in such detail as 10 required by the director of the budget. The amounts appropriated 11 herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state department, 12 agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein 13 (08202207) (30915) ... 77,000,000 ................. (re. $9,599,000) 14 GREEN AFFORDABLE PRE-ELECTRIFICATION PROGRAM (CCP) 15 Capital Projects Fund - Other 16 Housing Program Fund 17 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 19 For allocation as follows: for the purpose of funding green rehabili- 20 tation projects including but not limited to the repair of struc- 21 tural deficiencies, health hazards, or code violations which make a 22 building or property ineligible or unsuitable for energy efficiency, 23 electrification, weatherization, and insulation improvements neces- 24 sary for compliance with building codes or participation in local, 25 state, or federal programs. Such grants should be provided only to 26 owners or tenants of a residential building who would be ineligible 27 for, or have been denied, any local, state, or federal incentives, 28 assistance, subsidies, grants, or loans for improvements or projects 29 relating to energy savings, greenhouse gas reductions, climate 30 change adaptation and resiliency due to structural deficiencies, 31 health hazards, or code violations which make the building or prop- 32 erty ineligible or unsuitable for such improvements or projects, 33 excluding the installation or updating of fossil fuel-based equip- 34 ment. Funding should be prioritized for projects located in disad- 35 vantaged communities as defined in section 75-0101 of the environ- 36 mental conservation law and the application process shall be 37 coordinated in consultation with the new york state energy research 38 and development authority to facilitate a streamlined application 39 process that also accommodates concurrent applications for other 40 funding available through relevant state energy efficiency and elec- 41 trification programs. Notwithstanding any other law to the contra- 42 ry, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or trans- 43 ferred to any state department, agency or public authority for the 44 purposes stated herein (08482503) (64422) .......................... 45 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 46 HOMES FOR WORKING FAMILIES PROGRAM (CCP) 47 Capital Projects Funds - Other 503 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Housing Program Fund 2 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 3 New Facilities Purpose 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 5 For allocation as follows: For the purpose of maximizing the state's 6 utilization of federal low income housing tax credits in conjunction 7 with the issuance of tax exempt bonds used to finance affordable 8 housing construction. The amounts appropriated herein may be subal- 9 located or transferred to any state department, agency, or public 10 authority for the purposes stated herein. Up to 5 percent of the 11 funds appropriated herein may be used for administrative purposes 12 (08032507) (31423) ... 14,000,000 ................ (re. $14,000,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 For allocation as follows: For the purpose of maximizing the state's 15 utilization of federal low income housing tax credits in conjunction 16 with the issuance of tax exempt bonds used to finance affordable 17 housing construction. The amounts appropriated herein may be subal- 18 located or transferred to any state department, agency, or public 19 authority for the purposes stated herein. Up to 5 percent of the 20 funds appropriated herein may be used for administrative purposes 21 (08032407) (31423) ... 14,000,000 ................ (re. $14,000,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 23 For allocation as follows: For the purpose of maximizing the state's 24 utilization of federal low income housing tax credits in conjunction 25 with the issuance of tax exempt bonds used to finance affordable 26 housing construction. The amounts appropriated herein may be subal- 27 located or transferred to any state department, agency, or public 28 authority for the purposes stated herein. Up to 5 percent of the 29 funds appropriated herein may be used for administrative purposes 30 (08032307) (31423) ... 14,000,000 ................ (re. $13,456,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 32 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 33 For allocation as follows: For the purpose of maximizing the state's 34 utilization of federal low income housing tax credits in conjunction 35 with the issuance of tax exempt bonds used to finance affordable 36 housing construction. The amounts appropriated herein may be subal- 37 located or transferred to any state department, agency, or public 38 authority for the purposes stated herein. Up to 5 percent of the 39 funds appropriated herein may be used for administrative purposes 40 (08032207) (31423) ... 14,000,000 ................ (re. $13,300,000) 41 HOMEOWNER STABILIZATION FUND (CCP) 42 Capital Projects Funds - Other 43 Housing Program Fund 44 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 45 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 504 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 For services and expenses of a homeowner stabilization fund. Funds 3 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state 4 department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated 5 herein (08282303) (31538) ... 50,000,000 ......... (re. $35,962,000) 6 HOUSING PROGRAM (CCP) 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Housing Program Fund 9 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 10 New Facilities Purpose 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 12 In support of a comprehensive statewide multi-year housing program. 13 The commissioner shall provide, in electronic excel format or as 14 requested by the Legislature, an annual report to the director of 15 the budget, the speaker of the Assembly, and the temporary president 16 of the Senate, on or before July 1 of each year, that summarizes the 17 activities undertaken pursuant to the funding made available in the 18 2022-23 state fiscal year housing program (ccp). Such annual report 19 shall be cumulative and shall include an itemized list of each 20 project utilizing funds appropriated by the 2022-23 fiscal year 21 housing program (ccp), including a brief description of the project, 22 project address, county, awardee, total budget, amount of capital 23 subsidy appropriated by the housing program (ccp), relevant section 24 of the housing program (ccp), number of units, area median income 25 requirements if applicable, month and year construction will 26 commence, projected date of occupancy, and project phase 27 (construction, complete, defunded). In addition to the annual 28 report, the commissioner shall provide, in electronic excel format 29 or as requested by the Legislature, a summary update to the director 30 of the budget, the speaker of the Assembly, and the temporary presi- 31 dent of the Senate, on or before January 1 of each year. Such summa- 32 ry update shall include total commitments against each subprogram 33 within the 2022-23 fiscal year housing program (ccp), total number 34 of projects supported with those commitments, and total number of 35 affordable units within those projects. Such report and summary 36 update shall continue to be provided until such time as the final 37 disbursement of funds appropriated in the 2022-23 state fiscal year 38 housing program (ccp) has occurred. Notwithstanding any other law to 39 the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated to 40 any state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes 41 stated herein. 42 1. When combined with other funds made available in the 2022-23 state 43 fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of $1,500,000,000 44 shall be made available for the purpose of providing capital and 45 operating subsidies for the development or preservation of support- 46 ive housing units throughout the state over the next five years. 47 2. When combined with other funds made available in the 2022-23 state 48 fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of $1,000,000,000 49 shall be made available for the purpose of providing capital subsi- 505 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 dies for the new construction or adaptive reuse of rental housing 2 that advance one or more of the specific housing priorities of the 3 state. Up to 5 percent of the funds allocated herein may be used for 4 administrative purposes. 5 3. When combined with other funds made available in the 2022-23 state 6 fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of $300,000,000 7 shall be made available for the purpose of developing or rehabili- 8 tating senior rental affordable housing targeted to low-income 9 seniors, aged 60 and above. 10 4. When combined with other funds made available in the 2022-23 state 11 fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of $80,000,000 for 12 purposes of the rural and urban community investment fund program 13 created pursuant to article XXVII of the private housing finance 14 law. 15 5. When combined with other funds made available in the 2022-23 state 16 fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of $90,000,000 17 shall be made available for the purpose of providing capital subsi- 18 dies for the new construction, adaptive reuse, or reconstruction of 19 rental housing affordable to households that earn between 60 percent 20 and 130 percent of AMI and that advance one or more of the specific 21 housing priorities of the state. 22 6. When combined with other funds made available in the 2022-23 state 23 fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of $450,000,000 24 shall be made available for the purpose of substantial or moderate 25 rehabilitation of site-specific multi-family rental housing. 26 7. When combined with other funds made available in the 2022-23 state 27 fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of $120,000,000 28 shall be made available for the purpose of providing capital subsi- 29 dies to preserve and improve Mitchell-Lama properties in the state. 30 8. When combined with other funds made available in the 2022-23 state 31 fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of $150,000,000 32 shall be made available for the purpose of substantial or moderate 33 rehabilitation and/or the demolition and replacement through new 34 construction of site-specific multi-family rental housing currently 35 owned by federally-supervised or state-supervised public housing 36 authorities outside of New York city. 37 9. When combined with other funds made available in the 2022-23 state 38 fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of $60,000,000 39 shall be made available for the purpose of substantial or moderate 40 rehabilitation and new construction of buildings of 5 to 50 units. 41 10. When combined with other funds made available in the 2022-23 state 42 fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of $400,000,000 43 shall be made available for the purpose of promoting home ownership 44 among families of low and moderate income or whom there are few 45 affordable home ownership alternatives in the private market, and to 46 stimulate the development, stabilization, and preservation of New 47 York communities. 48 11. When combined with other funds made available in the 2022-23 state 49 fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of $20,000,000 50 shall be made available for the purposes of mobile and manufactured 51 home replacement program notwithstanding part P of chapter 54 of the 506 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 laws of 2016 for the replacement of dilapidated mobile or manufac- 2 tured homes. 3 12. When combined with other funds made available in the 2022-23 state 4 fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of $85,000,000 5 shall be made available for the purposes of creating and upgrading 6 accessory dwelling units across the state. 7 13. When combined with other funds made available in the 2022-23 state 8 fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of $250,000,000 9 shall be made available for the purposes of capital projects includ- 10 ing all-electric, high-performance equipment for heating and for 11 capital projects to utilize high-performance building envelope 12 design, and alternative energy sources (08422507) (30904) .......... 13 427,075,000 ..................................... (re. $427,075,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 15 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 16 In support of a comprehensive, statewide multi-year housing program. 17 The commissioner shall provide, in electronic excel format or as 18 requested by the Legislature, an annual report to the director of 19 the budget, the speaker of the Assembly, and the temporary president 20 of the Senate, on or before July 1 of each year, that summarizes the 21 activities undertaken pursuant to the funding made available in the 22 2022-23 state fiscal year housing program (ccp). Such annual report 23 shall be cumulative and shall include an itemized list of each 24 project utilizing funds appropriated by the 2022-23 fiscal year 25 housing program (ccp), including a brief description of the project, 26 project address, county, awardee, total budget, amount of capital 27 subsidy appropriated by the housing program (ccp), relevant section 28 of the housing program (ccp), number of units, area median income 29 requirements if applicable, month and year construction will 30 commence, projected date of occupancy, and project phase 31 (construction, complete, defunded). In addition to the annual 32 report, the commissioner shall provide, in electronic excel format 33 or as requested by the Legislature, a summary update to the director 34 of the budget, the speaker of the Assembly, and the temporary presi- 35 dent of the Senate, on or before January 1 of each year. Such summa- 36 ry update shall include total commitments against each subprogram 37 within the 2022-23 fiscal year housing program (ccp), total number 38 of projects supported with those commitments, and total number of 39 affordable units within those projects. Such report and summary 40 update shall continue to be provided until such time as the final 41 disbursement of funds appropriated in the 2022-23 state fiscal year 42 housing program (ccp) has occurred. Notwithstanding any other law to 43 the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or 44 transferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for 45 the purposes stated herein. 46 1. A total of $1,500,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose 47 of providing capital and operating subsidies for the development or 48 preservation of supportive housing units throughout the state over 49 the next five years. 50 2. A total of $1,000,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose 51 of providing capital subsidies for the new construction or adaptive 507 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 reuse of rental housing that advance one or more of the specific 2 housing priorities of the state. Up to 5 percent of the funds allo- 3 cated herein may be used for administrative purposes. 4 3. A total of $300,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of 5 developing or rehabilitating senior rental affordable housing 6 targeted to low-income seniors, aged 60 and above. 7 4. A total of $80,000,000 for purposes of the rural and urban communi- 8 ty investment fund program created pursuant to article XXVII of the 9 private housing finance law. 10 5. A total of $90,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of 11 providing capital subsidies for the new construction, adaptive 12 reuse, or reconstruction of rental housing affordable to households 13 that earn between 60 percent and 130 percent of AMI and that advance 14 one or more of the specific housing priorities of the state. 15 6. A total of $450,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of 16 substantial or moderate rehabilitation of site-specific multi-family 17 rental housing. 18 7. A total of $120,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of 19 providing capital subsidies to preserve and improve Mitchell-Lama 20 properties in the state. 21 8. A total of $150,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of 22 substantial or moderate rehabilitation and/or the demolition and 23 replacement through new construction of site-specific multi-family 24 rental housing currently owned by federally-supervised or state-su- 25 pervised public housing authorities outside of New York city. 26 9. A total of $60,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of 27 substantial or moderate rehabilitation and new construction of 28 buildings of 5 to 50 units. 29 10. A total of $400,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of 30 promoting home ownership among families of low and moderate income 31 for whom there are few affordable home ownership alternatives in the 32 private market, and to stimulate the development, stabilization, and 33 preservation of New York communities. 34 11. A total of $20,000,000 shall be made available for the purposes of 35 mobile and manufactured home replacement program notwithstanding 36 part P of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016 for the replacement of 37 dilapidated mobile or manufactured homes. 38 12. A total of $85,000,000 shall be made available for the purposes of 39 creating and upgrading accessory dwelling units across the state. 40 13. A total of $250,000,000 shall be made available for the purposes 41 of capital projects including all-electric, high-performance equip- 42 ment for heating and for capital projects to utilize high-perfor- 43 mance building envelope design, and alternative energy sources 44 (08112207) (30904) ... 4,505,000,000 .......... (re. $2,778,427,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 46 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 47 In support of a comprehensive, statewide multi-year housing program. 48 The commissioner shall provide, in electronic excel format or as 49 requested by the Legislature, an annual report to the director of 50 the budget, the speaker of the Assembly, and the temporary president 51 of the Senate, on or before July 1 of each year, that summarizes the 508 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 activities undertaken pursuant to the funding made available in the 2 2016-17 and 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp). Such 3 annual report shall be cumulative and shall include an itemized list 4 of each project utilizing funds appropriated by the 2016-17 and 5 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), including a brief 6 description of the project, street address, county, awardee, total 7 budget, amount of capital subsidy appropriated by the housing 8 program (ccp), relevant section of the housing program (ccp), bonded 9 or cash, amount of each additional public funding source, funding 10 program, number of units, area median income requirements if appli- 11 cable, month and year construction will commence, projected date of 12 occupancy, and project phase (in development, engineering, 13 construction, complete, defunded). Such annual report shall continue 14 to be provided until such time as the final disbursement of funds 15 appropriated in the 2016-17 and 2017-18 state fiscal year housing 16 program (ccp) has occurred. 17 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 18 ated herein may be suballocated to any state department, agency, or 19 public authority for the purposes stated herein. Notwithstanding 20 section 40 of the state finance law or any other law to the contra- 21 ry, all assistance appropriations made from this account shall 22 remain in full force and effect in accordance, in the aggregate, 23 with the following schedule: not more than an additional 24 $500,000,000 for the period April 1, 2019 through and past March 31, 25 2020, and not more than an additional $41,525,000 for the period 26 April 1, 2020 through and past March 31, 2021 as indicated below: 27 1. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 28 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 29 $950,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of providing 30 capital and operating subsidies for the development of 6,000 or more 31 supportive housing units throughout the state over the next five 32 years, as determined by a competitive selection process. 33 2. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 34 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 35 $472,025,000 shall be made available for the purpose of providing 36 capital subsidies for the new construction or adaptive reuse of 37 rental housing affordable to households that earn up to 60 percent 38 of area median income (AMI) and that advance one or more of the 39 specific housing priorities of the state. Up to 5 percent of the 40 funds allocated herein may be used for administrative purposes. 41 3. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 42 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 43 $125,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of developing 44 or rehabilitating one hundred percent senior rental affordable hous- 45 ing targeted to low-income seniors, aged 60 and above. 46 4. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 47 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 48 $45,000,000 for purposes of the rural and urban community investment 49 fund program created pursuant to article XXVII of the private hous- 50 ing finance law. 51 5. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 52 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 509 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 $150,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of providing 2 capital subsidies for the new construction, adaptive reuse, or 3 reconstruction of rental housing affordable to households that earn 4 between 60 percent and 130 percent of AMI and that advance one or 5 more of the specific housing priorities of the state. 6 6. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 7 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 8 $146,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of substantial 9 or moderate rehabilitation of site-specific multi-family rental 10 housing currently under a regulatory agreement or extended use 11 agreement with the division of housing and community renewal or 12 another state, federal or local housing agency. 13 7. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 14 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 15 $75,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of providing 16 capital subsidies to preserve and improve Mitchell-Lama properties 17 in the state. 18 8. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 19 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 20 $125,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of substantial 21 or moderate rehabilitation and/or the demolition and replacement 22 through new construction of site-specific multi-family rental hous- 23 ing currently owned by public housing authorities outside of New 24 York city. The distribution of any funds which the division of hous- 25 ing and community renewal or other appropriate state agencies or 26 authorities authorizes to be used as part of a federal housing 27 program, shall require the division of housing and community renewal 28 to monitor and ensure that any affected public housing tenants are 29 properly informed regarding participation in the federal housing 30 program and that appropriate documents related to participation in 31 such federal housing program are made publicly available and are 32 posted on each applicable housing authority's website in a timely 33 manner to properly inform such public housing authority tenants. 34 The residents of public housing that receives and uses such funds to 35 participate in such federal program shall be provided a uniform 36 lease agreement that provides, at a minimum, terms and conditions 37 consistent with those found in the public housing lease they had 38 prior to the public housing having received any such funds. Public 39 housing authorities that receive and use such funds shall be 40 required to: provide resident education, which shall include compre- 41 hensive information about any anticipated changes to the public 42 housing; provide language assistance to residents with limited 43 English proficiency; recognize the right of residents to form a 44 resident organization; require resident participation funding 45 commensurate to the funding that was being allocated to residents 46 already; develop a set of procedures for resident grievances and 47 lease termination proceedings that apply to residents following the 48 use of such funds, which shall be consistent with any existing 49 procedures, can provide stronger resident protections, and conform 50 with any other applicable federal rules and/or regulations. In cases 51 when there is a property manager other than the public housing 52 authority that receives these funds, then such property manager 510 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 shall be required to take actions including, but not limited to, 2 providing clear and accessible information to residents before, 3 during, and after becoming the property manager; provide language 4 assistance to residents with limited English proficiency; and recog- 5 nize a legitimate resident organization as the residents' represen- 6 tative, invite such resident organization to all resident engage- 7 ments, and meet regularly with the resident organization to discuss 8 emerging property-wide issues. 9 9. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 10 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 11 $62,500,000 shall be made available for the purpose of substantial 12 or moderate rehabilitation and/or the demolition and replacement 13 through new construction of buildings of 5 to 40 units. 14 10. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 amd 15 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 16 $41,475,000 shall be made available for the purpose of promoting 17 home ownership among families of low and moderate income for whom 18 there are few affordable home ownership alternatives in the private 19 market, and to stimulate the development, stabilization, and preser- 20 vation of New York communities. 21 11. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 22 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 23 $13,000,000 shall be made available for the purposes of mobile and 24 manufactured home replacement program pursuant to chapter 54 of the 25 laws of 2016. 26 12. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 27 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 28 $10,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of stimulating 29 reinvestment in properties located within mixed-used commercial 30 districts located in urban, small town, and rural areas of the state 31 pursuant to article XXVI of the private housing finance law. 32 13. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 33 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 34 $200,000,000 shall be made available, pursuant to a plan approved by 35 the director of the budget, in consultation with the New York city 36 housing authority chair and the dormitory authority of the state of 37 New York, for the purpose of capital projects and other improvements 38 related to housing developments owned or operated by the New York 39 city housing authority; provided further to the extent practicable, 40 the New York city housing authority in its administration of such 41 funds shall include employment opportunities for NYCHA tenants 42 consistent with section 3 of the housing and urban development act 43 of 1968. 44 14. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 45 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 46 $100,000,000 shall be made available for the preservation, restora- 47 tion or creation of affordable housing units in a city having a 48 population of one million or more, one hundred percent of which 49 shall be affordable to households that earn up to sixty percent of 50 the area median income adjusted for family size. Priority shall be 51 given to applicants incorporated pursuant to the not-for-profit 52 corporation law, with prior experience in community development 511 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 projects with at least a fifty-one percent controlling interest in 2 such project. Not-for-profits shall strive to develop projects 3 utilizing state or city-owned land and such utilization shall be 4 prioritized in the agency review of such project (08111707) (30904) 5 ... 541,525,000 ................................. (re. $152,463,000) 6 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 7 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 8 In support of a comprehensive, statewide multi-year housing program. 9 The commissioner shall provide, in electronic excel format or as 10 requested by the Legislature, an annual report to the director of 11 the budget, the speaker of the Assembly, and the temporary president 12 of the Senate, on or before July 1 of each year, that summarizes the 13 activities undertaken pursuant to the funding made available in the 14 2016-17 and 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp). Such 15 annual report shall be cumulative and shall include an itemized list 16 of each project utilizing funds appropriated by the 2016-17 and 17 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), including a brief 18 description of the project, street address, county, awardee, total 19 budget, amount of capital subsidy appropriated by the housing 20 program (ccp), relevant section of the housing program (ccp), bonded 21 or cash, amount of each additional public funding source, funding 22 program, number of units, area median income requirements if appli- 23 cable, month and year construction will commence, projected date of 24 occupancy, and project phase (in development, engineering, 25 construction, complete, defunded). Such annual report shall continue 26 to be provided until such time as the final disbursement of funds 27 appropriated in the 2016-17 and 2017-18 state fiscal year housing 28 program (ccp) has occurred. 29 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 30 ated herein may be suballocated to any state department, agency, or 31 public authority for the purposes stated herein. Notwithstanding 32 section 40 of the state finance law or any other law to the contra- 33 ry, all assistance appropriations made from this account shall 34 remain in full force and effect in accordance, in the aggregate, 35 with the following schedule: not more than $303,384,000 for the 36 period April 1, 2017 through and past March 31, 2018, not more than 37 an additional $354,715,000 for the period April 1, 2018 through and 38 past March 31, 2019, not more than an additional $359,565,000 for 39 the period April 1, 2019 through and past March 31, 2020, and not 40 more than an additional $365,811,000 for the period April 1, 2020 41 through and past March 31, 2021 as indicated below: 42 1. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 43 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 44 $950,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of providing 45 capital and operating subsidies for the development of 6,000 or more 46 supportive housing units throughout the state over the next five 47 years, as determined by a competitive selection process. 48 2. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 49 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 50 $472,025,000 shall be made available for the purpose of providing 51 capital subsidies for the new construction or adaptive reuse of 512 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 rental housing affordable to households that earn up to 60 percent 2 of area median income (AMI) and that advance one or more of the 3 specific housing priorities of the state. Up to 5 percent of the 4 funds allocated herein may be used for administrative purposes. 5 3. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 6 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 7 $125,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of developing 8 or rehabilitating one hundred percent senior rental affordable hous- 9 ing targeted to low-income seniors, aged 60 and above. 10 4. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 11 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 12 $45,000,000 for purposes of the rural and urban community investment 13 fund program created pursuant to article XXVII of the private hous- 14 ing finance law. 15 5. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 16 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 17 $150,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of providing 18 capital subsidies for the new construction, adaptive reuse, or 19 reconstruction of rental housing affordable to households that earn 20 between 60 percent and 130 percent of AMI and that advance one or 21 more of the specific housing priorities of the state. 22 6. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 23 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 24 $146,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of substantial 25 or moderate rehabilitation of site-specific multi-family rental 26 housing currently under a regulatory agreement or extended use 27 agreement with the division of housing and community renewal or 28 another state, federal or local housing agency. 29 7. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 30 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 31 $75,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of providing 32 capital subsidies to preserve and improve Mitchell-Lama properties 33 in the state. 34 8. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 35 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 36 $125,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of substantial 37 or moderate rehabilitation and/or the demolition and replacement 38 through new construction of site-specific multi-family rental hous- 39 ing currently owned by public housing authorities outside of New 40 York city. The distribution of any funds which the division of hous- 41 ing and community renewal or other appropriate state agencies or 42 authorities authorizes to be used as part of a federal housing 43 program, shall require the division of housing and community renewal 44 to monitor and ensure that any affected public housing tenants are 45 properly informed regarding participation in the federal housing 46 program and that appropriate documents related to participation in 47 such federal housing program are made publicly available and are 48 posted on each applicable housing authority's website in a timely 49 manner to properly inform such public housing authority tenants. The 50 residents of public housing that receives and uses such funds to 51 participate in such federal program shall be provided a uniform 52 lease agreement that provides, at a minimum, terms and conditions 513 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 consistent with those found in the public housing lease they had 2 prior to the public housing having received any such funds. Public 3 housing authorities that receive and use such funds shall be 4 required to: provide resident education, which shall include compre- 5 hensive information about any anticipated changes to the public 6 housing; provide language assistance to residents with limited 7 English proficiency; recognize the right of residents to form a 8 resident organization; require resident participation funding 9 commensurate to the funding that was being allocated to residents 10 already; develop a set of procedures for resident grievances and 11 lease termination proceedings that apply to residents following the 12 use of such funds, which shall be consistent with any existing 13 procedures, can provide stronger resident protections, and conform 14 with any other applicable federal rules and/or regulations. In cases 15 when there is a property manager other than the public housing 16 authority that receives these funds, then such property manager 17 shall be required to take actions including, but not limited to, 18 providing clear and accessible information to residents before, 19 during, and after becoming the property manager; provide language 20 assistance to residents with limited English proficiency; and recog- 21 nize a legitimate resident organization as the residents' represen- 22 tative, invite such resident organization to all resident engage- 23 ments, and meet regularly with the resident organization to discuss 24 emerging property-wide issues. 25 9. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 26 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 27 $62,500,000 shall be made available for the purpose of substantial 28 or moderate rehabilitation and/or the demolition and replacement 29 through new construction of buildings of 5 to 40 units. 30 10. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 31 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 32 $41,475,000 shall be made available for the purpose of promoting 33 home ownership among families of low and moderate income for whom 34 there are few affordable home ownership alternatives in the private 35 market, and to stimulate the development, stabilization, and preser- 36 vation of New York communities. 37 11. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 38 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 39 $13,000,000 shall be made available for the purposes of mobile and 40 manufactured home replacement program pursuant to chapter 54 of the 41 laws of 2016. 42 12. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 43 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 44 $10,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of stimulating 45 reinvestment in properties located within mixed-used commercial 46 districts located in urban, small town, and rural areas of the state 47 pursuant to article XXVI of the private housing finance law. 48 13. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 49 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 50 $200,000,000 shall be made available, pursuant to a plan approved by 51 the director of the budget, in consultation with the New York city 52 housing authority chair and the dormitory authority of the state of 514 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 New York, for the purpose of capital projects and other improvements 2 related to housing developments owned or operated by the New York 3 city housing authority; provided further to the extent practicable, 4 the New York city housing authority in its administration of such 5 funds shall include employment opportunities for NYCHA tenants 6 consistent with section 3 of the housing and urban development act 7 of 1968. 8 14. When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 9 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 10 $100,000,000 shall be made available for the preservation, restora- 11 tion or creation of affordable housing units in a city having a 12 population of one million or more, one hundred percent of which 13 shall be affordable to households that earn up to sixty percent of 14 the area median income adjusted for family size. Priority shall be 15 given to applicants incorporated pursuant to the not-for-profit 16 corporation law, with prior experience in community development 17 projects with at least a fifty-one percent controlling interest in 18 such project. Not-for-profits shall strive to develop projects 19 utilizing state or city-owned land and such utilization shall be 20 prioritized in the agency review of such project (08111607) (30904) 21 ... 1,383,475,000 ................................ (re. $24,011,000) 22 Capital Projects Funds - Other 23 Dedicated Infrastructure Investment Fund 24 Infrastructure Investment Account - 33050 25 New Facilities Purpose 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 27 In support of the comprehensive, statewide multi-year housing program. 28 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 29 ated herein may be suballocated to any state department, agency, or 30 public authority for the purposes stated herein. 31 When combined with other funds made available in the 2016-17 and 32 2017-18 state fiscal year housing program (ccp), up to a total of 33 $950,000,000 shall be made available for the purpose of providing 34 capital and operating subsidies for the development of 6,000 or more 35 supportive housing units throughout the state over the next five 36 years, as determined by a competitive selection process. Notwith- 37 standing any provisions of law to the contrary, the commissioner of 38 a state agency or authority holding an empire state supportive hous- 39 ing initiative contract, shall be authorized, subject to the 40 approval of the director of the budget, to continue contracts which 41 were executed on or before March 31, 2021 with entities providing 42 supportive housing services, without any additional requirements 43 that such contracts be subject to competitive bidding, a request for 44 proposal process or other administrative procedures (08101607) 45 (30904) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000) 46 HOUSING OPPORTUNITIES PROGRAM FOR THE ELDERLY (CCP) 47 Capital Projects Funds - Other 48 Housing Program Fund 515 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 2 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 4 For allocation as follows: For contracts with not-for-profit corpo- 5 rations or municipalities to provide state financial assistance to 6 administer emergency home repairs programs which provide grants and 7 loans in an amount not to exceed $10,000 per unit for the cost of 8 correcting any condition which poses a threat to the life, health or 9 safety of a low income elderly homeowner pursuant to article XXIX of 10 the private housing finance law. No funds shall be expended from 11 this appropriation until the director of the budget has approved a 12 financial plan submitted by the housing trust fund corporation on 13 behalf of the housing opportunities for the elderly program in such 14 detail as required by the director of the budget. 15 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 16 administrative purposes (08082503) (31422) ......................... 17 1,400,000 ......................................... (re. $1,400,000) 18 For additional funding for the housing opportunities program for the 19 elderly. For allocation as follows: For contracts with not-for-pro- 20 fit corporations or municipalities to provide state financial 21 assistance to administer emergency home repairs programs which 22 provide grants and loans in an amount not to exceed $10,000 per unit 23 for the cost of correcting any condition which poses a threat to the 24 life, health or safety of a low income elderly homeowner pursuant to 25 article XXIX of the private housing finance law. No funds shall be 26 expended from this appropriation until the director of the budget 27 has approved a financial plan submitted by the housing trust fund 28 corporation on behalf of the housing opportunities for the elderly 29 program in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 30 The amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 31 any state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes 32 stated herein (08HO2503) (31518) ................................... 33 2,600,000 ......................................... (re. $2,600,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 35 For allocation as follows: For contracts with not-for-profit corpo- 36 rations or municipalities to provide state financial assistance to 37 administer emergency home repairs programs which provide grants and 38 loans in an amount not to exceed $10,000 per unit for the cost of 39 correcting any condition which poses a threat to the life, health or 40 safety of a low income elderly homeowner pursuant to article XXIX of 41 the private housing finance law. No funds shall be expended from 42 this appropriation until the director of the budget has approved a 43 financial plan submitted by the housing trust fund corporation on 44 behalf of the housing opportunities for the elderly program in such 45 detail as required by the director of the budget. 46 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 47 administrative purposes (08082403) (31422) ......................... 48 1,400,000 ......................................... (re. $1,400,000) 49 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 516 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For additional funding for the housing opportunities program for the 2 elderly. For allocation as follows: For contracts with not-for-pro- 3 fit corporations or municipalities to provide state financial 4 assistance to administer emergency home repairs programs which 5 provide grants and loans in an amount not to exceed $10,000 per unit 6 for the cost of correcting any condition which poses a threat to the 7 life, health or safety of a low income elderly homeowner pursuant to 8 article XXIX of the private housing finance law. No funds shall be 9 expended from this appropriation until the director of the budget 10 has approved a financial plan submitted by the housing trust fund 11 corporation on behalf of the housing opportunities for the elderly 12 program in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 13 The amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 14 any state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes 15 stated herein (08082303) (31518) ................................... 16 7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,548,000) 17 HOUSING OUR NEIGHBORS WITH DIGNITY PROGRAM (CCP) 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Housing Program Fund 20 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 21 New Facilities Purpose 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 23 For services and expenses of the housing our neighbors with dignity 24 program to acquire vacant commercial properties and distressed hotel 25 properties throughout the State of New York for the purpose of 26 conversion to permanent affordable rental housing. Up to 5 percent 27 of the funds allocated herein may be used for administrative 28 purposes. The amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or 29 transferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for 30 the purposes stated herein (08232207) (31520) ...................... 31 100,000,000 ..................................... (re. $100,000,000) 32 HOUSING PROGRAM CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT (CCP) 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 35 Administration Purpose 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1990, as added by chapter 215, 37 section 10, of the laws of 1990, and as amended by chapter 55, 38 section 1, of the laws of 1996: 39 For transfer to the Housing Program Fund for the non-bondable costs of 40 projects authorized by appropriations in the Housing Program Fund. 41 Upon certification of such non-bondable costs by the director of the 42 budget, the comptroller is hereby authorized and directed to trans- 43 fer moneys to the Housing Program Fund to repay such costs 44 (71259050) (31416) ... 120,000,000 ............... (re. $56,896,000) 45 INFILL HOUSING PROGRAM (CCP) 517 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Housing Program Fund 3 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 4 New Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For services and expenses of an infill housing program. Funds shall be 7 for the construction, preservation, or rehabilitation of small 8 infill homes in areas outside of the city of New York with priority 9 given to projects in the cities of Buffalo, Rochester, Syracuse, 10 Albany, and Binghamton. Notwithstanding any other law to the contra- 11 ry, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or trans- 12 ferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for the 13 purposes stated herein (08332507) (31321) .......................... 14 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $30,000,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 16 For services and expenses of an infill housing program. Funds shall be 17 for the construction, preservation, or rehabilitation of small 18 infill homes in areas outside of the city of New York with priority 19 given to projects in the cities of Buffalo, Rochester, Syracuse, 20 Albany, and Binghamton. Notwithstanding any other law to the contra- 21 ry, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or trans- 22 ferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for the 23 purposes stated herein (08332407) (31321) .......................... 24 40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $39,600,000) 25 LAND BANKS (CCP) 26 Capital Projects Funds - Other 27 Housing Program Fund 28 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 29 New Facilities Purpose 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 31 For services and expenses of a land banks program. Funds shall be for 32 the redevelopment of blighted and abandoned properties. Notwith- 33 standing any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropriated 34 herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state department, 35 agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein 36 (08342507) (31323) ... 40,000,000 ................ (re. $40,000,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 38 For services and expenses of a land banks program. Funds shall be for 39 the redevelopment of blighted and abandoned properties. 40 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 41 ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart- 42 ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein 43 (08342407) (31323) ... 40,000,000 ................ (re. $32,303,000) 44 LEAD ABATEMENT PROGRAM (CCP) 518 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Housing Program Fund 3 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 4 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For services and expenses of a lead abatement program to be adminis- 7 tered through the housing trust fund corporation. Funds may be used 8 to support lead abatement outside the city of New York. The amounts 9 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state 10 department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated 11 herein (08302503) (31542) ... 20,000,000 ......... (re. $20,000,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 For services and expenses of a lead abatement program to be adminis- 14 tered through the housing trust fund corporation. Funds may be used 15 to support lead abatement outside the city of New York. The amounts 16 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state 17 department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated 18 herein (08302403) (31542) ... 20,000,000 ......... (re. $20,000,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 For services and expenses of a lead abatement program to be adminis- 21 tered through the housing trust fund corporation. Funds may be used 22 to support lead abatement outside the city of New York. The amounts 23 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state 24 department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated 25 herein (08302303) (31542) ... 20,000,000 ......... (re. $18,251,000) 26 LOW INCOME HOUSING TRUST FUND (CCP) 27 Capital Projects Funds - Other 28 Housing Program Fund 29 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 30 New Facilities Purpose 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 32 For allocation as follows: For deposit in the housing trust fund 33 account created pursuant to section 59-a of the private housing 34 finance law for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of arti- 35 cle XVIII of the private housing finance law including up to 36 $300,000 to offset housing trust fund corporation costs of adminis- 37 tering the low income housing trust fund program established by such 38 article. No funds shall be expended from this appropriation until 39 the director of the budget has approved a financial plan submitted 40 by the housing trust fund corporation on behalf of the housing trust 41 fund program in such detail as required by the director of the budg- 42 et. Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used 43 for administrative purposes (08042507) (31421) ..................... 44 44,200,000 ....................................... (re. $44,200,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 519 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For allocation as follows: For deposit in the housing trust fund 2 account created pursuant to section 59-a of the private housing 3 finance law for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of arti- 4 cle XVIII of the private housing finance law including up to 5 $300,000 to offset housing trust fund corporation costs of adminis- 6 tering the low income housing trust fund program established by such 7 article. No funds shall be expended from this appropriation until 8 the director of the budget has approved a financial plan submitted 9 by the housing trust fund corporation on behalf of the housing trust 10 fund program in such detail as required by the director of the budg- 11 et. 12 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 13 administrative purposes (08042407) (31421) ......................... 14 44,200,000 ....................................... (re. $42,586,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 16 For allocation as follows: For deposit in the housing trust fund 17 account created pursuant to section 59-a of the private housing 18 finance law for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of arti- 19 cle XVIII of the private housing finance law including up to 20 $300,000 to offset housing trust fund corporation costs of adminis- 21 tering the low income housing trust fund program established by such 22 article. No funds shall be expended from this appropriation until 23 the director of the budget has approved a financial plan submitted 24 by the housing trust fund corporation on behalf of the housing trust 25 fund program in such detail as required by the director of the budg- 26 et. 27 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 28 administrative purposes (08042307) (31421) ......................... 29 44,200,000 ....................................... (re. $41,690,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 31 For allocation as follows: For deposit in the housing trust fund 32 account created pursuant to section 59-a of the private housing 33 finance law for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of arti- 34 cle XVIII of the private housing finance law including up to 35 $300,000 to offset housing trust fund corporation costs of adminis- 36 tering the low income housing trust fund program established by such 37 article. No funds shall be expended from this appropriation until 38 the director of the budget has approved a financial plan submitted 39 by the housing trust fund corporation on behalf of the housing trust 40 fund program in such detail as required by the director of the budg- 41 et. 42 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 43 administrative purposes (08042207) (31421) ......................... 44 44,200,000 ....................................... (re. $41,690,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 46 For allocation as follows: For deposit in the housing trust fund 47 account created pursuant to section 59-a of the private housing 48 finance law for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of arti- 49 cle XVIII of the private housing finance law including up to 520 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 $300,000 to offset housing trust fund corporation costs of adminis- 2 tering the low income housing trust fund program established by such 3 article. No funds shall be expended from this appropriation until 4 the director of the budget has approved a financial plan submitted 5 by the housing trust fund corporation on behalf of the housing trust 6 fund program in such detail as required by the director of the budg- 7 et. 8 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 9 administrative purposes (08042107) (31421) ......................... 10 44,200,000 ....................................... (re. $14,502,000) 11 MAIN STREET PROGRAM (CCP) 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Housing Program Fund 14 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 15 New Facilities Purpose 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 17 For allocation as follows: For contract with not-for-profit corpo- 18 rations and municipalities to provide state fiscal assistance to 19 administer main street or downtown revitalization projects for 20 communities pursuant to article XXVI of the private housing finance 21 law. The receipt of funding from this appropriation to a munici- 22 pality may be conditioned upon a certification by the division of 23 housing and community renewal that such municipality is a pro-hous- 24 ing community (08062507) (31413) ................................... 25 4,200,000 ......................................... (re. $4,200,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 27 For allocation as follows: For contract with not-for-profit corpo- 28 rations and municipalities to provide state fiscal assistance to 29 administer main street or downtown revitalization projects for 30 communities pursuant to article XXVI of the private housing finance 31 law. The receipt of funding from this appropriation to a munici- 32 pality may be conditioned upon a certification by the division of 33 housing and community renewal that such municipality is a pro-hous- 34 ing community (08062407) (31413) ... 4,200,000 .... (re. $4,200,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 36 For allocation as follows: For contract with not-for-profit corpo- 37 rations and municipalities to provide state fiscal assistance to 38 administer main street or downtown revitalization projects for 39 communities pursuant to article XXVI of the private housing finance 40 law (08062307) (31413) ... 4,200,000 ................ (re. $595,000) 41 MANUFACTURED HOME ADVANTAGE PROGRAM (CCP) 42 Capital Projects Funds - Other 43 Housing Program Fund 44 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 45 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 521 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 2 For allocation as follows: For the purposes of a mobile and manufac- 3 tured home advantage program to fund loans and grants for the acqui- 4 sition, demolition, or replacement and/or repair of mobile or manu- 5 factured homes and/or mobile or manufactured home parks. No funds 6 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 7 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the administering 8 agency in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 9 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 10 ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart- 11 ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein 12 (08212507) (30917) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 For allocation as follows: For the purposes of a mobile and manufac- 15 tured home advantage program to fund loans and grants for the acqui- 16 sition, demolition, or replacement and/or repair of mobile or manu- 17 factured homes and/or mobile or manufactured home parks. No funds 18 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 19 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the administering 20 agency in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 21 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 22 ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart- 23 ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein 24 (08212407) (30917) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 For allocation as follows: For the purposes of a mobile and manufac- 27 tured home advantage program to fund loans and grants for the acqui- 28 sition, demolition, or replacement and/or repair of mobile or manu- 29 factured homes and/or mobile or manufactured home parks. No funds 30 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 31 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the administering 32 agency in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 33 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 34 ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart- 35 ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein 36 (08212303) (30917) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 38 For allocation as follows: For the purposes of a mobile and manufac- 39 tured home advantage program to fund loans and grants for the acqui- 40 sition, demolition, or replacement and/or repair of mobile or manu- 41 factured homes and/or mobile or manufactured home parks. No funds 42 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 43 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the administering 44 agency in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 45 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 46 ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart- 47 ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein 48 (08212203) (30917) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $3,777,000) 522 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 MITCHELL-LAMA PRESERVATION PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Housing Program Fund 4 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 5 New Facilities Purpose 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 7 For services and expenses of a Mitchell-Lama preservation program to 8 preserve and improve Mitchell-Lama properties located outside of the 9 city of New York. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 10 amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 11 any state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes 12 stated herein (08492503) (64424) ................................... 13 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $30,000,000) 14 For services and expenses of a Mitchell-Lama preservation program to 15 preserve and improve Mitchell-Lama properties located in the city of 16 New York, pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budget. 17 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 18 ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart- 19 ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein 20 (08502503) (64425) ... 30,000,000 ................ (re. $30,000,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 For services and expenses of a Mitchell-Lama preservation program to 23 preserve and improve Mitchell-Lama properties in the state, pursuant 24 to a plan approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding 25 any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may 26 be suballocated or transferred to any state department, agency, or 27 public authority for the purposes stated herein (08252403) (31522) 28 ... 80,000,000 ................................... (re. $80,000,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 30 For services and expenses of a Mitchell-Lama preservation program to 31 preserve and improve Mitchell-Lama properties in the state. The 32 amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 33 any state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes 34 stated herein (08252303) (31522) ................................... 35 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,000,000) 36 MITCHELL-LAMA PRESERVATION AND HOMEOWNERSHIP PROGRAM (CCP) 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 Housing Program Fund 39 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 40 New Facilities Purpose 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 42 For services and expenses of a Mitchell-Lama preservation and homeown- 43 ership program to preserve and improve Mitchell-Lama properties and 44 create permanently affordable homeownership in the state. Amounts 45 appropriated herein shall be distributed based on a plan submitted 523 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 by the division of housing and community renewal and approved by the 2 director of the budget. Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated 3 herein may be used for administrative purposes. The amounts appro- 4 priated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state 5 department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated 6 herein (08252203) (31522) ... 100,000,000 ........... (re. $441,000) 7 MITCHELL LAMA REHABILITATION AND PRESERVATION PROGRAM AND ALL AFFORDABLE 8 PROGRAM (CCP) 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 Housing Assistance Fund 11 Housing Assistance Account - 31801 12 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 13 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as added by chapter 1, 14 section 4, of the laws of 2009: 15 For allocation as follows: For services and expenses related to the 16 New York state housing finance agency's Mitchell Lama Rehabilitation 17 and Preservation Program and the All Affordable Program (08ML0803) 18 (31419) ... 10,000,000 ............................ (re. $5,911,000) 19 MIXED-INCOME RENTAL REVOLVING LOAN FUND (CCP) 20 Capital Projects Funds - Other 21 Housing Program Fund 22 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 23 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 25 For services and expenses of the mixed-income revolving loan fund 26 program to fund the development of mixed-income housing outside of 27 New York city. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 28 amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 29 any state department, agency or public authority for the purposes 30 stated herein (08442507) (64403) ... 50,000,000 .. (re. $50,000,000) 31 MODULAR AND STARTER HOMES (CCP) 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Housing Program Fund 34 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 35 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 37 For services and expenses of the modular and starter homes program to 38 fund the development of starter and modular homes. 39 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 40 ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart- 41 ment, agency or public authority for the purposes stated herein 42 (08432507) (64405) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $50,000,000) 524 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 NEW FACILITIES (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 3 Federal Capital Projects Fund 4 Federal Capital Projects Account - 31350 5 New Facilities Purpose 6 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1991, as 7 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is hereby 8 amended and reappropriated to read: 9 For expenditure of funds made available pursuant to the CranstonGon- 10 zales National Affordable Housing Act (, being P.L. 101-625) for 11 activities authorized pursuant to article XXIV of the Private Hous- 12 ing Finance Law. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 13 [$85,800,000] $91,800,000 of the amount appropriated herein shall be 14 used for payment of administrative costs incurred in the implementa- 15 tion of article XXIV of the private housing finance law for Federal 16 aid made available under the HOME Investment Partnership Program to 17 pay State personal service and fringe benefit costs related to 18 administration of the HOME program. Such funds allocated for admin- 19 istration shall be set aside prior to the distribution of funds to 20 projects as required by article XXIV of the private housing finance 21 law (08019107) (31414) ... 125,132,000 ........... (re. $10,100,000) 22 NEW YORK CITY HOUSING AUTHORITY PROGRAM (CCP) 23 Capital Projects Funds - Other 24 Housing Program Fund 25 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 26 New Facilities Purpose 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 28 For capital projects and other improvements at housing developments 29 owned or operated by the New York city housing authority. Notwith- 30 standing any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropriated 31 herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state department, 32 agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein 33 (08192407) (30913) ... 140,000,000 .............. (re. $140,000,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 35 For capital projects and other improvements at housing developments 36 owned or operated by the New York city housing authority. The 37 amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 38 any state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes 39 stated herein (08192307) (30913) ................................... 40 135,000,000 ..................................... (re. $135,000,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 54, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 43 For the purposes of capital projects and other improvements to address 44 issues including, but not limited to lead at housing developments 45 owned or operated by the New York city housing authority, pursuant 525 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 to a plan approved by the director of the budget, in consultation 2 with the New York city housing authority chair and the dormitory 3 authority of the state of New York; provided further to the extent 4 practicable, the New York city housing authority in its adminis- 5 tration of such funds shall include employment opportunities for 6 NYCHA tenants consistent with section 3 of the housing and urban 7 development act of 1968. The amounts appropriated herein may be 8 suballocated or transferred to any state department, agency, or 9 public authority for the purposes stated herein (08191907) (30913) 10 ... 100,000,000 .................................. (re. $70,000,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 12 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 13 For the purpose of capital projects and other improvements to address 14 issues relating to conditions of governance and habitability, 15 including but not limited to, heating, mold, or lead, and other such 16 conditions affecting the health and safety of tenants at housing 17 developments owned or operated by the New York city housing authori- 18 ty. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, funds appropri- 19 ated herein shall be made available pursuant to a plan established 20 under section 402-d of the public housing law. All work conducted 21 utilizing the funds appropriated herein must be conducted exclusive- 22 ly in accordance with the terms and conditions of the plan described 23 therein; provided further to the extent practicable, the New York 24 city housing authority in its administration of such funds shall 25 include employment opportunities for NYCHA tenants consistent with 26 section 3 of the housing and urban development act of 1968. 27 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no funds made available 28 pursuant to chapter 54 of the laws of 2017 for capital projects and 29 other improvements related to housing developments owned or operated 30 by the New York city housing authority shall be allocated until the 31 establishment of a plan pursuant to section 402-d of the public 32 housing law. The amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or 33 transferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for 34 the purposes stated herein (08191807) (30913) ...................... 35 250,000,000 ...................................... (re. $55,000,000) 36 NEW YORK HOUSING FOR THE FUTURE RENTAL PROGRAM (CCP) 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 Housing Program Fund 39 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 40 New Facilities Purpose 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 42 For services and expenses of a program to provide aid in the develop- 43 ment of permanently affordable rental units for households at or 44 under 130 percent of area median income. Notwithstanding any other 45 law to the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballo- 46 cated or transferred to any state department, agency, or public 47 authority for the purposes stated herein (08362407) (31325) ........ 48 75,000,000 ....................................... (re. $75,000,000) 526 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 NEW YORK HOUSING FOR THE FUTURE CO-OP PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Housing Program Fund 4 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 5 New Facilities Purpose 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 7 For services and expenses of a program to provide aid in the develop- 8 ment of permanently affordable limited equity cooperative housing 9 for households at or under 130 percent of area median income. 10 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 11 ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart- 12 ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein 13 (08352407) (31327) ... 75,000,000 ................ (re. $75,000,000) 14 PRO-HOUSING SUPPLY FUND (CCP) 15 Capital Projects Funds - Other 16 Housing Program Fund 17 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 18 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 20 For services and expenses of the pro-housing supply fund to support 21 housing-related infrastructure that supports housing development in 22 cities, towns and villages certified under the pro-housing communi- 23 ties program administered by the division of housing and community 24 renewal. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts 25 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state 26 department, agency or public authority for the purposes stated here- 27 in (08452507) (64407) .............................................. 28 100,000,000 ..................................... (re. $100,000,000) 29 PUBLIC HOUSING PROGRAM (CCP) 30 Capital Projects Funds - Other 31 Housing Program 32 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 33 New Facilities Purpose 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 35 For services and expenses of a public housing program. Funds appropri- 36 ated herein should be used for the purpose of substantial rehabili- 37 tation or moderate rehabilitation and/or the demolition and replace- 38 ment through new construction of site-specific multi-family rental 39 housing currently owned by federally supervised or state-supervised 40 public housing authorities outside New York City. Notwithstanding 41 any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may 42 be suballocated or transferred to any state department, agency, or 43 public authority for the purposes stated herein (08372507) (31318) 44 ... 75,000,000 ................................... (re. $75,000,000) 527 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 For services and expenses of a public housing program. Funds appropri- 3 ated herein should be used for the purpose of substantial rehabili- 4 tation or moderate rehabilitation and/or the demolition and replace- 5 ment through new construction of site-specific multi-family rental 6 housing currently owned by federally supervised or state-supervised 7 public housing authorities outside of New York City. Notwithstanding 8 any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may 9 be suballocated or transferred to any state department, agency, or 10 public authority for the purposes stated herein (08372407) (31318) 11 ... 75,000,000 ................................... (re. $75,000,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 13 For services and expenses of a public housing program. Funds appropri- 14 ated herein should be used for weatherization, heating needs, eleva- 15 tors, lead remediation, and other critical maintenance projects for 16 public housing across the state. Of the amounts appropriated herein 17 $200,000,000 shall be suballocated to the New York city housing 18 authority. Provided further that $125,000,000 shall be distributed 19 to public housing throughout the state based on a plan submitted by 20 the division of housing and community renewal and approved by the 21 director of the budget (08252107) (31494) .......................... 22 325,000,000 ..................................... (re. $200,000,000) 23 PUBLIC HOUSING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM (CCP) 24 Capital Projects Funds - Other 25 Housing Program Fund 26 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 27 New Facilities Purpose 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 29 For services and expenses of a public housing assistance program for 30 public housing across the state. Of the amounts appropriated herein 31 $350,000,000 shall be suballocated to the New York city housing 32 authority. Provided further that $50,000,000 shall be distributed to 33 public housing throughout the state based on a plan submitted by the 34 division of housing and community renewal and approved by the direc- 35 tor of the budget. The amounts appropriated herein may be suballo- 36 cated or transferred to any state department, agency, or public 37 authority for the purposes stated herein (08262207) (31524) ........ 38 400,000,000 ..................................... (re. $245,000,000) 39 PUBLIC HOUSING MODERNIZATION PROGRAM (CCP) 40 Capital Projects Funds - Other 41 Housing Program Fund 42 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 43 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 528 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For allocation as follows: For services and expenses of a public hous- 2 ing modernization program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the 3 sum of $400,000 may be allocated for capital project activities 4 associated with article XII of the public housing law. No funds 5 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 6 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the housing trust 7 fund corporation on behalf of the public housing modernization 8 program in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 9 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 10 administrative purposes (08052503) (31420) ......................... 11 6,400,000 ......................................... (re. $6,400,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 For allocation as follows: For services and expenses of a public hous- 14 ing modernization program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the 15 sum of $400,000 may be allocated for capital project activities 16 associated with article XII of the public housing law. No funds 17 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 18 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the housing trust 19 fund corporation on behalf of the public housing modernization 20 program in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 21 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 22 administrative purposes (08052403) (31420) ......................... 23 6,400,000 ......................................... (re. $6,400,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 25 For allocation as follows: For services and expenses of a public hous- 26 ing modernization program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the 27 sum of $400,000 may be allocated for capital project activities 28 associated with article XII of the public housing law. No funds 29 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 30 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the housing trust 31 fund corporation on behalf of the public housing modernization 32 program in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 33 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 34 administrative purposes (08052303) (31420) ......................... 35 6,400,000 ......................................... (re. $6,080,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 37 For allocation as follows: For services and expenses of a public hous- 38 ing modernization program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the 39 sum of $400,000 may be allocated for capital project activities 40 associated with article XII of the public housing law. No funds 41 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 42 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the housing trust 43 fund corporation on behalf of the public housing modernization 44 program in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 45 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 46 administrative purposes (08052203) (31420) ......................... 47 6,400,000 ......................................... (re. $6,080,000) 48 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 529 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For allocation as follows: For services and expenses of a public hous- 2 ing modernization program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the 3 sum of $400,000 may be allocated for capital project activities 4 associated with article XII of the public housing law. No funds 5 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 6 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the housing trust 7 fund corporation on behalf of the public housing modernization 8 program in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 9 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 10 administrative purposes (08062103) (31420) ......................... 11 6,400,000 ......................................... (re. $6,080,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 13 For allocation as follows: For services and expenses of a public hous- 14 ing modernization program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the 15 sum of $400,000 may be allocated for capital project activities 16 associated with article XII of the public housing law. No funds 17 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 18 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the housing trust 19 fund corporation on behalf of the public housing modernization 20 program in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 21 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 22 administrative purposes (08052003) (31420) ......................... 23 6,400,000 ......................................... (re. $6,080,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 25 For allocation as follows: For services and expenses of a public hous- 26 ing modernization program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the 27 sum of $400,000 may be allocated for capital project activities 28 associated with article XII of the public housing law. No funds 29 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 30 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the housing trust 31 fund corporation on behalf of the public housing modernization 32 program in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 33 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 34 administrative purposes (08051903) (31420) ......................... 35 6,400,000 ......................................... (re. $5,899,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 37 For allocation as follows: For services and expenses of a public hous- 38 ing modernization program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the 39 sum of $400,000 shall be allocated for capital project activities 40 associated with article XII of the public housing law. No funds 41 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 42 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the housing trust 43 fund corporation on behalf of the public housing modernization 44 program in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 45 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 46 administrative purposes (08051803) (31420) ......................... 47 6,400,000 ......................................... (re. $5,680,000) 48 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 530 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For allocation as follows: For services and expenses of a public hous- 2 ing modernization program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the 3 sum of $400,000 shall be allocated for capital project activities 4 associated with article XII of the public housing law. No funds 5 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 6 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the housing trust 7 fund corporation on behalf of the public housing modernization 8 program in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 9 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 10 administrative purposes (08051703) (31420) ......................... 11 6,400,000 ......................................... (re. $5,873,000) 12 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 13 For allocation as follows: For services and expenses of a public hous- 14 ing modernization program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the 15 sum of $400,000 shall be allocated for capital project activities 16 associated with article XII of the public housing law. No funds 17 shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the 18 budget has approved a financial plan submitted by the housing trust 19 fund corporation on behalf of the public housing modernization 20 program in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 21 Up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated herein may be used for 22 administrative purposes (08061603) (31420) ......................... 23 6,400,000 ......................................... (re. $1,274,000) 24 RESILIENT AND READY PROGRAM (CCP) 25 Capital Projects Funds - Other 26 Housing Program Fund 27 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 28 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 30 For services and expenses of the resilient and ready fund for home 31 repairs and permanent retrofits. Notwithstanding any other law to 32 the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or 33 transferred to any state department, agency or public authority for 34 the purposes stated herein (08322503) (31316) ...................... 35 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,000,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 37 For services and expenses of the resilient and ready fund for home 38 repairs and permanent retrofits (08322403)(31316) .................. 39 40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $28,426,000) 40 REST OF STATE VACANT APARTMENT REPAIR AND REHABILITATION PROGRAM (CCP) 41 Capital Projects Funds - Other 42 Housing Program Fund 43 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 44 New Facilities Purpose 531 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 2 For the purpose of a vacant apartment repair and rehabilitation 3 program outside of the city of New York. Such capital grants shall 4 be limited to properties with five units or less and shall not 5 exceed $75,000 per unit. The amounts appropriated herein may be 6 suballocated or transferred to any state department, agency, or 7 public authority for the purposes stated herein (08392507) (31331) 8 ... 40,000,000 ................................... (re. $40,000,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 10 For the purpose of a vacant apartment repair and rehabilitation 11 program outside of the city of New York. Such capital grants shall 12 be limited to properties with five units or less and shall not 13 exceed $75,000 per unit. The amounts appropriated herein may be 14 suballocated or transferred to any state department, agency, or 15 public authority for the purposes stated herein (08392407) (31331) 16 ... 40,000,000 ................................... (re. $33,742,000) 17 SMALL RENTAL HOUSING DEVELOPMENT INITIATIVE (CCP) 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Housing Program Fund 20 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 21 New Facilities Purpose 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 23 For services and expenses of a small rental housing development initi- 24 ative for capital developments under twenty units. 25 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 26 ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart- 27 ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein 28 (08242507) (31526) ... 10,000,000 ................ (re. $10,000,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 30 For services and expenses of a small rental housing development initi- 31 ative for capital developments under twenty units. Notwithstanding 32 any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may 33 be suballocated or transferred to any state department, agency, or 34 public authority for the purposes stated herein (08242407) (31526) 35 ... 7,000,000 ..................................... (re. $7,000,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 37 For services and expenses of a small rental development initiative for 38 capital developments under 20 units. The amounts appropriated herein 39 may be suballocated or transferred to any state department, agency, 40 or public authority for the purposes stated herein (08242307) 41 (31526) ... 7,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,472,000) 42 STATE HOUSING BOND FUND (CCP) 43 Capital Projects Funds - Other 44 State Housing Bond Fund 532 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 State Housing Bond Account - 30700 2 New Facilities Purpose 3 By chapter 955, section 4, of the laws of 1958, as amended by chapter 4 55, section 1, of the laws of 1996, for: 5 Loan contracts for low rent public housing. No funds shall be made 6 available until a plan which includes a draft request for proposals 7 has been submitted to the chairs of the senate and assembly housing 8 committees and approved by the director of the budget. In any event, 9 no expenditure shall be made pursuant to this appropriation prior to 10 October 1, 1994 (01347607) (80920) ................ (re. $7,294,000) 11 By chapter 27, section 4, of the laws of 1949, as amended by chapter 55, 12 section 1, of the laws of 1996, for: 13 Loan contracts for public housing (01347407) (80920) ... (re. $50,000) 14 USDA 515 RENTAL PROPERTIES PRESERVATION PROGRAM (CCP) 15 Capital Projects Funds - Other 16 Housing Program Fund 17 Housing Trust Fund Corporation Account - 31851 18 New Facilities Purpose 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 20 For services and expenses of preserving USDA 515 rental properties 21 authorized under Section 515 of the Housing Act of 1949 (42 U.S.C. 22 1485). Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts 23 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state 24 department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated 25 herein (08382507) (31329) ... 10,000,000 ......... (re. $10,000,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 27 For services and expenses of preserving USDA 515 rental properties 28 authorized under Section 515 of the Housing Act of 1949 (42 U.S.C. 29 1485). Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts 30 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state 31 department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated 32 herein (08382407) (31329) ... 10,000,000 .......... (re. $4,150,000) 533 12654-09-6 HUDSON RIVER PARK TRUST CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 111,733,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 0 111,733,000 5 ================ ================ 6 IMPROVEMENT AND REHABILITATION OF HUDSON RIVER PARK (CCP) 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 9 Environmental Protection or Improvements Purpose 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 11 For services and expenses of the Hudson River park trust for projects 12 related to the rehabilitation and development of Pier 76 (29HR2506) 13 (42903) ... 85,000,000 ........................... (re. $85,000,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 15 For services and expenses of the Hudson River park trust for projects 16 related to the development of the Hudson River park in coordination 17 with a matching payment by New York city in the amount of 18 $23,000,000 (29HR1906) (42903) ... 23,000,000 .... (re. $22,319,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 20 For services and expenses of the Hudson River park trust for projects 21 related to the development of the Hudson River park in coordination 22 with a matching payment by New York city in the amount of 23 $50,000,000 (29HR1806) (42903) ... 50,000,000 ..... (re. $4,414,000) 534 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 130,700,000 373,740,000 6 Capital Projects Funds - Federal ... 0 79,433,000 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 130,700,000 453,173,000 9 ================ ================ 10 IT INITIATIVE PROGRAM (CCP) ................................ 130,700,000 11 -------------- 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 14 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 15 For services and expenses related to tech- 16 nology equipment, software and services 17 with a demonstrated return on investment 18 or service improvement, as well as the 19 exploration and study of lower-cost alter- 20 natives. Funds appropriated herein may be 21 suballocated to any other state depart- 22 ment, agency, or public benefit corpo- 23 ration, to achieve this purpose (00IT2608) 24 (51919) .................................... 130,700,000 535 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 IT INITIATIVE PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For services and expenses related to technology equipment, software 7 and services with a demonstrated return on investment or service 8 improvement, as well as the exploration and study of lower-cost 9 alternatives. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any 10 other state department, agency, or public benefit corporation, to 11 achieve this purpose (00IT2508) (51919) ............................ 12 130,700,000 ..................................... (re. $130,676,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 For services and expenses related to technology equipment, software 15 and services with a demonstrated return on investment or service 16 improvement, as well as the exploration and study of lower-cost 17 alternatives. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any 18 other state department, agency, or public benefit corporation, to 19 achieve this purpose (00IT2408) (51919) ............................ 20 130,700,000 ..................................... (re. $130,700,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 22 For services and expenses related to technology equipment, software 23 and services with a demonstrated return on investment or service 24 improvement, as well as the exploration and study of lower-cost 25 alternatives. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any 26 other state department, agency, or public benefit corporation, to 27 achieve this purpose (00IT2308) (51919) ............................ 28 130,700,000 ...................................... (re. $91,100,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 30 For services and expenses related to technology equipment, software 31 and services with a demonstrated return on investment or service 32 improvement, as well as the exploration and study of lower-cost 33 alternatives. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any 34 other state department, agency, or public benefit corporation, to 35 achieve this purpose (00IT2208) (51919) ............................ 36 115,700,000 ....................................... (re. $2,648,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 39 For services and expenses related to technology equipment, software 40 and services with a demonstrated return on investment or service 41 improvement, as well as the exploration and study of lower-cost 42 alternatives. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any 43 other state department, agency, or public benefit corporation, to 44 achieve this purpose (00IT2108) (51919) ............................ 45 96,311,000 .......................................... (re. $954,000) 536 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 3 For services and expenses related to technology equipment, software 4 and services with a demonstrated return on investment or service 5 improvement, as well as the exploration and study of lower-cost 6 alternatives. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any 7 other state department, agency, or public benefit corporation, to 8 achieve this purpose (00IT2008) (51919) ............................ 9 101,023,000 ....................................... (re. $1,892,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 11 For services and expenses related to technology equipment, software 12 and services with a demonstrated return on investment or service 13 improvement, as well as the exploration and study of lower-cost 14 alternatives. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any 15 other state department, agency, or public benefit corporation, to 16 achieve this purpose. Provided further that $10,000,000 of the funds 17 appropriated herein shall be suballocated to the statewide financial 18 system for enterprise technology and financial application invest- 19 ments, pursuant to a plan approved by the division of budget 20 (00IT1908) (51919) ... 95,700,000 ................... (re. $544,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 22 For services and expenses related to technology equipment, software 23 and services with a demonstrated return on investment or service 24 improvement, as well as the exploration and study of lower-cost 25 alternatives. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any 26 other state department, agency, or public benefit corporation, to 27 achieve this purpose (00IT1808) (51919) ............................ 28 85,700,000 .......................................... (re. $845,000) 29 Capital Projects Funds - Other 30 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 31 Information Technology Capital Financing Account - 32215 32 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 34 Amounts appropriated herein may be made available, subject to the 35 identification and transferability of appropriate revenue, for the 36 expenses of information technology projects and services (00BS1408) 37 (51919) ... 30,000,000 ........................... (re. $14,381,000) 38 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 39 Federal Capital Projects Fund 40 Federal Capital Projects Account - 31379 41 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 43 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 44 program, of development costs related to the integrated eligibility 45 system program, including technology equipment, software and 46 services (00IE2008) (51919) ... 150,000,000 ...... (re. $79,433,000) 537 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF LAW CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 14,971,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 0 14,971,000 5 ================ ================ 6 IT INITIATIVE PROGRAM (CCP) 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 9 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 11 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 12 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 13 services (36012408) (51919) ... 8,415,000 ......... (re. $7,409,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 15 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 16 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 17 services (36012308) (51919) ... 2,750,000 ......... (re. $2,609,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 19 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 20 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 21 services (36012208) (51919) ... 6,500,000 ......... (re. $4,556,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 23 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 24 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 25 services (36012008) (51919) ... 6,000,000 ........... (re. $397,000) 538 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Fund - Other ...... 93,000,000 823,153,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 93,000,000 823,153,000 8 ================ ================ 9 COMMUNITY ALCOHOLISM AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE FACILITIES (CCP) ... 63,500,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Minor Rehabilitation Purpose 14 For minor alterations and improvements to 15 various facilities, including the payment 16 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 17 2026, provided, however, that no expendi- 18 tures may be made from this appropriation 19 until a comprehensive plan of projects has 20 been approved by the director of the budg- 21 et (53032689) (11826) ........................ 5,500,000 22 Capital Projects Funds - Other 23 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 24 OASAS-Community Facilities Account - 32305 25 New Facilities Purpose 26 For the acquisition of property, design, 27 construction and extensive rehabilitation 28 of facilities for the purpose of deliver- 29 ing chemical dependence services, pursuant 30 to the mental hygiene law. No expenditure 31 shall be made from this appropriation 32 until a spending plan for proposed 33 projects has been submitted by the commis- 34 sioner of the office of addiction services 35 and supports and approved by the director 36 of the budget (53AA2607) (11828) ............ 19,000,000 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 39 OASAS-Community Facilities Account - 32305 40 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 539 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For alterations and improvements for preser- 2 vation of various facilities including 3 rehabilitation projects and the acquisi- 4 tion of property, provided, however, that 5 no expenditures may be made from this 6 appropriation until a comprehensive plan 7 of projects has been approved by the 8 director of the budget (53032603) (11827) ... 39,000,000 9 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISION (CCP) .................... 7,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Preparation of Plans Purpose 14 For payment to the design and construction 15 management account of the centralized 16 services fund of the New York state office 17 of general services or to the dormitory 18 authority of the state of New York for the 19 purpose of preparation and review of 20 plans, specifications, estimates, 21 services, construction management and 22 supervision, inspection, studies, 23 appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 24 mental impact statements for new projects 25 (53PP2630) (81088) ........................... 4,000,000 26 Capital Projects Funds - Other 27 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 28 DASNY-OASAS Administration Account - 32308 29 Preparation of Plans Purpose 30 For payment to the design and construction 31 management account of the centralized 32 services fund of the New York state office 33 of general services or to the dormitory 34 authority of the state of New York for the 35 purpose of preparation and review of 36 plans, specifications, estimates, 37 services, construction management and 38 supervision, inspection, studies, 39 appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 40 mental impact statements for new projects 41 (53DC2630) (81088) ........................... 3,000,000 42 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) .................. 3,500,000 43 -------------- 540 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 4 For the maintenance and operation of various 5 facilities and systems including personal 6 services, fringe benefits and indirect 7 costs (53FM26MO) (81107) ..................... 3,500,000 8 INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES PROGRAM (CCP) ........................ 17,000,000 9 -------------- 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 12 Minor Rehabilitation Purpose 13 For minor alterations and improvements to 14 various facilities, including the payment 15 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 16 2026, provided, however, that no expendi- 17 tures may be made from this appropriation 18 until a comprehensive plan of projects has 19 been approved by the director of the budg- 20 et (53HD2689) (11833) ........................ 2,000,000 21 Capital Projects Funds - Other 22 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 23 OASAS-State Facilities Account - 32311 24 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 25 For alterations and improvements for preser- 26 vation of various facilities including 27 rehabilitation projects, provided, howev- 28 er, that no expenditures may be made from 29 this appropriation until a comprehensive 30 plan of projects has been approved by the 31 director of the budget. This appropriation 32 may be used for the cost of potential 33 claims against contracts awarded by the 34 dormitory authority of the state of New 35 York. Upon request of the commissioner of 36 the office of addiction services and 37 supports and approval by the director of 38 the budget, this appropriation may be 39 transferred or suballocated to any other 40 department, agency, or public authority 41 (53A22603) (81040) .......................... 15,000,000 42 NON-BONDABLE PROJECTS (CCP) .................................. 2,000,000 43 -------------- 541 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 Non-Bondable Purpose 4 For transfer to the mental hygiene capital 5 improvement fund for reimbursement of the 6 non-bondable cost of community facilities 7 authorized by appropriations or reappro- 8 priations funded from the mental hygiene 9 capital improvement fund including liabil- 10 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2026 or 11 for payment to the dormitory authority of 12 the state of New York for defeasance of 13 bonds. Upon request of the commissioner of 14 the office of addiction services and 15 supports and approval by the director of 16 the budget, this appropriation may be 17 transferred to the dormitory authority of 18 the state of New York (53NB26NB) (81042) ..... 2,000,000 542 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 COMMUNITY ALCOHOLISM AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE FACILITIES (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Minor Rehabilitation Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 7 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025, 8 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 9 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 10 the director of the budget (53032589) (11826) ...................... 11 5,500,000 ......................................... (re. $5,500,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 14 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024, 15 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 16 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 17 the director of the budget (53032489) (11826) ...................... 18 5,500,000 ......................................... (re. $5,500,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 21 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023, 22 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 23 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 24 the director of the budget (53032389) (11826) ...................... 25 5,500,000 ......................................... (re. $5,500,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 27 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 28 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022, 29 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 30 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 31 the director of the budget (53032289) (11826) ...................... 32 5,500,000 ......................................... (re. $5,500,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 34 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 35 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021, 36 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 37 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 38 the director of the budget (53032189) (11826) ...................... 39 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 41 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 42 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020, 43 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 543 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 2 the director of the budget (53032089) (11826) ...................... 3 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 5 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 6 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019, 7 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 8 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 9 the director of the budget (53031989) (11826) ...................... 10 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 12 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 13 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018, 14 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 15 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 16 the director of the budget (53031889) (11826) ...................... 17 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,355,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 19 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 20 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017, 21 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 22 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 23 the director of the budget (53031789) (11826) ...................... 24 10,000,000 .......................................... (re. $220,000) 25 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 27 For services and expenses approved by the office of addiction services 28 and supports related to chemical dependency detection, prevention, 29 treatment and recovery, including, but not limited to, purchase of 30 equipment. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money 31 hereby appropriated may be transferred to any other state agency, 32 with the approval of the director of the budget (53CD1689) (12084) 33 ... 5,014,000 ..................................... (re. $1,766,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 35 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 36 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2013, 37 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 38 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 39 the director of the budget (53031389) (11826) ...................... 40 3,810,000 ........................................... (re. $216,000) 41 Capital Projects Funds - Other 42 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 43 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 544 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 3 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and/or rehabili- 4 tation of facilities to expand substance abuse supports and 5 services, including treatment, recovery and prevention services to 6 support efforts to develop, expand, and/or operate substance abuse 7 supports and services for treatment, recovery, and prevention of 8 heroin and opiate use and addiction disorders including but not 9 limited to the provision of housing services for affected popu- 10 lations. No expenditure shall be made from this appropriation until 11 a spending plan for the proposed projects has been submitted by the 12 commissioner of the office of addiction services and supports and 13 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding sections 112 14 and 163 of the state finance law and section 142 of the economic 15 development law, or any other inconsistent provision of law, funds 16 available for expenditure pursuant to this appropriation for the 17 development, expansion, and/or operation of treatment, recovery, 18 prevention and/or housing services for persons with heroin and 19 opiate use and addiction disorders, may be allocated and distributed 20 by the commissioner of the office of addiction services and 21 supports, subject to approval of the director of the budget, without 22 a competitive bid or request for proposal process. Prior to an award 23 being granted to an applicant pursuant to this process, the commis- 24 sioner shall formally notify in writing the chair of the senate 25 finance committee and the chair of the assembly ways and means 26 committee of the intent to grant such an award. Such notice shall 27 include information regarding how the prospective recipient meets 28 objective criteria established by the commissioner. Expenditures 29 made from this appropriation shall reduce appropriations for grants 30 from the OASAS general fund local assistance account for the same 31 purpose by an equivalent amount, and such appropriation authority in 32 such account shall then be deemed to have lapsed to the extent of 33 such reduction (53CD1608) (11801) .................................. 34 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,707,000) 35 Capital Projects Funds - Other 36 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 37 OASAS-Community Facilities Account - 32305 38 New Facilities Purpose 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 40 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and extensive 41 rehabilitation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical 42 dependence services, pursuant to the mental hygiene law. No expendi- 43 ture shall be made from this appropriation until a spending plan for 44 proposed projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the 45 office of addiction services and supports and approved by the direc- 46 tor of the budget (53AA2507) (11828) ............................... 47 24,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,000,000) 545 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and extensive 3 rehabilitation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical 4 dependence services, pursuant to the mental hygiene law. No expendi- 5 ture shall be made from this appropriation until a spending plan for 6 proposed projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the 7 office of addiction services and supports and approved by the direc- 8 tor of the budget (53AA2407) (11828) ............................... 9 24,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,000,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 11 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and extensive 12 rehabilitation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical 13 dependence services, pursuant to the mental hygiene law. No expendi- 14 ture shall be made from this appropriation until a spending plan for 15 proposed projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the 16 office of addiction services and supports and approved by the direc- 17 tor of the budget (53AA2307) (11828) ............................... 18 24,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,000,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 20 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and extensive 21 rehabilitation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical 22 dependence services, pursuant to the mental hygiene law. No expendi- 23 ture shall be made from this appropriation until a spending plan for 24 proposed projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the 25 office of addiction services and supports and approved by the direc- 26 tor of the budget (53AA2207) (11828) ............................... 27 24,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,000,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 29 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and extensive 30 rehabilitation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical 31 dependence services, pursuant to the mental hygiene law. No expendi- 32 ture shall be made from this appropriation until a spending plan for 33 proposed projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the 34 office of addiction services and supports and approved by the direc- 35 tor of the budget (53AA2107) (11828) ............................... 36 24,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,000,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 38 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and extensive 39 rehabilitation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical 40 dependence services, pursuant to the mental hygiene law. No expendi- 41 ture shall be made from this appropriation until a spending plan for 42 proposed projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the 43 office of addiction services and supports and approved by the direc- 44 tor of the budget (53AA2007) (11828) ............................... 45 34,000,000 ....................................... (re. $34,000,000) 546 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 3 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and extensive 4 rehabilitation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical 5 dependence services, pursuant to the mental hygiene law. No expendi- 6 ture shall be made from this appropriation until a spending plan for 7 proposed projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the 8 office of addiction services and supports and approved by the direc- 9 tor of the budget (53AA1907) (11828) ............................... 10 40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $39,150,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 12 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 13 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and extensive 14 rehabilitation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical 15 dependence services, pursuant to the mental hygiene law. No expendi- 16 ture shall be made from this appropriation until a spending plan for 17 proposed projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the 18 office of addiction services and supports and approved by the direc- 19 tor of the budget (53AA1807) (11828) ............................... 20 40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $13,736,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 22 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 23 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and extensive 24 rehabilitation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical 25 dependence services, pursuant to the mental hygiene law. No expendi- 26 ture shall be made from this appropriation until a spending plan for 27 proposed projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the 28 office of addiction services and supports and approved by the direc- 29 tor of the budget (53AA1307) (11828) ............................... 30 34,773,000 ........................................ (re. $4,954,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 32 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 33 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and extensive 34 rehabilitation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical 35 dependence services, pursuant to the mental hygiene law. No expendi- 36 ture shall be made from this appropriation until a spending plan for 37 proposed projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the 38 office of addiction services and supports and approved by the direc- 39 tor of the budget (53AA1207) (11828) ............................... 40 42,273,000 ........................................ (re. $4,583,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 43 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and extensive 44 rehabilitation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical 45 dependence services, pursuant to the mental hygiene law. No expendi- 46 ture shall be made from this appropriation until a spending plan for 547 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 proposed projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the 2 office of addiction services and supports and approved by the direc- 3 tor of the budget (53AA1007) (11828) ............................... 4 42,273,000 ........................................ (re. $8,782,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 7 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and extensive 8 rehabilitation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical 9 dependence services, pursuant to the mental hygiene law. No expendi- 10 ture shall be made from this appropriation until a spending plan for 11 proposed projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the 12 office of addiction services and supports and approved by the direc- 13 tor of the budget (53AA0907) (11828) ............................... 14 42,273,000 ....................................... (re. $16,379,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 17 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and extensive 18 rehabilitation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical 19 dependence services, pursuant to the mental hygiene law. No expendi- 20 ture shall be made from this appropriation until a spending plan for 21 proposed projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the 22 office of addiction services and supports and approved by the direc- 23 tor of the budget (53AA0807) (11828) ............................... 24 66,273,000 ........................................ (re. $5,438,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 54, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 27 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and rehabili- 28 tation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical depend- 29 ence services, which may include 100 community residential treatment 30 beds in Suffolk and Nassau counties, to be developed for operation 31 by voluntary-operated or local government operated chemical depend- 32 ency treatment providers. Notwithstanding any other inconsistent 33 provision of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may support up to 34 100 percent of approved capital costs of such chemical dependency 35 facilities. Notwithstanding any other inconsistent provision of law, 36 and subject to approval of the director of the budget, funds from 37 this appropriation may be paid to the dormitory authority of the 38 state of New York or the office of general services to the design 39 and construction management account pursuant to one or more certif- 40 icates approved by the director of the budget for purposes of carry- 41 ing out the projects provided for herein. No expenditure shall be 42 made from this appropriation until a spending plan for the proposed 43 projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the office of 44 addiction services and supports and approved by the director of the 45 budget (53010707) (11829) ... 26,600,000 .......... (re. $8,175,000) 46 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and rehabili- 47 tation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical depend- 548 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ence services, which may include 100 intensive residential and/or 2 community residential beds for veterans, to be developed for opera- 3 tion by voluntary-operated or local government operated chemical 4 dependency treatment providers. Notwithstanding any other inconsist- 5 ent provision of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may support up 6 to 100 percent of approved capital costs of such chemical dependency 7 facilities. 8 Notwithstanding any other inconsistent provision of law, and subject 9 to approval of the director of the budget, funds from this appropri- 10 ation may be paid to the dormitory authority of the state of New 11 York or the office of general services to the design and 12 construction management account pursuant to one or more certificates 13 approved by the director of the budget for purposes of carrying out 14 the projects provided for herein. No expenditure shall be made from 15 this appropriation until a spending plan for the proposed projects 16 has been submitted by the commissioner of the office of addiction 17 services and supports and approved by the director of the budget 18 (53020707) (11830) ... 25,400,000 ................. (re. $5,163,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 54, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 21 For the acquisition of property design, construction and rehabili- 22 tation of facilities for the purpose of delivering chemical depend- 23 ence services, which may include 108 beds for adolescents and/or 24 women and their children, to be developed for operation by voluntar- 25 y-operated or local government operated chemical dependency treat- 26 ment providers. Notwithstanding any other inconsistent provision of 27 the law, the moneys hereby appropriated may support up to 100 28 percent of approved capital costs of such chemical dependency facil- 29 ities. Notwithstanding any other inconsistent provision of the law, 30 and subject to approval of the director of the budget, funds from 31 this appropriation may be paid to the dormitory authority of the 32 state of New York or the office of general services to the design 33 and construction management account pursuant to one or more certif- 34 icates approved by the director of the budget for purposes of carry- 35 ing out the projects provided for herein. No expenditure shall be 36 made from this appropriation until a spending plan for the proposed 37 projects has been submitted by the commissioner of the office of 38 addiction services and supports and approved by the director of the 39 budget (53010607) (11831) ... 24,900,000 .......... (re. $5,706,000) 40 Capital Projects Funds - Other 41 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 42 OASAS-Community Facilities Account - 32305 43 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 45 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 46 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 47 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 549 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 2 approved by the director of the budget (53032503) (11827) .......... 3 34,000,000 ....................................... (re. $34,000,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 6 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 7 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 8 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 9 approved by the director of the budget (53032403) (11827) .......... 10 34,000,000 ....................................... (re. $34,000,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 12 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 13 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 14 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 15 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 16 approved by the director of the budget (53032303) (11827) .......... 17 35,000,000 ....................................... (re. $35,000,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 19 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 20 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 21 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 22 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 23 approved by the director of the budget (53032203) (11827) .......... 24 40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $40,000,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 26 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 27 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 28 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 29 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 30 approved by the director of the budget (53032103) (11827) .......... 31 40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $40,000,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 33 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 34 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 35 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 36 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 37 approved by the director of the budget (53032003) (11827) .......... 38 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $30,000,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 40 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 41 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 42 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 43 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 550 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 approved by the director of the budget (53031903) (11827) .......... 2 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $25,000,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 4 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 5 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 6 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 7 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 8 approved by the director of the budget (53031803) (11827) .......... 9 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,500,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 11 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 12 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 13 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 14 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 15 approved by the director of the budget (53031703) (11827) .......... 16 32,000,000 ....................................... (re. $12,149,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 18 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 19 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 20 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 21 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 22 approved by the director of the budget (53031303) (11827) .......... 23 34,773,000 ....................................... (re. $16,942,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 25 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 26 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 27 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 28 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 29 approved by the director of the budget (53031203) (11827) .......... 30 42,273,000 ....................................... (re. $38,873,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 32 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 33 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 34 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 35 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 36 approved by the director of the budget (53031103) (11827) .......... 37 40,273,000 ....................................... (re. $17,094,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 39 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 40 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 41 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 42 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 43 approved by the director of the budget (53030803) (11827) .......... 44 42,273,000 ........................................ (re. $4,009,000) 551 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 2 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 3 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 4 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 5 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 6 approved by the director of the budget (53030703) (11827) .......... 7 27,423,000 ........................................ (re. $3,488,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 9 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 10 ties including rehabilitation projects and the acquisition of prop- 11 erty, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 12 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 13 approved by the director of the budget (53030603) (11827) .......... 14 17,243,000 ........................................ (re. $8,497,000) 15 Capital Projects Funds - Other 16 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 17 OASAS-Community Facilities Account - 32305 18 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 20 For the purchase and modification of vehicles to operate as Mobile 21 Medication Units (MMUs) providing substance use disorder services, 22 and any additional vehicles or equipment necessary for their opera- 23 tion (53MM2508) (12036) ... 1,250,000 ............. (re. $1,250,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 26 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and/or rehabili- 27 tation of facilities to expand substance abuse supports and 28 services, including treatment, recovery and prevention services to 29 support efforts to develop, expand and/or operate substance abuse 30 supports and services for treatment, recovery, and prevention of 31 heroin and opiate use and addiction disorders including but not 32 limited to the provision of housing services for affected popu- 33 lations. 34 Notwithstanding sections 112 and 163 of the state finance law and 35 section 142 of the economic development law, or any other inconsist- 36 ent provision of law, funds available for expenditure pursuant to 37 this appropriation for the development, expansion, and/or operation 38 of treatment, recovery, prevention and/or housing services for 39 persons with heroin and opiate use and addiction disorders, may be 40 allocated and distributed by the commissioner of the office of 41 addiction services and supports, subject to approval of the director 42 of the budget, without a competitive bid or request for proposal 43 process. Prior to an award being granted to an applicant pursuant to 44 this process, the commissioner shall formally notify in writing the 45 chair of the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly 46 ways and means committee of the intent to grant such an award. Such 552 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 notice shall include information regarding how the prospective 2 recipient meets objective criteria established by the commissioner 3 (53MH1808) (11801) ... 10,000,000 ................... (re. $249,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 6 For the acquisition of property, design, construction and/or rehabili- 7 tation of facilities to expand substance abuse supports and 8 services, including treatment, recovery and prevention services to 9 support efforts to develop, expand and/or operate substance abuse 10 supports and services for treatment, recovery, and prevention of 11 heroin and opiate use and addiction disorders including but not 12 limited to the provision of housing services for affected popu- 13 lations. Notwithstanding sections 112 and 163 of the state finance 14 law and section 142 of the economic development law, or any other 15 inconsistent provision of law, funds available for expenditure 16 pursuant to this appropriation for the development, expansion, 17 and/or operation of treatment, recovery, prevention and/or housing 18 services for persons with heroin and opiate use and addiction disor- 19 ders, may be allocated and distributed by the commissioner of the 20 office of addiction services and supports, subject to approval of 21 the director of the budget, without a competitive bid or request for 22 proposal process. Prior to an award being granted to an applicant 23 pursuant to this process, the commissioner shall formally notify in 24 writing the chair of the senate finance committee and the chair of 25 the assembly ways and means committee of the intent to grant such an 26 award. Such notice shall include information regarding how the 27 prospective recipient meets objective criteria established by the 28 commissioner (53MH1708) (11801) ... 10,000,000 ...... (re. $338,000) 29 Capital Projects Funds - Other 30 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 31 Opioid Settlement Capital Account 32 New Facilities Purpose 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 34 For the acquisition of property, design, construction, and rehabili- 35 tation of facilities for the purpose of expanding access to 36 addiction treatment services associated with the implementation of 37 statewide opioid settlement agreements. Upon request of the commis- 38 sioner of the office of addiction services and supports and approval 39 by the director of the budget, funding made available pursuant to 40 this appropriation may be transferred to the dormitory authority of 41 the state of New York. No expenditure shall be made from this appro- 42 priation until a spending plan for proposed projects has been 43 submitted by the commissioner of the office of addiction services 44 and supports and approved by the director of the budget (53OS2207) 45 (11828) ... 10,000,000 ........................... (re. $10,000,000) 46 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISION (CCP) 553 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 Preparation of Plans Purpose 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 5 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 6 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 7 services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 8 the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifications, 9 estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 10 inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 11 impact statements for new projects (53PP2530) (81088) .............. 12 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 15 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 16 services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 17 the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifications, 18 estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 19 inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 20 impact statements for new projects (53PP2430) (81088) .............. 21 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 23 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 24 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 25 services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 26 the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifications, 27 estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 28 inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 29 impact statements for new projects (53PP2330) (81088) .............. 30 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 32 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 33 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 34 services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 35 the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifications, 36 estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 37 inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 38 impact statements for new projects (53PP2230) (81088) .............. 39 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 41 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 42 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 43 services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 44 the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifications, 45 estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 554 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 2 impact statements for new projects (53PP2130) (81088) .............. 3 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,616,000) 4 Capital Projects Funds - Other 5 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 6 DASNY-OASAS Administration Account - 32308 7 Preparation of Plans Purpose 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 9 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 10 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 11 services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 12 the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifications, 13 estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 14 inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 15 impact statements for new projects (53DC2530) (81088) .............. 16 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 18 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 19 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 20 services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 21 the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifications, 22 estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 23 inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 24 impact statements for new projects (53DC2430) (81088) .............. 25 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,210,000) 26 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) 27 Capital Projects Funds - Other 28 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 29 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 31 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 32 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs 33 (53FM25MO) (81107) ... 3,500,000 .................. (re. $2,841,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 35 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 36 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs 37 (53FM24MO) (81107) ... 3,500,000 .................. (re. $1,435,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 39 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 40 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs 41 (53FM23MO) (81107) ... 3,500,000 .................. (re. $1,578,000) 555 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Minor Rehabilitation Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 7 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025, 8 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 9 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 10 the director of the budget (53HD2589) (11833) ...................... 11 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 14 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024, 15 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 16 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 17 the director of the budget (53HD2489) (11833) ...................... 18 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 21 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023, 22 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 23 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 24 the director of the budget (53HD2389) (11833) ...................... 25 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 27 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 28 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022, 29 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 30 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 31 the director of the budget (53HD2289) (11833) ...................... 32 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 34 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 35 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021, 36 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 37 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 38 the director of the budget (53HD2189) (11833) ...................... 39 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,496,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 41 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 42 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020, 43 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 556 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 2 the director of the budget (53HD2089) (11833) ...................... 3 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,926,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 5 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 6 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019, 7 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 8 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 9 the director of the budget (53HD1989) (11833) ...................... 10 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $919,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 12 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 13 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018, 14 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 15 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 16 the director of the budget (53HD1889) (11833) ...................... 17 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $888,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 19 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 20 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017, 21 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 22 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 23 the director of the budget (53HD1789) (11833) ...................... 24 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $780,000) 25 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 26 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 27 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016, 28 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 29 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 30 the director of the budget (53HD1689) (11833) ...................... 31 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $833,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 33 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 34 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2015, 35 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 36 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 37 the director of the budget (53HD1589) (11833) ...................... 38 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $308,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 40 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 41 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014, 42 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 43 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 557 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the director of the budget (53HD1489) (11833) ...................... 2 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $447,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 4 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 5 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2013, 6 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 7 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 8 the director of the budget (53HD1389) (11833) ...................... 9 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $192,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 11 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 12 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2012, 13 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 14 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 15 the director of the budget (53HD1289) (11833) ...................... 16 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $179,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 18 For minor alterations and improvements to various facilities, includ- 19 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2011, 20 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 21 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 22 the director of the budget (53HD1189) (11833) ...................... 23 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $103,000) 24 Capital Projects Funds - Other 25 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 26 OASAS-State Facilities Account - 32311 27 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 29 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 30 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 31 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 32 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 33 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 34 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 35 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 36 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 37 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 38 other department, agency, or public authority (53A22503) (81040) ... 39 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 41 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 42 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 43 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 44 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 558 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 2 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 3 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 4 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 5 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 6 other department, agency, or public authority (53A22403) (81040) ... 7 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 9 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 10 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 11 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 12 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 13 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 14 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 15 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 16 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 17 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 18 other department, agency, or public authority (53A22303) (81040) ... 19 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 22 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 23 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 24 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 25 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 26 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 27 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 28 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 29 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 30 other department, agency, or public authority (53A22203) (81040) ... 31 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 33 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 34 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 35 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 36 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 37 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 38 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 39 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 40 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 41 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 42 other department, agency, or public authority (53A22103) (81040) ... 43 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,415,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 45 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 46 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 559 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 2 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 3 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 4 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 5 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 6 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 7 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 8 other department, agency, or public authority (53A22003) (81040) ... 9 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,644,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 54, 11 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 12 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 13 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 14 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 15 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 16 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 17 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 18 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 19 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 20 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 21 other department, agency, or public authority (53A21903) (81040) ... 22 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,276,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 24 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 25 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 26 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 27 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 28 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 29 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 30 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 31 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 32 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 33 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 34 other department, agency, or public authority (53A21803) (81040) ... 35 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,407,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 37 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 38 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 39 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 40 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 41 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 42 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 43 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 44 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 45 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 46 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 560 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 other department, agency, or public authority (53A21703) (81040) ... 2 15,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,415,000) 3 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 4 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 5 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 6 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 7 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 8 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 9 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 10 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 11 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 12 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 13 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 14 other department, agency, or public authority (53A21603) (81040) ... 15 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,484,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 17 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 18 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 19 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 20 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 21 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 22 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 23 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 24 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 25 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 26 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 27 other department, agency, or public authority (53A21503) (81040) ... 28 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,184,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 30 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 31 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 32 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 33 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 34 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 35 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 36 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 37 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 38 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 39 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 40 other department, agency, or public authority (53A21303) (81040) ... 41 18,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,902,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 43 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 44 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 45 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 46 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 561 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 2 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 3 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 4 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 5 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 6 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 7 other department, agency, or public authority (53A21203) (81040) ... 8 3,000,000 ........................................... (re. $134,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 11 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 12 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 13 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 14 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 15 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 16 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 17 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 18 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 19 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 20 other department, agency, or public authority (53A21103) (81040) ... 21 7,000,000 ........................................... (re. $304,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 23 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 24 For alterations and improvements for preservation of various facili- 25 ties including rehabilitation projects, provided, however, that no 26 expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehen- 27 sive plan of projects has been approved by the director of the budg- 28 et. This appropriation may be used for the cost of potential claims 29 against contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of 30 New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office of 31 addiction services and supports and approval by the director of the 32 budget, this appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to any 33 other department, agency, or public authority (53A21003) (81040) ... 34 3,000,000 ............................................ (re. $96,000) 35 NON-BONDABLE PROJECTS (CCP) 36 Capital Projects Funds - Other 37 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 38 Non-Bondable Purpose 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 40 For transfer to the mental hygiene capital improvement fund for 41 reimbursement of the non-bondable cost of community facilities 42 authorized by appropriations or reappropriations funded from the 43 mental hygiene capital improvement fund including liabilities 44 incurred prior to April 1, 2025 or for payment to the dormitory 45 authority of the state of New York for defeasance of bonds. Upon 562 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 request of the commissioner of the office of addiction services and 2 supports and approval by the director of the budget, this appropri- 3 ation may be transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of 4 New York (53NB25NB) (81042) ........................................ 5 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 563 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 444,472,000 4,211,683,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 444,472,000 4,211,683,000 8 ================ ================ 9 COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH FACILITIES (CCP) .................... 71,722,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Infrastructure Purpose 14 State aid to municipalities and other public 15 and not-for-profit agencies for acquisi- 16 tion, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 17 to existing community mental health facil- 18 ities as required to address code 19 violations, health and safety issues, 20 and/or structural/mechanical deficiencies. 21 Additionally, this appropriation may be 22 used for payment to the design and 23 construction management account of the 24 centralized services fund of the New York 25 state office of general services for the 26 purpose of preparation and review of 27 plans, specifications, estimates, 28 services, construction management and 29 supervision, inspection, studies, 30 appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 31 mental impact statements for new, existing 32 and reappropriated capital projects and 33 programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 34 provision of law, within the amounts here- 35 by appropriated, the commissioner of the 36 office of mental health may provide state 37 aid grants of up to 100 per centum of 38 reasonable capital costs associated with 39 the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or 40 improvements (501126A4) (37015) .............. 6,000,000 41 Capital Projects Funds - Other 42 Mental Health Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 43 OMH-Community Facilities Account - 32303 44 Infrastructure Purpose 564 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the acquisition of property, 2 construction and rehabilitation of new 3 facilities and/or relocation of existing 4 community mental health facilities under 5 the auspice of municipalities and other 6 public and not-for-profit agencies, 7 approved by the commissioner of the office 8 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 9 of the mental hygiene law. Additionally, 10 this appropriation may be used for payment 11 of personal service and nonpersonal 12 service, including fringe benefits related 13 to the administration of the community 14 capital program provided by the office of 15 mental health for new and reappropriated 16 community capital projects. Upon request 17 of the commissioner of mental health and 18 approval by the director of the budget, 19 this appropriation may be transferred to 20 the dormitory authority of the state of 21 New York (500126A4) (37015) .................. 5,722,000 22 For the acquisition of property, 23 construction, and rehabilitation of new 24 facilities and/or relocation of existing 25 community mental health facilities under 26 the auspice of municipalities and other 27 public and not-for-profit agencies, 28 approved by the commissioner of the office 29 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 30 of the mental hygiene law. 31 Up to $10,000,000 of funds from this appro- 32 priation may be allocated to support envi- 33 ronmental modifications to improve access 34 and other aging in place needs for indi- 35 viduals in existing community based resi- 36 dential programs (50CR26A4) (37024) ......... 60,000,000 37 NON-BONDABLE PROJECTS (CCP) .................................. 1,000,000 38 -------------- 39 Capital Projects Funds - Other 40 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 41 Non-Bondable Purpose 42 For transfer to the Mental Hygiene Capital 43 Improvement Fund for reimbursement of the 44 non-bondable cost of projects for communi- 45 ty facilities authorized by appropriations 46 or reappropriations funded from the Mental 47 Hygiene Capital Improvement Fund including 565 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2 2026 or for payment to the dormitory 3 authority of the state of New York for 4 defeasance of bonds. Upon request of the 5 commissioner of mental health and approval 6 by the director of the budget, this appro- 7 priation may be transferred to the dormi- 8 tory authority of the state of New York 9 (500526NB) (81042) ........................... 1,000,000 10 STATE MENTAL HEALTH FACILITIES (CCP) ....................... 371,750,000 11 -------------- 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 14 Infrastructure Purpose 15 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, 16 construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 17 tation and improvements, including the 18 preparation of designs, plans, specifica- 19 tions and estimates, for new, existing, 20 and reappropriated capital projects and 21 programs, including, but not limited to, 22 preparation of plans, administration, 23 maintenance and improvement of existing 24 facilities, new facilities, energy conser- 25 vation, environmental protection or 26 improvement, health and safety, preserva- 27 tion of facilities, accreditation and 28 program improvement or program changes, 29 maintenance and operation of various 30 facilities and systems including personal 31 services, fringe benefits, and indirect 32 costs; provided, however, that no expendi- 33 tures may be made from this appropriation 34 until a comprehensive plan of projects has 35 been approved by the director of the budg- 36 et. Additionally, this appropriation may 37 be used for payment to the design and 38 construction management account of the 39 centralized services fund of the New York 40 state office of general services or to the 41 dormitory authority of the state of New 42 York for the purpose of preparation and 43 review of plans, specifications, esti- 44 mates, services, construction management 45 and supervision, inspection, studies, 46 appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 47 mental impact statements for new, existing 566 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 and reappropriated capital projects and 2 programs. Upon request of the commissioner 3 of mental health and approval by the 4 director of the budget, this appropriation 5 may be transferred to the dormitory 6 authority of the state of New York. 7 Furthermore, upon approval of the director 8 of the budget, funds from this appropri- 9 ation may be suballocated or transferred 10 to any department, agency, or public 11 authority (50IS26A4) (37017) ................ 96,750,000 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 14 MH Capital Improvement Account - 32309 15 Infrastructure Purpose 16 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, 17 construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 18 tation and improvements, including the 19 preparation of designs, plans, specifica- 20 tions and estimates, for new, existing and 21 reappropriated capital projects and 22 programs including, but not limited to, 23 preparation of plans, administration, 24 maintenance and improvement of existing 25 facilities, new facilities, energy conser- 26 vation, environmental protection or 27 improvement, health and safety, preserva- 28 tion of facilities, accreditation and 29 program improvement or program changes; 30 provided, however, that no expenditures 31 may be made from this appropriation until 32 a comprehensive plan of projects has been 33 approved by the director of the budget. 34 This appropriation may be used for payment 35 of personal service and nonpersonal 36 service, including fringe benefits, and 37 indirect cost recovery, related to the 38 administration of the capital projects and 39 programs provided by the office of mental 40 health. Additionally, this appropriation 41 may be used for payment to the design and 42 construction management account of the 43 centralized services fund of the New York 44 state office of general services or to the 45 dormitory authority of the state of New 46 York for the purpose of preparation and 47 review of plans, specifications, esti- 48 mates, services, construction management 567 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 and supervision, inspection, studies, 2 appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 3 mental impact statements for new and 4 existing projects. Upon request of the 5 commissioner of mental health and approval 6 by the director of the budget, this appro- 7 priation may be suballocated or trans- 8 ferred to any department, agency, or 9 public authority (50A426A4) (37017) ........ 275,000,000 568 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH FACILITIES (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Infrastructure Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 7 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 8 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 9 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 10 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 11 payment to the design and construction management account of the 12 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 13 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 14 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 15 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 16 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 17 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 18 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 19 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 20 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 21 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 22 (501125A4) (37015) ................................................. 23 6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $6,000,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 25 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 26 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 27 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 28 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 29 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 30 payment to the design and construction management account of the 31 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 32 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 33 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 34 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 35 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 36 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 37 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 38 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 39 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 40 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 41 (501124A4) (37015) ................................................. 42 6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $6,000,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 44 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 45 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 46 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 569 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 2 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 3 payment to the design and construction management account of the 4 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 5 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 6 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 7 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 8 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 9 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 10 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 11 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 12 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 13 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 14 (501123A4) (37015) ................................................. 15 6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $6,000,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 17 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 18 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 19 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 20 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 21 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 22 payment to the design and construction management account of the 23 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 24 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 25 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 26 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 27 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 28 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 29 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 30 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 31 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 32 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 33 (501122A4) (37015) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $6,000,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 35 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 36 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 37 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 38 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 39 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 40 payment to the design and construction management account of the 41 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 42 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 43 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 44 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 45 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 46 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 47 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 48 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 570 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 2 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 3 (501121A4) (37015) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $6,000,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 54, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 6 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 7 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 8 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 9 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 10 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 11 payment to the design and construction management account of the 12 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 13 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 14 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 15 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 16 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 17 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 18 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 19 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 20 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 21 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 22 (501120A4) (37015) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $5,992,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 54, 24 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 25 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 26 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 27 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 28 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 29 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 30 payment to the design and construction management account of the 31 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 32 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 33 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 34 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 35 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 36 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 37 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 38 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 39 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 40 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 41 (501119A4) (37015) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $4,358,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 43 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 44 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 45 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 46 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 47 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 571 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 2 payment to the design and construction management account of the 3 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 4 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 5 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 6 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 7 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 8 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 9 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 10 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 11 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 12 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 13 (501118A4) (37015) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $2,649,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 15 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 16 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 17 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 18 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 19 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 20 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 21 payment to the design and construction management account of the 22 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 23 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 24 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 25 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 26 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 27 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 28 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 29 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 30 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 31 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 32 (501117A4) (37015) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $1,676,000) 33 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 34 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 35 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 36 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 37 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 38 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 39 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 40 payment to the design and construction management account of the 41 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 42 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 43 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 44 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 45 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 46 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 47 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 48 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 572 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 2 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 3 (501116A4) (37015) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $2,096,000) 4 Capital Projects Funds - Other 5 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 6 Minor Rehabilitation Purpose 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 8 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 9 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 10 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 11 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 12 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 13 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 14 payment to the design and construction management account of the 15 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 16 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 17 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 18 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 19 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 20 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 21 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 22 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 23 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 24 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 25 (50101389) (36972) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $2,396,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 28 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 29 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 30 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 31 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 32 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 33 payment to the design and construction management account of the 34 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 35 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 36 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 37 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 38 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 39 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 40 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 41 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 42 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 43 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 44 (50101289) (36972) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $5,451,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 46 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 573 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 2 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 3 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 4 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 5 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 6 payment to the design and construction management account of the 7 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 8 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 9 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 10 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 11 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 12 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 13 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 14 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 15 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 16 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 17 (50101189) (36972) ... 6,000,000 .................... (re. $936,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 19 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 20 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 21 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 22 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 23 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 24 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 25 payment to the design and construction management account of the 26 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 27 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 28 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 29 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 30 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 31 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 32 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 33 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 34 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 35 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 36 (50101089) (36972) ... 6,000,000 .................... (re. $332,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 39 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 40 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 41 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 42 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 43 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 44 payment to the design and construction management account of the 45 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 46 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 47 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 48 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 574 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 2 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 3 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 4 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 5 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 6 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 7 (50100989) (36972) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $2,448,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 9 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 10 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 11 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 12 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 13 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 14 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 15 payment to the design and construction management account of the 16 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 17 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 18 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 19 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 20 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 21 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 22 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 23 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 24 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 25 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 26 (50100889) (36972) ... 6,000,000 .................... (re. $166,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 54, 28 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 29 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 30 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 31 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 32 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 33 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 34 payment to the design and construction management account of the 35 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 36 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 37 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 38 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 39 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 40 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 41 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 42 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 43 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 44 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 45 (50100789) (36972) ... 6,000,000 .................... (re. $632,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 54, 47 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 575 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 State aid to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 2 cies for acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements to exist- 3 ing community mental health facilities as required to address code 4 violations, health and safety issues, and/or structural/mechanical 5 deficiencies. Additionally, this appropriation may be used for 6 payment to the design and construction management account of the 7 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 8 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 9 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 10 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 11 ronmental impact statements for new, existing and reappropriated 12 capital projects and programs. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 13 provision of law, within the amounts hereby appropriated, the 14 commissioner of the office of mental health may provide state aid 15 grants of up to 100 per centum of reasonable capital costs associ- 16 ated with the acquisition, rehabilitation, and/or improvements 17 (50100689) (36972) ... 6,000,000 .................... (re. $111,000) 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Mental Health Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 20 OMH-Community Facilities Account - 32303 21 Infrastructure Purpose 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 23 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 24 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 25 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 26 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 27 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 28 Additionally, this appropriation may be used for payment of personal 29 service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits related 30 to the administration of the community capital program provided by 31 the office of mental health for new and reappropriated community 32 capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 33 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 34 be transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 35 (500125A4) (37015) ... 5,722,000 .................. (re. $5,396,000) 36 For the acquisition of property, construction, and rehabilitation of 37 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 38 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 39 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 40 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 41 Up to $10,000,000 of funds from this appropriation may be allocated to 42 support environmental modifications to improve access and other 43 aging in place needs for individuals in existing community based 44 residential programs. (50CR25A4) (37024) ........................... 45 60,000,000 ....................................... (re. $60,000,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 576 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 2 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 3 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 4 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 5 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 6 Additionally, this appropriation may be used for payment of personal 7 service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits related 8 to the administration of the community capital program provided by 9 the office of mental health for new and reappropriated community 10 capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 11 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 12 be transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 13 (500124A4) (37015) ... 5,722,000 .................. (re. $4,665,000) 14 For the acquisition of property, construction, and rehabilitation of 15 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 16 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 17 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 18 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 19 Up to $10,000,000 of funds from this appropriation may be allocated to 20 support environmental modifications to improve access and other 21 aging in place needs for individuals in existing community based 22 residential programs. (50CR24A4) (37024) ........................... 23 60,000,000 ....................................... (re. $59,947,000) 24 For the design, predevelopment acquisition of property, construction, 25 and rehabilitation of housing, including transition to home units, 26 for mentally ill persons under the auspice of municipalities and 27 other public and not-for-profit agencies, approved by the Commis- 28 sioner of the Office of Mental Health, pursuant to Article 41 of the 29 Mental Hygiene Law (50IL24A4) (37083) .............................. 30 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $25,000,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 32 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 33 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 34 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 35 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 36 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 37 Additionally, this appropriation may be used for payment of personal 38 service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits related 39 to the administration of the community capital program provided by 40 the office of mental health for new and reappropriated community 41 capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 42 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 43 be transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 44 (500123A4) (37015) ... 5,722,000 .................. (re. $5,026,000) 45 For the acquisition of property, construction, and rehabilitation of 46 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 47 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 48 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 49 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 577 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any provision 2 of law to the contrary, $9,000,000 of funds from this appropriation 3 shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the 4 temporary president of the senate and the director of the budget 5 which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount 6 to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating such 7 appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in a senate 8 resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resol- 9 ution must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to 10 the senate upon a roll call vote (50CR23A4) (37024) ................ 11 69,000,000 ....................................... (re. $63,200,000) 12 For the design, predevelopment, acquisition of property, construction 13 of new facilities and/or relocation of existing comprehensive 14 psychiatric emergency programs and/or psychiatric inpatient programs 15 under the auspice of municipalities and other public and not-for- 16 profit agencies, dually licensed pursuant to both article 31 of the 17 mental hygiene law and article 28 of the public health law 18 (50CP23A4) (37063) ... 60,000,000 ................ (re. $60,000,000) 19 For the design, predevelopment, acquisition of property, construction, 20 and rehabilitation of housing for people with mental illness under 21 the auspice of municipalities and other public and not-for-profit 22 agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office of mental 23 health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law (50RI23A4) 24 (37064) ... 915,000,000 ......................... (re. $887,364,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 26 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 27 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 28 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 29 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 30 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 31 Additionally, this appropriation may be used for payment of personal 32 service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits related 33 to the administration of the community capital program provided by 34 the office of mental health for new and reappropriated community 35 capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 36 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 37 be transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 38 (500122A4) (37015) ... 5,722,000 .................... (re. $726,000) 39 For the acquisition of property, construction, and rehabilitation of 40 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 41 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 42 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 43 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law 44 (50CR22A4) (37024) ... 60,000,000 ................ (re. $45,755,000) 45 For services and expenses of municipalities and not-for-profit agen- 46 cies licensed, certified, or approved by the office of mental 47 health, to support increased capacity and expansion of mental health 48 and substance use treatment services which may include but not be 49 limited to intensive crisis stabilization centers, intensive mobile 578 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 treatment, low barrier housing, supportive and reentry transitional 2 housing and inpatient alternatives to detention and treatment. A 3 portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to the office of 4 addiction services and supports for services and expenses related to 5 expanding mental health and substance use treatment services 6 (50IC22A4) (37062) ... 10,000,000 ................. (re. $7,385,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 8 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 9 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 10 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 11 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 12 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 13 Additionally, this appropriation may be used for payment of personal 14 service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits related 15 to the administration of the community capital program provided by 16 the office of mental health for new and reappropriated community 17 capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 18 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 19 be transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 20 (500121A4) (37015) ... 5,722,000 .................. (re. $1,797,000) 21 For the acquisition of property, construction, and rehabilitation of 22 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 23 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 24 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 25 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law 26 (50CR21A4) (37024) ... 60,000,000 ................ (re. $23,267,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 28 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 29 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 30 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 31 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 32 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 33 Additionally, this appropriation may be used for payment of personal 34 service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits related 35 to the administration of the community capital program provided by 36 the office of mental health for new and reappropriated community 37 capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 38 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 39 be transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 40 (500120A4) (37015) ... 5,722,000 .................. (re. $4,996,000) 41 For the acquisition of property, construction, and rehabilitation of 42 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 43 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 44 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 45 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law 46 (50CR20A4) (37024) ... 60,000,000 ................ (re. $37,642,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 579 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 2 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 3 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 4 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 5 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 6 Additionally, this appropriation may be used for payment of personal 7 service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits related 8 to the administration of the community capital program provided by 9 the office of mental health for new and reappropriated community 10 capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 11 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 12 be transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 13 (500119A4) (37015) ... 5,722,000 .................. (re. $2,223,000) 14 For the acquisition of property, construction, and rehabilitation of 15 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 16 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 17 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 18 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law 19 (50CR19A4) (37024) ... 60,000,000 ................ (re. $25,044,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 21 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 22 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 23 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 24 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 25 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 26 Additionally, this appropriation may be used for payment of personal 27 service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits related 28 to the administration of the community capital program provided by 29 the office of mental health for new and reappropriated community 30 capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 31 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 32 be transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 33 (500118A4) (37015) ... 5,722,000 .................. (re. $2,166,000) 34 For the acquisition of property, construction, and rehabilitation of 35 new facilities, for purposes of developing residential crisis 36 programs, which may include the renovation of existing community 37 mental health facilities for such purposes, under the auspice of 38 municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agencies, 39 approved by the commissioner of the office of mental health, pursu- 40 ant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law (50CR18A4) (37024) 41 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $38,418,000) 42 For services and expenses of not-for-profit agencies licensed, certi- 43 fied or approved by the office of mental health, to support the 44 preservation, restructuring, or expansion of children's behavioral 45 health services (501218A4) (37019) ................................. 46 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,706,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 48 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 580 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 2 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 3 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 4 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 5 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 6 Additionally, this appropriation may be used for payment of personal 7 service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits related 8 to the administration of the community capital program provided by 9 the office of mental health for new and reappropriated community 10 capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 11 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 12 be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the 13 state of New York (500117A4) (37015) ............................... 14 5,722,000 ............................................ (re. $35,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as transferred by chapter 16 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 17 For services and expenses of not-for-profit agencies licensed, certi- 18 fied or approved by the office of mental health, to support the 19 preservation, restructuring, or expansion of children's behavioral 20 health services (501217A4) (37019) ................................. 21 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,806,000) 22 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 23 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 24 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 25 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 26 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 27 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 28 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 29 Additionally, this appropriation may be used for payment of personal 30 service and nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits related 31 to the administration of the community capital program provided by 32 the office of mental health for new and reappropriated community 33 capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 34 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 35 be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the 36 state of New York (500116A4) (37015) ............................... 37 5,722,000 ............................................ (re. $59,000) 38 Capital Projects Funds - Other 39 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 40 OMH-Community Facilities Account - 32303 41 New Facilities Purpose 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 43 For payment to municipalities and not-for-profit community providers 44 for the acquisition of property, design, construction and rehabili- 45 tation of housing for mentally ill persons. To the extent that any 46 portion of such appropriation is utilized to develop housing in any 581 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 city having a population of one million or more, that portion of the 2 appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis. Notwithstanding any 3 other provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts appropri- 4 ated herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer 5 without limit with any appropriation of the office of mental health 6 capital projects budget, upon the request of the commissioner of 7 mental health and with the approval of the director of the budget, 8 who shall file such approval with the department of audit and 9 control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance 10 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 11 (50VY0807) (36975) ... 145,000,000 ............... (re. $37,044,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 13 For payment to municipalities and not-for-profit community providers 14 for the acquisition of property, design, construction and rehabili- 15 tation of housing for mentally ill persons. To the extent that any 16 portion of such appropriation is utilized to develop housing in any 17 city having a population of one million or more, that portion of the 18 appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis. Notwithstanding any 19 other provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts appropri- 20 ated herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer 21 without limit with any appropriation of the office of mental health 22 capital projects budget, upon the request of the commissioner of 23 mental health and with the approval of the director of the budget, 24 who shall file such approval with the department of audit and 25 control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance 26 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 27 (50VY0707) (36975) ... 200,000,000 .............. (re. $112,897,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 29 For payment to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit 30 community providers approved by the commissioner of the office of 31 mental health, pursuant to mental hygiene law, for the acquisition 32 of property, construction and rehabilitation of supportive housing 33 for mentally ill homeless persons. Notwithstanding any other 34 provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts appropriated 35 herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer 36 without limit with any appropriation of the office of mental health 37 capital projects budget, upon the request of the commissioner of 38 mental health and with the approval of the director of the budget, 39 who shall file such approval with the department of audit and 40 control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance 41 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 42 (50VY0607) (36975) ... 211,000,000 ............... (re. $99,097,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 54, 44 section 1, of the laws of 2014: 45 For payment to municipalities and not-for-profit community providers 46 for the acquisition of property, design, construction and rehabili- 47 tation of housing for mentally ill persons. Of such appropriation up 582 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 to eighty percent shall be matched on a 50/50 basis. Notwithstanding 2 any other provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts 3 appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or 4 transfer without limit with any appropriation of the office of 5 mental health capital projects budget, upon the request of the 6 commissioner of mental health and with the approval of the director 7 of the budget, who shall file such approval with the department of 8 audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate 9 finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means 10 committee (50VY0507) (36975) ... 75,000,000 ...... (re. $22,154,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 54, 12 section 1, of the laws of 2014: 13 For payment to municipalities and not-for-profit community providers 14 for the acquisition of property, design, construction and rehabili- 15 tation of housing for mentally ill persons. Of such appropriation up 16 to eighty percent shall be matched on a 50/50 basis. Notwithstanding 17 any other provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts 18 appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or 19 transfer without limit with any appropriation of the office of 20 mental health capital projects budget, upon the request of the 21 commissioner of mental health and with the approval of the director 22 of the budget, who shall file such approval with the department of 23 audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate 24 finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means 25 committee (50VY0307) (36975) ... 65,000,000 ...... (re. $23,365,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1999, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2014: 28 For payment to municipalities and not-for-profit community providers 29 for the acquisition of property, design, construction and rehabili- 30 tation of housing for mentally ill persons. Of such appropriation 31 eighty percent shall be matched on a 50/50 basis and twenty percent 32 shall not require a match. Notwithstanding any other provision of 33 law to the contrary, any of the amounts appropriated herein may be 34 increased or decreased by interchange or transfer without limit with 35 any appropriation of the office of mental health capital projects 36 budget, upon the request of the commissioner of mental health and 37 with the approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such 38 approval with the department of audit and control and copies thereof 39 with the chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman 40 of the assembly ways and means committee (50VY9907) (36975) ........ 41 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,102,000) 42 Capital Projects Funds - Other 43 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 44 OMH-Community Facilities Account - 32303 45 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 583 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 2 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 3 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 4 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 5 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law 6 (50231303) (36977) ... 5,000,000 ..................... (re. $45,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 8 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 9 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 10 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 11 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 12 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law 13 (50231203) (36977) ... 5,000,000 ..................... (re. $17,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 15 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 16 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 17 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 18 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 19 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law 20 (50231103) (36977) ... 5,000,000 ..................... (re. $82,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 22 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 23 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 24 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 25 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 26 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law 27 (50231003) (36977) ... 5,000,000 .................... (re. $851,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 29 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 30 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 31 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 32 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 33 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law 34 (50230903) (36977) ... 5,000,000 .................... (re. $163,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2014: 37 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 38 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 39 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 40 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 41 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any of 43 the amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by 44 interchange or transfer without limit with any appropriation of the 45 office of mental health capital projects budget, upon the request of 584 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the commissioner of mental health and with the approval of the 2 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 3 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 4 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 5 ways and means committee (50230803) (36977) ........................ 6 28,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,084,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 54, 8 section 1, of the laws of 2014: 9 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 10 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 11 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 12 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 13 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any of 15 the amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by 16 interchange or transfer without limit with any appropriation of the 17 office of mental health capital projects budget, upon the request of 18 the commissioner of mental health and with the approval of the 19 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 20 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 21 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 22 ways and means committee (50230703) (36977) ........................ 23 112,000,000 ...................................... (re. $19,852,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 54, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2014: 26 For the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of 27 new facilities and/or relocation of existing community mental health 28 facilities under the auspice of municipalities and other public and 29 not-for-profit agencies, approved by the commissioner of the office 30 of mental health, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any of 32 the amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by 33 interchange or transfer without limit with any appropriation of the 34 office of mental health capital projects budget, upon the request of 35 the commissioner of mental health and with the approval of the 36 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 37 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 38 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 39 ways and means committee (50230603) (36977) ........................ 40 15,000,000 .......................................... (re. $450,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2001: 42 For the acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation and/or 43 relocation of existing community mental health facilities under the 44 auspice of municipalities and other public and not-for-profit agen- 45 cies, approved by the commissioner of the office of mental health, 46 pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law (50230103) (36977) 47 ... 5,000,000 ........................................ (re. $16,000) 585 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENT OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Health and Safety Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 6 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 7 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 8 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing facil- 9 ities and programs, provided, however, that no expenditures may be 10 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 11 has been approved by the director of the budget. Upon request of the 12 commissioner of mental health and approval by the director of the 13 budget, this appropriation may be transferred to the dormitory 14 authority of the state of New York (50HS1301) (81028) .............. 15 6,274,000 ........................................... (re. $165,000) 16 Capital Projects Funds - Other 17 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 18 MH Capital Improvement Account - 32309 19 Accreditation Purpose 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 21 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 22 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 23 struction and improvements, including the preparation of designs, 24 plans, specifications and estimates related to accreditation 25 improvements to existing facilities and programs. This appropriation 26 may be used for payment of personal service, indirect cost recovery, 27 and fringe benefit costs associated with New York State employees 28 assigned to such capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner 29 of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, this 30 appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory 31 authority of the state of New York. Notwithstanding any other 32 provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts appropriated 33 herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer 34 without limit with any appropriation of the office of mental health 35 capital projects budget, upon the request of the commissioner of 36 mental health and with the approval of the director of the budget, 37 who shall file such approval with the department of audit and 38 control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance 39 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 40 (50061302) (36910) ... 28,188,000 ................. (re. $2,131,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 43 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 44 struction and improvements, including the preparation of designs, 45 plans, specifications and estimates related to accreditation 586 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 improvements to existing facilities and programs. This appropriation 2 may be used for payment of personal service, indirect cost recovery, 3 and fringe benefit costs associated with New York State employees 4 assigned to such capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner 5 of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, this 6 appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory 7 authority of the state of New York. Notwithstanding any other 8 provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts appropriated 9 herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer 10 without limit with any appropriation of the office of mental health 11 capital projects budget, upon the request of the commissioner of 12 mental health and with the approval of the director of the budget, 13 who shall file such approval with the department of audit and 14 control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance 15 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 16 (50061202) (36910) ... 14,441,000 ................... (re. $561,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 18 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 19 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 20 struction and improvements, including the preparation of designs, 21 plans, specifications and estimates related to accreditation 22 improvements to existing facilities and programs. This appropriation 23 may be used for payment of personal service, indirect cost recovery, 24 and fringe benefit costs associated with New York State employees 25 assigned to such capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner 26 of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, this 27 appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory 28 authority of the state of New York (50061002) (36910) .............. 29 9,565,000 ........................................... (re. $512,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 31 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 32 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 33 struction and improvements, including the preparation of designs, 34 plans, specifications and estimates related to accreditation 35 improvements to existing facilities and programs. This appropriation 36 may be used for payment of personal service, indirect cost recovery, 37 and fringe benefit costs associated with New York State employees 38 assigned to such capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner 39 of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, this 40 appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory 41 authority of the state of New York. Notwithstanding any other 42 provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts appropriated 43 herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer 44 without limit with any appropriation of the office of mental health 45 capital projects budget, upon the request of the commissioner of 46 mental health and with the approval of the director of the budget, 47 who shall file such approval with the department of audit and 48 control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance 587 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 2 (50060902) (36910) ... 347,480,000 ................ (re. $1,208,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 4 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 5 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 6 struction and improvements, including the preparation of designs, 7 plans, specifications and estimates related to accreditation 8 improvements to existing facilities and programs. This appropriation 9 may be used for payment of personal service, indirect cost recovery, 10 and fringe benefit costs associated with New York State employees 11 assigned to such capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner 12 of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, this 13 appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory 14 authority of the state of New York. Notwithstanding any other 15 provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts appropriated 16 herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer 17 without limit with any appropriation of the office of mental health 18 capital projects budget, upon the request of the commissioner of 19 mental health and with the approval of the director of the budget, 20 who shall file such approval with the department of audit and 21 control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance 22 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 23 (50060802) (36910) ... 95,624,000 ................... (re. $782,000) 24 Capital Projects Funds - Other 25 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 26 MH Capital Improvement Account - 32309 27 Health and Safety Purpose 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 29 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 30 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 31 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 32 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing facil- 33 ities and programs, provided, however, that no expenditures may be 34 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 35 has been approved by the director of the budget. This appropriation 36 may be used for payment of personal service, indirect cost recovery, 37 and fringe benefit costs associated with New York State employees 38 assigned to such capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner 39 of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, this 40 appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory 41 authority of the state of New York. Notwithstanding any other 42 provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts appropriated 43 herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer 44 without limit with any appropriation of the office of mental health 45 capital projects budget, upon the request of the commissioner of 46 mental health and with the approval of the director of the budget, 47 who shall file such approval with the department of audit and 588 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance 2 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 3 (50011301) (81028) ... 28,737,000 ................. (re. $5,933,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 6 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 7 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 8 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing facil- 9 ities and programs, provided, however, that no expenditures may be 10 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 11 has been approved by the director of the budget. This appropriation 12 may be used for payment of personal service, indirect cost recovery, 13 and fringe benefit costs associated with New York State employees 14 assigned to such capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner 15 of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, this 16 appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory 17 authority of the state of New York. Notwithstanding any other 18 provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts appropriated 19 herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer 20 without limit with any appropriation of the office of mental health 21 capital projects budget, upon the request of the commissioner of 22 mental health and with the approval of the director of the budget, 23 who shall file such approval with the department of audit and 24 control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance 25 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 26 (50011201) (81028) ... 24,920,000 ................... (re. $258,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 28 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 29 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 30 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 31 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing facil- 32 ities and programs, provided, however, that no expenditures may be 33 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 34 has been approved by the director of the budget. This appropriation 35 may be used for payment of personal service, indirect cost recovery, 36 and fringe benefit costs associated with New York State employees 37 assigned to such capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner 38 of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, this 39 appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory 40 authority of the state of New York. Notwithstanding any other 41 provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts appropriated 42 herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer 43 without limit with any appropriation of the office of mental health 44 capital projects budget, upon the request of the commissioner of 45 mental health and with the approval of the director of the budget, 46 who shall file such approval with the department of audit and 47 control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance 589 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 2 (50011001) (81028) ... 37,066,000 ................... (re. $372,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 4 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 5 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 6 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 7 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing facil- 8 ities and programs, provided, however, that no expenditures may be 9 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 10 has been approved by the director of the budget. This appropriation 11 may be used for payment of personal service, indirect cost recovery, 12 and fringe benefit costs associated with New York State employees 13 assigned to such capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner 14 of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, this 15 appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory 16 authority of the state of New York. Notwithstanding any other 17 provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts appropriated 18 herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer 19 without limit with any appropriation of the office of mental health 20 capital projects budget, upon the request of the commissioner of 21 mental health and with the approval of the director of the budget, 22 who shall file such approval with the department of audit and 23 control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance 24 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 25 (50010901) (81028) ... 38,125,000 ................... (re. $578,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 28 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 29 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 30 and estimates, for health and safety improvements to existing facil- 31 ities and programs, provided, however, that no expenditures may be 32 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 33 has been approved by the director of the budget. This appropriation 34 may be used for payment of personal service, indirect cost recovery, 35 and fringe benefit costs associated with New York State employees 36 assigned to such capital projects. Upon request of the commissioner 37 of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, this 38 appropriation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory 39 authority of the state of New York. Notwithstanding any other 40 provision of law to the contrary, any of the amounts appropriated 41 herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer 42 without limit with any appropriation of the office of mental health 43 capital projects budget, upon the request of the commissioner of 44 mental health and with the approval of the director of the budget, 45 who shall file such approval with the department of audit and 46 control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance 47 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 48 (50010801) (81028) ... 60,276,000 ................... (re. $610,000) 590 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 3 MH Capital Improvement Account - 32309 4 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 8 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 9 and estimates, and minor rehabilitation and improvements for the 10 preservation of existing facilities and programs, provided, however, 11 that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 12 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 13 the budget. This appropriation may be used for payment of personal 14 service, indirect cost recovery, and fringe benefit costs associated 15 with New York State employees assigned to such capital projects. 16 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 17 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be transferred or 18 suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state of New York. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any of 20 the amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by 21 interchange or transfer without limit with any appropriation of the 22 office of mental health capital projects budget, upon the request of 23 the commissioner of mental health and with the approval of the 24 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 25 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 26 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 27 ways and means committee (50031303) (81010) ........................ 28 51,546,000 ........................................ (re. $6,975,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 30 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 31 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 32 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 33 and estimates, and minor rehabilitation and improvements for the 34 preservation of existing facilities and programs, provided, however, 35 that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 36 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 37 the budget. This appropriation may be used for payment of personal 38 service, indirect cost recovery, and fringe benefit costs associated 39 with New York State employees assigned to such capital projects. 40 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 41 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be transferred or 42 suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state of New York. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any of 44 the amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by 45 interchange or transfer without limit with any appropriation of the 46 office of mental health capital projects budget, upon the request of 47 the commissioner of mental health and with the approval of the 48 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 591 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 2 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 3 ways and means committee (50031203) (81010) ........................ 4 48,743,000 ........................................ (re. $3,266,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 8 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 9 and estimates, and minor rehabilitation and improvements for the 10 preservation of existing facilities and programs, provided, however, 11 that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 12 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 13 the budget. This appropriation may be used for payment of personal 14 service, indirect cost recovery, and fringe benefit costs associated 15 with New York State employees assigned to such capital projects. 16 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 17 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be transferred or 18 suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state of New York. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any of 20 the amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by 21 interchange or transfer without limit with any appropriation of the 22 office of mental health capital projects budget, upon the request of 23 the commissioner of mental health and with the approval of the 24 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 25 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 26 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 27 ways and means committee (50031103) (81010) ........................ 28 59,543,000 ........................................ (re. $1,651,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 30 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 31 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 32 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 33 and estimates, and minor rehabilitation and improvements for the 34 preservation of existing facilities and programs, provided, however, 35 that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 36 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 37 the budget. This appropriation may be used for payment of personal 38 service, indirect cost recovery, and fringe benefit costs associated 39 with New York State employees assigned to such capital projects. 40 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 41 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be transferred or 42 suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state of New York. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any of 44 the amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by 45 interchange or transfer without limit with any appropriation of the 46 office of mental health capital projects budget, upon the request of 47 the commissioner of mental health and with the approval of the 48 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 592 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 2 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 3 ways and means committee (50031003) (81010) ........................ 4 110,767,000 ....................................... (re. $3,497,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 8 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 9 and estimates, and minor rehabilitation and improvements for the 10 preservation of existing facilities and programs, provided, however, 11 that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 12 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 13 the budget. This appropriation may be used for payment of personal 14 service, indirect cost recovery, and fringe benefit costs associated 15 with New York State employees assigned to such capital projects. 16 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 17 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be transferred or 18 suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state of New York. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any of 20 the amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by 21 interchange or transfer without limit with any appropriation of the 22 office of mental health capital projects budget, upon the request of 23 the commissioner of mental health and with the approval of the 24 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 25 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 26 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 27 ways and means committee (50030903) (81010) ........................ 28 45,396,000 .......................................... (re. $386,000) 29 Capital Projects Funds - Other 30 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 31 MH Capital Improvement Account - 32309 32 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 34 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 35 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 36 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 37 and estimates related to improvements or changes to existing facili- 38 ties and programs. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 39 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 40 be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the 41 state of New York. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 42 contrary, any of the amounts appropriated herein may be increased or 43 decreased by interchange or transfer without limit with any appro- 44 priation of the office of mental health capital projects budget, 45 upon the request of the commissioner of mental health and with the 46 approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval 47 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 593 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 2 assembly ways and means committee (50081308) (81063) ............... 3 22,878,000 ........................................ (re. $2,659,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 6 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 7 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 8 and estimates related to improvements or changes to existing facili- 9 ties and programs. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 10 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 11 be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the 12 state of New York. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 13 contrary, any of the amounts appropriated herein may be increased or 14 decreased by interchange or transfer without limit with any appro- 15 priation of the office of mental health capital projects budget, 16 upon the request of the commissioner of mental health and with the 17 approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval 18 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 19 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 20 assembly ways and means committee (50081208) (81063) ............... 21 36,455,000 ........................................ (re. $1,286,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 23 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 24 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 25 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 26 and estimates related to improvements or changes to existing facili- 27 ties and programs. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 28 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 29 be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the 30 state of New York (50081008) (81063) ............................... 31 16,937,000 .......................................... (re. $121,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 33 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 34 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 35 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 36 and estimates related to improvements or changes to existing facili- 37 ties and programs. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 38 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 39 be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the 40 state of New York. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 41 contrary, any of the amounts appropriated herein may be increased or 42 decreased by interchange or transfer without limit with any appro- 43 priation of the office of mental health capital projects budget, 44 upon the request of the commissioner of mental health and with the 45 approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval 46 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 47 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 594 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 assembly ways and means committee (50080908) (81063) ............... 2 85,185,000 ........................................ (re. $1,034,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 4 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 5 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction and improve- 6 ments, including the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 7 and estimates related to improvements or changes to existing facili- 8 ties and programs. Upon request of the commissioner of mental health 9 and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may 10 be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the 11 state of New York. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 12 contrary, any of the amounts appropriated herein may be increased or 13 decreased by interchange or transfer without limit with any appro- 14 priation of the office of mental health capital projects budget, 15 upon the request of the commissioner of mental health and with the 16 approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval 17 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 18 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 19 assembly ways and means committee (50080808) (81063) ............... 20 32,952,000 .......................................... (re. $898,000) 21 NON-BONDABLE PROJECTS (CCP) 22 Capital Projects Funds - Other 23 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 24 Non-Bondable Purpose 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 26 For transfer to the Mental Hygiene Capital Improvement Fund for 27 reimbursement of the non-bondable cost of projects for community 28 facilities authorized by appropriations or reappropriations funded 29 from the Mental Hygiene Capital Improvement Fund including liabil- 30 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 or for payment to the dormito- 31 ry authority of the state of New York for defeasance of bonds. Upon 32 request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by the 33 director of the budget, this appropriation may be transferred to the 34 dormitory authority of the state of New York (500525NB) (81042) .... 35 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 37 For transfer to the Mental Hygiene Capital Improvement Fund for 38 reimbursement of the non-bondable cost of projects for community 39 facilities authorized by appropriations or reappropriations funded 40 from the Mental Hygiene Capital Improvement Fund including liabil- 41 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 or for payment to the dormito- 42 ry authority of the state of New York for defeasance of bonds. Upon 43 request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by the 44 director of the budget, this appropriation may be transferred to the 595 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 dormitory authority of the state of New York (500524NB) (81042) .... 2 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $195,000) 3 STATE MENTAL HEALTH FACILITIES (CCP) 4 Capital Projects Funds - Other 5 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 6 Infrastructure Purpose 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 8 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 9 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 10 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 11 existing, and reappropriated capital projects and programs, includ- 12 ing, but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, main- 13 tenance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, 14 energy conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health 15 and safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 16 improvement or program changes, maintenance and operation of various 17 facilities and systems including personal services, fringe benefits, 18 and indirect costs; provided, however, that no expenditures may be 19 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 20 has been approved by the director of the budget. Additionally, this 21 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 22 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 23 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 24 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 25 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 26 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 27 and environmental impact statements for new, existing and reappro- 28 priated capital projects and programs. Upon request of the commis- 29 sioner of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, 30 this appropriation may be transferred to the dormitory authority of 31 the state of New York. Furthermore, upon approval of the director of 32 the budget, funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or 33 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 34 (50IS25A4) (37017) ... 96,750,000 ................ (re. $68,035,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 36 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 37 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 38 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 39 existing, and reappropriated capital projects and programs, includ- 40 ing, but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, main- 41 tenance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, 42 energy conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health 43 and safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 44 improvement or program changes, maintenance and operation of various 45 facilities and systems including personal services, fringe benefits, 46 and indirect costs; provided, however, that no expenditures may be 596 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 2 has been approved by the director of the budget. Additionally, this 3 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 4 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 5 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 6 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 7 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 8 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 9 and environmental impact statements for new, existing and reappro- 10 priated capital projects and programs. Upon request of the commis- 11 sioner of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, 12 this appropriation may be transferred to the dormitory authority of 13 the state of New York. Furthermore, upon approval of the director of 14 the budget, funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or 15 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 16 (50IS24A4) (37017) ... 211,750,000 .............. (re. $119,889,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 18 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 19 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 20 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 21 existing, and reappropriated capital projects and programs, includ- 22 ing, but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, main- 23 tenance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, 24 energy conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health 25 and safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 26 improvement or program changes, maintenance and operation of various 27 facilities and systems including personal services, fringe benefits, 28 and indirect costs; provided, however, that no expenditures may be 29 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 30 has been approved by the director of the budget. Additionally, this 31 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 32 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 33 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 34 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 35 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 36 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 37 and environmental impact statements for new, existing and reappro- 38 priated capital projects and programs. Upon request of the commis- 39 sioner of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, 40 this appropriation may be transferred to the dormitory authority of 41 the state of New York. Furthermore, upon approval of the director of 42 the budget, funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or 43 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 44 (50IS23A4) (37017) ... 96,750,000 ................ (re. $11,964,000) 45 For payment of the cost of demolition, including the preparation of 46 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, environmental studies, 47 and environmental remediation related to the disposal of facilities 48 determined by the commissioner of mental health to be in poor and/or 49 uninhabitable condition and for which no state agency has long-term 597 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 use. This appropriation may be used for payment to the design and 2 construction management account of the centralized services fund of 3 the New York state office of general services or to the dormitory 4 authority of the state of New York for the purpose of preparation 5 and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 6 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 7 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements. 8 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 9 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be transferred to 10 the dormitory authority of the state of New York (50DE23A4) (37065) 11 ... 14,000,000 .................................... (re. $4,566,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 13 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 14 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 15 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 16 existing, and reappropriated capital projects and programs, includ- 17 ing, but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, main- 18 tenance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, 19 energy conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health 20 and safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 21 improvement or program changes, maintenance and operation of various 22 facilities and systems including personal services, fringe benefits, 23 and indirect costs; provided, however, that no expenditures may be 24 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 25 has been approved by the director of the budget. Additionally, this 26 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 27 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 28 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 29 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 30 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 31 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 32 and environmental impact statements for new, existing and reappro- 33 priated capital projects and programs. Upon request of the commis- 34 sioner of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, 35 this appropriation may be transferred to the dormitory authority of 36 the state of New York. Furthermore, upon approval of the director of 37 the budget, funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or 38 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 39 (50IS22A4) (37017) ... 86,750,000 ................. (re. $7,418,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 41 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 42 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 43 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 44 existing, and reappropriated capital projects and programs, includ- 45 ing, but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, main- 46 tenance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, 47 energy conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health 48 and safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 598 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 improvement or program changes, maintenance and operation of various 2 facilities and systems including personal services, fringe benefits, 3 and indirect costs; provided, however, that no expenditures may be 4 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 5 has been approved by the director of the budget. Additionally, this 6 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 7 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 8 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 9 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 10 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 11 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 12 and environmental impact statements for new, existing and reappro- 13 priated capital projects and programs. Upon request of the commis- 14 sioner of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, 15 this appropriation may be transferred to the dormitory authority of 16 the state of New York. Furthermore, upon approval of the director of 17 the budget, funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or 18 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 19 (50IS21A4) (37017) ... 86,750,000 ................. (re. $5,479,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 54, 21 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 22 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 23 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 24 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 25 existing, and reappropriated capital projects and programs, includ- 26 ing, but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, main- 27 tenance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, 28 energy conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health 29 and safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 30 improvement or program changes, maintenance and operation of various 31 facilities and systems including personal services, fringe benefits, 32 and indirect costs; provided, however, that no expenditures may be 33 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 34 has been approved by the director of the budget. Additionally, this 35 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 36 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 37 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 38 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 39 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 40 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 41 and environmental impact statements for new, existing and reappro- 42 priated capital projects and programs. Upon request of the commis- 43 sioner of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, 44 this appropriation may be transferred to the dormitory authority of 45 the state of New York. Furthermore, upon approval of the director of 46 the budget, funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or 47 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 48 (50IS20A4) (37017) ... 91,750,000 .................... (re. $41,000) 599 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 2 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 3 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 4 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 5 existing, and reappropriated capital projects and programs, includ- 6 ing, but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, main- 7 tenance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, 8 energy conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health 9 and safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 10 improvement or program changes, maintenance and operation of various 11 facilities and systems including personal services, fringe benefits, 12 and indirect costs; provided, however, that no expenditures may be 13 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 14 has been approved by the director of the budget. Additionally, this 15 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 16 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 17 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 18 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 19 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 20 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 21 and environmental impact statements for new, existing and reappro- 22 priated capital projects and programs. Upon request of the commis- 23 sioner of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, 24 this appropriation may be transferred to the dormitory authority of 25 the state of New York. Furthermore, upon approval of the director of 26 the budget, funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or 27 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 28 (50IS19A4) (37017) ... 86,750,000 ................. (re. $1,508,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 30 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 31 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 32 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 33 existing, and reappropriated capital projects and programs, includ- 34 ing, but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, main- 35 tenance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, 36 energy conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health 37 and safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 38 improvement or program changes, maintenance and operation of various 39 facilities and systems including personal services, fringe benefits, 40 and indirect costs; provided, however, that no expenditures may be 41 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 42 has been approved by the director of the budget. Additionally, this 43 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 44 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 45 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 46 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 47 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 48 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 49 and environmental impact statements for new, existing and reappro- 600 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 priated capital projects and programs. Upon request of the commis- 2 sioner of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, 3 this appropriation may be transferred to the dormitory authority of 4 the state of New York. Furthermore, upon approval of the director of 5 the budget, funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or 6 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 7 (50IS18A4) (37017) ... 86,750,000 ................... (re. $171,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 9 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 10 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 11 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 12 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 13 existing, and reappropriated capital projects and programs, includ- 14 ing, but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, main- 15 tenance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, 16 energy conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health 17 and safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 18 improvement or program changes, maintenance and operation of various 19 facilities and systems including personal services, fringe benefits, 20 and indirect costs; provided, however, that no expenditures may be 21 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 22 has been approved by the director of the budget. Additionally, this 23 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 24 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 25 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 26 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 27 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 28 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 29 and environmental impact statements for new, existing and reappro- 30 priated capital projects and programs. Upon request of the commis- 31 sioner of mental health and approval by the director of the budget, 32 this appropriation may be transferred to the dormitory authority of 33 the state of New York. Furthermore, upon approval of the director of 34 the budget, funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or 35 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 36 (50IS17A4) (37017) ... 97,248,000 ................. (re. $1,537,000) 37 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 39 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 40 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 41 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 42 existing, and reappropriated capital projects and programs, includ- 43 ing, but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, main- 44 tenance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, 45 energy conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health 46 and safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 47 improvement or program changes; provided, however, that no expendi- 48 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 601 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget. Addi- 2 tionally, this appropriation may be used for payment to the design 3 and construction management account of the centralized services fund 4 of the New York state office of general services or to the dormitory 5 authority of the state of New York for the purpose of preparation 6 and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 7 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 8 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 9 new, existing and reappropriated capital projects and programs. 10 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 11 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be transferred to 12 the dormitory authority of the state of New York. Furthermore, upon 13 approval of the director of the budget, funds from this appropri- 14 ation may be transferred to the office for people with developmental 15 disabilities and the office of addiction services and supports for 16 payment to the dormitory authority of the state of New York in 17 relation to the preparation of plans (50IS16A4) (37017) ............ 18 84,450,000 .......................................... (re. $407,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 21 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 22 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 23 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 24 existing, and reappropriated capital projects and programs, includ- 25 ing, but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, main- 26 tenance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, 27 energy conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health 28 and safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 29 improvement or program changes; provided, however, that no expendi- 30 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 31 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget. Addi- 32 tionally, this appropriation may be used for payment to the design 33 and construction management account of the centralized services fund 34 of the New York state office of general services or to the dormitory 35 authority of the state of New York for the purpose of preparation 36 and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 37 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 38 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 39 new, existing and reappropriated capital projects and programs. 40 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 41 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be transferred to 42 the dormitory authority of the state of New York. Furthermore, upon 43 approval of the director of the budget, funds from this appropri- 44 ation may be transferred to the office for people with developmental 45 disabilities and the office of addiction services and supports for 46 payment to the dormitory authority of the state of New York in 47 relation to the preparation of plans (50IS14A4) (37017) ............ 48 36,950,000 ........................................ (re. $8,992,000) 602 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 3 MH Capital Improvement Account - 32309 4 Infrastructure Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 7 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 8 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 9 existing and reappropriated capital projects and programs including, 10 but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, mainte- 11 nance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, energy 12 conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health and 13 safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 14 improvement or program changes; provided, however, that no expendi- 15 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 16 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget. This 17 appropriation may be used for payment of personal service and 18 nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, and indirect cost 19 recovery, related to the administration of the capital projects and 20 programs provided by the office of mental health. Additionally, 21 this appropriation may be used for payment to the design and 22 construction management account of the centralized services fund of 23 the New York state office of general services or to the dormitory 24 authority of the state of New York for the purpose of preparation 25 and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 26 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 27 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 28 new and existing projects. Upon request of the commissioner of 29 mental health and approval by the director of the budget, this 30 appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to any department, 31 agency, or public authority (50A425A4) (37017) ..................... 32 275,000,000 ..................................... (re. $274,818,000) 33 For payment of the costs of the forensic expansion project on Ward's 34 Island; provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from 35 this appropriation until a comprehensive plan for the project has 36 been approved by the director of the division of budget. 37 This appropriation may be used for payment of costs of construction, 38 reconstruction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prep- 39 aration of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, improvement 40 of existing facilities, new facilities, energy conservation, envi- 41 ronmental protection or improvement, health and safety, preservation 42 of facilities; and for personal service and nonpersonal service, 43 including fringe benefits, and indirect cost recovery, related to 44 the administration of the capital projects and programs provided by 45 the office of mental health. Additionally, this appropriation may be 46 used for payment to the design and construction management account 47 of the centralized services fund of the New York state office of 48 general services or to the dormitory authority of the state of New 49 York for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, specifica- 603 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 tions, estimates, services, construction management and supervision, 2 inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 3 impact statements for this project (50FE25A4) (37066) .............. 4 160,000,000 ..................................... (re. $160,000,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 7 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 8 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 9 existing and reappropriated capital projects and programs including, 10 but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, mainte- 11 nance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, energy 12 conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health and 13 safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 14 improvement or program changes; provided, however, that no expendi- 15 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 16 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget. This 17 appropriation may be used for payment of personal service and 18 nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, and indirect cost 19 recovery, related to the administration of the capital projects and 20 programs provided by the office of mental health. Additionally, this 21 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 22 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 23 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 24 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 25 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 26 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 27 and environmental impact statements for new and existing projects. 28 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 29 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 30 or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 31 (50A424A4) (37017) ................................................. 32 275,000,000 ..................................... (re. $259,801,000) 33 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 34 tation and improvements, including the preparation of designs, 35 plans, specifications and estimates for capital projects and 36 programs addressing the emergent need to expand inpatient capacity 37 within the office of mental health's state-operated system, includ- 38 ing transition to home units, and may be used for payment to the 39 design and construction management account of the centralized 40 services fund of the New York state office of general services or to 41 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for the purpose of 42 preparation and review of plans, specifications, estimates, 43 services, construction management and supervision, inspection, 44 studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 45 statements for new and existing projects. 46 Notwithstanding section 8 of the public buildings law, section 2879 of 47 the public authorities law, and section 142 of the economic develop- 48 ment law or any other inconsistent provision of law, in order to 49 expedite projects, the office of general services and the dormitory 604 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 authority of the state of New York are authorized to award cost plus 2 percentage fee contracts. Funds available for expenditure pursuant 3 to this appropriation may be allocated and distributed by the 4 commissioner of the office of mental health (50IE24A4) (37066) 5 12,000,000 ....................................... (re. $12,000,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 7 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 8 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 9 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 10 existing and reappropriated capital projects and programs including, 11 but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, mainte- 12 nance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, energy 13 conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health and 14 safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 15 improvement or program changes; provided, however, that no expendi- 16 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 17 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget. This 18 appropriation may be used for payment of personal service and 19 nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, and indirect cost 20 recovery, related to the administration of the capital projects and 21 programs provided by the office of mental health. Additionally, this 22 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 23 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 24 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 25 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 26 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 27 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 28 and environmental impact statements for new and existing projects. 29 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 30 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 31 or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 32 (50A423A4) (37017) ................................................. 33 275,000,000 ..................................... (re. $248,820,000) 34 For payment of the cost of construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 35 tation and improvements, including the preparation of designs, 36 plans, specifications and estimates for capital projects and 37 programs addressing the emergent need to expand inpatient capacity 38 within the office of mental health's state-operated system and may 39 be used for payment to the design and construction management 40 account of the centralized services fund of the New York state 41 office of general services or to the dormitory authority of the 42 state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 43 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 44 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 45 and environmental impact statements for new and existing projects. 46 Notwithstanding section 8 of the public buildings law, section 2879 of 47 the public authorities law, and section 142 of the economic develop- 48 ment law or any other inconsistent provision of law, in order to 49 expedite projects, the office of general services and the dormitory 605 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 authority of the state of New York are authorized to award cost plus 2 percentage fee contracts. Funds available for expenditure pursuant 3 to this appropriation may be allocated and distributed by the 4 commissioner of the office of mental health (50IE23A4) (37066) ..... 5 18,000,000 ....................................... (re. $16,640,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 7 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 8 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 9 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 10 existing and reappropriated capital projects and programs including, 11 but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, mainte- 12 nance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, energy 13 conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health and 14 safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 15 improvement or program changes; provided, however, that no expendi- 16 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 17 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget. This 18 appropriation may be used for payment of personal service and 19 nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, and indirect cost 20 recovery, related to the administration of the capital projects and 21 programs provided by the office of mental health. Additionally, this 22 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 23 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 24 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 25 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 26 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 27 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 28 and environmental impact statements for new and existing projects. 29 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 30 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 31 or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 32 (50A422A4) (37017) ................................................. 33 275,000,000 ..................................... (re. $244,429,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 35 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 36 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 37 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 38 existing and reappropriated capital projects and programs including, 39 but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, mainte- 40 nance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, energy 41 conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health and 42 safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 43 improvement or program changes; provided, however, that no expendi- 44 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 45 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget. This 46 appropriation may be used for payment of personal service and 47 nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, and indirect cost 48 recovery, related to the administration of the capital projects and 606 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 programs provided by the office of mental health. Additionally, this 2 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 3 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 4 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 5 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 6 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 7 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 8 and environmental impact statements for new and existing projects. 9 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 10 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 11 or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 12 (50A421A4) (37017) ... 375,000,000 .............. (re. $304,006,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 14 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 15 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 16 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 17 existing and reappropriated capital projects and programs including, 18 but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, mainte- 19 nance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, energy 20 conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health and 21 safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 22 improvement or program changes; provided, however, that no expendi- 23 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 24 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget. This 25 appropriation may be used for payment of personal service and 26 nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, and indirect cost 27 recovery, related to the administration of the capital projects and 28 programs provided by the office of mental health. Additionally, this 29 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 30 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 31 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 32 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 33 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 34 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 35 and environmental impact statements for new and existing projects. 36 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 37 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 38 or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 39 (50A420A4) (37017) ... 375,000,000 .............. (re. $254,994,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 41 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 42 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 43 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 44 existing and reappropriated capital projects and programs including, 45 but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, mainte- 46 nance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, energy 47 conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health and 48 safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 607 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 improvement or program changes; provided, however, that no expendi- 2 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 3 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget. This 4 appropriation may be used for payment of personal service and 5 nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, and indirect cost 6 recovery, related to the administration of the capital projects and 7 programs provided by the office of mental health. Additionally, this 8 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 9 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 10 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 11 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 12 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 13 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 14 and environmental impact statements for new and existing projects. 15 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 16 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 17 or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 18 (50A419A4) (37017) ... 375,000,000 .............. (re. $213,234,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 20 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 21 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 22 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 23 existing and reappropriated capital projects and programs including, 24 but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, mainte- 25 nance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, energy 26 conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health and 27 safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 28 improvement or program changes; provided, however, that no expendi- 29 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 30 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget. This 31 appropriation may be used for payment of personal service and 32 nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, and indirect cost 33 recovery, related to the administration of the capital projects and 34 programs provided by the office of mental health. Additionally, this 35 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 36 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 37 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 38 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 39 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 40 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 41 and environmental impact statements for new and existing projects. 42 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 43 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 44 or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 45 (50A418A4) (37017) ... 275,000,000 ............... (re. $66,266,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 47 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 48 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 608 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 2 existing and reappropriated capital projects and programs including, 3 but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, mainte- 4 nance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, energy 5 conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health and 6 safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 7 improvement or program changes; provided, however, that no expendi- 8 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 9 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget. This 10 appropriation may be used for payment of personal service and 11 nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, and indirect cost 12 recovery, related to the administration of the capital projects and 13 programs provided by the office of mental health. Additionally, this 14 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 15 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 16 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 17 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 18 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 19 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 20 and environmental impact statements for new and existing projects. 21 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 22 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 23 or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 24 (50A417A4) (37017) ... 275,000,000 ............... (re. $67,930,000) 25 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 27 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 28 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 29 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 30 existing and reappropriated capital projects and programs including, 31 but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, mainte- 32 nance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, energy 33 conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health and 34 safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 35 improvement or program changes; provided, however, that no expendi- 36 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 37 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget. This 38 appropriation may be used for payment of personal service and 39 nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, and indirect cost 40 recovery, related to the administration of the capital projects and 41 programs provided by the office of mental health. Additionally, this 42 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 43 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 44 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 45 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 46 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 47 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 48 and environmental impact statements for new and existing projects. 49 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 609 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be transferred or 2 suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state of New York. 3 Furthermore, upon approval of the director of the budget, funds from 4 this appropriation may be transferred to the office for people with 5 developmental disabilities and the office of addiction services and 6 supports for payment to the dormitory authority of the state of New 7 York in relation to the preparation of plans (50A416A4) (37017) .... 8 275,000,000 ...................................... (re. $38,407,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 11 For payment of the cost of land acquisition, construction, recon- 12 struction, rehabilitation and improvements, including the prepara- 13 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for new, 14 existing and reappropriated capital projects and programs including, 15 but not limited to, preparation of plans, administration, mainte- 16 nance and improvement of existing facilities, new facilities, energy 17 conservation, environmental protection or improvement, health and 18 safety, preservation of facilities, accreditation and program 19 improvement or program changes; provided, however, that no expendi- 20 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 21 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget. This 22 appropriation may be used for payment of personal service and 23 nonpersonal service, including fringe benefits, and indirect cost 24 recovery, related to the administration of the capital projects and 25 programs provided by the office of mental health. Additionally, this 26 appropriation may be used for payment to the design and construction 27 management account of the centralized services fund of the New York 28 state office of general services or to the dormitory authority of 29 the state of New York for the purpose of preparation and review of 30 plans, specifications, estimates, services, construction management 31 and supervision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing 32 and environmental impact statements for new and existing projects. 33 Upon request of the commissioner of mental health and approval by 34 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be transferred or 35 suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state of New York. 36 Furthermore, upon approval of the director of the budget, funds from 37 this appropriation may be transferred to the office for people with 38 developmental disabilities and the office of addiction services and 39 supports for payment to the dormitory authority of the state of New 40 York in relation to the preparation of plans (50A415A4) (37017) .... 41 275,000,000 ...................................... (re. $18,807,000) 610 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 142,926,000 707,261,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 142,926,000 707,261,000 8 ================ ================ 9 COMMUNITY AND INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES PROGRAM (CCP) .......... 74,426,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Infrastructure Purpose 14 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, 15 and preservation of various community 16 program and institutional program facili- 17 ties, including, but not limited to, reha- 18 bilitation projects, health and safety 19 projects, fire safety projects and other 20 capital and administrative costs related 21 to this purpose. For state aid, to munici- 22 palities and other public and not-for-pro- 23 fit agencies, including the payment of 24 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 25 2026 for up to 100 per centum of the net 26 cost of feasibility studies, property 27 options, capital renovations, acquisition 28 of property, construction, rehabilitation 29 and capital costs incidental and appurten- 30 ant to facilities required to be licensed 31 pursuant to article 16, as defined in the 32 mental hygiene law, and for services and 33 expenses related to the maintenance and 34 improvement inclusive of fire safety and 35 life safety upgrades of voluntary not-for- 36 profit provider operated community resi- 37 dential and day service programs and envi- 38 ronmental modifications and adaptive 39 technology services at voluntary not-for- 40 profit provider operated community resi- 41 dential facilities, certified family care 42 homes and private residences, as a loan 43 and/or grant to family care providers, for 44 payment to other public housing agencies, 45 including municipal, county, state and 611 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 federal housing agencies, public benefit 2 corporations or authorities, or private 3 corporations and for capital development, 4 improvements and alterations of residen- 5 tial housing or day program alternatives 6 not currently defined in the mental 7 hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 8 of the state finance law, section 142 of 9 the economic development law, and article 10 41 of the mental hygiene law, the commis- 11 sioner of the office for people with 12 developmental disabilities may make the 13 funds appropriated herein available as 14 state aid, a loan or a grant, pursuant to 15 terms and conditions established by the 16 commissioner of the office for people with 17 developmental disabilities, to cover a 18 portion of the development costs of 19 private, public and/or non-profit organ- 20 izations, including corporations and part- 21 nerships established pursuant to the 22 private housing finance law and/or any 23 other statutory provisions. Further, the 24 office for people with developmental disa- 25 bilities shall have a lien on the real 26 property developed with such state aid, 27 loans or grants, which shall be in the 28 amount of the loan or grant, for a maximum 29 term of 30 years, or other longer term 30 consistent with the requirements of anoth- 31 er regulatory agency. Upon request of the 32 commissioner of the office for people with 33 developmental disabilities and approval by 34 the director of the budget, the funds 35 appropriated herein may be suballocated or 36 transferred to any other public housing 37 agencies, including municipal, county, 38 state and federal housing agencies, public 39 benefit corporations or authorities, or 40 private corporations, provided, however, 41 that no expenditures may be made from this 42 appropriation until a comprehensive plan 43 of projects has been approved by the 44 director of the budget (510126A4) (37884) ... 41,600,000 45 Capital Projects Funds - Other 46 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 47 OPWDD-State Facilities Account - 32310 48 Infrastructure Purpose 612 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, 2 and preservation of various community 3 program and institutional program facili- 4 ties, including, but not limited to, reha- 5 bilitation projects, health and safety 6 projects, fire safety projects and other 7 capital and administrative costs related 8 to this purpose. For state aid, to munici- 9 palities and other public and not-for-pro- 10 fit agencies, including the payment of 11 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 12 2026 for up to 100 per centum of the net 13 cost of feasibility studies, property 14 options, capital renovations, acquisition 15 of property, construction, rehabilitation 16 and capital costs incidental and appurten- 17 ant to facilities required to be licensed 18 pursuant to article 16, as defined in the 19 mental hygiene law, and for services and 20 expenses related to the maintenance and 21 improvement inclusive of fire safety and 22 life safety upgrades of voluntary not-for- 23 profit provider operated community resi- 24 dential and day service programs and envi- 25 ronmental modifications and adaptive 26 technology services at voluntary not-for- 27 profit provider operated community resi- 28 dential facilities, certified family care 29 homes and private residences, as a loan 30 and/or grant to family care providers, for 31 payment to other public housing agencies, 32 including municipal, county, state and 33 federal housing agencies, public benefit 34 corporations or authorities, or private 35 corporations and for capital development, 36 improvements and alterations of residen- 37 tial housing or day program alternatives 38 not currently defined in the mental 39 hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 40 of the state finance law, section 142 of 41 the economic development law, and article 42 41 of the mental hygiene law, the commis- 43 sioner of the office for people with 44 developmental disabilities may make the 45 funds appropriated herein available pursu- 46 ant to terms and conditions established by 47 the commissioner of the office for people 48 with developmental disabilities, to cover 49 a portion of the development costs of 50 private, public and/or non-profit organ- 613 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 izations, including corporations and part- 2 nerships established pursuant to the 3 private housing finance law and/or any 4 other statutory provisions, for supportive 5 housing units that have been set aside for 6 individuals with intellectual and develop- 7 mental disabilities. The funds appropri- 8 ated herein may also be made available for 9 the payment to municipalities and other 10 public and not-for-profit community 11 providers approved by the commissioner of 12 the office for people with developmental 13 disabilities, for the acquisition of prop- 14 erty, construction and rehabilitation of 15 supportive housing units for individuals 16 with intellectual and developmental disa- 17 bilities. Further, the office for people 18 with developmental disabilities shall have 19 a lien on the real property developed with 20 such state aid, loans or grants, which 21 shall be in the amount of the loan or 22 grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or 23 other longer term consistent with the 24 requirements of another regulatory agency. 25 Upon request of the commissioner of the 26 office for people with developmental disa- 27 bilities and approval by the director of 28 the budget, the funds appropriated herein 29 may be suballocated or transferred to any 30 public housing agencies, including munici- 31 pal, county, state or federal agencies, 32 public benefit corporations or authori- 33 ties, or private corporations for the 34 purposes stated above, provided, however, 35 that no expenditures may be made from this 36 appropriation until a comprehensive plan 37 of projects has been approved by the 38 director of the budget (510226A4) (37884) ... 32,826,000 39 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISION (CCP) ................... 14,500,000 40 -------------- 41 Capital Projects Funds - Other 42 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 43 Preparation of Plans Purpose 44 For payment to the design and construction 45 management account of the centralized 46 services fund of the New York state office 47 of general services or to the dormitory 614 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 authority for the purpose of preparation 2 and review of plans, specifications, esti- 3 mates, services, construction management 4 and supervision, inspection, studies, 5 appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 6 mental impact statements for new and 7 existing projects associated with the 8 community services and institutional 9 services programs. Upon the request of the 10 commissioner of the office for people with 11 developmental disabilities and the 12 approval of the director of the budget, 13 this appropriation may be transferred or 14 suballocated to the dormitory authority of 15 the state of New York. Upon approval by 16 the director of the budget, funds from 17 this appropriation may be transferred to 18 the office of mental health and the office 19 of addiction services and supports for 20 payment to the dormitory authority of the 21 state of New York for the preparation of 22 plans purpose (51F22630) (81088) ............. 7,500,000 23 Capital Projects Funds - Other 24 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 25 DASNY-OPWDD Administration Account - 32307 26 Preparation of Plans Purpose 27 For payment to the design and construction 28 management account of the centralized 29 services fund of the New York state office 30 of general services or to the dormitory 31 authority for the purpose of preparation 32 and review of plans, specifications, esti- 33 mates, services, construction management 34 and supervision, inspection, studies, 35 appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 36 mental impact statements for new and 37 existing projects associated with the 38 institutional services program and the 39 community services program. Upon the 40 request of the commissioner of the office 41 for people with developmental disabilities 42 and the approval of the director of the 43 budget, this appropriation may be trans- 44 ferred or suballocated to the dormitory 45 authority of the state of New York. Upon 46 approval by the director of the budget, 47 funds from this appropriation may be 48 transferred to the office of mental health 615 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 and the office of addiction services and 2 supports for payment to the dormitory 3 authority of the state of New York for the 4 preparation of plans purpose 5 (51F12630)(81088) ............................ 7,000,000 6 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) ................. 54,000,000 7 -------------- 8 Capital Projects Funds - Other 9 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 10 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 11 For the maintenance and operation of various 12 facilities and systems including personal 13 services, fringe benefits and indirect 14 costs (51FM26MO) (81107) .................... 54,000,000 616 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 COMMUNITY AND INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Infrastructure Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 7 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 8 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 9 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 10 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 11 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 12 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 for up to 100 per centum 13 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 14 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 15 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 16 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 17 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 18 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 19 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 20 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 21 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 22 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 23 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 24 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 25 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 26 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 27 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 28 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 29 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state 30 finance law, section 142 of the economic development law, and arti- 31 cle 41 of the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for 32 people with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropri- 33 ated herein available as state aid, a loan or a grant, pursuant to 34 terms and conditions established by the commissioner of the office 35 for people with developmental disabilities, to cover a portion of 36 the development costs of private, public and/or non-profit organiza- 37 tions, including corporations and partnerships established pursuant 38 to the private housing finance law and/or any other statutory 39 provisions. Further, the office for people with developmental disa- 40 bilities shall have a lien on the real property developed with such 41 state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount of the loan 42 or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other longer term 43 consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agency. Upon 44 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 45 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, the 46 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 47 other public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 48 and federal housing agencies, public benefit corporations or author- 617 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ities, or private corporations, provided, however, that no expendi- 2 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 3 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget 4 (510125A4) (37884) ... 67,900,000 ................ (re. $59,590,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 7 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 8 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 9 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 10 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 11 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 12 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 for up to 100 per centum 13 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 14 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 15 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 16 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 17 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 18 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 19 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 20 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 21 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 22 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 23 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 24 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 25 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 26 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 27 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 28 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 29 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance 30 law, section 142 of the economic development law, and article 41 of 31 the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for people 32 with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropriated 33 herein available as state aid, a loan or a grant, pursuant to terms 34 and conditions established by the commissioner of the office for 35 people with developmental disabilities, to cover a portion of the 36 development costs of private, public and/or non-profit organiza- 37 tions, including corporations and partnerships established pursuant 38 to the private housing finance law and/or any other statutory 39 provisions. Further, the office for people with developmental disa- 40 bilities shall have a lien on the real property developed with such 41 state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount of the loan 42 or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other longer term 43 consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agency. Upon 44 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 45 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, the 46 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 47 other public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 48 and federal housing agencies, public benefit corporations or author- 49 ities, or private corporations, provided, however, that no expendi- 618 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 2 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget 3 (510124A4) (37884) ... 41,600,000 ................ (re. $12,921,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 5 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 6 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 7 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 8 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 9 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 10 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 11 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 for up to 100 per centum 12 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 13 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 14 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 15 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 16 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 17 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 18 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 19 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 20 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 21 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 22 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 23 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 24 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 25 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 26 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 27 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 28 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance 29 law, section 142 of the economic development law, and article 41 of 30 the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for people 31 with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropriated 32 herein available as state aid, a loan or a grant, pursuant to terms 33 and conditions established by the commissioner of the office for 34 people with developmental disabilities, to cover a portion of the 35 development costs of private, public and/or non-profit organiza- 36 tions, including corporations and partnerships established pursuant 37 to the private housing finance law and/or any other statutory 38 provisions. Further, the office for people with developmental disa- 39 bilities shall have a lien on the real property developed with such 40 state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount of the loan 41 or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other longer term 42 consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agency. Upon 43 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 44 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, the 45 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 46 other public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 47 and federal housing agencies, public benefit corporations or author- 48 ities, or private corporations, provided, however, that no expendi- 49 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 619 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget 2 (510123A4) (37884) ... 41,600,000 ................. (re. $2,938,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 4 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 5 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 6 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 7 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 8 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 9 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 10 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 for up to 100 per centum 11 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 12 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 13 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 14 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 15 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 16 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 17 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 18 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 19 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 20 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 21 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 22 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 23 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 24 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 25 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 26 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 27 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance 28 law, section 142 of the economic development law, and article 41 of 29 the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for people 30 with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropriated 31 herein available as state aid, a loan or a grant, pursuant to terms 32 and conditions established by the commissioner of the office for 33 people with developmental disabilities, to cover a portion of the 34 development costs of private, public and/or non-profit organiza- 35 tions, including corporations and partnerships established pursuant 36 to the private housing finance law and/or any other statutory 37 provisions. Further, the office for people with developmental disa- 38 bilities shall have a lien on the real property developed with such 39 state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount of the loan 40 or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other longer term 41 consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agency. Upon 42 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 43 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, the 44 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 45 other public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 46 and federal housing agencies, public benefit corporations or author- 47 ities, or private corporations, provided, however, that no expendi- 48 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 49 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget 620 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 (510122A4) (37884) ................................................. 2 41,600,000 .......................................... (re. $467,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 4 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 5 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 6 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 7 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 8 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 9 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 10 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 for up to 100 per centum 11 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 12 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 13 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 14 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 15 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 16 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 17 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 18 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 19 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 20 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 21 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 22 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 23 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 24 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 25 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 26 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 27 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance 28 law, section 142 of the economic development law, and article 41 of 29 the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for people 30 with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropriated 31 herein available as state aid, a loan or a grant, pursuant to terms 32 and conditions established by the commissioner of the office for 33 people with developmental disabilities, to cover a portion of the 34 development costs of private, public and/or non-profit organiza- 35 tions, including corporations and partnerships established pursuant 36 to the private housing finance law and/or any other statutory 37 provisions. Further, the office for people with developmental disa- 38 bilities shall have a lien on the real property developed with such 39 state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount of the loan 40 or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other longer term 41 consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agency. Upon 42 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 43 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, the 44 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 45 other public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 46 and federal housing agencies, public benefit corporations or author- 47 ities, or private corporations, provided, however, that no expendi- 48 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 621 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget 2 (510121A4) (37884) ... 39,600,000 ................... (re. $534,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 4 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 5 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 6 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 7 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 8 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 9 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 10 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 for up to 100 per centum 11 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 12 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 13 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 14 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 15 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 16 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 17 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 18 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 19 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 20 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 21 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 22 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 23 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 24 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 25 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 26 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 27 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance 28 law, section 142 of the economic development law, and article 41 of 29 the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for people 30 with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropriated 31 herein available as state aid, a loan or a grant, pursuant to terms 32 and conditions established by the commissioner of the office for 33 people with developmental disabilities, to cover a portion of the 34 development costs of private, public and/or non-profit organiza- 35 tions, including corporations and partnerships established pursuant 36 to the private housing finance law and/or any other statutory 37 provisions. Further, the office for people with developmental disa- 38 bilities shall have a lien on the real property developed with such 39 state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount of the loan 40 or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other longer term 41 consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agency. Upon 42 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 43 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, the 44 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 45 other public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 46 and federal housing agencies, public benefit corporations or author- 47 ities, or private corporations, provided, however, that no expendi- 48 tures may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan 622 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of projects has been approved by the director of the budget 2 (510120A4) (37884) ... 39,600,000 ................... (re. $294,000) 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 5 OPWDD-State Facilities Account - 32310 6 Infrastructure Purpose 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 8 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 9 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 10 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 11 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 12 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 13 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 14 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 for up to 100 per centum 15 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 16 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 17 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 18 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 19 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 20 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 21 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 22 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 23 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 24 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 25 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 26 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 27 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 28 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 29 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 30 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 31 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state 32 finance law, section 142 of the economic development law, and arti- 33 cle 41 of the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for 34 people with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropri- 35 ated herein available pursuant to terms and conditions established 36 by the commissioner of the office for people with developmental 37 disabilities, to cover a portion of the development costs of 38 private, public and/or nonprofit organizations, including corpo- 39 rations and partnerships established pursuant to the private housing 40 finance law and/or any other statutory provisions, for supportive 41 housing units that have been set aside for individuals with intel- 42 lectual and developmental disabilities. The funds appropriated here- 43 in may also be made available for the payment to municipalities and 44 other public and not-for-profit community providers approved by the 45 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 46 ties, for the acquisition of property, construction and rehabili- 47 tation of supportive housing units for individuals with intellectual 48 and developmental disabilities. Further, the office for people with 623 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 developmental disabilities shall have a lien on the real property 2 developed with such state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in 3 the amount of the loan or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or 4 other longer term consistent with the requirements of another regu- 5 latory agency. Upon request of the commissioner of the office for 6 people with developmental disabilities and approval by the director 7 of the budget, the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or 8 transferred to any public housing agencies, including municipal, 9 county, state or federal agencies, public benefit corporations or 10 authorities, or private corporations for the purposes stated above, 11 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 12 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 13 the director of the budget (510225A4) (37884) ...................... 14 32,826,000 ....................................... (re. $32,826,000) 15 For alterations and improvements of the new york state institute for 16 basic research in developmental disabilities. This appropriation 17 shall be used to support projects to modernize and/or improve 18 research and other activities of the institute and facilities on its 19 campus, and may be used for the cost of potential claims against 20 contracts awarded by the dormitory authority of the state of New 21 York. Upon request of the commissioner of the office for people with 22 developmental disabilities and approval by the director of the budg- 23 et, this appropriation may be transferred to the dormitory authority 24 of the state of New York (51IB2503) (37918) ........................ 25 75,000,000 ....................................... (re. $75,000,000) 26 For alterations and improvements of property, acquisition of technolo- 27 gy and/or equipment and/or other reasonable development costs asso- 28 ciated with facilities licensed pursuant to article 16 of the mental 29 hygiene law or article 28 of the public health law. Notwithstanding 30 sections 112 and 163 of the state finance law, section 142 of the 31 economic development law, or any other provision of law to the 32 contrary, the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 33 mental disabilities may, in consultation with the commissioner of 34 health, make the funds appropriated herein available as a grant, 35 pursuant to the terms and conditions established by the commissioner 36 of the office for people with developmental disabilities and the 37 commissioner of health, to cover all or a portion of the property 38 improvement, technology and/or equipment acquisition, and/or other 39 reasonable development costs of facilities licensed pursuant to 40 article 16 of the mental hygiene law or article 28 of the public 41 health law to increase access and better coordinate and integrate 42 services so as to improve healthcare for people with developmental 43 disabilities. Upon request of the commissioner of the office for 44 people with developmental disabilities and approval by the director 45 of the budget, the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or 46 transferred to any other public benefit corporations or authorities, 47 or private corporations, provided, however, that no expenditures may 48 be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of 49 projects has been approved by the director of the budget (51DC2503) 50 (37919) ... 25,000,000 ........................... (re. $25,000,000) 624 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 3 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 4 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 5 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 6 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 7 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 8 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 for up to 100 per centum 9 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 10 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 11 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 12 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 13 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 14 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 15 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 16 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 17 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 18 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 19 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 20 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 21 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 22 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 23 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 24 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 25 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance 26 law, section 142 of the economic development law, and article 41 of 27 the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for people 28 with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropriated 29 herein available pursuant to terms and conditions established by the 30 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 31 ties, to cover a portion of the development costs of private, public 32 and/or non-profit organizations, including corporations and partner- 33 ships established pursuant to the private housing finance law and/or 34 any other statutory provisions, for supportive housing units that 35 have been set aside for individuals with intellectual and develop- 36 mental disabilities. The funds appropriated herein may also be made 37 available for the payment to municipalities and other public and 38 not-for-profit community providers approved by the commissioner of 39 the office for people with developmental disabilities, for the 40 acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of support- 41 ive housing units for individuals with intellectual and develop- 42 mental disabilities. Further, the office for people with develop- 43 mental disabilities shall have a lien on the real property developed 44 with such state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount 45 of the loan or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other long- 46 er term consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agen- 47 cy. Upon request of the commissioner of the office for people with 48 developmental disabilities and approval by the director of the budg- 49 et, the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred 50 to any public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 625 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 or federal agencies, public benefit corporations or authorities, or 2 private corporations for the purposes stated above, provided, howev- 3 er, that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 4 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 5 the budget (510224A4) (37884) ... 32,826,000 ..... (re. $32,826,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 7 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 8 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 9 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 10 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 11 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 12 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 13 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 for up to 100 per centum 14 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 15 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 16 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 17 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 18 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 19 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 20 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 21 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 22 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 23 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 24 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 25 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 26 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 27 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 28 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 29 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 30 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance 31 law, section 142 of the economic development law, and article 41 of 32 the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for people 33 with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropriated 34 herein available pursuant to terms and conditions established by the 35 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 36 ties, to cover a portion of the development costs of private, public 37 and/or non-profit organizations, including corporations and partner- 38 ships established pursuant to the private housing finance law and/or 39 any other statutory provisions, for supportive housing units that 40 have been set aside for individuals with intellectual and develop- 41 mental disabilities. The funds appropriated herein may also be made 42 available for the payment to municipalities and other public and 43 not-for-profit community providers approved by the commissioner of 44 the office for people with developmental disabilities, for the 45 acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of support- 46 ive housing units for individuals with intellectual and develop- 47 mental disabilities. Further, the office for people with develop- 48 mental disabilities shall have a lien on the real property developed 49 with such state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount 626 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of the loan or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other long- 2 er term consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agen- 3 cy. Upon request of the commissioner of the office for people with 4 developmental disabilities and approval by the director of the budg- 5 et, the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred 6 to any public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 7 or federal agencies, public benefit corporations or authorities, or 8 private corporations for the purposes stated above, provided, howev- 9 er, that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 10 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 11 the budget (510223A4) (37884) ...................................... 12 20,850,000 ....................................... (re. $20,718,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 14 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 15 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 16 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 17 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 18 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 19 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 20 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 for up to 100 per centum 21 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 22 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 23 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 24 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 25 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 26 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 27 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 28 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 29 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 30 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 31 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 32 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 33 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 34 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 35 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 36 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 37 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance 38 law, section 142 of the economic development law, and article 41 of 39 the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for people 40 with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropriated 41 herein available pursuant to terms and conditions established by the 42 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 43 ties, to cover a portion of the development costs of private, public 44 and/or non-profit organizations, including corporations and partner- 45 ships established pursuant to the private housing finance law and/or 46 any other statutory provisions, for supportive housing units that 47 have been set aside for individuals with intellectual and develop- 48 mental disabilities. The funds appropriated herein may also be made 49 available for the payment to municipalities and other public and 627 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 not-for-profit community providers approved by the commissioner of 2 the office for people with developmental disabilities, for the 3 acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of support- 4 ive housing units for individuals with intellectual and develop- 5 mental disabilities. Further, the office for people with develop- 6 mental disabilities shall have a lien on the real property developed 7 with such state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount 8 of the loan or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other long- 9 er term consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agen- 10 cy. Upon request of the commissioner of the office for people with 11 developmental disabilities and approval by the director of the budg- 12 et, the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred 13 to any public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 14 or federal agencies, public benefit corporations or authorities, or 15 private corporations for the purposes stated above, provided, howev- 16 er, that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 17 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 18 the budget (510222A4) (37884) ...................................... 19 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $12,000,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 21 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 22 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 23 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 24 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 25 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 26 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 27 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 for up to 100 per centum 28 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 29 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 30 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 31 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 32 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 33 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 34 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 35 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 36 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 37 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 38 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 39 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 40 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 41 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 42 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 43 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 44 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance 45 law, section 142 of the economic development law, and article 41 of 46 the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for people 47 with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropriated 48 herein available pursuant to terms and conditions established by the 49 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 628 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ties, to cover a portion of the development costs of private, public 2 and/or non-profit organizations, including corporations and partner- 3 ships established pursuant to the private housing finance law and/or 4 any other statutory provisions, for supportive housing units that 5 have been set aside for individuals with intellectual and develop- 6 mental disabilities. The funds appropriated herein may also be made 7 available for the payment to municipalities and other public and 8 not-for-profit community providers approved by the commissioner of 9 the office for people with developmental disabilities, for the 10 acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of support- 11 ive housing units for individuals with intellectual and develop- 12 mental disabilities. Further, the office for people with develop- 13 mental disabilities shall have a lien on the real property developed 14 with such state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount 15 of the loan or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other long- 16 er term consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agen- 17 cy. Upon request of the commissioner of the office for people with 18 developmental disabilities and approval by the director of the budg- 19 et, the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred 20 to any public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 21 or federal agencies, public benefit corporations or authorities, or 22 private corporations for the purposes stated above, provided, howev- 23 er, that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 24 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 25 the budget (510221A4) (37884) ...................................... 26 15,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,841,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 28 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 29 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 30 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 31 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 32 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 33 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 34 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 for up to 100 per centum 35 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 36 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 37 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 38 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 39 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 40 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 41 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 42 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 43 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 44 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 45 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 46 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 47 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 48 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 49 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 629 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 2 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance 3 law, section 142 of the economic development law, and article 41 of 4 the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for people 5 with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropriated 6 herein available pursuant to terms and conditions established by the 7 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 8 ties, to cover a portion of the development costs of private, public 9 and/or non-profit organizations, including corporations and partner- 10 ships established pursuant to the private housing finance law and/or 11 any other statutory provisions, for supportive housing units that 12 have been set aside for individuals with intellectual and develop- 13 mental disabilities. The funds appropriated herein may also be made 14 available for the payment to municipalities and other public and 15 not-for-profit community providers approved by the commissioner of 16 the office for people with developmental disabilities, for the 17 acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of support- 18 ive housing units for individuals with intellectual and develop- 19 mental disabilities. Further, the office for people with develop- 20 mental disabilities shall have a lien on the real property developed 21 with such state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount 22 of the loan or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other long- 23 er term consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agen- 24 cy. Upon request of the commissioner of the office for people with 25 developmental disabilities and approval by the director of the budg- 26 et, the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred 27 to any public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 28 or federal agencies, public benefit corporations or authorities, or 29 private corporations for the purposes stated above, provided, howev- 30 er, that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 31 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 32 the budget (510220A4) (37884) ... 15,000,000 ..... (re. $10,176,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 34 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 35 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 36 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 37 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 38 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 39 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 40 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 for up to 100 per centum 41 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 42 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 43 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 44 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 45 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 46 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 47 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 48 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 49 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 630 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 2 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 3 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 4 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 5 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 6 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 7 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 8 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance 9 law, section 142 of the economic development law, and article 41 of 10 the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for people 11 with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropriated 12 herein available pursuant to terms and conditions established by the 13 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 14 ties, to cover a portion of the development costs of private, public 15 and/or non-profit organizations, including corporations and partner- 16 ships established pursuant to the private housing finance law and/or 17 any other statutory provisions, for supportive housing units that 18 have been set aside for individuals with intellectual and develop- 19 mental disabilities. The funds appropriated herein may also be made 20 available for the payment to municipalities and other public and 21 not-for-profit community providers approved by the commissioner of 22 the office for people with developmental disabilities, for the 23 acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of support- 24 ive housing units for individuals with intellectual and develop- 25 mental disabilities. Further, the office for people with develop- 26 mental disabilities shall have a lien on the real property developed 27 with such state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount 28 of the loan or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other long- 29 er term consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agen- 30 cy. Upon request of the commissioner of the office for people with 31 developmental disabilities and approval by the director of the budg- 32 et, the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred 33 to any public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 34 or federal agencies, public benefit corporations or authorities, or 35 private corporations for the purposes stated above, provided, howev- 36 er, that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 37 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 38 the budget (510219A4) (37884) ... 15,000,000 ...... (re. $7,734,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 40 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 41 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 42 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 43 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 44 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 45 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 46 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 for up to 100 per centum 47 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 48 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 49 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 631 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 2 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 3 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 4 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 5 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 6 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 7 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 8 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 9 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 10 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 11 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 12 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 13 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 14 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance 15 law, section 142 of the economic development law, and article 41 of 16 the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for people 17 with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropriated 18 herein available pursuant to terms and conditions established by the 19 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 20 ties, to cover a portion of the development costs of private, public 21 and/or non-profit organizations, including corporations and partner- 22 ships established pursuant to the private housing finance law and/or 23 any other statutory provisions, for supportive housing units that 24 have been set aside for individuals with intellectual and develop- 25 mental disabilities. The funds appropriated herein may also be made 26 available for the payment to municipalities and other public and 27 not-for-profit community providers approved by the commissioner of 28 the office for people with developmental disabilities, for the 29 acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of support- 30 ive housing units for individuals with intellectual and develop- 31 mental disabilities. Further, the office for people with develop- 32 mental disabilities shall have a lien on the real property developed 33 with such state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount 34 of the loan or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other long- 35 er term consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agen- 36 cy. Upon request of the commissioner of the office for people with 37 developmental disabilities and approval by the director of the budg- 38 et, the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred 39 to any public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 40 or federal agencies, public benefit corporations or authorities, or 41 private corporations for the purposes stated above, provided, howev- 42 er, that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 43 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 44 the budget (510218A4) (37884) ... 15,000,000 ..... (re. $12,406,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 46 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 47 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 48 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 49 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 632 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 2 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 3 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 for up to 100 per centum 4 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 5 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 6 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 7 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 8 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 9 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 10 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 11 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 12 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 13 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 14 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 15 providers, for payment to other public housing agencies, including 16 municipal, county, state and federal housing agencies, public bene- 17 fit corporations or authorities, or private corporations and for 18 capital development, improvements and alterations of residential 19 housing or day program alternatives not currently defined in the 20 mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance 21 law, section 142 of the economic development law, and article 41 of 22 the mental hygiene law, the commissioner of the office for people 23 with developmental disabilities may make the funds appropriated 24 herein available pursuant to terms and conditions established by the 25 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 26 ties, to cover a portion of the development costs of private, public 27 and/or nonprofit organizations, including corporations and partner- 28 ships established pursuant to the private housing finance law and/or 29 any other statutory provisions, for supportive housing units that 30 have been set aside for individuals with intellectual and develop- 31 mental disabilities. The funds appropriated herein may also be made 32 available for the payment to municipalities and other public and 33 not-for-profit community providers approved by the commissioner of 34 the office for people with developmental disabilities, for the 35 acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation of support- 36 ive housing units for individuals with intellectual and develop- 37 mental disabilities. Further, the office for people with develop- 38 mental disabilities shall have a lien on the real property developed 39 with such state aid, loans or grants, which shall be in the amount 40 of the loan or grant, for a maximum term of 30 years, or other long- 41 er term consistent with the requirements of another regulatory agen- 42 cy. Upon request of the commissioner of the office for people with 43 developmental disabilities and approval by the director of the budg- 44 et, the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred 45 to any public housing agencies, including municipal, county, state 46 or federal agencies, public benefit corporations or authorities, or 47 private corporations for the purposes stated above, provided, howev- 48 er, that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 49 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 50 the budget (510217A4) (37884) ... 15,000,000 ...... (re. $4,376,000) 633 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 3 For acquisition, alterations, improvements, and preservation of vari- 4 ous community program and institutional program facilities, includ- 5 ing, but not limited to, rehabilitation projects, health and safety 6 projects, fire safety projects and other capital and administrative 7 costs related to this purpose. For state aid, to municipalities and 8 other public and not-for-profit agencies, including the payment of 9 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014 for up to 100 per centum 10 of the net cost of feasibility studies, property options, capital 11 renovations, acquisition of property, construction, rehabilitation 12 and capital costs incidental and appurtenant to facilities required 13 to be licensed pursuant to article 16, as defined in the mental 14 hygiene law, and for services and expenses related to the mainte- 15 nance and improvement inclusive of fire safety and life safety 16 upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit provider operated community 17 residential and day service programs and environmental modifications 18 and adaptive technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provid- 19 er operated community residential facilities, certified family care 20 homes and private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care 21 providers, for payment to other state and federal housing agencies, 22 private corporations and for capital development, improvements and 23 alterations of residential housing or day program alternatives not 24 currently defined in the mental hygiene law. Upon request of the 25 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 26 ties and approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation 27 may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authority of the 28 state of New York, provided, however, that no expenditures may be 29 made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects 30 has been approved by the director of the budget (510214A4) (37884) 31 ... 10,000,000 ................................... (re. $10,000,000) 32 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISION (CCP) 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 35 Preparation of Plans Purpose 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 37 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 38 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 39 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 40 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 41 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 42 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 43 new and existing projects associated with the community services and 44 institutional services programs. Upon the request of the commission- 45 er of the office for people with developmental disabilities and the 46 approval of the director of the budget, this appropriation may be 47 transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state 634 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budget, funds from 2 this appropriation may be transferred to the office of mental health 3 and the office of addiction services and supports for payment to the 4 dormitory authority of the state of New York for the preparation of 5 plans purpose (51F22530) (81088) ................................... 6 6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $6,000,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 8 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 9 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 10 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 11 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 12 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 13 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 14 new and existing projects associated with the community services and 15 institutional services programs. Upon the request of the commission- 16 er of the office for people with developmental disabilities and the 17 approval of the director of the budget, this appropriation may be 18 transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state 19 of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budget, funds from 20 this appropriation may be transferred to the office of mental health 21 and the office of addiction services and supports for payment to the 22 dormitory authority of the state of New York for the preparation of 23 plans purpose (51F22430) (81088) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $6,000,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 25 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 26 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 27 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 28 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 29 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 30 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 31 new and existing projects associated with the community services and 32 institutional services programs. Upon the request of the commission- 33 er of the office for people with developmental disabilities and the 34 approval of the director of the budget, this appropriation may be 35 transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state 36 of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budget, funds from 37 this appropriation may be transferred to the office of mental health 38 and the office of addiction services and supports for payment to the 39 dormitory authority of the state of New York for the preparation of 40 plans purpose (51F22330) (81088) ................................... 41 6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $6,000,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 43 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 44 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 45 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 46 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 47 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 635 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 2 new and existing projects associated with the community services and 3 institutional services programs. Upon the request of the commission- 4 er of the office for people with developmental disabilities and the 5 approval of the director of the budget, this appropriation may be 6 transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state 7 of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budget, funds from 8 this appropriation may be transferred to the office of mental health 9 and the office of addiction services and supports for payment to the 10 dormitory authority of the state of New York for the preparation of 11 plans purpose (51F22230) (81088) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $6,000,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 13 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 14 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 15 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 16 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 17 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 18 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 19 new and existing projects associated with the community services and 20 institutional services programs. Upon the request of the commission- 21 er of the office for people with developmental disabilities and the 22 approval of the director of the budget, this appropriation may be 23 transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state 24 of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budget, funds from 25 this appropriation may be transferred to the office of mental health 26 and the office of addiction services and supports for payment to the 27 dormitory authority of the state of New York for the preparation of 28 plans purpose (51F22130) (81088) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $6,000,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 30 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 31 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 32 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 33 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 34 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 35 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 36 new and existing projects associated with the community services and 37 institutional services programs. Upon the request of the commission- 38 er of the office for people with developmental disabilities and the 39 approval of the director of the budget, this appropriation may be 40 transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state 41 of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budget, funds from 42 this appropriation may be transferred to the office of mental health 43 and the office of addiction services and supports for payment to the 44 dormitory authority of the state of New York for the preparation of 45 plans purpose (51F22030) (81088) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $6,000,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 54, 47 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 636 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 2 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 3 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 4 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 5 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 6 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 7 new and existing projects associated with the community services and 8 institutional services programs. Upon the request of the commission- 9 er of the office for people with developmental disabilities and the 10 approval of the director of the budget, this appropriation may be 11 transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state 12 of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budget, funds from 13 this appropriation may be transferred to the office of mental health 14 and the office of addiction services and supports for payment to the 15 dormitory authority of the state of New York for the preparation of 16 plans purpose (51F21930) (81088) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $1,713,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 18 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 19 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 20 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 21 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 22 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 23 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 24 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 25 new and existing projects associated with the community services and 26 institutional services programs. Upon the request of the commission- 27 er of the office for people with developmental disabilities and the 28 approval of the director of the budget, this appropriation may be 29 transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority of the state 30 of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budget, funds from 31 this appropriation may be transferred to the office of mental health 32 and the office of addiction services and supports for payment to the 33 dormitory authority of the state of New York for the preparation of 34 plans purpose (51F21830) (81088) ... 6,000,000 .... (re. $3,832,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 37 For: (1) the payment of all claims for personal injury, death or prop- 38 erty damage for which the New York State Medical Care Facilities 39 Finance Agency, the facilities development corporation, or the 40 dormitory authority of the state of New York might be liable occur- 41 ring upon, in or about any projects covered by the Agreement of 42 Lease entered into by the facilities development corporation, the 43 department of mental hygiene and the New York State Medical Care 44 Facilities Finance Agency under date of October 1, 1987 as from time 45 to time amended and supplemented and any and all penalties, costs, 46 including attorneys' fees, claims, demands and causes of action due 47 directly or indirectly to the use, disuse, misuse or interest in 48 such projects; (2) in the case of damage, loss or destruction of any 637 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 such project, or any part of any such project, the payment of the 2 costs of repairing, restoring, rebuilding or replacing the same in 3 accordance with the obligations of the facilities development corpo- 4 ration so to do from the proceeds of insurance under the provisions 5 of paragraph (b) of section 3.04 of the Agreement of Lease; and (3) 6 payments to the New York State Medical Care Facilities Finance Agen- 7 cy of moneys at the times and in the amounts that annual rentals 8 would be due with respect to each project during such time or times 9 as each such project may be damaged or destroyed and not available 10 for use by the department of mental hygiene in accordance with the 11 terms of the Agreement of Lease. 12 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 13 facilities development corporation may assign to the New York State 14 Medical Care Facilities Finance Agency all or any portion of the 15 moneys hereby appropriated for the purposes hereinabove set forth. 16 Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the appropriation is 17 insufficient to cover the losses, upon notification from the facili- 18 ties development corporation, the director of the budget shall 19 submit a request for additional appropriations to cover the addi- 20 tional losses. Upon approval by the director of the budget, funds 21 from this appropriation may be transferred to the office of mental 22 health and the office of addiction services and supports for payment 23 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for the prepara- 24 tion of plans purpose (51WC1430) (81094) ........................... 25 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 28 For: (1) the payment of all claims for personal injury, death or prop- 29 erty damage for which the New York State Medical Care Facilities 30 Finance Agency, the facilities development corporation, or the 31 dormitory authority of the state of New York might be liable occur- 32 ring upon, in or about any projects covered by the Agreement of 33 Lease entered into by the facilities development corporation, the 34 department of mental hygiene and the New York State Medical Care 35 Facilities Finance Agency under date of October 1, 1987 as from time 36 to time amended and supplemented and any and all penalties, costs, 37 including attorneys' fees, claims, demands and causes of action due 38 directly or indirectly to the use, disuse, misuse or interest in 39 such projects; (2) in the case of damage, loss or destruction of any 40 such project, or any part of any such project, the payment of the 41 costs of repairing, restoring, rebuilding or replacing the same in 42 accordance with the obligations of the facilities development corpo- 43 ration so to do from the proceeds of insurance under the provisions 44 of paragraph (b) of section 3.04 of the Agreement of Lease; and (3) 45 payments to the New York State Medical Care Facilities Finance Agen- 46 cy of moneys at the times and in the amounts that annual rentals 47 would be due with respect to each project during such time or times 48 as each such project may be damaged or destroyed and not available 638 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 for use by the department of mental hygiene in accordance with the 2 terms of the Agreement of Lease. 3 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 4 facilities development corporation may assign to the New York State 5 Medical Care Facilities Finance Agency all or any portion of the 6 moneys hereby appropriated for the purposes hereinabove set forth. 7 Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the appropriation is 8 insufficient to cover the losses, upon notification from the facili- 9 ties development corporation, the director of the budget shall 10 submit a request for additional appropriations to cover the addi- 11 tional losses. Upon approval by the director of the budget, funds 12 from this appropriation may be transferred to the office of mental 13 health and the office of addiction services and supports for payment 14 to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for the prepara- 15 tion of plans purpose (51WC1330) (81094) ........................... 16 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 17 Capital Projects Funds - Other 18 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 19 DASNY-OPWDD Administration Account - 32307 20 Preparation of Plans Purpose 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 22 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 23 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 24 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 25 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 26 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 27 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 28 new and existing projects associated with the institutional services 29 program and the community services program. Upon the request of the 30 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 31 ties and the approval of the director of the budget, this appropri- 32 ation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority 33 of the state of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budg- 34 et, funds from this appropriation may be transferred to the office 35 of mental health and the office of addiction services and supports 36 for payment to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 37 the preparation of plans purpose (51F12530)(81088) ................. 38 7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $7,000,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 40 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 41 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 42 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 43 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 44 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 45 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 46 new and existing projects associated with the institutional services 47 program and the community services program. Upon the request of the 639 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 2 ties and the approval of the director of the budget, this appropri- 3 ation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority 4 of the state of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budg- 5 et, funds from this appropriation may be transferred to the office 6 of mental health and the office of addiction services and supports 7 for payment to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 8 the preparation of plans purpose (51F12430) (81088) ................ 9 7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,664,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 11 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 12 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 13 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 14 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 15 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 16 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 17 new and existing projects associated with the institutional services 18 program and the community services program. Upon the request of the 19 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 20 ties and the approval of the director of the budget, this appropri- 21 ation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority 22 of the state of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budg- 23 et, funds from this appropriation may be transferred to the office 24 of mental health and the office of addiction services and supports 25 for payment to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 26 the preparation of plans purpose (51F12330) (81088) ................ 27 7,000,000 ........................................... (re. $522,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 29 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 30 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 31 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 32 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 33 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 34 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 35 new and existing projects associated with the institutional services 36 program and the community services program. Upon the request of the 37 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 38 ties and the approval of the director of the budget, this appropri- 39 ation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority 40 of the state of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budg- 41 et, funds from this appropriation may be transferred to the office 42 of mental health and the office of addiction services and supports 43 for payment to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 44 the preparation of plans purpose (51F12230) (81088) ................ 45 7,000,000 ........................................... (re. $315,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 640 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 2 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 3 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 4 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 5 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 6 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 7 new and existing projects associated with the institutional services 8 program and the community services program. Upon the request of the 9 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 10 ties and the approval of the director of the budget, this appropri- 11 ation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority 12 of the state of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budg- 13 et, funds from this appropriation may be transferred to the office 14 of mental health and the office of addiction services and supports 15 for payment to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 16 the preparation of plans purpose (51F12130) (81088) ................ 17 7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,193,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 19 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 20 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 21 services or to the dormitory authority for the purpose of prepara- 22 tion and review of plans, specifications, estimates, services, 23 construction management and supervision, inspection, studies, 24 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 25 new and existing projects associated with the institutional services 26 program and the community services program. Upon the request of the 27 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabili- 28 ties and the approval of the director of the budget, this appropri- 29 ation may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authority 30 of the state of New York. Upon approval by the director of the budg- 31 et, funds from this appropriation may be transferred to the office 32 of mental health and the office of addiction services and supports 33 for payment to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for 34 the preparation of plans purpose (51F12030) (81088) ................ 35 7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,193,000) 36 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 39 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 41 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 42 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs 43 (51FM25MO) (81107) ... 53,000,000 ................ (re. $44,184,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 641 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 2 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs 3 (51FM23MO) (81107) ... 44,000,000 ................. (re. $3,028,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 5 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 6 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs 7 (51FM20MO) (81107) ... 41,000,000 ................. (re. $1,572,000) 8 INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES PROGRAM (CCP) 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 11 OPWDD-State Facilities Account - 32310 12 Health and Safety Purpose 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 14 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 15 For alterations and improvements for health and safety projects at 16 various facilities. This appropriation may be used for the cost of 17 potential claims against contracts awarded by the dormitory authori- 18 ty of the state of New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the 19 office for people with developmental disabilities and approval by 20 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 21 or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York, 22 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 23 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 24 the director of the budget (51H31301) (81078) ...................... 25 42,000,000 ....................................... (re. $35,732,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 28 For alterations and improvements for health and safety projects at 29 various facilities. This appropriation may be used for the cost of 30 potential claims against contracts awarded by the dormitory authori- 31 ty of the state of New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the 32 office for people with developmental disabilities and approval by 33 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 34 or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York, 35 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 36 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 37 the director of the budget (51H31201) (81078) ...................... 38 28,830,000 ....................................... (re. $16,851,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 40 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 41 For alterations and improvements for health and safety projects at 42 various facilities. This appropriation may be used for the cost of 43 potential claims against contracts awarded by the dormitory authori- 44 ty of the state of New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the 642 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 office for people with developmental disabilities and approval by 2 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 3 or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 4 (51H31101) (81078) ... 44,855,000 ................ (re. $11,988,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 For alterations and improvements for health and safety projects at 8 various facilities. This appropriation may be used for the cost of 9 potential claims against contracts awarded by the dormitory authori- 10 ty of the state of New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the 11 office for people with developmental disabilities and approval by 12 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 13 or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 14 (51H31001) (81078) ... 40,500,000 ................. (re. $7,432,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 17 For alterations and improvements for health and safety projects at 18 various facilities. This appropriation may be used for the cost of 19 potential claims against contracts awarded by the dormitory authori- 20 ty of the state of New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the 21 office for people with developmental disabilities and approval by 22 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 23 or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 24 (51H30801) (81078) ... 33,200,000 ................. (re. $6,410,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 54, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 27 For alterations and improvements for health and safety projects at 28 various facilities. This appropriation may be used for the cost of 29 potential claims against contracts awarded by the dormitory authori- 30 ty of the state of New York. Upon request of the commissioner of the 31 office for people with developmental disabilities and approval by 32 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 33 or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 34 (51H30701) (81078) ... 32,290,000 ................. (re. $3,707,000) 35 STATE-OPERATED COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM (CCP) 36 Capital Projects Funds - Other 37 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 38 New Facilities Purpose 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 40 For alterations and improvements of sites leased for state-operated 41 programs, and for the purchase of furniture and equipment for 42 stateoperated programs. Upon request of the commissioner of the 43 office for people with developmental disabilities and approval by 44 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be transferred to 643 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the dormitory authority of the state of New York, provided, however, 2 that no expenditures may be made from this appropriation until a 3 comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by the director of 4 the budget (51L11307) (37858) ... 4,700,000 ....... (re. $3,628,000) 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other 6 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 7 OPWDD-State Facilities Account - 32310 8 Fire Safety Purpose 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 11 For alterations and improvements for fire safety and life safety 12 upgrades of state-owned community residential and day program facil- 13 ities for persons with developmental disabilities. Upon request of 14 the commissioner of the office for people with developmental disa- 15 bilities and approval by the director of the budget, this appropri- 16 ation may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authority 17 of the state of New York, provided, however, that no expenditures 18 may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of 19 projects has been approved by the director of the budget (51FS13F3) 20 (37880) ... 16,000,000 ........................... (re. $12,702,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 22 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 23 For alterations and improvements for fire safety and life safety 24 upgrades of state-owned community residential and day program facil- 25 ities for persons with developmental disabilities. Upon request of 26 the commissioner of the office for people with developmental disa- 27 bilities and approval by the director of the budget, this appropri- 28 ation may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory authority 29 of the state of New York, provided, however, that no expenditures 30 may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of 31 projects has been approved by the director of the budget (51FS12F3) 32 (37880) ... 24,500,000 ............................ (re. $6,368,000) 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 35 OPWDD-State Facilities Account - 32310 36 New Facilities Purpose 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 39 For the acquisition and alterations and improvements of property to be 40 used as state-operated community residential facilities. Upon 41 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 42 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, this 43 appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 44 authority of the state of New York. Upon request of the commissioner 45 of the office for people with developmental disabilities, and 644 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may be 2 used for the acquisition and alterations and improvements of proper- 3 ty to be used as not-for-profit facilities licensed pursuant to 4 articles 16 and 41 of the mental hygiene law (51R11107) (37858) .... 5 31,000,000 ....................................... (re. $27,541,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 7 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 8 For the acquisition and alterations and improvements of property to be 9 used as state-operated community residential facilities. Upon 10 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 11 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, this 12 appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 13 authority of the state of New York. Upon request of the commissioner 14 of the office for people with developmental disabilities, and 15 approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may be 16 used for the acquisition and alterations and improvements of proper- 17 ty to be used as not-for-profit facilities licensed pursuant to 18 articles 16 and 41 of the mental hygiene law (51R11007) (37858) .... 19 28,325,000 ....................................... (re. $20,290,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 21 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 22 For the acquisition and alterations and improvements of property to be 23 used as state-operated community residential facilities. Upon 24 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 25 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, this 26 appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 27 authority of the state of New York. Upon request of the commissioner 28 of the office for people with developmental disabilities, and 29 approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may be 30 used for the acquisition and alterations and improvements of proper- 31 ty to be used as not-for-profit facilities licensed pursuant to 32 articles 16 and 41 of the mental hygiene law (51R10907) (37858) .... 33 14,675,000 ........................................ (re. $3,797,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 35 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 36 For the acquisition and alterations and improvements of property to be 37 used as state-operated community residential facilities. Upon 38 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 39 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, this 40 appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 41 authority of the state of New York. Upon request of the commissioner 42 of the office for people with developmental disabilities, and 43 approval by the director of the budget, this appropriation may be 44 used for the acquisition and alterations and improvements of proper- 45 ty to be used as not-for-profit facilities licensed pursuant to 46 articles 16 and 41 of the mental hygiene law (51R10807) (37858) .... 47 24,575,000 ........................................ (re. $4,846,000) 645 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 3 OPWDD-State Facilities Account - 32310 4 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 For renovation and minor rehabilitation and improvements of stateowned 8 community residential and day program facilities for persons with 9 developmental disabilities. Upon request of the commissioner of the 10 office for people with developmental disabilities and approval by 11 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 12 or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York, 13 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 14 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 15 the director of the budget (51PR1303) (37857) ...................... 16 1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 17 VOLUNTARY-OPERATED COMMUNITY FACILITIES (CCP) 18 Capital Projects - Other 19 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 20 New Facilities Purpose 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 22 For state aid, to municipalities and other public and not-forprofit 23 agencies, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 24 April 1, 2013 for up to 100 per centum of the net cost of feasibil- 25 ity studies, property options, capital renovations, acquisition of 26 property, construction, rehabilitation and capital costs incidental 27 and appurtenant to facilities required to be licensed pursuant to 28 article 16, as defined in the mental hygiene law, and for services 29 and expenses related to environmental modifications and adaptive 30 technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provider operated 31 community residential facilities, certified family care homes and 32 private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care providers, 33 for payment to other state and federal housing agencies, private 34 corporations and for capital development of residential housing or 35 day program alternatives not currently defined in the mental hygiene 36 law, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 37 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 38 approved by the director of the budget (51B11307) (37860) .......... 39 5,900,000 ......................................... (re. $5,900,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 41 For state aid, to municipalities and other public and not-forprofit 42 agencies, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 43 April 1, 2012 for up to 100 per centum of the net cost of feasibil- 44 ity studies, property options, capital renovations, acquisition of 45 property, construction, rehabilitation and capital costs incidental 646 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 and appurtenant to facilities required to be licensed pursuant to 2 article 16, as defined in the mental hygiene law, and for services 3 and expenses related to environmental modifications and adaptive 4 technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provider operated 5 community residential facilities, certified family care homes and 6 private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care providers, 7 for payment to other state and federal housing agencies, private 8 corporations and for capital development of residential housing or 9 day program alternatives not currently defined in the mental hygiene 10 law, provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this 11 appropriation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been 12 approved by the director of the budget (51B11207) (37860) .......... 13 5,740,000 ......................................... (re. $5,740,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 15 For state aid, to municipalities and other public and not-for-profit 16 agencies, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 17 April 1, 2011 for up to 100 per centum of the net cost of feasibil- 18 ity studies, property options, capital renovations, acquisition of 19 property, construction, rehabilitation and capital costs incidental 20 and appurtenant to facilities required to be licensed pursuant to 21 article 16, as defined in the mental hygiene law, and for services 22 and expenses related to environmental modifications and adaptive 23 technology services at voluntary not-for-profit provider operated 24 community residential facilities, certified family care homes and 25 private residences, as a loan and/or grant to family care providers, 26 for payment to other state and federal housing agencies, private 27 corporations and for capital development of residential housing or 28 day program alternatives not currently defined in the mental hygiene 29 law (51B11107) (37860) ... 5,370,000 .............. (re. $5,370,000) 30 Capital Projects Funds - Other 31 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 32 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 34 For state aid, to municipalities and other public and not-forprofit 35 agencies, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 36 April 1, 2013, for up to 100 per centum of the net cost of services 37 and expenses related to the maintenance and improvement inclusive of 38 fire safety and life safety upgrades of voluntary not-for-profit 39 provider operated community residential and day service programs, 40 provided, however, that no expenditures may be made from this appro- 41 priation until a comprehensive plan of projects has been approved by 42 the director of the budget (51201303) (37859) ...................... 43 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 44 Capital Projects Funds - Other 45 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 46 OPWDD-Community Facilities Account - 32304 647 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Community Facilities Purpose 2 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 3 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 4 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and projects as 5 herein specified, and for departmental administrative costs related 6 thereto, consistent with section 41.34 of the mental hygiene law, 7 and for the acquisition of property, construction and rehabiliation, 8 including the payment of preoperational costs incurred prior to 9 occupancy, of article 16 community mental retardation facilities and 10 associated programs and facilities and under the auspice of munici- 11 palities and other public and not-for-profit private agencies 12 approved by the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 13 mental disabilities, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene 14 law and for management fees associated with voluntary not-for-profit 15 operated projects to be financed through dormitory authority of the 16 state of New York bonds, provided, however, that no expenditures may 17 be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of 18 projects has been approved by the director of the budget. Upon 19 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 20 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, this 21 appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 22 authority of the state of New York (513213H2) (37861) .............. 23 7,400,000 ......................................... (re. $7,400,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 26 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and projects as 27 herein specified, and for departmental administrative costs related 28 thereto, consistent with section 41.34 of the mental hygiene law, 29 and for the acquisition of property, construction and rehabili- 30 tation, including the payment of preoperational costs incurred prior 31 to occupancy, of article 16 community mental retardation facilities 32 and associated programs and facilities and under the auspice of 33 municipalities and other public and not-for-profit private agencies 34 approved by the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 35 mental disabilities, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene 36 law and for management fees associated with voluntary not-for-profit 37 operated projects to be financed through dormitory authority of 38 thestate of New York bonds, provided, however, that no expenditures 39 may be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of 40 projects has been approved by the director of the budget. Upon 41 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 42 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, this 43 appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 44 authority of the state of New York (513212H2) (37861) .............. 45 7,280,000 ......................................... (re. $7,280,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 47 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 648 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and projects as 2 herein specified, and for departmental administrative costs related 3 thereto, consistent with section 41.34 of the mental hygiene law, 4 and for the acquisition of property, construction and rehabili- 5 tation, including the payment of preoperational costs incurred prior 6 to occupancy, of article 16 community mental retardation facilities 7 and associated programs and facilities and under the auspice of 8 municipalities and other public and not-for-profit private agencies 9 approved by the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 10 mental disabilities, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene 11 law and for management fees associated with voluntary not-for-profit 12 operated projects to be financed through dormitory authority of the 13 state of New York bonds. Upon request of the commissioner of the 14 office for people with developmental disabilities and approval by 15 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 16 or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 17 (513211H2) (37861) ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $7,000,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 19 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 20 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and projects as 21 herein specified, and for departmental administrative costs related 22 thereto, consistent with section 41.34 of the mental hygiene law,and 23 for the acquisition of property, construction and rehabilitation, 24 including the payment of preoperational costs incurred prior to 25 occupancy, of article 16 community mental retardation facilities and 26 associated programs and facilities and under the auspice of munici- 27 palities and other public and not-for-profit private agencies 28 approved by the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 29 mental disabilities, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene 30 law and for management fees associated with voluntary not-for-profit 31 operated projects to be financed through dormitory authority of the 32 state of New York bonds. Upon request of the commissioner of the 33 office for people with developmental disabilities and approval by 34 the director of the budget, this appropriation may be suballocated 35 or transferred to the dormitory authority of the state of New York 36 (513210H2) (37861) ... 6,710,000 .................. (re. $6,710,000) 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 Mental Hygiene Facilities Capital Improvement Fund 39 OPWDD-Community Facilities Account - 32304 40 Fire Safety Purpose 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 43 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and projects as 44 herein specified, and for departmental administrative costs related 45 thereto, consistent with section 41.34 of the mental hygiene law, 46 and for alterations and improvements for fire safety and life safety 47 upgrades of article 16 community mental retardation facilities and 649 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 associated programs and facilities and under the auspice of munici- 2 palities and other public and not-for-profit private agencies 3 approved by the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 4 mental disabilities, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene 5 law and for management fees associated with voluntary not-for-profit 6 operated projects to be financed through dormitory authority of the 7 state of New York bonds, provided, however, that no expenditures may 8 be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of 9 projects has been approved by the director of the budget. Upon 10 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 11 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, this 12 appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 13 authority of the state of New York (51FV13F3) (37881) .............. 14 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $30,000,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 17 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and projects as 18 herein specified, and for departmental administrative costs related 19 thereto, consistent with section 41.34 of the mental hygiene law, 20 and for alterations and improvements for fire safety and life safety 21 upgrades of article 16 community mental retardation facilities and 22 associated programs and facilities and under the auspice of munici- 23 palities and other public and not-for-profit private agencies 24 approved by the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 25 mental disabilities, pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene 26 law and for management fees associated with voluntary not-for-profit 27 operated projects to be financed through dormitory authority of the 28 state of New York bonds, provided, however, that no expenditures may 29 be made from this appropriation until a comprehensive plan of 30 projects has been approved by the director of the budget. Upon 31 request of the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 32 mental disabilities and approval by the director of the budget, this 33 appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to the dormitory 34 authority of the state of New York (51FV12F3) (37881) .............. 35 31,000,000 ....................................... (re. $31,000,000) 650 12654-09-6 METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 75,000,000 5,800,369,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 75,000,000 5,800,369,000 5 ================ ================ 6 METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY (CCP) ................. 75,000,000 7 -------------- 8 Capital Projects Funds - Other 9 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 10 Mass Transit Purpose 11 For payment to the metropolitan transporta- 12 tion authority for costs associated with 13 design work necessary to advance projects 14 related to the improvement, construction 15 or reconstruction of Jamaica Station, 16 subject to a plan approved by the director 17 of the budget (26JS26MT) .................... 50,000,000 18 For payment to the metropolitan transporta- 19 tion authority for costs associated with 20 preliminary engineering for the extension 21 of the Second Avenue Subway project west 22 along 125th street in Manhattan (26NO26MT) 23 ............................................. 25,000,000 651 12654-09-6 METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Mass Transit Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For the costs of the metropolitan transportation authority's 2025-2029 7 capital program and costs to enhance safety within the subway system 8 (26JL25MT) (43815) ... 3,000,000,000 .......... (re. $3,000,000,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 10 For payment to the Metropolitan Transportation Authority for costs 11 associated with feasibility studies, environmental reviews, and 12 preliminary design and engineering work necessary to advance the 13 Interborough Express and the western expansion of the Second Avenue 14 Subway capital projects. The items shown in the schedule below shall 15 be for projects with a common purpose and may be interchanged with- 16 out limitation subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 17 et: $52,000,000 for the feasibility study, design and engineering 18 work for the Interborough Express; and $16,000,000 for the feasibil- 19 ity study, environmental review and preliminary engineering work for 20 the western expansion of the Second Avenue Subway (26IS24MT) (43813) 21 ... 68,000,000 ................................... (re. $68,000,000) 22 For payment to the Metropolitan Transportation Authority for costs 23 associated with the Metro North Hudson River Line Resiliency 24 Projects including, but not limited to, a feasibility study, envi- 25 ronmental review, preliminary design, engineering work, 26 construction, and slope stabilization efforts (26AI24MT) (43814) ... 27 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,000,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 29 For the costs of the metropolitan transportation authority's 2020-2024 30 capital program including an amount set aside subject to a memoran- 31 dum of understanding pursuant to section 13 of subpart B of part ZZZ 32 of chapter 59 of the laws of 2019. Funds appropriated herein shall 33 be made available in the event that the state elects to meet its 34 commitment through direct payments (26MF20MT) (43812) .............. 35 3,000,000,000 ................................. (re. $1,890,000,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 37 For the costs of the metropolitan transportation authority's 2015-2019 38 capital program, pursuant to chapter 54 of the laws of 2016 regard- 39 ing the commitment of the state of New York to fund, over a multi- 40 year period, $7,336,000,000 of capital costs related to such 41 program. Funds appropriated herein shall be made available in the 42 event that the state elects to meet its commitment through direct 43 payments (26JW19MT) (43809) ........................................ 44 1,467,200,000 ................................... (re. $572,133,000) 45 For the payment by the state, as an advance to the metropolitan trans- 46 portation authority for the capital project costs of the planning, 47 design, acquisition and construction, required or expected to be 652 12654-09-6 METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 required to implement the central business district tolling infras- 2 tructure and collection system, as defined in the "MTA reform and 3 traffic mobility act," enacted as a part of the state fiscal year 4 2019-20 state budget. No portion of this appropriation shall be 5 available for expenditure until the Metropolitan Transportation 6 Authority has entered into a repayment agreement with the director 7 of budget providing for repayment to the state of an amount equal to 8 the amount disbursed from this appropriation and any associated 9 financing costs. A copy of such agreement shall be filed with the 10 state comptroller, the chair of the senate finance committee and 11 chair of the assembly ways and means committee (26CT19MT) (43811) 12 ... 100,000,000 ................................. (re. $100,000,000) 13 TRIBOROUGH BRIDGE AND TUNNEL AUTHORITY 14 Capital Projects Funds - Other 15 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 16 Mass Transportation and Rail Freight Purpose 17 The appropriation made by chapter 314, section 30, of the laws of 1981, 18 as amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is hereby 19 amended and reappropriated to read: 20 Advance for: The sum of thirty-six million dollars ($36,000,000), or 21 so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated as an 22 advance from the capital projects fund to the Triborough bridge and 23 tunnel authority for replacements of the authority's insurance 24 reserve and operating contingency reserve for the period beginning 25 April 1, [2025] 2026 and ending March 31, [2026] 2027. The advance 26 appropriation shall be made available and paid only if the Tribor- 27 ough bridge and tunnel authority's insurance reserve and operating 28 contingency reserve is needed for the purposes for which the 29 reserves were created. 30 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, no part 31 of any such appropriation shall be available for the purposes desig- 32 nated until a certificate of approval of availability shall have 33 been issued by the director of the budget, and a copy of such 34 certificate filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the 35 senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and 36 means committee. Such certificate may be amended from time to time 37 subject to the approval of the director of the budget, and a copy of 38 each such amendment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the 39 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 40 assembly ways and means committee (03310912) (43807) ............... 41 .................................................. (re. $36,000,000) 42 URBAN AND COMMUTER MASS TRANSPORTATION BONDABLE (CCP) 43 Capital Projects Funds - Other 44 Capital Projects Fund - Rebuild and Renew New York (Bondable) - 30000 45 Mass Transit Purpose 653 12654-09-6 METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 2 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 3 York transportation bond act of 2005 and section 1270-f of the 4 public authorities law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from 5 bond fund proceeds for the planning and design, acquisition, 6 construction, reconstruction, replacement, improvement, recondition- 7 ing, rehabilitation and preservation, including the acquisition of 8 real property and interests therein required or expected to be 9 required in connection therewith, of urban and commuter passenger, 10 freight rail, omnibus, mass transit and rapid transit systems, 11 facilities and equipment, including acquisition, which are capital 12 elements set forth in the 2005-2009 capital program plans approved 13 by the metropolitan transportation authority capital program review 14 board (26BA09MT) (43805) ... 82,000,000 .......... (re. $82,000,000) 15 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 16 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 17 York transportation bond act of 2005 and section 1270-f of the 18 public authorities law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from 19 bond fund proceeds for the planning and design, acquisition, 20 construction, reconstruction, replacement, improvement, recondition- 21 ing, rehabilitation and preservation, including the acquisition of 22 real property and interests therein required or expected to be 23 required in connection therewith, of urban and commuter passenger, 24 freight rail, omnibus, mass transit and rapid transit systems, 25 facilities and equipment, including acquisition, which are capital 26 elements set forth in the 2005-2009 capital program plans approved 27 by the metropolitan transportation authority capital program review 28 board (26BA08MT) (43805) ... 487,000,000 ......... (re. $32,236,000) 654 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes, and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 70,760,000 268,993,000 6 Capital Projects Funds - Federal ... 33,613,000 305,681,000 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 104,373,000 574,674,000 9 ================ ================ 10 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISION (CCP) ................... 13,801,000 11 -------------- 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 14 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 15 Alterations and improvements for the preser- 16 vation of facilities including liabilities 17 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 (07SP2603) 18 (38709) ..................................... 13,801,000 19 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) ................. 19,572,000 20 -------------- 21 Capital Projects Funds - Other 22 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 23 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 24 For the maintenance and operation of various 25 facilities and systems including personal 26 services, fringe benefits and indirect 27 costs. Notwithstanding any other law to 28 the contrary, all or a portion of the 29 funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 30 cated or transferred to any department, 31 agency, or public authority (07FM26MO) 32 (81107) ..................................... 11,959,000 33 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 34 Federal Capital Projects Fund 35 DMNA Federal Capital Account - 31365 36 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 37 For the maintenance and operation of various 38 facilities and systems including personal 39 services, fringe benefits and indirect 40 costs. Notwithstanding any other law to 41 the contrary, all or a portion of the 655 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 2 cated or transferred to any department, 3 agency, or public authority (07MF26MO) 4 (81107) ...................................... 7,613,000 5 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS (CCP) .......................... 71,000,000 6 -------------- 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 9 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 10 Alterations and improvements for the preser- 11 vation of facilities including liabilities 12 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 (07MB2603) 13 (81010) ..................................... 45,000,000 14 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 15 Federal Capital Projects Fund 16 DMNA Federal Capital Account - 31365 17 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 18 Alterations and improvements for the preser- 19 vation of facilities including liabilities 20 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 (07FO2603) 21 (81010) ..................................... 26,000,000 656 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISION (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 New Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 6 For the cost of studies, site acquisitions, planning, design, 7 construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment related to 8 the development of federal military and state organized militia 9 facilities including related departmental administrative costs 10 incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (07SN2007) (81089) ................. 11 3,000,000 ........................................... (re. $784,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 13 For the cost of studies, site acquisitions, planning, design, 14 construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment related to 15 the development of federal military and state organized militia 16 facilities including related departmental administrative costs 17 incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (07SN1907) (81089) ................. 18 3,000,000 ........................................... (re. $108,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 20 For the cost of studies, site acquisitions, planning, design, 21 construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment related to 22 the development of federal military and state organized militia 23 facilities including related departmental administrative costs 24 incurred prior to April 1, 2013 (07SN1307) (81089) ................. 25 2,200,000 ............................................ (re. $15,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 27 For the cost of studies, site acquisitions, planning, design, 28 construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment related to 29 the development of federal military and state organized militia 30 facilities including related departmental administrative costs 31 incurred prior to April 1, 2012 (07SN1207) (81089) ................. 32 3,200,000 ........................................... (re. $200,000) 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 35 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 37 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 38 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (07SP2503) 39 (38709) ... 13,801,000 ........................... (re. $13,531,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 41 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 42 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (07SP2403) 43 (38709) ... 13,801,000 ............................ (re. $5,097,000) 657 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 3 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (07SP2303) 4 (38709) ... 13,801,000 ............................ (re. $1,134,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 6 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 7 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (07SP2203) 8 (38709) ... 13,801,000 .............................. (re. $890,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 10 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 11 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (07SP2103) 12 (38709) ... 13,200,000 .............................. (re. $747,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 14 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 15 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (07SP2003) 16 (38709) ... 10,200,000 .............................. (re. $438,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 18 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 19 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (07SP1903) 20 (38709) ... 10,200,000 .............................. (re. $210,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 22 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 23 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (07SP1803) 24 (38709) ... 13,200,000 .............................. (re. $287,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 26 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 27 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (07OB1703) 28 (81109) ... 3,000,000 ............................... (re. $109,000) 29 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 30 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 31 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (07SP1603) 32 (38709) ... 6,000,000 ................................ (re. $47,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 34 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 35 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2015 (07SP1503) 36 (38709) ... 2,000,000 ................................ (re. $23,000) 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 38 Military Museum Account - 32225 39 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 41 Alterations and improvements including design and related departmental 42 administrative costs for program improvement or program change of 658 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the New York state military museum and veterans research center, 2 through the use of donated funds (07MM2008) (81115) ................ 3 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 4 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 5 Federal Capital Projects Fund 6 DMNA Federal Capital Account - 31365 7 New Facilities Purpose 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 9 For the cost of studies, site acquisitions, planning, design, 10 construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment related to 11 the development of federal military and state organized militia 12 facilities including related departmental administrative costs 13 incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (07NF1807) (81089) ................. 14 8,000,000 ........................................... (re. $980,000) 15 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 16 Federal Capital Projects Fund 17 DMNA Federal Capital Account - 31365 18 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 19 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 20 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 21 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (07FP1603) 22 (38709) ... 3,000,000 ............................... (re. $148,000) 23 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) 24 Capital Projects Funds - Other 25 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 26 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 28 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 29 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 30 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 31 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 32 any department, agency, or public authority (07FM25MO) (81107) ..... 33 11,959,000 ....................................... (re. $11,959,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 35 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 36 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 37 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 38 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 39 any department, agency, or public authority (07FM24MO) (81107) ... 40 7,307,000 ......................................... (re. $3,508,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 42 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 43 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 659 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 2 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 3 any department, agency, or public authority (07FM23MO) (81107) ..... 4 7,307,000 ......................................... (re. $3,564,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 7 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 8 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 9 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 10 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 11 any department, agency, or public authority (07FM22MO) (81107) ... 12 8,454,000 ......................................... (re. $5,315,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 14 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 15 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 16 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 17 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 18 department, agency, or public authority (07FM21MO) (81107) ......... 19 4,000,000 ............................................ (re. $25,000) 20 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 21 Federal Capital Projects Fund 22 DMNA Federal Capital Account - 31365 23 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 25 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 26 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 27 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 28 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 29 any department, agency, or public authority (07MF25MO) (81107) ..... 30 7,613,000 ......................................... (re. $7,613,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 32 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 33 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 34 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 35 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 36 any department, agency, or public authority (07MF24MO) (81107) ..... 37 7,613,000 ......................................... (re. $4,083,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 39 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 40 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 41 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 42 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 43 any department, agency, or public authority (07MF23MO) (81107) ..... 44 7,613,000 ......................................... (re. $4,150,000) 660 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 3 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 4 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 5 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 6 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 7 any department, agency, or public authority (07MF22MO) (81107) ... 8 7,232,000 ......................................... (re. $1,677,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 10 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 11 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 12 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 13 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 14 any department, agency, or public authority (07MF21MO) (81107) ..... 15 7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,389,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 17 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 18 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 19 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 20 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 21 department, agency, or public authority (07MF20MO) (81107) ......... 22 7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,596,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 24 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 25 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 26 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 27 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 28 department, agency, or public authority (07MF19MO) (81107) ......... 29 7,000,000 ........................................... (re. $592,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 31 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 32 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs. 33 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 34 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 35 department, agency, or public authority (07MF18MO) (81107) ......... 36 7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,040,000) 37 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS (CCP) 38 Capital Projects Funds - Other 39 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 40 New Facilities Purpose 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 42 For the cost of studies, site acquisitions, planning, design, 43 construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment related to 44 the development of federal military and state organized militia 45 facilities including related departmental administrative costs 661 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 incurred prior to April 1, 2015 (07SF1507) (81025) ................. 2 7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $6,842,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 4 For the cost of studies, site acquisitions, planning, design, 5 construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment related to 6 the development of federal military and state organized militia 7 facilities including related departmental administrative costs 8 incurred prior to April 1, 2013 (07SF1307) (81025) ................. 9 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $373,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 11 For the cost of studies, site acquisitions, planning, design, 12 construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment related to 13 the development of federal military and state organized militia 14 facilities including related departmental administrative costs 15 incurred prior to April 1, 2012 (07SF1207) (81025) ................. 16 11,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,771,000) 17 Capital Projects Funds - Other 18 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 19 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 21 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 22 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (07MB2503) 23 (81010) ... 60,000,000 ........................... (re. $60,000,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 25 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 26 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (07MB2403) 27 (81010) ... 35,000,000 ........................... (re. $25,075,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 29 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 30 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (07MB2303) 31 (81010) ... 25,000,000 ............................ (re. $7,863,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 33 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 34 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (07MB2203) 35 (81010) ... 25,000,000 ............................ (re. $7,813,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 37 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 38 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (07MB2103) 39 (81010) ... 15,000,000 .............................. (re. $199,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 41 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 42 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (07MB2003) 43 (81010) ... 25,000,000 ........................... (re. $12,595,000) 662 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 2 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 3 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (07MB1903) 4 (81010) ... 25,000,000 .............................. (re. $517,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 6 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 7 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (07MB1803) 8 (81010) ... 20,000,000 ............................... (re. $81,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 10 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 11 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (07MB1703) 12 (81010) ... 17,000,000 .............................. (re. $331,000) 13 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 14 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 15 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (07SO1603) 16 (81010) ... 7,200,000 ............................. (re. $1,511,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 18 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 19 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2015 (07SO1503) 20 (81010) ... 3,200,000 ................................ (re. $38,000) 21 Capital Projects Funds - Other 22 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 23 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 25 For the cost of studies, planning, design, construction, recon- 26 struction, renovation, and equipment related to the development of 27 federal military and state organized militia facilities including 28 related departmental administrative costs incurred prior to April 1, 29 2025 (07HQ2508) (81063) ... 40,000,000 ........... (re. $40,000,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 31 For the cost of studies, planning, design, construction, recon- 32 struction, renovation, and equipment related to the development of 33 federal military and state organized militia facilities including 34 related departmental administrative costs incurred prior to April 1, 35 2024 (07LA2408) (81063) ... 15,000,000 ........... (re. $15,000,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 37 For the cost of studies, planning, design, construction, recon- 38 struction, renovation, and equipment related to the development of 39 federal military and state organized militia facilities including 40 related departmental administrative costs incurred prior to April 1, 41 2023 (07LA2308) (81063) ... 25,000,000 ........... (re. $21,118,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 663 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the cost of studies, planning, design, construction, recon- 2 struction, renovation, and equipment related to the development of 3 federal military and state organized militia facilities including 4 related departmental administrative costs incurred prior to April 1, 5 2020 (07JA2008) (81063) ... 40,000,000 ............ (re. $9,875,000) 6 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 7 Federal Capital Projects Fund 8 DMNA Federal Capital Account - 31365 9 New Facilities Purpose 10 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 11 For the cost of studies, site acquisitions, planning, design, 12 construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment related to 13 the development of federal military and state organized militia 14 facilities including related departmental administrative costs 15 incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (07FF1607) (81025) ................. 16 10,000,000 ........................................... (re. $73,000) 17 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 18 Federal Capital Projects Fund 19 DMNA Federal Capital Account - 31365 20 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 22 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 23 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (07FO2503) 24 (81010) ... 26,000,000 ........................... (re. $26,000,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 27 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (07FO2403) 28 (81010) ... 26,000,000 ........................... (re. $23,867,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 30 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 31 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (07FO2303) 32 (81010) ... 26,000,000 ............................ (re. $8,726,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 34 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 35 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (07FO2203) 36 (81010) ... 26,000,000 ............................ (re. $1,623,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 38 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 39 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (07FO2103) 40 (81010) ... 26,000,000 ............................ (re. $3,066,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 664 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 2 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (07FO2003) 3 (81010) ... 26,000,000 ............................ (re. $7,409,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 5 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 6 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (07FO1903) 7 (81010) ... 26,000,000 ............................ (re. $2,436,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 9 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 10 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (07FO1803) 11 (81010) ... 18,000,000 ............................ (re. $1,582,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 13 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 14 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (07FO1703) 15 (81010) ... 18,000,000 ............................ (re. $3,793,000) 16 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 17 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities 18 including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (07FO1603) 19 (81010) ... 12,000,000 ............................ (re. $2,644,000) 20 For preventive maintenance on state facilities including personal 21 services, non-personal services, fringe benefits and the contractual 22 services provided by private firms, including the payment of liabil- 23 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (07FM1603) (38711) ........... 24 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,986,000) 25 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 26 Federal Capital Projects Fund 27 DMNA Federal Capital Account - 31365 28 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 30 For the cost of studies, planning, design, construction, recon- 31 struction, renovation, and equipment related to the development of 32 federal military and state organized militia including related 33 departmental administrative costs incurred prior to April 1, 2025 34 (07HF2508) (81063) ... 90,000,000 ................ (re. $90,000,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 36 For the cost of studies, planning, design, construction, recon- 37 struction, renovation, and equipment related to the development of 38 federal military and state organized militia including related 39 departmental administrative costs incurred prior to April 1, 2024 40 (07FL2408) (81063) ... 15,000,000 ................ (re. $15,000,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 42 For the cost of studies, planning, design, construction, recon- 43 struction, renovation, and equipment related to the development of 44 federal military and state organized militia including related 665 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 departmental administrative costs incurred prior to April 1, 2023 2 (07FL2308) (81063) ... 75,000,000 ................ (re. $65,538,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 4 For the cost of studies, planning, design, construction, recon- 5 struction, renovation, and equipment related to the development of 6 federal military and state organized militia facilities including 7 related departmental administrative costs incurred prior to April 1, 8 2020 (07FJ2008) (81063) ... 100,000,000 .......... (re. $24,670,000) 666 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 336,469,000 455,765,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 336,469,000 455,765,000 8 ================ ================ 9 TRANSPORTATION SUPPORT (CCP) ............................... 336,469,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 13 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 14 Transportation Support Purpose 15 For services and expenses of the department 16 of motor vehicles. 17 The items shown in the schedule below shall 18 be for projects with a common purpose and 19 may be interchanged without limitation 20 subject to the approval of the director of 21 the budget. 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 23 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 24 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 25 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 26 state fiscal year state operations appro- 27 priation for the budget division program 28 of the division of the budget, are deemed 29 fully incorporated herein and a part of 30 this appropriation as if fully stated 31 (39012). 32 Personal service (231126TS) (50000) .......... 142,192,000 33 Nonpersonal service (231226TS) (57050) ........ 95,470,000 34 Fringe benefits (231326TS) (60090) ............ 93,981,000 35 Indirect costs (231426TS) (58850) .............. 4,826,000 667 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 DMV TRANSFORMATION (CCP) 2 Capital Project Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to technology equipment, software 7 and services needed to upgrade or replace the department of motor 8 vehicles' legacy technology systems and improve service offerings 9 (23ET2408) (39027) ... 178,460,000 .............. (re. $144,443,000) 10 TRANSPORTATION SUPPORT (CCP) 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 13 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 14 Transportation Support Purpose 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 16 For services and expenses of the department of motor vehicles. 17 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 18 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 19 the approval of the director of the budget. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 21 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 22 fer Authority as defined in the state fiscal year state operations 23 appropriation for the budget division program of the division of the 24 budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a part of this 25 appropriation as if fully stated (39012). 26 Personal service (231125TS) (50000) .................................. 27 142,192,000 ...................................... (re. $66,406,000) 28 Nonpersonal service (231225TS) (57050) ............................... 29 95,470,000 ....................................... (re. $75,524,000) 30 Fringe benefits (231325TS) (60090) ................................... 31 93,981,000 ....................................... (re. $52,705,000) 32 Indirect costs (231425TS) (58850) ... 4,826,000 ..... (re. $2,446,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 34 For services and expenses of the department of motor vehicles. 35 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 36 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 37 the approval of the director of the budget. 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 39 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 40 fer Authority as defined in the state fiscal year state operations 41 appropriation for the budget division program of the division of the 42 budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a part of this 43 appropriation as if fully stated (39012). 44 Nonpersonal service (231224TS) (57050) ............................... 45 95,470,000 ....................................... (re. $17,285,000) 668 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 For services and expenses of the department of motor vehicles. 3 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 4 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 5 the approval of the director of the budget. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 7 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 8 fer Authority as defined in the state fiscal year state operations 9 appropriation for the budget division program of the division of the 10 budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a part of this 11 appropriation as if fully stated (39012). 12 Nonpersonal service (231223TS) (57050) ............................... 13 94,470,000 ........................................ (re. $5,525,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 15 For services and expenses of the department of motor vehicles. 16 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 17 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 18 the approval of the director of the budget. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 20 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 21 fer Authority as defined in the state fiscal year state operations 22 appropriation for the budget division program of the division of the 23 budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a part of this 24 appropriation as if fully stated (39012). 25 Personal service (231122TS) (50000) .................................. 26 146,279,000 ....................................... (re. $6,251,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (231222TS) (57050) ............................... 28 191,152,000 ...................................... (re. $77,813,000) 29 Fringe benefits (231322TS) (60090) ... 88,123,000 ... (re. $4,529,000) 30 Indirect costs (231422TS) (58850) ... 4,984,000 ....... (re. $325,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 32 For services and expenses of the department of motor vehicles. 33 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 34 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 35 the approval of the director of the budget. 36 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 37 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 38 fer Authority as defined in the state fiscal year state operations 39 appropriation for the budget division program of the division of the 40 budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a part of this 41 appropriation as if fully stated (39012). 42 Nonpersonal service (231221TS) (57050) ............................... 43 94,470,000 ............................................ (re. $4,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 45 For services and expenses of the department of motor vehicles. 46 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 47 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 48 the approval of the director of the budget. 669 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 2 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 3 fer Authority as defined in the 2019-20 state fiscal year state 4 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 5 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39012). 7 Nonpersonal service (231220TS) (57050) ............................... 8 92,154,000 ............................................ (re. $9,000) 9 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 54, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2012: 11 For services and expenses of the department of motor vehicles 12 (230103TS). 13 Maintenance undistributed 14 For services and expenses related to the establishment, operation and 15 maintenance of stationary offices in any city within the county of 16 Monroe with a population of two hundred thousand or more and in any 17 hamlet within the town of Brookhaven within the county of Suffolk 18 with a population of not less than seven thousand nor more than ten 19 thousand (39012) ... 2,500,000 .................... (re. $2,500,000) 670 12654-09-6 OLYMPIC REGIONAL DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 100,000,000 151,448,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 100,000,000 151,448,000 8 ================ ================ 9 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) .. 100,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 14 The sum of $25,000,000 is hereby appropri- 15 ated for services and expenses related to 16 maintenance of olympic and ski facilities, 17 and Belleayre Mountain Ski Center, includ- 18 ing but not limited to energy efficiency 19 projects, lift maintenance, building main- 20 tenance and other infrastructure and 21 preventive maintenance projects, including 22 personal service and the payment of 23 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 24 2026 (20022603) (44704) ..................... 25,000,000 25 The sum of $75,000,000 is hereby appropri- 26 ated for services and expenses related to 27 the upgrade, renovation, and modernization 28 of olympic, ski, and other facilities 29 owned and operated by the olympic regional 30 development authority, including personal 31 service and the payment of liabilities 32 incurred prior to April 1, 2026. The 33 availability of funds from this appropri- 34 ation shall be subject to the approval of 35 a strategic modernization and investment 36 plan by the director of the division of 37 the budget (20222603) (44705) ............... 75,000,000 671 12654-09-6 OLYMPIC REGIONAL DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 The sum of $25,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 7 expenses related to maintenance of olympic and ski facilities, and 8 Belleayre Mountain Ski Center, including but not limited to energy 9 efficiency projects, lift maintenance, building maintenance and 10 other infrastructure and preventive maintenance projects, including 11 personal service and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 12 April 1, 2025 (20022503) (44704) ................................... 13 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $22,992,000) 14 The sum of $85,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 15 expenses related to the upgrade, renovation, and modernization of 16 olympic, ski, and other facilities owned and operated by the olympic 17 regional development authority, including personal service and the 18 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025. The avail- 19 ability of funds from this appropriation shall be subject to the 20 approval of a strategic modernization and investment plan by the 21 director of the division of the budget (20222503) (44705) .......... 22 85,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,220,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 24 The sum of $70,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 25 expenses related to the upgrade, renovation, and modernization of 26 olympic, ski, and other facilities owned and operated by the olympic 27 regional development authority, including personal service and the 28 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024. The avail- 29 ability of funds from this appropriation shall be subject to the 30 approval of a strategic modernization and investment plan by the 31 director of the division of the budget (20222403) (44705) .......... 32 70,000,000 ....................................... (re. $70,000,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 34 The sum of $80,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 35 expenses related to the upgrade, renovation, and modernization of 36 olympic, ski, and other facilities owned and operated by the olympic 37 regional development authority, including personal service and the 38 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023. The avail- 39 ability of funds from this appropriation shall be subject to the 40 approval of a strategic modernization and investment plan by the 41 director of the division of the budget (20222304) (44705) .......... 42 80,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,236,000) 672 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 641,900,000 1,283,165,000 6 Capital Projects Funds - Federal ... 20,000,000 84,399,000 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 661,900,000 1,367,564,000 9 ================ ================ 10 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) ................. 70,500,000 11 -------------- 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 14 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 15 For the maintenance and operation of various 16 facilities and systems including personal 17 services, fringe benefits and indirect 18 costs (49FM26MO) (81107) .................... 37,500,000 19 Capital Projects Funds - Other 20 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 21 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 22 For payment to zoos, botanical gardens, and 23 aquaria for the capital costs of projects 24 to be allocated by the commissioner on a 25 non-competitive basis (49012603) (40439) .... 10,000,000 26 For the services and expenses of the Queens 27 Botanical Gardens ........................... 10,000,000 28 For the services and expenses of the Brook- 29 lyn Botanic Garden ........................... 4,000,000 30 To the town of Rotterdam for parks and 31 sports facilities. All or a portion of the 32 funds appropriated hereby may be suballo- 33 cated or transferred to any department, 34 agency, public benefit corporation, or 35 public authority ............................. 4,000,000 36 To the New York City Department of Transpor- 37 tation for the Queens Waterfront Greenway 38 project. All or a portion of the funds 39 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 40 transferred to any department, agency, 41 public benefit corporation, or public 42 authority .................................... 1,000,000 43 To the New York City Department of Parks & 44 Recreation for Rainey Park. All or a 673 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 portion of the funds appropriated hereby 2 may be suballocated or transferred to any 3 department, agency, public benefit corpo- 4 ration, or public authority .................. 4,000,000 5 FEDERAL CAPITAL PROJECTS FUND (CCP) ......................... 20,000,000 6 -------------- 7 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 8 Federal Capital Projects Fund 9 OPRHP-Federal Capital Projects Account - 31363 10 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 11 For the federal government's share of the 12 cost to prepare and review plans, specifi- 13 cations and estimates, for the acquisition 14 of property and for the construction, 15 expansion and rehabilitation of state 16 facilities for recreation. Portions of 17 this appropriation may be suballocated to 18 other state agencies for such eligible 19 projects subject to the approval of the 20 director of the budget (49FE2603) (39911) ... 20,000,000 21 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) .. 116,400,000 22 -------------- 23 Capital Projects Funds - Other 24 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 25 Capital Miscellaneous Gifts Account - 32214 26 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 27 For alterations, rehabilitation and improve- 28 ments of various park facilities and 29 historic sites, including personal service 30 and the payment of liabilities incurred 31 prior to April 1, 2026, including suballo- 32 cation to other state departments and 33 agencies (49GI2603) (39926) ................. 54,000,000 34 Capital Projects Funds - Other 35 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 36 Minekill State Park Account - 32202 37 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 38 For rehabilitation and improvements at Mine- 39 kill State Park, including the payment of 40 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 41 2026(49PA2603) (39926) ......................... 500,000 42 Capital Projects Funds - Other 43 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 674 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Miscellaneous CP Resource Account - 32203 2 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 3 For rehabilitation and improvements at vari- 4 ous parks and historic sites, including 5 the payment of liabilities incurred prior 6 to April 1, 2026, including suballocation 7 to other state departments and agencies 8 (49RA2603) (39926) ............................. 300,000 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 11 Parks Capital Investment Account - 32207 12 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 13 For rehabilitation, replacement and refur- 14 bishment of facilities at various parks 15 and historic sites, including the payment 16 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 17 2026 (49RR2603) (39926) ........................ 500,000 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 20 Parks and Recreation Resource Account - 32209 21 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 22 For rehabilitation and improvements at vari- 23 ous parks and historic sites, including 24 the payment of liabilities incurred prior 25 to April 1, 2026, including suballocation 26 to other state departments and agencies 27 (49NR2603) (39926) ........................... 1,500,000 28 Capital Projects Funds - Other 29 State Park Infrastructure Fund 30 State Park Infrastructure Account - 30351 31 Engineering Services Purpose 32 For state park engineering services and 33 expenses, including the preparation of 34 plans and designs; specifications and 35 estimates; construction management and 36 supervision; surveys and testing; environ- 37 mental impact and historic project assess- 38 ment; and related services for state parks 39 infrastructure fund projects including the 40 payment of contractual services, travel 41 expenses and supplies and fringe benefits 42 charges (490626ES) (39927) ................... 5,800,000 43 Capital Projects Funds - Other 44 State Park Infrastructure Fund 675 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 State Park Infrastructure Account - 30351 2 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 3 For alterations, rehabilitation and improve- 4 ments of various park facilities and 5 historic sites including personal service 6 and the payment of liabilities incurred 7 prior to April 1, 2026 including suballo- 8 cation to other state departments and 9 agencies (49032603) (81010) ................. 48,600,000 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 State Park Infrastructure Fund 12 State Park Infrastructure Account - 30351 13 Preventive Maintenance Purpose 14 For preventive maintenance at various parks 15 and historic sites, including personal 16 services and fringe benefits (49ZZ26PM) 17 (39928) ...................................... 5,200,000 18 NEW YORK WORKS (CCP) ....................................... 455,000,000 19 -------------- 20 Capital Projects Funds - Other 21 State Park Infrastructure Fund 22 State Park Infrastructure Account - 30351 23 New Facilities Purpose 24 For services and expenses related to 25 projects for alterations, rehabilitation, 26 acquisition, maintenance, improvements, 27 and development at High Falls State Park. 28 All or a portion of the funds appropriated 29 hereby may be suballocated or transferred 30 to any department, agency, public benefit 31 corporation, or public authority 32 (49HF2607) .................................. 75,000,000 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 State Park Infrastructure Fund 35 State Park Infrastructure Account - 30351 36 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 37 For services and expenses related to New 38 York Works projects, including: infras- 39 tructure projects at state parks and 40 historic sites, publicly accessible elec- 41 tric vehicle charging stations, the 42 repair, rehabilitation, maintenance and 43 improvement of the Empire State Trail All 44 or a portion of the funds appropriated 676 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 hereby may be suballocated or transferred 2 to any department, agency, public benefit 3 corporation, or public authority 4 (49NY2603) (39944) ......................... 200,000,000 5 For services and expenses related to the New 6 York Building Recreational Infrastructure 7 for Communities, Kids, and Seniors includ- 8 ing but not limited to grants to munici- 9 palities or not-for-profit entities for 10 the renovation, expansion or construction 11 of community centers, to achieve a public 12 purpose. Not less than $37,500,000 of this 13 appropriation shall be used for grants to 14 municipalities or not-for-profit entities 15 in underserved communities. Notwithstand- 16 ing any other provision of law, the dormi- 17 tory authority of the state of New York, 18 in conjunction with the office of parks, 19 recreation and historic preservation, is 20 authorized to administer a grant program, 21 which may be awarded on a competitive 22 basis through a request for applications 23 process and eligibility criteria deter- 24 mined by the office of parks, recreation 25 and historic preservation in consultation 26 with the dormitory authority of the state 27 of New York, which criteria may prioritize 28 access to underserved communities. Grants 29 may be used for any applicable expenses 30 including but not limited to general 31 project development costs, the acquisi- 32 tion, design, construction, improvement, 33 or renovation of the site, the purchase of 34 equipment, and other costs necessary to 35 effectuate the initiative. A portion of 36 this appropriation may be transferred to 37 state operations for administration of the 38 program. All or a portion of the funds 39 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 40 transferred to any department, agency, 41 public benefit corporation, or public 42 authority (49BR2603) (40446) ................ 75,000,000 43 For services and expenses related to Ameri- 44 ca's 250th Commemoration projects, includ- 45 ing, but not limited to, the creation of 46 the New York History Preservation and 47 Resource Center at Peebles Island State 48 Park (49PI2603) .............................. 7,000,000 49 For services and expenses related to 50 projects for alterations, rehabilitation, 51 acquisition, maintenance, and improvements 52 at Denny Farrell Riverbank State Park, 677 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Lake Welch Beach at Harriman State Park, 2 and Montauk Downs State Park (49MW2603) ..... 58,000,000 3 For services and expenses related to the New 4 York Statewide Investment in More Swimming 5 initiative, including but not limited to 6 grants to municipalities or not-for-profit 7 entities for the renovation, expansion or 8 construction of swimming facilities and 9 structures, including natural swimming 10 areas and improvements ancillary thereto, 11 to achieve a public purpose. Not less than 12 $10,000,000 of this appropriation shall be 13 used for grants to municipalities or not- 14 for-profit entities in underserved commu- 15 nities. Notwithstanding any other 16 provision of law, the dormitory authority 17 of the state of New York, in conjunction 18 with the office of parks, recreation and 19 historic preservation, is authorized to 20 administer a grant program, which may be 21 awarded on a competitive basis through a 22 request for applications process and 23 eligibility criteria determined by the 24 office of parks, recreation and historic 25 preservation in consultation with the 26 dormitory authority of the state of New 27 York, which criteria may prioritize access 28 to underserved communities. Grants may be 29 used for any applicable expenses including 30 but not limited to general project devel- 31 opment costs, the acquisition, design, 32 construction, improvement, or renovation 33 of the site, the purchase of equipment, 34 and other costs necessary to effectuate 35 the initiative. A portion of this appro- 36 priation may be transferred to state oper- 37 ations for administration of the program. 38 All or a portion of the funds appropriated 39 hereby may be suballocated or transferred 40 to any department, agency, public benefit 41 corporation, or public authority ............ 20,000,000 42 For services and expenses related to the New 43 York Places for Learning, Activity, and 44 Youth Socialization including but not 45 limited to grants to municipalities or 46 not-for-profit entities for the reno- 47 vation, expansion or construction of play- 48 grounds, to achieve a public purpose. Not 49 less than $10,000,000 of this appropri- 50 ation shall be used for grants to munici- 51 palities or not-for-profit entities in 52 underserved communities. Notwithstanding 678 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 any other provision of law, the dormitory 2 authority of the state of New York, in 3 conjunction with the office of parks, 4 recreation and historic preservation, is 5 authorized to administer a grant program, 6 which may be awarded on a competitive 7 basis through a request for applications 8 process and eligibility criteria deter- 9 mined by the office of parks, recreation 10 and historic preservation in consultation 11 with the dormitory authority of the state 12 of New York, which criteria may prioritize 13 access to underserved communities or 14 people with disabilities. Grants may be 15 used for any applicable expenses including 16 but not limited to general project devel- 17 opment costs, the acquisition, design, 18 construction, improvement, or renovation 19 of the site, the purchase of equipment, 20 and other costs necessary to effectuate 21 the initiative. A portion of this appro- 22 priation may be transferred to state oper- 23 ations for administration of the program. 24 All or a portion of the funds appropriated 25 hereby may be suballocated or transferred 26 to any department, agency, public benefit 27 corporation, or public authority ............ 20,000,000 679 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For payment to zoos, botanical gardens, and aquaria for the capital 7 costs of projects to be allocated by the commissioner on a non-com- 8 petitive basis (49012503) (40439) .................................. 9 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 11 For payment to zoos, botanical gardens, and aquaria for the capital 12 costs of projects to be allocated by the commissioner on a non-com- 13 petitive basis (49012403) (40439) .................................. 14 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 15 For the services and expenses of the New York Botanical Gardens 16 (49BG2403) (40442) ... 10,000,000 ................ (re. $10,000,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 18 For payment to zoos, botanical gardens, and aquaria for the capital 19 costs of projects to be allocated by the commissioner on a non-com- 20 petitive basis (49012303) (40439) .................................. 21 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,929,000) 22 Capital Projects Funds - Other 23 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 24 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 26 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 27 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs 28 (49FM25MO) (81107) ... 37,500,000 ................ (re. $25,656,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 30 For the maintenance and operation of various facilities and systems 31 including personal services, fringe benefits and indirect costs 32 (49FM24MO) (81107) ... 36,000,000 ................... (re. $999,000) 33 FEDERAL CAPITAL PROJECTS FUND (CCP) 34 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 35 Federal Capital Projects Fund 36 OPRHP-Federal Capital Projects Account - 31363 37 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 39 For the federal government's share of the cost to prepare and review 40 plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition of property 41 and for the construction, expansion and rehabilitation of state 42 facilities for recreation. Portions of this appropriation may be 680 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 suballocated to other state agencies for such eligible projects 2 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (49FE2503) 3 (39911) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For the federal government's share of the cost to prepare and review 6 plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition of property 7 and for the construction, expansion and rehabilitation of state 8 facilities for recreation. Portions of this appropriation may be 9 suballocated to other state agencies for such eligible projects 10 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (49FE2403) 11 (39911) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 For the federal government's share of the cost to prepare and review 14 plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition of property 15 and for the construction, expansion and rehabilitation of state 16 facilities for recreation. Portions of this appropriation may be 17 suballocated to other state agencies for such eligible projects 18 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (49FE2303) 19 (39911) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $15,858,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 For the federal government's share of the cost to prepare and review 22 plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition of property 23 and for the construction, expansion and rehabilitation of state 24 facilities for recreation. Portions of this appropriation may be 25 suballocated to other state agencies for such eligible projects 26 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (49FE2203) 27 (39911) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $12,612,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 29 For the federal government's share of the cost to prepare and review 30 plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition of property 31 and for the construction, expansion and rehabilitation of state 32 facilities for recreation. Portions of this appropriation may be 33 suballocated to other state agencies for such eligible projects 34 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (49FE2103) 35 (39911) ... 20,000,000 ............................ (re. $8,085,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 37 For the federal government's share of the cost to prepare and review 38 plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition of property 39 and for the construction, expansion and rehabilitation of state 40 facilities for recreation. Portions of this appropriation may be 41 suballocated to other state agencies for such eligible projects 42 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (49FE2003) 43 (39911) ... 20,000,000 ............................ (re. $5,095,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 45 For the federal government's share of the cost to prepare and review 46 plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition of property 681 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 and for the construction, expansion and rehabilitation of state 2 facilities for recreation. Portions of this appropriation may be 3 suballocated to other state agencies for such eligible projects 4 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (49FE1903) 5 (39911) ... 20,000,000 .............................. (re. $446,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 For the federal government's share of the cost to prepare and review 8 plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition of property 9 and for the construction, expansion and rehabilitation of state 10 facilities for recreation. Portions of this appropriation may be 11 suballocated to other state agencies for such eligible projects 12 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (49FE1803) 13 (39911) ... 20,000,000 ............................ (re. $2,094,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 15 For the federal government's share of the cost to prepare and review 16 plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition of property 17 and for the construction, expansion and rehabilitation of state 18 facilities for recreation. Portions of this appropriation may be 19 suballocated to other state agencies for such eligible projects 20 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (49FE1703) 21 (39911) ... 4,000,000 ............................... (re. $209,000) 22 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) 23 Capital Projects Funds - Other 24 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 25 Capital Miscellaneous Gifts Account - 32214 26 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 28 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 29 facilities and historic sites, including personal service and the 30 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025, including 31 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49GI2503) 32 (39926) ... 54,000,000 ........................... (re. $54,000,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 34 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 35 facilities and historic sites, including personal service and the 36 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024, including 37 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49GI2403) 38 (39926) ... 54,000,000 ........................... (re. $54,000,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 40 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 41 facilities and historic sites, including personal service and the 42 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023, including 43 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49GI2303) 44 (39926) ... 54,000,000 ........................... (re. $54,000,000) 682 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 2 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 3 facilities and historic sites, including personal service and the 4 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022, including 5 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49GI2203) 6 (39926) ... 24,000,000 ........................... (re. $24,000,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 8 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 9 facilities and historic sites, including personal service and the 10 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021, including 11 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49GI2103) 12 (39926) ... 24,000,000 ........................... (re. $21,036,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 14 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 15 facilities and historic sites, including personal service and the 16 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020, including 17 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49GI2003) 18 (39926) ... 24,000,000 ........................... (re. $19,559,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 20 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 21 facilities and historic sites, including personal service and the 22 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019, including 23 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49GI1903) 24 (39926) ... 24,300,000 ........................... (re. $17,676,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 26 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 27 facilities and historic sites, including personal service and the 28 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018, including 29 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49GI1803) 30 (39926) ... 24,300,000 ............................ (re. $7,570,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 32 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 33 facilities and historic sites, including personal service and the 34 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017, including 35 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49GI1703) 36 (39926) ... 24,300,000 ............................ (re. $7,792,000) 37 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 38 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 39 facilities and historic sites, including personal service and the 40 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016, including 41 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49GI1603) 42 (39926) ... 25,000,000 ............................ (re. $3,923,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 44 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 45 facilities and historic sites, including personal service and the 683 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2015, including 2 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49GI1503) 3 (39926) ... 25,000,000 ............................ (re. $2,424,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 5 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 6 facilities and historic sites, including personal service and the 7 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014, including 8 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49GI1403) 9 (39926) ... 25,000,000 ............................ (re. $1,323,000) 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 12 Minekill State Park Account - 32202 13 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 15 For rehabilitation and improvements at Minekill State Park, including 16 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 17 (49PA2503) (39926) ... 500,000 ...................... (re. $500,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 19 For rehabilitation and improvements at Minekill State Park, including 20 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 21 (49PA2403) (39926) ... 500,000 ...................... (re. $500,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 23 For rehabilitation and improvements at Minekill State Park, including 24 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 25 (49PA2303) (39926) ... 500,000 ...................... (re. $500,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 27 For rehabilitation and improvements at Minekill State Park, including 28 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 29 (49PA2203) (39926) ... 500,000 ...................... (re. $500,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 31 For rehabilitation and improvements at Minekill State Park, including 32 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 33 (49PA2103) (39926) ... 500,000 ...................... (re. $326,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 35 For rehabilitation and improvements at Minekill State Park, including 36 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 37 (49PA2003) (39926) ... 500,000 ...................... (re. $376,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 39 For rehabilitation and improvements at Minekill State Park, including 40 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 41 (49PA1903) (39926) ... 500,000 ...................... (re. $100,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 684 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For rehabilitation and improvements at Minekill State Park, including 2 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 3 (49PA1803) (39926) ... 500,000 ...................... (re. $500,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 5 For rehabilitation and improvements at Minekill State Park, including 6 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 7 (49PA1703) (39926) ... 500,000 ...................... (re. $500,000) 8 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 9 For rehabilitation and improvements at Minekill State Park, including 10 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 11 (49PA1603) (39926) ... 500,000 ....................... (re. $80,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 13 For rehabilitation and improvements at Minekill State Park, including 14 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014 15 (49PA1403) (39926) ... 500,000 ....................... (re. $86,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 17 For rehabilitation and improvements at Minekill State Park, including 18 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2012 19 (49PA1203) (39926) ... 500,000 ...................... (re. $146,000) 20 Capital Projects Funds - Other 21 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 22 Miscellaneous CP Resource Account - 32203 23 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 25 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 26 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 27 1, 2025, including suballocation to other state departments and 28 agencies (49RA2503) (39926) ... 300,000 ............. (re. $300,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 30 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 31 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 32 1, 2024, including suballocation to other state departments and 33 agencies (49RA2403) (39926) ... 300,000 ............. (re. $300,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 35 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 36 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 37 1, 2023, including suballocation to other state departments and 38 agencies (49RA2303) (39926) ... 300,000 ............. (re. $300,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 40 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 41 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 42 1, 2022, including suballocation to other state departments and 43 agencies (49RA2203) (39926) ... 300,000 ............. (re. $300,000) 685 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 2 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 3 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 4 1, 2021, including suballocation to other state departments and 5 agencies (49RA2103) (39926) ... 300,000 ............. (re. $297,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 7 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 8 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 9 1, 2020, including suballocation to other state departments and 10 agencies (49RA2003) (39926) ... 300,000 ............. (re. $300,000) 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 13 Parks Capital Investment Account - 32207 14 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 16 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 17 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 18 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (49RR2503) (39926) ........... 19 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 22 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 23 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (49RR2403) (39926) ........... 24 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 27 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 28 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (49RR2303) (39926) ........... 29 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 31 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 32 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 33 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (49RR2203) (39926) ........... 34 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 36 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 37 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 38 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (49RR2103) (39926) ........... 39 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 41 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 42 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 43 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (49RR2003) (39926) ........... 44 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 686 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 2 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 3 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 4 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (49RR1903) (39926) ........... 5 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 8 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 9 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (49RR1803) (39926) ........... 10 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 12 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 13 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 14 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (49RR1703) (39926) ........... 15 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 16 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 17 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 18 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 19 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (49RR1603) (39926) ........... 20 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 22 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 23 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 24 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2015 (49RR1503) (39926) ........... 25 500,000 ............................................. (re. $405,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 27 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 28 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 29 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2014 (49RR1403) (39926) ........... 30 500,000 ............................................. (re. $499,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 32 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 33 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 34 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2013 (49RR1303) (39926) ........... 35 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 37 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 38 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 39 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2012 (49RR1203) (39926) ........... 40 500,000 .............................................. (re. $73,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 43 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 44 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 687 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2011 (49RR1103) (39926) ........... 2 500,000 ............................................. (re. $254,000) 3 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 4 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 5 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 6 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2010 (49RR1003) (39926) ........... 7 500,000 ............................................. (re. $317,000) 8 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 9 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 10 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 11 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2009 (49RR0903) (39926) ........... 12 500,000 ............................................. (re. $154,000) 13 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 14 For rehabilitation, replacement and refurbishment of facilities at 15 various parks and historic sites, including the payment of liabil- 16 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2008 (49RR0803) (39926) ........... 17 500,000 .............................................. (re. $34,000) 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 20 Parks and Recreation Resource Account - 32209 21 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 23 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 24 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 25 1, 2025, including suballocation to other state departments and 26 agencies (49NR2503) (39926) ... 1,500,000 ......... (re. $1,500,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 28 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 29 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 30 1, 2024, including suballocation to other state departments and 31 agencies (49NR2403) (39926) ... 1,500,000 ......... (re. $1,500,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 33 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 34 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 35 1, 2023, including suballocation to other state departments and 36 agencies (49NR2303) (39926) ... 1,500,000 ......... (re. $1,500,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 38 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 39 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 40 1, 2022, including suballocation to other state departments and 41 agencies (49NR2203) (39926) ... 1,500,000 ......... (re. $1,500,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 688 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 2 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 3 1, 2021, including suballocation to other state departments and 4 agencies (49NR2103) (39926) ... 1,500,000 ......... (re. $1,295,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 6 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 7 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 8 1, 2020, including suballocation to other state departments and 9 agencies (49NR2003) (39926) ... 1,500,000 ........... (re. $719,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 11 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 12 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 13 1, 2019, including suballocation to other state departments and 14 agencies (49NR1903) (39926) ... 1,500,000 ........... (re. $407,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 16 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 17 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 18 1, 2018, including suballocation to other state departments and 19 agencies (49NR1803) (39926) ... 1,500,000 ........... (re. $265,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 21 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 22 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 23 1, 2017, including suballocation to other state departments and 24 agencies (49NR1703) (39926) ... 1,500,000 ........... (re. $893,000) 25 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 26 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 27 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 28 1, 2016, including suballocation to other state departments and 29 agencies (49NR1603) (39926) ... 1,500,000 ........... (re. $975,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 31 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 32 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 33 1, 2015, including suballocation to other state departments and 34 agencies (49NR1503) (39926) ... 1,500,000 ........... (re. $175,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 36 For rehabilitation and improvements at various parks and historic 37 sites, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 38 1, 2014, including suballocation to other state departments and 39 agencies (49NR1403) (39926) ... 1,500,000 ........... (re. $200,000) 40 State Park Infrastructure Fund 41 In accordance with Section 97-mm of the state finance law, all funds 42 received and designated by the commissioner of parks, recreation and 43 historic preservation to the credit of SPIF, shall be directed to 689 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 state park infrastructure projects including engineering services 2 costs. 3 A portion of the amounts included within these appropriations, subject 4 to the approval of the director of the budget, may be made available 5 to the New York State Office of General Services for payment to the 6 design and construction management account of the centralized 7 services fund of the New York State Office of General Services, to 8 accomplish the purpose of these appropriations. All or a portion of 9 the disbursements made pursuant to the following appropriations may 10 be repaid from proceeds of bonds issued by the environmental facili- 11 ties corporation in state fiscal year 1992-1993. 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 State Park Infrastructure Fund 14 State Park Infrastructure Account - 30351 15 Energy Conservation Purpose 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 17 For energy conservation purposes at various parks and historic sites, 18 including personal service and the payment of liabilities incurred 19 prior to April 1, 2022 (49EC2205) (81036) .......................... 20 700,000 ............................................. (re. $356,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 22 For energy conservation purposes at various parks and historic sites, 23 including personal service and the payment of liabilities incurred 24 prior to April 1, 2021 (49EC2105) (81036) .......................... 25 700,000 ............................................. (re. $338,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 27 For energy conservation purposes at various parks and historic sites, 28 including personal service and the payment of liabilities incurred 29 prior to April 1, 2020 (49EC2005) (81036) .......................... 30 700,000 ............................................. (re. $283,000) 31 Capital Projects Funds - Other 32 State Park Infrastructure Fund 33 State Park Infrastructure Account - 30351 34 Engineering Services Purpose 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 36 For state park engineering services and expenses, including the prepa- 37 ration of plans and designs; specifications and estimates; 38 construction management and supervision; surveys and testing; envi- 39 ronmental impact and historic project assessment; and related 40 services for state parks infrastructure fund projects including the 41 payment of contractual services, travel expenses and supplies and 42 fringe benefits charges (490625ES) (39927) ......................... 43 5,800,000 ......................................... (re. $5,800,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 690 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For state park engineering services and expenses, including the prepa- 2 ration of plans and designs; specifications and estimates; 3 construction management and supervision; surveys and testing; envi- 4 ronmental impact and historic project assessment; and related 5 services for state parks infrastructure fund projects including the 6 payment of contractual services, travel expenses and supplies and 7 fringe benefits charges (490624ES) (39927) ......................... 8 5,800,000 ......................................... (re. $5,800,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 54, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 11 For state park engineering services and expenses, including the prepa- 12 ration of plans and designs; specifications and estimates; 13 construction management and supervision; surveys and testing; envi- 14 ronmental impact and historic project assessment; and related 15 services for state parks infrastructure fund projects including the 16 payment of contractual services, travel expenses and supplies and 17 fringe benefits charges (490623ES) (39927) ......................... 18 6,700,000 ......................................... (re. $3,880,000) 19 Capital Projects Funds - Other 20 State Park Infrastructure Fund 21 State Park Infrastructure Account - 30351 22 Facilities for the Physically Disabled Purpose 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 24 To improve accessibility of facilities for the disabled at various 25 parks and historic sites, including personal service and the payment 26 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (49042204) (81061) 27 ... 700,000 ......................................... (re. $353,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 29 To improve accessibility of facilities for the disabled at various 30 parks and historic sites, including personal service and the payment 31 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (49042104) (81061) 32 ... 700,000 ......................................... (re. $418,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 34 To improve accessibility of facilities for the disabled at various 35 parks and historic sites, including personal service and the payment 36 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (49042004) (81061) 37 ... 700,000 ......................................... (re. $407,000) 38 Capital Projects Funds - Other 39 State Park Infrastructure Fund 40 State Park Infrastructure Account - 30351 41 Health and Safety Purpose 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 43 For health and safety projects at various parks and historic sites, 44 including personal service and the payment of liabilities incurred 45 prior to April 1, 2022, including suballocation to other state 691 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 departments and agencies (49012201) (81028) ........................ 2 4,700,000 ......................................... (re. $1,924,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 4 For health and safety projects at various parks and historic sites, 5 including personal service and the payment of liabilities incurred 6 prior to April 1, 2021, including suballocation to other state 7 departments and agencies (49012101) (81028) ........................ 8 4,700,000 ......................................... (re. $1,764,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 10 For health and safety projects at various parks and historic sites, 11 including personal service and the payment of liabilities incurred 12 prior to April 1, 2020, including suballocation to other state 13 departments and agencies (49012001) (81028) ........................ 14 4,700,000 ......................................... (re. $1,389,000) 15 Capital Projects Funds - Other 16 State Park Infrastructure Fund 17 State Park Infrastructure Account - 30351 18 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 20 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 21 facilities and historic sites including personal service and the 22 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025, including 23 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49032503) 24 (81010) ... 48,600,000 ........................... (re. $46,913,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 27 facilities and historic sites including personal service and the 28 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024, including 29 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49032403) 30 (81010) ... 48,600,000 ........................... (re. $29,952,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 32 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 33 facilities and historic sites including personal service and the 34 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023, including 35 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49032303) 36 (81010) ... 33,600,000 ........................... (re. $15,299,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 38 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 39 facilities and historic sites including personal service and the 40 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022, including 41 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49032203) 42 (81010) ... 27,500,000 ............................ (re. $6,088,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 692 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 2 facilities and historic sites including personal service and the 3 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021, including 4 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49032103) 5 (81010) ... 27,500,000 ............................ (re. $8,196,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 7 For alterations, rehabilitation and improvements of various park 8 facilities and historic sites including personal service and the 9 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020, including 10 suballocation to other state departments and agencies (49032003) 11 (81010) ... 27,500,000 ............................ (re. $4,118,000) 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 State Park Infrastructure Fund 14 State Park Infrastructure Account - 30351 15 Preventive Maintenance Purpose 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 17 For preventive maintenance at various parks and historic sites, 18 including personal services and fringe benefits (49ZZ25PM) (39928) 19 ... 5,200,000 ..................................... (re. $5,200,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For preventive maintenance at various parks and historic sites, 22 including personal services and fringe benefits (49ZZ24PM) (39928) 23 ... 5,200,000 ..................................... (re. $5,200,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 25 For preventive maintenance at various parks and historic sites, 26 including personal services and fringe benefits (49ZZ23PM) (39928) 27 ... 5,200,000 ..................................... (re. $2,716,000) 28 NATURAL HERITAGE TRUST (CCP) 29 Capital Projects Funds - Other 30 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 31 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1994, as amended by chapter 55, 33 section 1, of the laws of 1996: State aid for services and expenses 34 for: Museum of Ceramic Art at Alfred (20039408) (39929) ............ 35 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $300,000) 36 NEW YORK WORKS (CCP) 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 State Park Infrastructure Fund 39 State Park Infrastructure Account - 30351 40 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 693 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses related to New York Works projects, includ- 2 ing: infrastructure projects at state parks and historic sites, 3 publicly accessible electric vehicle charging stations, the repair, 4 rehabilitation, maintenance and improvement of the Empire State 5 Trail, and, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, up to 6 $2,000,000 to Saratoga Performing Arts Center for the completion of 7 the Spa Little Theater renovations. All or a portion of the funds 8 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 9 department, agency, public benefit corporation, or public authority 10 (49NY2503) (39944) ... 200,000,000 .............. (re. $192,253,000) 11 For services and expenses related to the New York Statewide Investment 12 in More Swimming initiative, including but not limited to grants to 13 municipalities or not-for-profit entities for the renovation, expan- 14 sion or construction of swimming facilities and structures, includ- 15 ing natural swimming areas and improvements ancillary thereto, to 16 achieve a public purpose. Not less than $25,000,000 of this appro- 17 priation shall be used for grants to municipalities or not-for-pro- 18 fit entities in underserved communities. Notwithstanding any other 19 provision of law, the dormitory authority of the state of New York, 20 in conjunction with the office of parks, recreation and historic 21 preservation, is authorized to administer a grant program, which may 22 be awarded on a competitive basis through a request for applications 23 process and eligibility criteria determined by the office of parks, 24 recreation and historic preservation in consultation with the dormi- 25 tory authority of the state of New York, which criteria may prior- 26 itize access to underserved communities. Grants may be used for any 27 applicable expenses including but not limited to general project 28 development costs, the acquisition, design, construction, improve- 29 ment, or renovation of the site, the purchase of equipment, and 30 other costs necessary to effectuate the initiative. A portion of 31 this appropriation may be transferred to state operations for admin- 32 istration of the program. All or a portion of the funds appropriated 33 hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, 34 public benefit corporation, or public authority (49SW2503) (40441) 35 ... 50,000,000 ................................... (re. $50,000,000) 36 For additional services and expenses related to the New York Statewide 37 Investment in More Swimming initiative. Notwithstanding any 38 provisions to the contrary contained in section 163 and section 112 39 of the state finance law or any other law, the amounts appropriated 40 herein may be allocated by the office of parks, recreation, and 41 historic preservation or the dormitory authority of the state of New 42 York pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budget which 43 may include grants to municipalities, non-profit entities, public 44 benefit corporations, and any other non-government organization. 45 Grants may be used for any applicable expenses including but not 46 limited to general project development costs, the acquisition, 47 design, construction, improvement, or renovation of the site, the 48 purchase of equipment, and other costs necessary to effectuate the 49 initiative. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 50 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, public bene- 51 fit corporation or public authority for the purposes stated herein 52 (49SM2503) (40449) ... 40,000,000 ................ (re. $40,000,000) 694 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses related to the New York Places for Learning, 2 Activity, and Youth Socialization including but not limited to 3 grants to municipalities or not-for-profit entities for the reno- 4 vation, expansion or construction of playgrounds, to achieve a 5 public purpose. Not less than $35,000,000 of this appropriation 6 shall be used for grants to municipalities or not-for-profit enti- 7 ties in underserved communities. Notwithstanding any other provision 8 of law, the dormitory authority of the state of New York, in 9 conjunction with the office of parks, recreation and historic pres- 10 ervation, is authorized to administer a grant program, which may be 11 awarded on a competitive basis through a request for applications 12 process and eligibility criteria determined by the office of parks, 13 recreation and historic preservation in consultation with the dormi- 14 tory authority of the state of New York, which criteria may prior- 15 itize access to underserved communities or people with disabilities. 16 Grants may be used for any applicable expenses including but not 17 limited to general project development costs, the acquisition, 18 design, construction, improvement, or renovation of the site, the 19 purchase of equipment, and other costs necessary to effectuate the 20 initiative. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to 21 state operations for administration of the program. All or a 22 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 23 transferred to any department, agency, public benefit corporation, 24 or public authority (49PL2503) (40445) ............................. 25 67,500,000 ....................................... (re. $67,500,000) 26 For services and expenses related to the New York Building Recreation- 27 al Infrastructure for Communities, Kids, and Seniors including but 28 not limited to grants to municipalities or not-for-profit entities 29 for the renovation, expansion or construction of community centers, 30 to achieve a public purpose. Not less than $50,000,000 of this 31 appropriation shall be used for grants to municipalities or not-for- 32 profit entities in underserved communities. Notwithstanding any 33 other provision of law, the dormitory authority of the state of New 34 York, in conjunction with the office of parks, recreation and 35 historic preservation, is authorized to administer a grant program, 36 which may be awarded on a competitive basis through a request for 37 applications process and eligibility criteria determined by the 38 office of parks, recreation and historic preservation in consulta- 39 tion with the dormitory authority of the state of New York, which 40 criteria may prioritize access to underserved communities. Grants 41 may be used for any applicable expenses including but not limited to 42 general project development costs, the acquisition, design, 43 construction, improvement, or renovation of the site, the purchase 44 of equipment, and other costs necessary to effectuate the initi- 45 ative. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to state 46 operations for administration of the program. All or a portion of 47 the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to 48 any department, agency, public benefit corporation, or public 49 authority (49BR2503) (40446) ... 100,000,000 .... (re. $100,000,000) 50 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 695 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses related to New York Works infrastructure 2 projects at state parks and historic sites, including for publicly 3 accessible electric vehicle charging stations, and for the repair, 4 rehabilitation, maintenance and improvement of the Empire State 5 Trail. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 6 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency or public 7 authority (49NY2403) (39944) ... 200,000,000 .... (re. $155,899,000) 8 For services and expenses related to the New York State Park Centenni- 9 al projects including, but not limited to, the Jones Beach East 10 Bathhouse project (49102403) (40440) ............................... 11 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $85,534,000) 12 For services and expenses related to the New York Statewide Investment 13 in More Swimming initiative, including but not limited to grants to 14 municipalities or non-profit entities for the renovation, expansion 15 or construction of public swimming facilities and structures, 16 including natural swimming areas and improvements ancillary thereto. 17 Not less then $60,000,000 of this appropriation shall be used for 18 grants to municipalities in underserved communities. Notwithstanding 19 any other provision of law, the dormitory authority of the state of 20 New York, in conjunction with the office of parks, recreation, and 21 historic preservation, is authorized to administer a grant program, 22 which may be awarded on a competitive basis through a request for 23 applications process and eligibility criteria determined by the 24 office of parks, recreation, and historic preservation in consulta- 25 tion with the dormitory authority of the state of New York, which 26 criteria may prioritize access to underserved communities. Grants 27 may be used for any applicable expenses including but not limited to 28 general project development costs, the acquisition, design, 29 construction, improvement, or renovation of the site, the purchase 30 of equipment, and other costs necessary to effectuate the initi- 31 ative. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to state 32 operations for administration of the program. All or a portion of 33 the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to 34 any department, agency, or public authority (49SW2403) (40441) ... 35 150,000,000 ..................................... (re. $139,644,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 37 For services and expenses related to New York Works Infrastructure 38 projects at state parks and historic sites, including for publicly 39 accessible electric vehicle charging stations, and for the repair, 40 rehabilitation, maintenance and improvement of the Empire State 41 Trail, provided that not less than $2,500,000 is provided to the 42 olympic regional development authority, including $500,000 for 43 Belleayre Mountain Ski Center, including but not limited to lift 44 maintenance, building maintenance and other infrastructure and 45 preventive maintenance projects, including personal service and the 46 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023. All or a 47 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 48 transferred to any department, agency or public authority (49NY2303) 49 (39944) ... 202,500,000 .......................... (re. $90,382,000) 50 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 696 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses related to New York Works Infrastructure 2 projects at state parks and historic sites, including for publicly 3 accessible electric vehicle charging stations, and for the repair, 4 rehabilitation, maintenance and improvement of the Empire State 5 Trail, provided that not less than $2,500,000 is provided to the 6 olympic regional development authority, including $500,000 for 7 Belleayre Mountain Ski Center, including but not limited to lift 8 maintenance, building maintenance and other infrastructure and 9 preventive maintenance projects, including personal service and the 10 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022. All or a 11 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 12 transferred to any department, agency or public authority (49NY2203) 13 (39944) ... 202,500,000 .......................... (re. $65,492,000) 14 For additional services and expenses related to New York Works Infras- 15 tructure projects at state parks and historic sites, including for 16 publicly accessible electric vehicle charging stations. All or a 17 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 18 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 19 (49NY2203) (39944) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $50,000,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 21 For services and expenses related to New York Works Infrastructure 22 projects at state parks and historic sites, and for the repair, 23 rehabilitation, maintenance and improvement of the Empire State 24 Trail, provided that not less than $2,500,000 is provided to the 25 olympic regional development authority, including $500,000 for 26 Belleayre Mountain Ski Center, including but not limited to lift 27 maintenance, building maintenance and other infrastructure and 28 preventive maintenance projects, including personal service and the 29 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1,2021. All or a 30 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 31 transferred to any department, agency or public authority (49NY2103) 32 (39944) ... 112,500,000 ........................... (re. $8,658,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 34 For services and expenses related to New York Works Infrastructure 35 projects at state parks and historic sites, provided that not less 36 than $2.5 million is provided to the olympic regional development 37 authority, including $500,000 for Belleayre Mountain Ski Center, 38 including but not limited to lift maintenance, building maintenance 39 and other infrastructure and preventive maintenance projects, 40 including personal service and the payment of liabilities incurred 41 prior to April 1, 2020. All or a portion of the funds appropriated 42 hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency 43 or public authority (49NY2003) (39944) ............................. 44 112,500,000 ....................................... (re. $4,732,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 46 For services and expenses related to New York Works Infrastructure 47 projects at state parks and historic sites, provided that not less 48 than $2.5 million is provided to the olympic regional development 49 authority, including $500,000 for Belleayre Mountain Ski Center, 697 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 including but not limited to lift maintenance, building maintenance 2 and other infrastructure and preventive maintenance projects, 3 including personal service and the payment of liabilities incurred 4 prior to April 1, 2019. All or a portion of the funds appropriated 5 hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency 6 or public authority (49NY1903) (39944) ............................. 7 112,500,000 ....................................... (re. $2,651,000) 8 OUTDOOR RECREATION DEVELOPMENT FUND (CCP) 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 Outdoor Recreation Development Bond Fund 11 Outdoor Recreation Development Bond Fund Account - 30750 12 Bond Proceeds Purpose 13 By chapter 558, section 19, of the laws of 1965, and chapter 558, 14 section 20, of the laws of 1965, as consolidated by chapter 54, 15 section 7, of the laws of 1976, and as amended by chapter 55, 16 section 1, of the laws of 1996, for: 17 The sale of bonds as authorized pursuant to the provisions of chapter 18 five hundred fifty-eight of the laws of nineteen hundred sixty-five 19 known as the "Outdoor Recreation Development Bond Act" for payment to 20 the capital projects fund as created by section ninety-three of the 21 state finance law for disbursements from such fund pursuant to appro- 22 priations for the development and acquisition of lands for outdoor 23 recreation and for historic sites for the purposes, in the manner and 24 to the extent specified in the outdoor recreation development act as 25 enacted by chapter five hundred fifty-eight of the laws of nineteen 26 hundred sixty-five, and as such disbursements are hereinafter referred 27 to as "Outdoor Recreation Development and Acquisition of Lands 28 Disbursements" and "Outdoor Recreation Development and Acquisition of 29 Land for Historic Sites Disbursements" (01377210) (80918) ............ 30 ..................................................... (re. $6,218,000) 31 PARKS - EQBA 86 (CCP) 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 34 New Facilities Purpose 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1989: 36 For payment of the state share of the costs of historic preservation 37 and municipal park projects in accordance with the provisions of 38 title 9 of article 52 of the environmental conservation law, for 39 projects, included in the following schedule, including costs inci- 40 dental and appurtenant thereto, hereinafter referred to as "Historic 41 Preservation and Municipal Park Disbursements." 42 The commissioner shall submit to the chairmen of the senate finance 43 committee and the assembly ways and means committee a list of 44 proposed grants and the amounts thereof not less than 14 days prior 45 to approval of such grants. 698 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 2 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for historic preserva- 3 tion and municipal park expenditures for approved historic preserva- 4 tion and municipal park projects in accordance with section 52-0901 5 of the environmental conservation law upon the issuance of a certif- 6 icate of approval of availability by the director of the division of 7 the budget. 8 The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify 9 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 10 the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation, the 11 chairman of the senate finance committee, and the chairman of the 12 assembly ways and means committee the amounts disbursed from this 13 appropriation for Historic Preservation and Municipal Park Disburse- 14 ments for the month preceding such certification (49EQ8907) (39909) 15 ... 30,000,000 ...................................... (re. $196,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1988, as amended by chapter 54, 17 section 3, of the laws of 1989: 18 For payment of the state share of the costs of historic preservation, 19 municipal park, and urban cultural park projects in accordance with 20 the provisions of title 9 of article 52 of the environmental conser- 21 vation law, for projects, included in the following schedule, 22 including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, hereinafter 23 referred to as "Historic Preservation, Municipal Park and Urban 24 Cultural Park Disbursements." The commissioner shall submit to the 25 chairmen of the senate finance committee and the assembly ways and 26 means committee a list of proposed grants and the amounts thereof 27 not less than 14 days prior to approval of such grants. 28 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 29 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for historic preserva- 30 tion, municipal park, and urban cultural park expenditures for 31 approved historic preservation, municipal park, and urban cultural 32 park projects in accordance with section 52-0901 of the environ- 33 mental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 34 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 35 budget. 36 The state comptroller, shall at the commencement of each month certify 37 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 38 the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation, the 39 chairman of the senate finance committee, and the chairman of the 40 assembly ways and means committee the amounts disbursed from this 41 appropriation for Historic Preservation, Municipal Park and Urban 42 Cultural Park Disbursements for the month preceding such certif- 43 ication (49EQ8807) (39909) ... 35,000,000 ........... (re. $595,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1987: 45 For payment of the state share of the costs of historic preservation, 46 municipal parks and urban cultural park projects in accordance with 47 the provisions of title nine of article fifty-two of the environ- 48 mental conservation law, for projects, included in the following 49 schedule, including costs incidental and appurtenant thereto, here- 50 inafter referred to as "Historic Preservation, Municipal Park and 699 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Urban Cultural Parks Disbursements." The commissioner shall submit 2 to the chairmen of the senate finance committee and the assembly 3 ways and means committee a list of proposed grants and the amounts 4 thereof not less than fourteen days prior to approval of such 5 grants. 6 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, the 7 moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for historic preserva- 8 tion, municipal park and urban cultural park expenditures for 9 approved historic preservation, municipal park and urban cultural 10 park projects in accordance with section 52-0901 of the environ- 11 mental conservation law upon the issuance of a certificate of 12 approval of availability by the director of the division of the 13 budget. 14 The state comptroller, shall at the commencement of each month certify 15 to the director of the division of the budget, the commissioner of 16 environmental conservation, the chairman of the senate finance 17 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee 18 the amounts disbursed from this appropriation for Historic Preserva- 19 tion, Municipal Park and Urban Cultural Park Disbursements for the 20 month preceding such certification (49EQ8707) (39909) .............. 21 30,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,007,000) 700 12654-09-6 NEW YORK POWER AUTHORITY CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 52,500,000 98,873,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 52,500,000 98,873,000 5 ================ ================ 6 CANAL DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM (CCP) ........................... 52,500,000 7 -------------- 8 Capital Projects Funds - Other 9 New York State Canal System Development Fund 10 Canal System Account - 30301 11 Canals and Waterways Purpose 12 For the maintenance, construction, recon- 13 struction, development or promotion of the 14 New York State Canal System in accordance 15 with the provisions of section 92-u of the 16 state finance law including the payment of 17 liabilities prior to April 1, 2026 18 (95012616)(46201) ............................ 2,500,000 19 Capital Projects Funds - Other 20 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 21 Canals and Waterways Purpose 22 For services, expenses, and indirect costs 23 related to maintenance, repair, 24 construction, reconstruction, development 25 and preservation of the New York state 26 canal system. These projects may include 27 but are not limited to dam and lock 28 repair, flood mitigation, infrastructure 29 improvements, canal system resiliency and 30 other projects which prioritize the 31 health, safety, recreation, and welfare of 32 the residents of New York State, and the 33 overall canal system. Notwithstanding any 34 inconsistent provision of law, all or a 35 portion of the funds appropriated herein 36 may be suballocated or transferred to any 37 state department, agency, public authori- 38 ty, or public benefit corporation 39 (95CC2616) (45303) .......................... 50,000,000 701 12654-09-6 NEW YORK POWER AUTHORITY CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 CANAL DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 New York State Canal System Development Fund 4 Canal System Account - 30301 5 Canals and Waterways Purpose 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 7 For the maintenance, construction, reconstruction, development or 8 promotion of the New York State Canal System in accordance with the 9 provisions of section 92-u of the state finance law including the 10 payment of liabilities prior to April 1, 2025. (95012516)(46201) ... 11 2,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,500,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 For the maintenance, construction, reconstruction, development or 14 promotion of the New York State Canal System in accordance with the 15 provisions of section 92-u of the state finance law including the 16 payment of liabilities prior to April 1, 2024. (95012416)(46201) ... 17 2,500,000 ........................................... (re. $105,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 19 For the maintenance, construction, reconstruction, development or 20 promotion of the New York State Canal System in accordance with the 21 provisions of section 92-u of the state finance law including the 22 payment of liabilities prior to April 1, 2023. (95012316)(46201) ... 23 7,500,000 ........................................... (re. $368,000) 24 Capital Projects Funds - Other 25 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 26 Canals and Waterways Purpose 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 28 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to maintenance, 29 repair, construction, reconstruction, development and preservation 30 of the New York state canal system. These projects may include but 31 are not limited to dam and lock repair, flood mitigation, infras- 32 tructure improvements, canal system resiliency and other projects 33 which prioritize the health, safety, recreation, and welfare of the 34 residents of New York State, and the overall canal system. Notwith- 35 standing any inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of the 36 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 37 state department, agency, public authority, or public benefit corpo- 38 ration (95CC2516) (45303) .......................................... 39 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,000,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 41 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to maintenance, 42 repair, construction, reconstruction, development and preservation 43 of the New York state canal system. These projects may include but 44 are not limited to dam and lock repair, flood mitigation, infras- 45 tructure improvements, canal system resiliency and other projects 702 12654-09-6 NEW YORK POWER AUTHORITY CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 which prioritize the health, safety, recreation, and welfare of the 2 residents of New York State, and the overall canal system. Notwith- 3 standing any inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of the 4 funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 5 state department, agency, public authority, or public benefit corpo- 6 ration (95CC2416) (45303) ... 50,000,000 ......... (re. $40,000,000) 7 EMPIRE STATE TRAIL (CCP) 8 Capital Projects Funds - Other 9 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 10 Environment and Recreation Purpose 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 12 For the costs and expenses, including personal services, nonpersonal 13 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs of projects related to 14 improvements, alterations, rehabilitation and completion of the 15 Empire State Trail network in the hudson river valley, champlain 16 valley and along the erie canal, including the payment of liabil- 17 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2017. All or a portion of the funds 18 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 19 department, agency or public authority (95ET17ER) (81112) .......... 20 77,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,400,000) 21 WATERSHED MODELING (CCP) 22 Capital Projects Funds - Other 23 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 24 Environmental Protection or Improvements Purpose 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For services, expenses, and indirect costs related to watershed model- 27 ing for the Mohawk and Oswego River Basins, as recommended in the 28 2023 Upstate New York Flood Mitigation Task Force Report. The Canal 29 Corporation shall create flow models to estimate normal and flood 30 water flows in the Oswego River Basin and the Mohawk River Basin, 31 which shall mean, respectively, (a) a watershed in the state of New 32 York comprised of all hydrologically meaningful rivers, streams, 33 lakes, and reservoirs and the surrounding land areas or other 34 significant drainage, including but not limited to canals, that 35 drains or flows via the Oswego River into Lake Ontario, and (b) a 36 watershed in the state of New York comprised of all hydrologically 37 meaningful rivers, streams, lakes, reservoirs and the surrounding 38 land areas or other significant drainage, including but not limited 39 to canals, that drains or flows via the Mohawk River into the Hudson 40 River, respectively. As soon as practicable, the Canal Corporation 41 shall make the flow models available to the public through its 42 public website. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby 43 may be transferred to state operations. Notwithstanding any incon- 44 sistent provision of law, all or a portion of the funds appropriated 45 herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state department, 703 12654-09-6 NEW YORK POWER AUTHORITY CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 agency, public authority, or public benefit corporation (95WM2406) 2 (45305) ... 1,500,000 ............................. (re. $1,500,000) 704 12654-09-6 PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS BOARD CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 2,468,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 0 2,468,000 8 ================ ================ 9 PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS BOARD (CCP) 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 12 New Facilities Purpose 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 14 For system modernizations for the Public Employment Relations Board 15 regarding electronic mail and registration systems for faster proc- 16 essing of applications for assistance and faster correspondence 17 between the agency and applicants (31012208) (48001) ............... 18 2,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,468,000) 705 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF STATE CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 208,000,000 1,143,345,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 208,000,000 1,143,345,000 8 ================ ================ 9 DOWNTOWN REVITALIZATION (CCP) .............................. 200,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Economic Development Purpose 14 For services and expenses, loans, grants, 15 and costs associated with program adminis- 16 tration, including the payment of liabil- 17 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2026. The 18 receipt of funding from this appropriation 19 to a municipality may be conditioned upon 20 a certification by the Division of Housing 21 and Community Renewal that such munici- 22 pality is a pro-housing community. 23 The receipt of funding from this appropri- 24 ation may also be directed to communities 25 impacted by the closure of New York state 26 correctional and juvenile justice facili- 27 ties. All or a portion of the funds appro- 28 priated hereby may be suballocated or 29 transferred to any department, agency, or 30 public authority, according to the follow- 31 ing: 32 For payments related to a downtown revitali- 33 zation program designed and executed by 34 the department of state and the division 35 of housing and community renewal for 36 transformative housing, economic develop- 37 ment, transportation, and community 38 projects, including those designed to 39 increase the property tax base. 40 An amount up to $100,000,000 is hereby 41 appropriated for services and expenses 42 related to the economic development, 43 transportation, and community projects 44 administered through the NY Forward 45 program designed and executed by the 46 department of state (19CP2609) (51275) ..... 200,000,000 706 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF STATE CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR (CCP) ................................. 2,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 5 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 6 For payments to provide for the regulation 7 of cemetery corporations and maintenance 8 of abandoned cemetery property and the 9 repair of vandalized gravesites under 10 paragraph (h) of section 1507 of the not- 11 for-profit corporation law (19CR2603) 12 (51272) ...................................... 2,000,000 13 IT MODERNIZATION (CCP) ....................................... 6,000,000 14 -------------- 15 Capital Projects Funds - Other 16 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 17 PARIS Modernization Fund 18 For services and expenses, and costs associ- 19 ated with a modernization project of the 20 public authorities reporting information 21 system, including the payment of liabil- 22 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2026. All 23 or a portion of this appropriation may be 24 suballocated or transferred to any depart- 25 ment, agency, or public authority 26 (19IT2608) ................................... 6,000,000 707 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF STATE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 DOWNTOWN REVITALIZATION (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Economic Development Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with 7 program administration, including the payment of liabilities 8 incurred prior to April 1, 2025. The receipt of funding from this 9 appropriation to a municipality may be conditioned upon a certif- 10 ication by the Division of Housing and Community Renewal that such 11 municipality is a pro-housing community. 12 The receipt of funding from this appropriation may also be directed to 13 communities impacted by the closure of New York state correctional 14 and juvenile justice facilities. All or a portion of the funds 15 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 16 department, agency, or public authority, according to the following: 17 For payments related to a downtown revitalization program designed and 18 executed by the department of state and the division of housing and 19 community renewal for transformative housing, economic development, 20 transportation, and community projects, including those designed to 21 increase the property tax base. 22 An amount up to $100,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 23 expenses related to the economic development, transportation, and 24 community projects administered through the NY Forward program 25 designed and executed by the department of state (19CP2509) (51275) 26 ... 200,000,000 ................................. (re. $200,000,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 28 For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with 29 program administration, including the payment of liabilities 30 incurred prior to April 1, 2024. The receipt of funding from this 31 appropriation to a municipality may be conditioned upon a certif- 32 ication by the Division of Housing and Community Renewal that such 33 municipality is a pro-housing community. The receipt of funding from 34 this appropriation may also be directed to communities impacted by 35 the closure of New York state correctional and juvenile justice 36 facilities. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 37 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 38 authority, according to the following: 39 For payments related to a downtown revitalization program designed and 40 executed by the department of state and the division of housing and 41 community renewal for transformative housing, economic development, 42 transportation, and community projects, including those designed to 43 increase the property tax base. 44 An amount up to $100,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 45 expenses related to the economic development, transportation, and 46 community projects administered through the NY Forward program 47 designed and executed by the department of state (19CP2409) (51275) 48 ... 200,000,000 ................................. (re. $200,000,000) 708 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF STATE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with 3 program administration, including the payment of liabilities 4 incurred prior to April 1, 2023. All or a portion of the funds 5 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 6 department, agency, or public authority, according to the following: 7 For payments related to a downtown revitalization program designed and 8 executed by the department of state and the division of housing and 9 community renewal for transformative housing, economic development, 10 transportation, and community projects, including those designed to 11 increase the property tax base. 12 An amount up to $100,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 13 expenses related to the economic development, transportation, and 14 community projects administered through the NY Forward program 15 designed and executed by the department of state (19CP2309) (51275) 16 ... 200,000,000 ................................. (re. $199,012,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 18 For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with 19 program administration, including the payment of liabilities 20 incurred prior to April 1, 2022. All or a portion of the funds 21 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 22 department, agency, or public authority, according to the following: 23 For payments related to a downtown revitalization program designed and 24 executed by the department of state and the division of housing and 25 community renewal for transformative housing, economic development, 26 transportation, and community projects, including those designed to 27 increase the property tax base. An amount up to $100,000,000 is 28 hereby appropriated for services and expenses related to the econom- 29 ic development, transportation, and community projects administered 30 through the NY Forward program designed and executed by the depart- 31 ment of state (19CP2209) (51275) ................................... 32 200,000,000 ..................................... (re. $182,510,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 34 For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with 35 program administration, including the payment of liabilities 36 incurred prior to April 1, 2021. All or a portion of the funds 37 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 38 department, agency, or public authority, according to the following: 39 For payments related to a downtown revitalization program designed and 40 executed by the department of state and the division of housing and 41 community renewal for transformative housing, economic development, 42 transportation, and community projects, including those designed to 43 increase the property tax base (19CP2109) (51275) .................. 44 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $97,989,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 46 For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with 47 program administration, including the payment of liabilities 48 incurred prior to April 1, 2020. All or a portion of the funds 709 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF STATE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 2 department, agency, or public authority, according to the following: 3 For payments related to a downtown revitalization program designed and 4 executed by the department of state and the division of housing and 5 community renewal for transformative housing, economic development, 6 transportation, and community projects, including those designed to 7 increase the property tax base (19002009) (51275) .................. 8 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $87,317,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 10 For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with 11 program administration, including the payment of liabilities 12 incurred prior to April 1, 2019. All or a portion of the funds 13 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 14 department, agency, or public authority, according to the following: 15 For payments related to a downtown revitalization program designed and 16 executed by the department of state and the division of housing and 17 community renewal for transformative housing, economic development, 18 transportation, and community projects, including those designed to 19 increase the property tax base (19001909) (51275) .................. 20 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $65,825,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 22 For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with 23 program administration, including the payment of liabilities 24 incurred prior to April 1, 2018. All or a portion of the funds 25 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 26 department, agency, or public authority, according to the following: 27 For payments related to a downtown revitalization program designed and 28 executed by the department of state and the division of housing and 29 community renewal for transformative housing, economic development, 30 transportation, and community projects, including those designed to 31 increase the property tax base (19001809) (51275) .................. 32 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $53,856,000) 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Dedicated Infrastructure Investment Fund 35 Infrastructure Investment Account - 33050 36 Economic Development Purpose 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 39 For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with 40 program administration, of projects and purposes authorized by 41 section 93-b of the state finance law to receive funding from the 42 dedicated infrastructure investment fund - infrastructure investment 43 account, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 44 April 1, 2017. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may 45 be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 46 authority, according to the following: 47 For payments related to a downtown revitalization program designed and 48 executed by the department of state and the division of housing and 710 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF STATE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 community renewal for transformative housing, economic development, 2 transportation, and community projects, including those designed to 3 increase the property tax base (19011709) (51275) .................. 4 98,562,566 ....................................... (re. $42,717,000) 5 MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR (CCP) 6 Capital Projects Funds - Other 7 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 8 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 10 For payments to provide for the regulation of cemetery corporations 11 and maintenance of abandoned cemetery property and the repair of 12 vandalized gravesites under paragraph (h) of section 1507 of the 13 not-for-profit corporation law (19CR2503) (51272) .................. 14 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 16 For payments to provide for the regulation of cemetery corporations 17 and maintenance of abandoned cemetery property and the repair of 18 vandalized gravesites under paragraph (h) of section 1507 of the 19 not-for-profit corporation law (19CR2403) (51272) .................. 20 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,789,000) 21 NYS COMMISSION ON AFRICAN AMERICAN HISTORY 22 Capital Projects Fund - Other 23 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 24 Commission on African American History 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For services and expenses, loans, grants, including program adminis- 27 tration costs, for the New York State Commission on African American 28 History, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 29 April 1, 2024. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may 30 be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 31 authority for the purposes stated herein (19AA2403) (51263) ........ 32 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 33 SOLID AND HAZARDOUS WASTE MANAGEMENT (CCP) 34 Capital Projects Funds - Other 35 Hazardous Waste Remedial Fund 36 Hazardous Waste Oversight and Assistance Account - 31505 37 Hazardous Waste Purpose 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 39 For the following purposes: non-bondable services and expenses associ- 40 ated with the brownfield cleanup and hazardous waste remediation 41 projects; grants authorized pursuant to section 970-r of the general 42 municipal law; and, suballocation to other state departments and 711 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF STATE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 agencies; and for other brownfield site cleanup hazardous waste 2 purposes (191313F7) (81096) ... 10,000,000 .......... (re. $330,000) 712 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Fund - Other ...... 199,143,000 420,049,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 199,143,000 420,049,000 8 ================ ================ 9 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) ................. 10,030,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 14 For the maintenance and operation of various 15 facilities and systems including personal 16 services, fringe benefits and indirect 17 costs. Notwithstanding any other law to 18 the contrary, all or a portion of the 19 funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 20 cated or transferred to any department, 21 agency, or public authority (06FM26MO) 22 (81107) ..................................... 10,030,000 23 LAW ENFORCEMENT (CCP) ....................................... 60,000,000 24 -------------- 25 Capital Projects Funds - Other 26 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 27 Equitable Sharing-DSP - Justice Account - 32220 28 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 29 For moneys to the division of state police 30 for the justice department federal equita- 31 ble sharing agreement to be used for law 32 enforcement purposes distributed pursuant 33 to a plan prepared by superintendent of 34 the division of state police and approved 35 by the director of the budget. 36 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 37 contrary, upon approval of the director of 38 the budget, the funding appropriated here- 39 in may be suballocated, interchanged, or 40 transferred and may be used for the 41 payment of prior year liabilities 42 (06JU2608) (50109) .......................... 30,000,000 43 Capital Projects Funds - Other 713 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 2 Equitable Sharing-DSP - Treasury Account - 32221 3 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 4 For moneys to the division of state police 5 for the treasury department federal equi- 6 table sharing agreement to be used for law 7 enforcement purposes distributed pursuant 8 to a plan prepared by superintendent of 9 the division of state police and approved 10 by the director of the budget. 11 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 12 contrary, upon approval of the director of 13 the budget, the funding appropriated here- 14 in may be suballocated, interchanged, or 15 transferred and may be used for the 16 payment of prior year liabilities 17 (06TR2608) (50111) .......................... 30,000,000 18 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENT OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) .... 63,113,000 19 -------------- 20 Capital Projects Funds - Other 21 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 22 Health and Safety Purpose 23 Alterations and improvements for health and 24 safety including liabilities incurred 25 prior to April 1, 2026 (06HS2601) (81028) .... 2,000,000 26 Capital Projects Funds - Other 27 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 28 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 29 Alterations and improvements for the preser- 30 vation of facilities and the replacement, 31 maintenance and repair of equipment and 32 equipment parts including liabilities 33 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 (06PF2603) 34 (81010) ..................................... 61,113,000 35 NEW FACILITIES (CCP) ........................................ 66,000,000 36 -------------- 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 39 New Facilities Purpose 40 For services and expenses associated with 41 the design, construction and outfitting of 42 new stations and zone headquarters, 43 including, but not limited to the costs of 714 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 property acquisition, studies, appraisals, 2 surveys, preparations of plans, design, 3 construction, equipment and furnishings, 4 including liabilities incurred prior to 5 April 1, 2026 (06NF2607) (81009) ............ 12,000,000 6 Capital Projects Funds - Other 7 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 8 State Police Forensic Laboratory 9 For services and expenses associated with 10 the design, construction, reconstruction 11 and outfitting of forensic laboratory 12 facilities, including, but not limited to 13 the costs of property acquisition, 14 studies, appraisals, surveys, preparations 15 of plans, design, construction, equipment 16 and furnishings, including liabilities 17 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 (06SL2607) 18 (50135) ..................................... 54,000,000 715 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 IT INITIATIVE PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2017: 7 For services and expenses related to the development of a records 8 management system. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to 9 the office of information technology services to achieve this 10 purpose. The division of criminal justice services, after consulta- 11 tion with the division of state police and the office of information 12 technology, shall submit a plan to the legislative leaders setting 13 forth the plan to develop such a records management system and 14 assessing any privacy and security implications, and no expenditures 15 may be made from this appropriation until the plan has been approved 16 by the legislative leaders (06SC1408) (51919) ...................... 17 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 18 LAW ENFORCEMENT (CCP) 19 Capital Projects Funds - Other 20 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 21 Equitable Sharing-DSP - Justice Account - 32220 22 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 24 For moneys to the division of state police for the justice department 25 federal equitable sharing agreement to be used for law enforcement 26 purposes distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by superintendent 27 of the division of state police and approved by the director of the 28 budget. 29 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of 30 the director of the budget, the funding appropriated herein may be 31 suballocated, interchanged, or transferred and may be used for the 32 payment of prior year liabilities (06JU2508) (50109) ............... 33 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $29,999,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 35 For moneys to the division of state police for the justice department 36 federal equitable sharing agreement to be used for law enforcement 37 purposes distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by superintendent 38 of the division of state police and approved by the director of the 39 budget. 40 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of 41 the director of the budget, the funding appropriated herein may be 42 suballocated, interchanged, or transferred and may be used for the 43 payment of prior year liabilities (06JU2408) (50109) ............... 44 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $23,501,000) 45 Capital Projects Funds - Other 716 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 2 Equitable Sharing-DSP - Treasury Account - 32221 3 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 5 For moneys to the division of state police for the treasury department 6 federal equitable sharing agreement to be used for law enforcement 7 purposes distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by superintendent 8 of the division of state police and approved by the director of the 9 budget. 10 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of 11 the director of the budget, the funding appropriated herein may be 12 suballocated, interchanged, or transferred and may be used for the 13 payment of prior year liabilities (06TR2508) (50111) ............... 14 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $30,000,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 16 For moneys to the division of state police for the treasury department 17 federal equitable sharing agreement to be used for law enforcement 18 purposes distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by superintendent 19 of the division of state police and approved by the director of the 20 budget. 21 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of 22 the director of the budget, the funding appropriated herein may be 23 suballocated, interchanged, or transferred and may be used for the 24 payment of prior year liabilities (06TR2408) (50111) ............... 25 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $28,704,000) 26 MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENT OF EXISTING FACILITIES (CCP) 27 Capital Projects Funds - Other 28 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 29 Health and Safety Purpose 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 31 Alterations and improvements for health and safety including liabil- 32 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (06HS2501) (81028) ........... 33 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 35 Alterations and improvements for health and safety including liabil- 36 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (06HS2401) (81028) ........... 37 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 39 Alterations and improvements for health and safety including liabil- 40 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (06HS2301) (81028) ........... 41 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,755,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 717 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Alterations and improvements for health and safety including liabil- 2 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (06HS2201) (81028) ........... 3 2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $954,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 5 Alterations and improvements for health and safety including liabil- 6 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (06HS2101) (81028) ........... 7 2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $534,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 9 Alterations and improvements for health and safety including liabil- 10 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (06HS2001) (81028) ........... 11 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,255,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 13 Alterations and improvements for health and safety including liabil- 14 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (06HS1901) (81028) ........... 15 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,851,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 17 Alterations and improvements for health and safety including liabil- 18 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (06HS1801) (81028) ........... 19 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,669,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 21 Alterations and improvements for health and safety including liabil- 22 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (06HS1701) (81028) ........... 23 2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $821,000) 24 Capital Projects Funds - Other 25 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 26 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 28 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities and 29 the replacement, maintenance and repair of equipment and equipment 30 parts including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 31 (06PF2503) (81010) ... 60,882,000 ................ (re. $53,459,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 33 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities and 34 the replacement, maintenance and repair of equipment and equipment 35 parts including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 36 (06PF2403) (81010) ... 60,882,000 ................ (re. $35,348,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 38 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities and 39 the replacement, maintenance and repair of equipment and equipment 40 parts including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 41 (06PF2303) (81010) ... 53,482,000 ................. (re. $5,389,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 718 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities and 2 the replacement, maintenance and repair of equipment and equipment 3 parts including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 4 (06PF2203) (81010) ... 46,635,000 ................ (re. $10,686,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 6 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities and 7 the replacement, maintenance and repair of equipment and equipment 8 parts including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 9 (06PF2103) (81010) ... 45,500,000 ................ (re. $11,844,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 11 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities and 12 the replacement, maintenance and repair of equipment and equipment 13 parts including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 14 (06PF2003) (81010) ... 45,500,000 ................ (re. $17,364,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 16 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities and 17 the replacement, maintenance and repair of equipment and equipment 18 parts including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 19 (06PF1903) (81010) ... 45,500,000 ................ (re. $14,358,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 21 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities and 22 the replacement, maintenance and repair of equipment and equipment 23 parts including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 24 (06PF1803) (81010) ... 40,500,000 ................. (re. $3,350,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 26 Alterations and improvements for the preservation of facilities and 27 the replacement, maintenance and repair of equipment and equipment 28 parts including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 29 (06PF1703) (81010) ... 35,500,000 .................... (re. $32,000) 30 Capital Projects Funds - Other 31 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 32 Program Improvements Purpose 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 34 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction and 35 renovation of evidence storage facilities at troop headquarters, 36 including but not limited to the costs of studies, appraisals, 37 surveys, preparation of plans, design, construction, equipment, and 38 renovations including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 39 (06EV2208) (50121) ... 6,000,000 .................... (re. $742,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 41 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction and 42 renovation of evidence storage facilities at troop headquarters, 43 including but not limited to the costs of studies, appraisals, 44 surveys, preparation of plans, design, construction, equipment, and 719 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 renovations including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 2 (06EV2108) (50121) ... 6,000,000 .................... (re. $172,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 4 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction and 5 renovation of evidence storage facilities at troop headquarters, 6 including but not limited to the costs of studies, appraisals, 7 surveys, preparation of plans, design, construction, equipment, and 8 renovations including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 9 (06EV2008) (50121) ... 6,000,000 ..................... (re. $47,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 11 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction and 12 renovation of evidence storage facilities at troop headquarters, 13 including but not limited to the costs of studies, appraisals, 14 surveys, preparation of plans, design, construction, equipment, and 15 renovations including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 16 (06EV1908) (50121) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $1,159,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 18 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction and 19 renovation of evidence storage facilities at troop headquarters, 20 including but not limited to the costs of studies, appraisals, 21 surveys, preparation of plans, design, construction, equipment, and 22 renovations including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 23 (06EV1808) (50121) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $1,104,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 25 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction and 26 renovation of evidence storage facilities at troop headquarters, 27 including but not limited to the costs of studies, appraisals, 28 surveys, preparation of plans, design, construction, equipment, and 29 renovations including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 30 (06EV1708) (50121) ... 6,000,000 ..................... (re. $87,000) 31 NEW FACILITIES (CCP) 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 34 New Facilities Purpose 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 36 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction and 37 outfitting of new stations and zone headquarters, including, but not 38 limited to the costs of property acquisition, studies, appraisals, 39 surveys, preparations of plans, design, construction, equipment and 40 furnishings, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 41 (06NF2507) (81009) ... 12,000,000 ................ (re. $12,000,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 43 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction and 44 outfitting of new stations and zone headquarters, including, but not 720 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 limited to the costs of property acquisition, studies, appraisals, 2 surveys, preparations of plans, design, construction, equipment and 3 furnishings, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 4 (06NF2407) (81009) ... 12,000,000 ................ (re. $12,000,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 6 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction and 7 outfitting of new stations and zone headquarters, including, but not 8 limited to the costs of property acquisition, studies, appraisals, 9 surveys, preparations of plans, design, construction, equipment and 10 furnishings, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 11 (06NF2307) (81009) ... 12,000,000 ................ (re. $10,357,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 13 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction and 14 outfitting of new stations and zone headquarters, including, but not 15 limited to the costs of property acquisition, studies, appraisals, 16 surveys, preparations of plans, design, construction, equipment and 17 furnishings, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 18 (06NF2207) (81009) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $5,404,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 20 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction and 21 outfitting of new stations and zone headquarters, including, but not 22 limited to the costs of property acquisition, studies, appraisals, 23 surveys, preparations of plans, design, construction, equipment and 24 furnishings, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 25 (06NF2107) (81009) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $2,184,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 27 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction and 28 outfitting of new stations and zone headquarters, including, but not 29 limited to the costs of property acquisition, studies, appraisals, 30 surveys, preparations of plans, design, construction, equipment and 31 furnishings, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 32 (06NF2007) (81009) ... 6,000,000 ..................... (re. $79,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 34 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction and 35 outfitting of new stations and zone headquarters, including, but not 36 limited to the costs of property acquisition, studies, appraisals, 37 surveys, preparations of plans, design, construction, equipment and 38 furnishings, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 39 (06NF1907) (81009) ... 6,000,000 .................... (re. $294,000) 40 Capital Projects Funds - Other 41 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 42 State Police Forensic Laboratory 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 44 For services and expenses associated with the design, construction, 45 reconstruction and outfitting of forensic laboratory facilities, 721 12654-09-6 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 including, but not limited to the costs of property acquisition, 2 studies, appraisals, surveys, preparations of plans, design, 3 construction, equipment and furnishings, including liabilities 4 incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (06SL2307) [(50153)](50135) ........ 5 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $87,547,000) 722 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 1,635,816,000 7,047,481,000 6 Capital Projects Fund - Federal .... 0 5,000,000 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 1,635,816,000 7,052,481,000 9 ================ ================ 10 FACILITIES MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS (CCP) ................ 230,769,000 11 -------------- 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 14 Maintenance and Operations Purpose 15 For the maintenance and operation of various 16 facilities and systems including personal 17 services, fringe benefits and indirect 18 costs. Notwithstanding any other law to 19 the contrary, all or a portion of the 20 funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 21 cated or transferred to any department, 22 agency, or public authority (28FM26MO) 23 (81107) .................................... 230,769,000 24 GENERAL MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS (CCP) ............... 1,045,000,000 25 -------------- 26 Capital Projects Funds - Other 27 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 28 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 29 For services and expenses related to alter- 30 ations and improvements to existing facil- 31 ities for capital maintenance, including 32 but not limited to capital design, 33 construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 34 tation, in-kind replacement of accessory 35 and support structures as well as equip- 36 ment; for in-kind replacement of buildings 37 and facilities upon demonstration, through 38 multi-factor benefit-cost analysis of 39 capital costs and life-cycle operating 40 costs comparing existing facility, reno- 41 vated facility, and new construction, that 42 replacement is more cost-effective and 43 energy-efficient than full renovation and 723 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 does not exceed existing square footage 2 except incidentally where necessary to 3 provide accessibility, mechanical effi- 4 ciency, or required accessory and minor 5 support structures; for health and safety, 6 enhancement to campus security and securi- 7 ty infrastructure, preservation of facili- 8 ties, program improvement or program 9 change, environmental protection, energy 10 conservation, accreditation, facilities 11 for the physically disabled, preventative 12 maintenance and related projects, includ- 13 ing costs incurred prior to April 1, 2026 14 and subject to a plan developed and 15 submitted annually by the state university 16 of New York and approved by the director 17 of the budget, and which may include, but 18 not be limited to, projects in the follow- 19 ing schedule (28F12603) (45913) ............ 595,000,000 20 Project Schedule 21 PROJECT AMOUNT 22 ---------------------------------------------------------- 23 (thousands of dollars) 24 Albany 25 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 10,490 26 Alfred Ceramics 27 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 845 28 Alfred State 29 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,319 30 Binghamton 31 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 12,037 32 Brockport 33 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,326 34 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 35 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,498 36 Buffalo College 37 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,563 38 Buffalo University 39 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 21,657 40 Canton 41 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,883 42 Cobleskill 43 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,911 44 Cornell 45 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,907 46 Cortland 47 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,941 48 Delhi 49 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,027 50 Empire State 724 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 483 2 Environmental Science and Forestry 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,466 4 Farmingdale 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,083 6 Fredonia 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,319 8 Geneseo 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,316 10 Maritime 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,797 12 Morrisville 13 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,318 14 New Paltz 15 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,873 16 Old Westbury 17 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,281 18 Oneonta 19 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,086 20 Optometry 21 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 929 22 Oswego 23 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,529 24 Plattsburgh 25 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,028 26 Potsdam 27 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,450 28 Purchase 29 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,562 30 State Univ Plaza 31 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,524 32 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 33 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 34 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 26,418 35 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 36 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,937 37 SUNY Polytechnic 38 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,149 39 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 40 Maintenance undistributed 41 For priority capital maintenance or 42 capital improvement projects to support 43 the preservation of facilities ................. 429,048 44 -------------- 45 Total .......................................... 595,000 46 -------------- 47 For additional services and expenses related 48 to alterations and improvements to exist- 49 ing facilities for capital maintenance, 50 including but not limited to capital 725 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 design, construction, reconstruction, 2 rehabilitation, in-kind replacement of 3 accessory and support structures as well 4 as equipment; for in-kind replacement of 5 buildings and facilities upon demon- 6 stration, through multi-factor benefit- 7 cost analysis of capital costs and life- 8 cycle operating costs comparing existing 9 facility, renovated facility, and new 10 construction, that replacement is more 11 cost-effective and energy-efficient than 12 full renovation and does not exceed exist- 13 ing square footage except incidentally 14 where necessary to provide accessibility, 15 mechanical efficiency, or required acces- 16 sory and minor support structures; for 17 health and safety, enhancement to campus 18 security and security infrastructure, 19 preservation of facilities, program 20 improvement or program change, environ- 21 mental protection, energy conservation, 22 accreditation, facilities for the phys- 23 ically disabled, preventative maintenance 24 and related projects, including costs 25 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 and 26 subject to a plan developed and submitted 27 annually by the state university of New 28 York and approved by the director of the 29 budget (28F22603) .......................... 200,000,000 30 For services and expenses of state universi- 31 ty of New York hospitals for alterations, 32 improvements, services and expenses, and 33 new facilities, including costs incurred 34 prior to April 1, 2026 subject to a plan 35 developed by the state university and 36 approved by the director of the budget 37 (28FI2603) (45921) ......................... 150,000,000 38 Project Schedule 39 PROJECT AMOUNT 40 ---------------------------------------------------------- 41 (thousands of dollars) 42 Downstate University Hospital 43 For university-wide projects ..................... 50,000 44 Stony Brook University Hospital 45 For university-wide projects ..................... 50,000 46 Upstate University Hospital 47 For university-wide projects ..................... 50,000 48 -------------- 49 Total ........................................... 150,000 50 ============== 726 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses related to alter- 2 ations and improvements to research facil- 3 ities including but not limited to capital 4 design, construction, reconstruction, 5 rehabilitation, and equipment; for health 6 and safety, preservation of facilities, 7 program improvement or program change, 8 environmental protection, energy conserva- 9 tion, and accreditation, including costs 10 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 and 11 subject to a plan approved by the chancel- 12 lor of the state university of New York 13 and the director of the budget (28IN2608) 14 (45942) .................................... 100,000,000 15 PROJECT ADMINISTRATION (CCP) ................................ 31,937,000 16 -------------- 17 Capital Projects Funds - Other 18 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 19 Administration Purpose 20 For payment to the state university 21 construction fund, for services and 22 expenses of the state university 23 construction fund including payments for 24 personal service, fringe benefits charges, 25 supplies and materials, contractual 26 services, equipment, travel expenses, 27 indirect costs and liabilities incurred 28 prior to April 1, 2026 (28SF2650) (45904) ... 31,937,000 29 STATE UNIVERSITY CAPITAL PROJECTS FUND (CCP) ............... 100,000,000 30 -------------- 31 Capital Projects Funds - Other 32 State University Capital Projects Fund - 32400 33 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 34 Alterations and improvements for projects 35 university-wide, including services and 36 expenses and new facilities, which may 37 include revenue transfers from various 38 external revenue sources and the payment 39 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 40 2026 (28C12603) (45925) .................... 100,000,000 41 STATE UNIVERSITY RESIDENCE HALL REHABILITATION FUND (CCP) .. 100,000,000 42 -------------- 43 Capital Projects Funds - Other 727 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 SUNY Residence Halls Rehabilitation and Repair Fund 2 SUNY Residence Halls Rehabilitation and Repair Account - 3 30100 4 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 5 Alterations and improvements for residence 6 hall rehabilitation projects and for resi- 7 dence hall renovations including services 8 and expenses, to be financed by a transfer 9 from the debt service fund state universi- 10 ty dormitory income fund or other external 11 revenue sources subject to a plan devel- 12 oped by the state university and approved 13 by the director of the budget. Notwith- 14 standing any other law to the contrary, 15 all or a portion of the amounts hereby 16 appropriated may be transferred or subal- 17 located to the dormitory authority and/or 18 the state university of New York for such 19 purpose (28D32603) (45926) ................. 100,000,000 728 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, 2 purposes and projects as herein specified 3 in accordance with the following: 4 GENERAL MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS (CCP) ................. 128,110,000 5 -------------- 6 Capital Projects Funds - Other 7 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 8 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 9 For services and expenses for the state 10 share of financial assistance to community 11 colleges for alterations and improvements 12 to various facilities, including service 13 contracts, memoranda of understanding, 14 capital design, construction, acquisition, 15 reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipment 16 and personal service costs; for health and 17 safety, preservation of facilities, tech- 18 nology upgrades, new facilities, program 19 improvements or program changes, environ- 20 mental protection, energy conservation, 21 accreditation, facilities for the phys- 22 ically disabled, and related projects, 23 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 24 2026, subject to a plan submitted by the 25 state university and approved by the 26 director of the budget. Notwithstanding 27 any other law to the contrary, all or a 28 portion of the amounts hereby appropriated 29 may be suballocated or transferred to the 30 state university construction fund or the 31 dormitory authority of the state of New 32 York for such purposes (28CC2608) (45931) .. 128,110,000 729 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 GENERAL MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Administration Purpose 5 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as amended by chapter 53, 6 section 3, of the laws of 2016: 7 Advance for campus core component projects including services and 8 expenses for alterations and improvements to various facilities, 9 capital design including the cost of services provided by private 10 firms, including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 11 plans, specifications and estimates; underground utilities; acquisi- 12 tion of property and operation of parking facilities; construction, 13 reconstruction and rehabilitation; construction management and 14 supervision; appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 15 statements; equipment costs; and the payment of liabilities incurred 16 prior to April 1, 1998 (28F898C1) (45914) ... .................... 17 947,326,000 ....................................... (re. $2,923,000) 18 Advance for campus technology/campus development component projects 19 including services and expenses for alterations and improvements to 20 various facilities, capital design including the cost of services 21 provided by private firms, including but not limited to the prepara- 22 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; underground 23 utilities; acquisition of property; construction, reconstruction and 24 rehabilitation; construction management and supervision; appraisals, 25 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements; equipment 26 costs; including not more than $8,467,000 for design, construction 27 and development of a health and wellness center at Alfred Ceramics, 28 provided, however that any previous allocation from this appropri- 29 ation for the center for ceramic education at Alfred Ceramics shall 30 be deemed repealed and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 31 April 1, 1998 (28F698C1) (45915) ... ............................. 32 187,038,000 ....................................... (re. $1,928,000) 33 Advance for systemwide component projects including services and 34 expenses for alterations and improvements to various facilities, 35 capital design including the cost of services provided by private 36 firms, including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 37 plans, specifications and estimates; underground utilities; acquisi- 38 tion of property and operation of parking facilities; construction, 39 reconstruction and rehabilitation; construction management and 40 supervision; appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 41 statements; equipment costs; and the payment of liabilities incurred 42 prior to April 1, 1998 (28F498C1) (45918) ... .................... 43 73,125,000 .......................................... (re. $244,000) 44 Advance for campus improvement/quality of life component projects 45 including services and expenses for alterations and improvements to 46 various facilities, capital design including the cost of services 47 provided by private firms, including but not limited to the prepara- 48 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; underground 49 utilities; acquisition of property; construction, reconstruction and 730 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 rehabilitation; construction management and supervision; appraisals, 2 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements; equipment 3 costs for state university educational facility projects; and the 4 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1998 (28F398C1) 5 (45919) ... ... 45,120,000 ........................ (re. $441,000) 6 Advance for the hospital facility program including services and 7 expenses for alterations and improvements to various facilities, 8 capital design including the cost of services provided by private 9 firms, including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 10 plans, specifications and estimates; underground utilities; acquisi- 11 tion of property and operation of parking facilities; construction, 12 reconstruction and rehabilitation; construction management and 13 supervision; appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 14 statements; equipment costs; and the payment of liabilities incurred 15 prior to April 1, 1998 (28F198C1) (45920) ... .................... 16 75,000,000 .......................................... (re. $454,000) 17 Capital Projects Funds - Other 18 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 19 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 21 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 22 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 23 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 24 tation, in-kind replacement of accessory and support structures as 25 well as equipment; for in-kind replacement of buildings and facili- 26 ties upon demonstration, through multi-factor benefit-cost analysis 27 of capital costs and life-cycle operating costs comparing existing 28 facility, renovated facility, and new construction, that replacement 29 is more cost-effective and energy-efficient than full renovation and 30 does not exceed existing square footage except incidentally where 31 necessary to provide accessibility, mechanical efficiency, or 32 required accessory and minor support structures; for health and 33 safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement or program 34 change, environmental protection, energy conservation, accredi- 35 tation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative mainte- 36 nance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to April 37 1, 2025 and subject to a plan developed and submitted annually by 38 the state university of New York and approved by the director of the 39 budget, and which may include, but not be limited to, projects in 40 the following schedule (28F12503) (45913) .......................... 41 550,000,000 ..................................... (re. $546,629,000) 42 Project Schedule 43 PROJECT AMOUNT 44 ---------------------------------------------------------- 45 (thousands of dollars) 46 Albany 47 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,799 48 Alfred Ceramics 731 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 765 2 Alfred State 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,154 4 Binghamton 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 11,199 6 Brockport 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,848 8 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,279 10 Buffalo College 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,230 12 Buffalo University 13 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 20,126 14 Canton 15 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,703 16 Cobleskill 17 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,797 18 Cornell 19 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,142 20 Cortland 21 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,581 22 Delhi 23 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,818 24 Empire State 25 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 422 26 Environmental Science and Forestry 27 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,220 28 Farmingdale 29 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,592 30 Fredonia 31 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,110 32 Geneseo 33 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,005 34 Maritime 35 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,652 36 Morrisville 37 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,130 38 New Paltz 39 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,547 40 Old Westbury 41 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,990 42 Oneonta 43 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,823 44 Optometry 45 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 872 46 Oswego 47 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,159 48 Plattsburgh 49 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,494 50 Potsdam 732 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,301 2 Purchase 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,164 4 State Univ Plaza 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,411 6 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 7 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 8 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 24,299 9 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 10 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,705 11 SUNY Polytechnic 12 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,063 13 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 14 Maintenance undistributed 15 For priority capital maintenance or 16 capital improvement projects to support 17 the preservation of facilities ................. 396,600 18 -------------- 19 Total .......................................... 550,000 20 -------------- 21 For services and expenses of state university of New York hospitals 22 for alterations, improvements, services and expenses, and new facil- 23 ities, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2025 subject to a 24 plan developed by the state university and approved by the director 25 of the budget (28FI2503) (45921) ................................... 26 150,000,000 ..................................... (re. $150,000,000) 27 Project Schedule 28 PROJECT AMOUNT 29 ---------------------------------------------------------- 30 (thousands of dollars) 31 Downstate University Hospital 32 For university-wide projects ..................... 50,000 33 Stony Brook University Hospital 34 For university-wide projects ..................... 50,000 35 Upstate University Hospital 36 For university-wide projects ..................... 50,000 37 -------------- 38 Total ........................................... 150,000 39 ============== 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 41 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 42 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 43 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 44 tation, in-kind replacement of accessory and support structures as 45 well as equipment; for in-kind replacement of buildings and facili- 46 ties upon demonstration, through multi-factor benefit-cost analysis 47 of capital costs and life-cycle operating costs comparing existing 48 facility, renovated facility, and new construction, that replacement 733 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 is more cost-effective and energy-efficient than full renovation and 2 does not exceed existing square footage except incidentally where 3 necessary to provide accessibility, mechanical efficiency, or 4 required accessory and minor support structures; for health and 5 safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement or program 6 change, environmental protection, energy conservation, accredi- 7 tation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative mainte- 8 nance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to April 9 1, 2024 and subject to a plan developed and submitted annually by 10 the state university of New York and approved by the director of the 11 budget, and which may include, but not be limited to, projects in 12 the following schedule (28F12403) (45913) .......................... 13 550,000,000 ..................................... (re. $473,357,000) 14 Project Schedule 15 PROJECT AMOUNT 16 ---------------------------------------------------------- 17 (thousands of dollars) 18 Albany 19 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,922 20 Alfred Ceramics 21 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 769 22 Alfred State 23 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,100 24 Binghamton 25 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 11,066 26 Brockport 27 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,644 28 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 29 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,214 30 Buffalo College 31 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,262 32 Buffalo University 33 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 20,351 34 Canton 35 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,705 36 Cobleskill 37 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,795 38 Cornell 39 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,184 40 Cortland 41 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,584 42 Delhi 43 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,765 44 Empire State 45 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 402 46 Environmental Science and Forestry 47 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,197 48 Farmingdale 49 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,414 50 Fredonia 734 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,099 2 Geneseo 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,073 4 Maritime 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,694 6 Morrisville 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,003 8 New Paltz 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,553 10 Old Westbury 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,950 12 Oneonta 13 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,732 14 Optometry 15 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 887 16 Oswego 17 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,233 18 Plattsburgh 19 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,555 20 Potsdam 21 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,292 22 Purchase 23 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,187 24 State Univ Plaza 25 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,420 26 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 27 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 28 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 24,523 29 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 30 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,721 31 SUNY Polytechnic 32 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,104 33 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 34 Maintenance undistributed 35 For priority capital maintenance or 36 capital improvement projects to support 37 the preservation of facilities ................. 396,600 38 -------------- 39 Total .......................................... 550,000 40 -------------- 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 42 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 43 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 44 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 45 tation, in-kind replacement of accessory and support structures as 46 well as equipment; for in-kind replacement of buildings and facili- 47 ties upon demonstration, through multi-factor benefit-cost analysis 48 of capital costs and life-cycle operating costs comparing existing 49 facility, renovated facility, and new construction, that replacement 50 is more cost-effective and energy-efficient than full renovation and 735 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 does not exceed existing square footage except incidentally where 2 necessary to provide accessibility, mechanical efficiency, or 3 required accessory and minor support structures; for health and 4 safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement or program 5 change, environmental protection, energy conservation, accredi- 6 tation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative mainte- 7 nance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to April 8 1, 2023 and subject to a plan developed and submitted annually by 9 the state university of New York and approved by the director of the 10 budget, and which may include, but not be limited to, projects in 11 the following schedule (28F12303) (45913) .......................... 12 650,000,000 ..................................... (re. $376,621,000) 13 Project Schedule 14 PROJECT AMOUNT 15 ---------------------------------------------------------- 16 (thousands of dollars) 17 Albany 18 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 11,661 19 Alfred Ceramics 20 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 915 21 Alfred State 22 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,474 23 Binghamton 24 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 12,829 25 Brockport 26 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,591 27 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 28 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,947 29 Buffalo College 30 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,403 31 Buffalo University 32 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 23,721 33 Canton 34 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,026 35 Cobleskill 36 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,129 37 Cornell 38 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 10,332 39 Cortland 40 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,369 41 Delhi 42 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,071 43 Empire State 44 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 461 45 Environmental Science and Forestry 46 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,585 47 Farmingdale 48 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,409 49 Fredonia 736 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,729 2 Geneseo 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,732 4 Maritime 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,056 6 Morrisville 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,395 8 New Paltz 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,376 10 Old Westbury 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,287 12 Oneonta 13 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,496 14 Optometry 15 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,060 16 Oswego 17 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,177 18 Plattsburgh 19 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,256 20 Potsdam 21 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,948 22 Purchase 23 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,266 24 State Univ Plaza 25 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,685 26 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 27 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 28 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 29,359 29 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 30 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,270 31 SUNY Polytechnic 32 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,285 33 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 34 Maintenance undistributed 35 For priority capital maintenance or 36 capital improvement projects to support 37 the preservation of facilities ................. 468,700 38 -------------- 39 Total .......................................... 650,000 40 -------------- 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 42 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 43 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 44 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 45 tation, in-kind replacement of accessory and support structures as 46 well as equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facili- 47 ties, program improvement or program change, environmental 48 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 49 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 50 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2022 and subject to a 737 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 plan developed and submitted annually by the state university of New 2 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 3 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule 4 (28F12203) (45913) ... 550,000,000 .............. (re. $214,602,000) 5 Project Schedule 6 PROJECT AMOUNT 7 ---------------------------------------------------------- 8 (thousands of dollars) 9 Albany 10 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,849 11 Alfred Ceramics 12 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 776 13 Alfred State 14 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,113 15 Binghamton 16 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 10,559 17 Brockport 18 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,820 19 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 20 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,370 21 Buffalo College 22 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,649 23 Buffalo University 24 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 19,437 25 Canton 26 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,740 27 Cobleskill 28 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,813 29 Cornell 30 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 8,850 31 Cortland 32 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,529 33 Delhi 34 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,801 35 Empire State 36 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 369 37 Environmental Science and Forestry 38 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,200 39 Farmingdale 40 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,494 41 Fredonia 42 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,182 43 Geneseo 44 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,204 45 Maritime 46 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,796 47 Morrisville 48 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,076 49 New Paltz 738 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,584 2 Old Westbury 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,929 4 Oneonta 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,929 6 Optometry 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 900 8 Oswego 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,271 10 Plattsburgh 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,645 12 Potsdam 13 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,386 14 Purchase 15 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,343 16 State Univ Plaza 17 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,430 18 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 19 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 20 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 24,649 21 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 22 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,616 23 SUNY Polytechnic 24 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,091 25 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 26 Maintenance undistributed 27 For priority capital maintenance or 28 capital improvement projects to support 29 the preservation of facilities ................. 396,600 30 -------------- 31 Total .......................................... 550,000 32 -------------- 33 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 34 facilities and capital maintenance for educational opportunity 35 centers (28E02203) (45936) ... 10,000,000 ......... (re. $9,981,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 37 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 38 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 39 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 40 tation, in-kind replacement of accessory and support structures as 41 well as equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facili- 42 ties, program improvement or program change, environmental 43 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 44 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 45 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2021 and subject to a 46 plan developed and submitted annually by the state university of New 47 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 48 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule 49 (28F12103) (45913) ... 550,000,000 ............... (re. $90,663,000) 739 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Project Schedule 2 PROJECT AMOUNT 3 ---------------------------------------------------------- 4 (thousands of dollars) 5 Albany 6 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,632 7 Alfred Ceramics 8 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 798 9 Alfred State 10 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,157 11 Binghamton 12 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 10,522 13 Brockport 14 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,114 15 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 16 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,322 17 Buffalo College 18 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,777 19 Buffalo University 20 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 19,338 21 Canton 22 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,761 23 Cobleskill 24 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,866 25 Cornell 26 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 8,887 27 Cortland 28 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,554 29 Delhi 30 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,767 31 Empire State 32 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 458 33 Environmental Science and Forestry 34 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,281 35 Farmingdale 36 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,523 37 Fredonia 38 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,294 39 Geneseo 40 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,303 41 Maritime 42 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,819 43 Morrisville 44 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,123 45 New Paltz 46 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,608 47 Old Westbury 48 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,901 49 Oneonta 50 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,886 51 Optometry 740 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 906 2 Oswego 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,359 4 Plattsburgh 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,708 6 Potsdam 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,496 8 Purchase 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,194 10 State Univ Plaza 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,343 12 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 13 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 14 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 23,974 15 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 16 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,635 17 SUNY Polytechnic 18 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,094 19 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 20 Maintenance undistributed 21 For priority capital maintenance or 22 capital improvement projects to support 23 the preservation of facilities ............... 396,600 24 -------------- 25 Total .......................................... 550,000 26 -------------- 27 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 28 facilities and capital maintenance for educational opportunity 29 centers (28E02103) (45936) ... 10,000,000 ......... (re. $8,997,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 31 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 32 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 33 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 34 tation, in-kind replacement of accessory and support structures as 35 well as equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facili- 36 ties, program improvement or program change, environmental 37 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 38 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 39 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2020 and subject to a 40 plan developed and submitted annually by the state university of New 41 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 42 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule 43 (28F12003) (45913) ... 550,000,000 ............... (re. $72,578,000) 44 Project Schedule 45 PROJECT AMOUNT 46 ---------------------------------------------------------- 47 (thousands of dollars) 48 Albany 741 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,720 2 Alfred Ceramics 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 797 4 Alfred State 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,131 6 Binghamton 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 10,373 8 Brockport 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,217 10 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,262 12 Buffalo College 13 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,792 14 Buffalo University 15 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 19,125 16 Canton 17 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,781 18 Cobleskill 19 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,877 20 Cornell 21 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 8,829 22 Cortland 23 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,550 24 Delhi 25 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,793 26 Empire State 27 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 455 28 Environmental Science and Forestry 29 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,283 30 Farmingdale 31 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,403 32 Fredonia 33 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,326 34 Geneseo 35 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,339 36 Maritime 37 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,813 38 Morrisville 39 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,199 40 New Paltz 41 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,594 42 Old Westbury 43 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,941 44 Oneonta 45 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,878 46 Optometry 47 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 899 48 Oswego 49 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,413 50 Plattsburgh 742 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,799 2 Potsdam 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,549 4 Purchase 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,252 6 State Univ Plaza 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,354 8 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 9 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 10 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 23,948 11 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 12 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,627 13 SUNY Polytechnic 14 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,081 15 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 16 Maintenance undistributed 17 For priority capital maintenance or 18 capital improvement projects to support the 19 preservation of facilities ................... 396,600 20 -------------- 21 Total .......................................... 550,000 22 -------------- 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 24 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 25 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 26 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 27 tation, in-kind replacement of accessory and support structures as 28 well as equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facili- 29 ties, program improvement or program change, environmental 30 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 31 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 32 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2019 and subject to a 33 plan developed and submitted annually by the state university of New 34 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 35 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule 36 (28F11903) (45913) ... 550,000,000 ............... (re. $44,721,000) 37 Project Schedule 38 PROJECT AMOUNT 39 ---------------------------------------------------------- 40 (thousands of dollars) 41 Albany 42 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,744 43 Alfred Ceramics 44 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 806 45 Alfred State 46 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,174 47 Binghamton 48 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 10,268 49 Brockport 743 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,309 2 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,626 4 Buffalo College 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,162 6 Buffalo University 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 19,484 8 Canton 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,801 10 Cobleskill 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,878 12 Cornell 13 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,132 14 Cortland 15 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,606 16 Delhi 17 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,885 18 Empire State 19 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 400 20 Environmental Science and Forestry 21 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,324 22 Farmingdale 23 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,496 24 Fredonia 25 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,383 26 Geneseo 27 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,385 28 Maritime 29 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,893 30 Morrisville 31 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,250 32 New Paltz 33 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,731 34 Old Westbury 35 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,877 36 Oneonta 37 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,953 38 Optometry 39 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 927 40 Oswego 41 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,404 42 Plattsburgh 43 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,847 44 Potsdam 45 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,753 46 Purchase 47 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,042 48 State Univ Plaza 49 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,159 50 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 51 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 744 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 23,289 2 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,328 4 SUNY Polytechnic 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,084 6 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 7 Maintenance undistributed 8 For priority capital maintenance or capi- 9 tal improvement projects to support the 10 preservation of facilities ..................... 396,600 11 -------------- 12 Total .......................................... 550,000 13 ============== 14 For services and expenses of SUNY hospitals for alterations, improve- 15 ments, services and expenses, and new facilities, including costs 16 incurred prior to April 1, 2019 subject to a plan developed by the 17 state university and approved by the director of the budget 18 (28FI1903) (45921) ... 100,000,000 ............... (re. $40,441,000) 19 Project Schedule 20 PROJECT AMOUNT 21 ---------------------------------------------------------- 22 (thousands of dollars) 23 Upstate University Hospital ....................... 50,000 24 For university-wide projects 25 Stony Brook University Hospital ................... 50,000 26 For university-wide projects 27 -------------- 28 Total ........................................ 100,000 29 ============== 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 31 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 32 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 33 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 34 tation, in-kind replacement of accessory and support structures as 35 well as equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facili- 36 ties, program improvement or program change, environmental 37 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 38 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 39 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2018 and subject to a 40 plan developed and submitted annually by the state university of New 41 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 42 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule 43 (28F11803) (45913) ... 350,000,000 ............... (re. $17,493,000) 44 Project Schedule 45 PROJECT AMOUNT 46 ---------------------------------------------------------- 745 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 (thousands of dollars) 2 Albany 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,685 4 Alfred Ceramics 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 857 6 Alfred State 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,358 8 Binghamton 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 10,762 10 Brockport 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,521 12 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 13 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,681 14 Buffalo College 15 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,476 16 Buffalo University 17 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 18,002 18 Canton 19 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,827 20 Cobleskill 21 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,927 22 Cornell 23 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,924 24 Cortland 25 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,799 26 Delhi 27 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,849 28 Empire State 29 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 411 30 Environmental Science and Forestry 31 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,423 32 Farmingdale 33 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,999 34 Fredonia 35 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,763 36 Geneseo 37 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,571 38 Maritime 39 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,809 40 Morrisville 41 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,316 42 New Paltz 43 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,898 44 Old Westbury 45 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,521 46 Oneonta 47 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,016 48 Optometry 49 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 901 50 Oswego 746 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,760 2 Plattsburgh 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,756 4 Potsdam 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,896 6 Purchase 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,183 8 State Univ Plaza 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,479 10 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 11 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 12 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 21,315 13 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 14 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,676 15 SUNY Polytechnic 16 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,039 17 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 18 Maintenance undistributed 19 For priority capital maintenance or 20 capital improvement projects to support the 21 preservation of facilities ..................... 196,600 22 -------------- 23 Total .......................................... 350,000 24 ============== 25 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 26 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 27 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 28 tation, in-kind replacement of accessory and support structures as 29 well as equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facili- 30 ties, program improvement or program change, environmental 31 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 32 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 33 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2018 and subject to a 34 plan developed and submitted annually by the state university of New 35 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 36 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule 37 (28FU1803) (45930) ... 200,000,000 ................ (re. $9,836,000) 38 Project Schedule 39 PROJECT AMOUNT 40 ---------------------------------------------------------- 41 (thousands of dollars) 42 Albany 43 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 12,627 44 Alfred Ceramics 45 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,117 46 Alfred State 47 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,074 48 Binghamton 747 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 14,031 2 Brockport 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 7,198 4 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,799 6 Buffalo College 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 8,441 8 Buffalo University 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 23,471 10 Canton 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,382 12 Cobleskill 13 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,512 14 Cornell 15 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 12,939 16 Cortland 17 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,257 18 Delhi 19 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,411 20 Empire State 21 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 536 22 Environmental Science and Forestry 23 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,159 24 Farmingdale 25 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,518 26 Fredonia 27 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,906 28 Geneseo 29 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,656 30 Maritime 31 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,359 32 Morrisville 33 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,020 34 New Paltz 35 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,386 36 Old Westbury 37 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,287 38 Oneonta 39 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,236 40 Optometry 41 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,175 42 Oswego 43 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 7,510 44 Plattsburgh 45 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,897 46 Potsdam 47 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,080 48 Purchase 49 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,454 50 State Univ Plaza 748 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,928 2 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 3 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 4 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 27,790 5 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 6 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,489 7 SUNY Polytechnic 8 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,355 9 -------------- 10 Total .......................................... 200,000 11 ============== 12 For services and expenses of SUNY hospitals for alterations, improve- 13 ments, services and expenses, and new facilities, including costs 14 incurred prior to April 1, 2018 subject to a plan developed by the 15 state university and approved by the director of the budget 16 (28FI1803) (45921) ... 100,000,000 ............... (re. $20,036,000) 17 Project Schedule 18 PROJECT AMOUNT 19 ---------------------------------------------------------- 20 (thousands of dollars) 21 Upstate University Hospital ....................... 50,000 22 For university-wide projects 23 Stony Brook University Hospital ................... 50,000 24 For university-wide projects 25 -------------- 26 Total ........................................ 100,000 27 ============== 28 For services and expenses of SUNY hospitals for alterations, improve- 29 ments, services and expenses, and new facilities, including costs 30 incurred prior to April 1, 2018 subject to a plan developed by the 31 state university and approved by the director of the budget 32 (28FJ1803) (45934) ... 77,300,000 ................ (re. $17,756,000) 33 Project Schedule 34 PROJECT AMOUNT 35 ---------------------------------------------------------- 36 (thousands of dollars) 37 Upstate University Hospital ....................... 40,800 38 For university-wide projects 39 Stony Brook University Hospital ................... 36,500 40 For university-wide projects 41 -------------- 42 Total ......................................... 77,300 43 ============== 44 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 45 facilities and capital maintenance for educational opportunity 46 centers (28E01803) (45936) ... 10,000,000 ......... (re. $3,585,000) 749 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 3 For services and expenses of SUNY hospitals for alterations, improve- 4 ments, services and expenses, and new facilities, including costs 5 incurred prior to April 1, 2018 subject to a plan developed by the 6 state university and approved by the director of the budget. 7 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state 8 university construction fund is hereby authorized to transfer up to 9 $3,600,000 in state university capital funds from this appropriation 10 to the Health Science Center at Brooklyn Foundation, Inc. or other 11 appropriate corporation pursuant to an agreement for the transfer of 12 title of a property located at 329 Clarkson Avenue in Brooklyn, with 13 such transferred funds to be used exclusively for the purpose of 14 satisfying an existing mortgage on the property (28FK1803) (45935) 15 ... 78,564,000 ................................... (re. $75,439,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 17 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 18 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 19 limited to capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabili- 20 tation, and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facil- 21 ities, program improvement or program change, environmental 22 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 23 physically disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, 24 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2017 and subject to a 25 plan developed and submitted annually by the state university of New 26 York and approved by the director of the budget, and which may 27 include, but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule 28 (28F11703) (45913) ... 450,000,000 ............... (re. $22,706,000) 29 Project Schedule 30 PROJECT AMOUNT 31 ---------------------------------------------------------- 32 (thousands of dollars) 33 Albany 34 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,447 35 Alfred Ceramics 36 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 843 37 Alfred State 38 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,283 39 Binghamton 40 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 10,604 41 Brockport 42 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,708 43 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 44 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,687 45 Buffalo College 46 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,594 47 Buffalo University 48 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 17,756 49 Canton 750 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,771 2 Cobleskill 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,979 4 Cornell 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,723 6 Cortland 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,691 8 Delhi 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,867 10 Empire State 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 405 12 Environmental Science and Forestry 13 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,452 14 Farmingdale 15 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,841 16 Fredonia 17 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,655 18 Geneseo 19 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,697 20 Maritime 21 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,813 22 Morrisville 23 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,310 24 New Paltz 25 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,664 26 Old Westbury 27 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,583 28 Oneonta 29 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,962 30 Optometry 31 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 895 32 Oswego 33 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,736 34 Plattsburgh 35 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,832 36 Potsdam 37 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,957 38 Purchase 39 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,289 40 State Univ Plaza 41 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,585 42 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 43 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 44 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 21,138 45 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 46 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,578 47 SUNY Polytechnic 48 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,055 49 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 50 Maintenance undistributed 51 For priority capital maintenance or capi- 751 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 tal improvement projects to support the 2 preservation of facilities ................... 296,600 3 -------------- 4 Total .......................................... 450,000 5 ============== 6 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 7 various facilities including but not limited to capital design, 8 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 9 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 10 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 11 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 12 maintenance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 13 April 1, 2017 and subject to a plan developed and submitted annually 14 by the state university of New York and approved by the director of 15 the budget, and which may include, but not be limited to, projects 16 in the following schedule (28F41703) (45930) ....................... 17 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $45,464,000) 18 Project Schedule 19 PROJECT AMOUNT 20 ---------------------------------------------------------- 21 (thousands of dollars) 22 Albany 23 Campus-wide projects ............................. 6,159 24 Alfred Ceramics 25 Campus-wide projects ............................... 550 26 Alfred State 27 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,489 28 Binghamton 29 Campus-wide projects ............................. 6,912 30 Brockport 31 Campus-wide projects ............................. 3,721 32 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 33 Campus-wide projects ............................. 2,403 34 Buffalo College 35 Campus-wide projects ............................. 4,299 36 Buffalo University 37 Campus-wide projects ............................ 11,575 38 Canton 39 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,155 40 Cobleskill 41 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,290 42 Cornell 43 Campus-wide projects ............................. 6,338 44 Cortland 45 Campus-wide projects ............................. 3,058 46 Delhi 47 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,217 48 Empire State 752 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide projects ............................... 264 2 Environmental Science and Forestry 3 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,598 4 Farmingdale 5 Campus-wide projects ............................. 3,156 6 Fredonia 7 Campus-wide projects ............................. 2,383 8 Geneseo 9 Campus-wide projects ............................. 2,410 10 Maritime 11 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,182 12 Morrisville 13 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,506 14 New Paltz 15 Campus-wide projects ............................. 3,041 16 Old Westbury 17 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,684 18 Oneonta 19 Campus-wide projects ............................. 2,583 20 Optometry 21 Campus-wide projects ............................... 584 22 Oswego 23 Campus-wide projects ............................. 3,739 24 Plattsburgh 25 Campus-wide projects ............................. 2,498 26 Potsdam 27 Campus-wide projects ............................. 2,580 28 Purchase 29 Campus-wide projects ............................. 2,796 30 State Univ Plaza 31 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,029 32 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 33 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 34 Campus-wide projects ............................ 13,780 35 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 36 Campus-wide projects ............................. 2,333 37 SUNY Polytechnic 38 Campus-wide projects ............................... 688 39 -------------- 40 Total .......................................... 100,000 41 ============== 42 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 53, 43 section 3, of the laws of 2016: 44 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 45 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 46 limited to services and expenses, service agreements or service 47 contracts and memoranda of understanding; for capital design includ- 48 ing the cost of services provided by private firms, including prepa- 49 ration of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; facility 50 reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipment; for health and safety 753 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 improvements and upgrades to preserve or enhance facility function- 2 ing; for program improvements or program change; to support improve- 3 ments in technology, research, environmental protection, energy and 4 resource conservation, and accreditation; to finance costs attribut- 5 able to executive order 88, ADA and code compliance needs, claims, 6 emergencies and remediation of environmental hazards; to ensure the 7 functionality of major building systems such as fire alarms and 8 sprinklers, electrical, mechanical, plumbing, heating/cooling 9 systems and supporting infrastructure, including underground utili- 10 ties; and to provide for facilities for the disabled and related 11 projects including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2016 subject to 12 a plan developed by the state university of New York and approved by 13 the director of the budget (28F11603) (45913) ...................... 14 200,000,000 ....................................... (re. $2,503,000) 15 Project Schedule 16 PROJECT AMOUNT 17 ---------------------------------------------------------- 18 (thousands of dollars) 19 Albany 20 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,500 21 Alfred Ceramics 22 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 800 23 Alfred State 24 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,300 25 Binghamton 26 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 10,600 27 Brockport 28 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,700 29 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 30 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,700 31 Buffalo College 32 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,700 33 Buffalo University 34 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 17,300 35 Canton 36 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,800 37 Cobleskill 38 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,100 39 Cornell 40 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 9,600 41 Cortland 42 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,700 43 Delhi 44 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,900 45 Empire State 46 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 400 47 Environmental Science and Forestry 48 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,500 49 Farmingdale 754 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,800 2 Fredonia 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,800 4 Geneseo 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,700 6 Maritime 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,800 8 Morrisville 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,200 10 New Paltz 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,700 12 Old Westbury 13 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,400 14 Oneonta 15 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,100 16 Optometry 17 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 900 18 Oswego 19 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,100 20 Plattsburgh 21 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,900 22 Potsdam 23 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,000 24 Purchase 25 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,300 26 State Univ Plaza 27 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,600 28 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 29 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 30 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 21,000 31 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 32 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,500 33 SUNY Polytechnic 34 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,000 35 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 36 Maintenance undistributed 37 For university-wide capital maintenance or 38 capital improvement costs, including 39 costs attributable to executive order 40 88; ADA and code compliance claims; 41 environmental hazards; emergencies 42 health and safety, and energy conserva- 43 tion needs, asbestos and PCB remedi- 44 ation; fire alarms and sprinklers; elec- 45 trical, mechanical, plumbing and heating 46 and cooling system requirements and 47 other similar university-wide needs .......... 16,600 48 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 49 Maintenance undistributed 50 For priority capital maintenance or capi- 51 tal improvement projects to support the 755 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 preservation of facilities .................... 30,000 2 -------------- 3 Total .......................................... 200,000 4 ============== 5 For additional services and expenses related to alterations and 6 improvements to existing facilities for capital maintenance, includ- 7 ing but not limited to services and expenses, service agreements or 8 service contracts and memoranda of understanding; for capital design 9 including the cost of services provided by private firms, including 10 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; facili- 11 ty reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipment; for health and safety 12 improvements and upgrades to preserve or enhance facility function- 13 ing; for program improvements or program change; to support improve- 14 ments in technology, research, environmental protection, energy and 15 resource conservation, and accreditation; to finance costs attribut- 16 able to executive order 88, ADA and code compliance needs, claims, 17 emergencies and remediation of environmental hazards; to ensure the 18 functionality of major building systems such as fire alarms and 19 sprinklers, electrical, mechanical, plumbing, heating/cooling 20 systems and supporting infrastructure, including underground utili- 21 ties; and to provide for facilities for the disabled and related 22 projects including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2016 subject to 23 a plan developed by the state university of New York and approved by 24 the director of the budget (28F21603) (45932) ...................... 25 60,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,539,000) 26 Project Schedule 27 PROJECT AMOUNT 28 ---------------------------------------------------------- 29 (thousands of dollars) 30 Albany 31 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,800 32 Alfred Ceramics 33 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 200 34 Alfred State 35 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 700 36 Binghamton 37 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,100 38 Brockport 39 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,700 40 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 41 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,100 42 Buffalo College 43 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,000 44 Buffalo University 45 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,100 46 Canton 47 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 500 48 Cobleskill 756 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 600 2 Cornell 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,800 4 Cortland 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,400 6 Delhi 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 600 8 Empire State 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 100 10 Environmental Science and Forestry 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 700 12 Farmingdale 13 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,400 14 Fredonia 15 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,100 16 Geneseo 17 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,100 18 Maritime 19 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 500 20 Morrisville 21 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 700 22 New Paltz 23 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,400 24 Old Westbury 25 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 700 26 Oneonta 27 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,200 28 Optometry 29 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 300 30 Oswego 31 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,800 32 Plattsburgh 33 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,200 34 Potsdam 35 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,200 36 Purchase 37 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,300 38 State Univ Plaza 39 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 500 40 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 41 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 42 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,200 43 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 44 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,000 45 SUNY Polytechnic 46 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 300 47 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 48 Maintenance undistributed 49 For university-wide capital maintenance or 50 capital improvement costs, including 51 costs attributable to executive order 757 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 88; ADA and code compliance claims; 2 environmental hazards; emergencies 3 health and safety, and energy conserva- 4 tion needs, asbestos and PCB remedi- 5 ation; fire alarms and sprinklers; elec- 6 trical, mechanical, plumbing and heating 7 and cooling system requirements and 8 other similar university-wide needs ............ 5,700 9 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 10 Maintenance undistributed 11 For priority capital maintenance or capi- 12 tal improvement projects to support the 13 preservation of facilities ....................... 9,000 14 -------------- 15 Total ........................................... 60,000 16 ============== 17 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 73, 18 section 1 of part M, of the laws of 2016: 19 For additional services and expenses related to alterations and 20 improvements to various facilities for capital projects, including 21 but not limited to services and expenses, service agreements or 22 service contracts and memoranda of understanding; for capital design 23 including the cost of services provided by private firms, including 24 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; for 25 property acquisition, facility construction, reconstruction, reha- 26 bilitation, equipment; for health and safety improvements and 27 upgrades to preserve or enhance facility functioning; for program 28 improvements or program change; to support improvements in technolo- 29 gy, research, environmental protection, energy and resource conser- 30 vation, and accreditation; to finance costs attributable to execu- 31 tive order 88, ADA and code compliance needs, claims, emergencies 32 and remediation of environmental hazards; to ensure the functionali- 33 ty of major building systems such as fire alarms and sprinklers, 34 electrical, mechanical, plumbing, heating/cooling systems and 35 supporting infrastructure, including underground utilities; and to 36 provide for facilities for the disabled and related projects includ- 37 ing costs incurred prior to April 1, 2016 subject to a plan devel- 38 oped by the state university of New York and approved by the direc- 39 tor of the budget (28F31603) (45933) ............................... 40 30,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,358,000) 41 Project Schedule 42 PROJECT AMOUNT 43 ---------------------------------------------------------- 44 (thousands of dollars) 45 Albany 46 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,400 47 Alfred Ceramics 48 Campus-wide projects ............................... 100 49 Alfred State 758 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide projects ............................... 350 2 Binghamton 3 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,550 4 Brockport 5 Campus-wide projects ............................... 850 6 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 7 Campus-wide projects ............................... 550 8 Buffalo College 9 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,000 10 Buffalo University 11 Campus-wide projects ............................. 2,550 12 Canton 13 Campus-wide projects ............................... 250 14 Cobleskill 15 Campus-wide projects ............................... 300 16 Cornell 17 Campus-wide projects ............................. 1,400 18 Cortland 19 Campus-wide projects ............................... 700 20 Delhi 21 Campus-wide projects ............................... 300 22 Empire State 23 Campus-wide projects ................................ 50 24 Environmental Science and Forestry 25 Campus-wide projects ............................... 350 26 Farmingdale 27 Campus-wide projects ............................... 700 28 Fredonia 29 Campus-wide projects ............................... 550 30 Geneseo 31 Campus-wide projects ............................... 550 32 Maritime 33 Campus-wide projects ............................... 250 34 Morrisville 35 Campus-wide projects ............................... 350 36 New Paltz 37 Campus-wide projects ............................... 700 38 Old Westbury 39 Campus-wide projects ............................... 350 40 Oneonta 41 Campus-wide projects ............................... 600 42 Optometry 43 Campus-wide projects ............................... 150 44 Oswego 45 Campus-wide projects ............................... 900 46 Plattsburgh 47 Campus-wide projects ............................... 600 48 Potsdam 49 Campus-wide projects ............................... 600 50 Purchase 759 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide projects ............................... 650 2 State Univ Plaza 3 Campus-wide projects ............................... 250 4 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 5 (HSC) and Long Island State Veterans Home: 6 Campus-wide projects ............................. 3,100 7 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 8 Campus-wide projects ............................... 500 9 SUNY Polytechnic 10 Campus-wide projects ............................... 150 11 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 12 Maintenance undistributed 13 For university-wide capital project costs, 14 including costs attributable to executive 15 order 88; ADA and code compliance claims; 16 environmental hazards; emergencies health 17 and safety, and energy conservation needs, 18 asbestos and PCB remediation; fire alarms 19 and sprinklers; electrical, mechanical, 20 plumbing and heating and cooling system 21 requirements and other university-wide 22 needs ............................................ 2,850 23 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 24 Maintenance undistributed 25 For priority capital projects ...................... 4,500 26 -------------- 27 Total ........................................... 30,000 28 ============== 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 30 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 31 existing facilities for capital maintenance, including but not 32 limited to services and expenses, service agreements or service 33 contracts and memoranda of understanding; for capital design includ- 34 ing the cost of services provided by private firms, including prepa- 35 ration of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; facility 36 reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipment; for health and safety 37 improvements and upgrades to preserve or enhance facility function- 38 ing; for program improvements or program change; to support improve- 39 ments in technology, research, environmental protection, energy and 40 resource conservation, and accreditation; to finance costs attribut- 41 able to executive order 88, ADA and code compliance needs, claims, 42 emergencies and remediation of environmental hazards; to ensure the 43 functionality of major building systems such as fire alarms and 44 sprinklers, electrical, mechanical, plumbing, heating/cooling 45 systems and supporting infrastructure, including underground utili- 46 ties; and to provide for facilities for the disabled and related 47 projects including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2015 subject to 48 a plan developed by the state university of New York and approved by 49 the director of the budget (28F11503) (45913) ...................... 50 200,000,000 ....................................... (re. $3,002,000) 760 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Project Schedule 2 PROJECT AMOUNT 3 ---------------------------------------------------------- 4 (thousands of dollars) 5 Albany 6 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 10,412 7 Alfred Ceramics 8 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 897 9 Alfred State 10 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,411 11 Binghamton 12 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 11,026 13 Brockport 14 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,054 15 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 16 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,007 17 Buffalo College 18 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 7,305 19 Buffalo University 20 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 18,271 21 Canton 22 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,949 23 Cobleskill 24 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,156 25 Cornell 26 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 10,294 27 Cortland 28 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,182 29 Delhi 30 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,938 31 Empire State 32 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 396 33 Environmental Science and Forestry 34 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,694 35 Farmingdale 36 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 5,038 37 Fredonia 38 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,064 39 Geneseo 40 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,988 41 Maritime 42 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,916 43 Morrisville 44 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,416 45 New Paltz 46 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,924 47 Old Westbury 48 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 2,774 49 Oneonta 50 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,474 51 Optometry 761 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................... 974 2 Oswego 3 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 6,651 4 Plattsburgh 5 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,101 6 Potsdam 7 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,228 8 Purchase 9 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 4,367 10 State Univ Plaza 11 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,683 12 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center (HSC) 13 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................ 22,223 14 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 15 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 3,627 16 SUNY Polytechnic 17 Campus-wide maintenance projects ................. 1,060 18 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 19 Maintenance undistributed 20 For university-wide capital maintenance or 21 capital improvement costs, including 22 costs attributable to executive order 23 88; ADA and code compliance claims; 24 environmental hazards; emergencies 25 health and safety, and energy conserva- 26 tion needs, asbestos and PCB remedi- 27 ation; fire alarms and sprinklers; elec- 28 trical, mechanical, plumbing and heating 29 and cooling system requirements and 30 other similar university-wide needs ........... 16,500 31 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 32 Maintenance undistributed 33 For priority capital maintenance or 34 capital improvement projects to support the 35 preservation of facilities .................... 20,000 36 -------------- 37 Total .......................................... 200,000 38 ============== 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 40 Advances for alterations and improvements to existing facilities for 41 capital critical maintenance, including but not limited to services 42 and expenses, service agreements or service contracts and memoranda 43 of understanding; for capital design including the cost of services 44 provided by private firms, including preparation of designs, plans, 45 specifications and estimates; facility reconstruction, rehabili- 46 tation, equipment; for health and safety improvements and upgrades 47 to preserve or enhance facility functioning; for program improve- 48 ments or program change; to support improvements in technology, 49 research, environmental protection, energy and resource conserva- 50 tion, and accreditation; to finance costs attributable to executive 762 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 order 88, ADA and code compliance needs, claims, emergencies and 2 remediation of environmental hazards; to ensure the functionality of 3 major building systems such as fire alarms and sprinklers, elec- 4 trical, mechanical, plumbing, heating/cooling systems and supporting 5 infrastructure, including underground utilities; and to provide for 6 facilities for the disabled and related projects including costs 7 incurred prior to April 1, 2014 subject to a plan developed by the 8 state university and approved by the director of the budget 9 (28F11403) (45913) ... 402,000,000 ................ (re. $7,768,000) 10 Project Schedule 11 PROJECT AMOUNT 12 ---------------------------------------------------------- 13 (thousands of dollars) 14 Albany 15 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 28,595 16 Alfred Ceramics 17 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 2,520 18 Alfred State 19 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 6,753 20 Binghamton 21 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 30,196 22 Brockport 23 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 17,755 24 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 25 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 11,273 26 Buffalo College 27 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 21,376 28 Buffalo University 29 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 61,150 30 Canton 31 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 5,818 32 Cobleskill 33 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 6,178 34 Cornell 35 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 29,967 36 Cortland 37 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 14,771 38 Delhi 39 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 6,083 40 Empire State 41 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 1,183 42 Environmental Science and Forestry 43 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 7,492 44 Farmingdale 45 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 14,524 46 Fredonia 47 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 12,161 48 Geneseo 49 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 12,120 50 Maritime 763 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 5,486 2 Morrisville 3 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 7,336 4 New Paltz 5 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 14,827 6 Old Westbury 7 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 9,465 8 Oneonta 9 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 12,784 10 Optometry 11 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 2,693 12 Oswego 13 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 18,628 14 Plattsburgh 15 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 12,173 16 Potsdam 17 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 12,132 18 Purchase 19 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 15,913 20 State Univ Plaza 21 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 4,400 22 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center (HSC) 23 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ....... 64,659 24 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 25 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 9,996 26 Utica-Rome 27 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects ........ 3,093 28 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 29 Maintenance undistributed 30 For university-wide capital critical main- 31 tenance or capital improvement costs, 32 including costs attributable to execu- 33 tive order 88; ADA and code compliance 34 claims; environmental hazards; emergen- 35 cies health and safety, and energy 36 conservation needs, asbestos and PCB 37 remediation; fire alarms and sprinklers; 38 electrical, mechanical, plumbing and 39 heating and cooling system requirements 40 and other similar university-wide needs ....... 16,500 41 Less an amount to be allocated by the 42 board of trustees ........................... (98,000) 43 -------------- 44 Total .......................................... 402,000 45 ============== 46 Advances for alterations and improvements to various facilities 47 including services and expenses, service contracts, memoranda of 48 understanding, capital design, construction, acquisition, recon- 49 struction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 50 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 764 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 program change, technology, environment protection, energy conserva- 2 tion, accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and 3 related projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2014, 4 subject to an annual plan developed by the state university of New 5 York and approved by the director of the budget (28F31403) (45905) 6 ... 82,000,000 .................................... (re. $7,650,000) 7 Project Schedule 8 PROJECT AMOUNT 9 ---------------------------------------------------------- 10 (thousands of dollars) 11 Morrisville 12 Campus-wide Electrical Feeders and 13 Distribution ................................... 3,000 14 Oneonta 15 Campus Welcome Center ............................ 5,000 16 Milne Library Reconstruction ..................... 8,000 17 Potsdam 18 Child Care Center ................................ 6,000 19 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center (HSC) 20 Mezzanine ....................................... 60,000 21 -------------- 22 Total ........................................... 82,000 23 ============== 24 Advances for alterations and improvements to existing facilities for 25 capital critical maintenance, including but not limited to services 26 and expenses, service agreements or service contracts and memoranda 27 of understanding; for capital design including the cost of services 28 provided by private firms, including preparation of designs, plans, 29 specifications and estimates; facility reconstruction, rehabili- 30 tation, equipment; for health and safety improvements and upgrades 31 to preserve or enhance facility functioning; for program improve- 32 ments or program change; to support improvements in technology, 33 research, environmental protection, energy and resource conserva- 34 tion, and accreditation; to finance costs attributable to executive 35 order 88, ADA and code compliance needs, claims, emergencies and 36 remediation of environmental hazards; to ensure the functionality of 37 major building systems such as fire alarms and sprinklers, elec- 38 trical, mechanical, plumbing, heating/cooling systems and supporting 39 infrastructure, including underground utilities; and to provide for 40 facilities for the disabled and related projects including costs 41 incurred prior to April 1, 2014 subject to a plan developed by the 42 state university and approved by the director of the budget 43 (28F21403) (45929) ... 19,000,000 ................... (re. $170,000) 44 Project Schedule 45 PROJECT AMOUNT 46 ---------------------------------------------------------- 47 (thousands of dollars) 48 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 765 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 (HSC) Campus-wide projects, including 2 facility rehabilitation and research lab 3 renovations ..................................... 19,000 4 Notwithstanding any provision of law this appropriation shall be allo- 5 cated only pursuant to a plan setting forth an itemized list of 6 projects with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology 7 for allocating such appropriation. Such plan shall be subject to the 8 approval of the temporary president of the senate and the director 9 of the budget and thereafter shall be included in a resolution call- 10 ing for the expenditure of such monies, which resolution must be 11 approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the senate 12 upon a roll call vote (28F41403) (45906) ........................... 13 49,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,742,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 15 Advances for alterations and improvements to facilities for capital 16 critical maintenance, including but not limited to services and 17 expenses, service agreements or service contracts and memoranda of 18 understanding; for capital design including the cost of services 19 provided by private firms, including preparation of designs, plans, 20 specifications and estimates; for property acquisition, and facility 21 reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipment; for health and safety 22 improvements and upgrades to preserve or enhance facility function- 23 ing; for program improvements or program change; to support improve- 24 ments in technology, research, environmental protection, energy and 25 resource conservation, and accreditation; to finance costs attribut- 26 able to executive order 111, ADA and code compliance needs, claims, 27 emergencies and remediation of environmental hazards; to ensure the 28 functionality of major building systems such as fire alarms and 29 sprinklers, electrical, mechanical, plumbing, heating/cooling 30 systems and supporting infrastructure, including underground utili- 31 ties; and to provide for facilities for the disabled and related 32 projects including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2013 subject to 33 a plan developed by the state university and approved by the direc- 34 tor of the budget (28F21303) (45913) ............................... 35 60,000,000 .......................................... (re. $474,000) 36 Project Schedule 37 PROJECT AMOUNT 38 ---------------------------------------------------------- 39 (thousands of dollars) 40 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center 41 (HSC) Campus-wide projects, including 42 improvements to the Campus Electrical 43 Distribution System ............................. 60,000 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 45 Advances for alterations and improvements to facilities for capital 46 critical maintenance, including but not limited to services and 47 expenses, service agreements or service contracts and memoranda of 766 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 understanding; for capital design including the cost of services 2 provided by private firms, including preparation of designs, plans, 3 specifications and estimates; for property acquisition, and facility 4 reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipment; for health and safety 5 improvements and upgrades to preserve or enhance facility function- 6 ing; for program improvements or program change; to support improve- 7 ments in technology, research, environmental protection, energy and 8 resource conservation, and accreditation; to finance costs attribut- 9 able to executive order 111, ADA and code compliance needs, claims, 10 emergencies and remediation of environmental hazards; to ensure the 11 functionality of major building systems such as fire alarms and 12 sprinklers, electrical, mechanical, plumbing, heating/cooling 13 systems and supporting infrastructure, including underground utili- 14 ties; and to provide for facilities for the disabled and related 15 projects including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2012 subject to 16 a plan developed by the state university and approved by the direc- 17 tor of the budget. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or 18 regulation to the contrary, amounts designated as university-wide, 19 may be made available for projects identified and approved by the 20 governor and the chancellor of the state university of New York 21 pursuant to the NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program (28F11203) 22 (45913) ... 550,000,000 ........................... (re. $2,827,000) 23 Project Schedule 24 PROJECT AMOUNT 25 ---------------------------------------------------------- 26 (thousands of dollars) 27 Albany 28 Campus-wide projects, including Fire Alarm 29 Upgrades to Downtown Campus ..................... 32,477 30 Alfred Ceramics 31 Campus-wide projects, including Satellite 32 Boilers .......................................... 2,836 33 Alfred State 34 Campus-wide projects, including Rehabili- 35 tation of Campus Quad for ADA Compliance 36 and Hinkle Library ............................... 7,799 37 Binghamton 38 Campus-wide projects, including Rehabili- 39 tation of University Union North Phase II ....... 31,360 40 Brockport 41 Campus-wide projects, including Rehabili- 42 tation of Exterior Decks & Plaza ................ 19,430 43 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 44 Campus-wide projects, including New Utili- 45 ty Chases - BSB ................................. 12,699 46 Buffalo College 47 Campus-wide projects, including Renovation 48 of Underground Utilities ........................ 24,305 49 Buffalo University 50 Campus-wide projects, including ADA 767 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Improvements .................................... 65,903 2 Canton 3 Campus-wide projects, including Rehabili- 4 tation of Mechanical/Electrical/Plumbing ......... 5,830 5 Cobleskill 6 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 7 Old Gym for Business School ...................... 7,001 8 Cornell 9 Campus-wide projects, including Energy 10 Conservation-Multiple Buildings ................. 32,862 11 Cortland 12 Campus-wide projects, including Replace- 13 ment of Neubig Roof ............................. 16,417 14 Delhi 15 Campus-wide projects, including Site Util- 16 ities Study & Site Infrastructure Improve- 17 ments ............................................ 6,351 18 Empire State 19 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab of 20 Elevators in Union Facility ...................... 1,168 21 Environmental Science and Forestry 22 Campus-wide projects, including Site 23 Improvements, Phase II ........................... 8,328 24 Farmingdale 25 Campus-wide projects, including Nold Hall 26 Generator ....................................... 15,243 27 Fredonia 28 Campus-wide projects, including Rehabili- 29 tation and Elevator Upgrades .................... 13,382 30 Geneseo 31 Campus-wide projects, including Sidewalk & 32 Drainage Improvements, Phase A .................. 13,769 33 Maritime 34 Campus-wide projects, including Replace 35 Exterior Doors in Various Buildings .............. 6,363 36 Morrisville 37 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 38 Charlton Hall, Phase I ........................... 8,229 39 New Paltz 40 Campus-wide projects, including Upgrade 41 Electrical Distribution ......................... 16,680 42 Old Westbury 43 Campus-wide projects, including Repave 44 Access and Ring Road ............................. 9,513 45 Oneonta 46 Campus-wide projects, including Upgrade 47 tele Communication and Data Systems ............. 13,896 48 Optometry 49 Campus-wide projects, Bathroom Renovations ....... 3,103 50 Oswego 51 Campus-wide projects, including Rehabili- 768 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 tation of Roadways and Walkways ................. 21,032 2 Plattsburgh 3 Campus-wide projects, including Replace 4 Insulation on High Temperature Water Heat- 5 ers in Various Buildings ........................ 13,676 6 Potsdam 7 Campus-wide projects, including Masonry 8 Restoration to Various Buildings ................ 13,850 9 Purchase 10 Campus-wide projects, including Rehabili- 11 tation of Exterior of Academic Buildings ........ 18,360 12 State Univ Plaza 13 Campus-wide projects, including General 14 Infrastructure and Space Rehabilitation .......... 4,384 15 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center (HSC) 16 Campus-wide projects, including Replace- 17 ment of Electrical Feeders ...................... 74,524 18 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 19 Campus-wide projects, including Upgrade 20 Steam Plant ...................................... 9,607 21 Utica-Rome 22 Campus-wide projects, including South 23 Plaza Rehabilitation-Campus Center ............... 3,123 24 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 25 Maintenance Undistributed 26 For university-wide capital critical main- 27 tenance or capital improvement costs, 28 including costs attributable to executive 29 order 111; ADA and code compliance claims; 30 environmental hazards; emergencies health 31 and safety, and energy conservation needs, 32 asbestos and PCB remediation; fire alarms 33 and sprinklers; electrical, mechanical, 34 plumbing and heating and cooling system 35 requirements and other similar universi- 36 ty-wide needs ................................... 16,500 37 Total .......................................... 550,000 38 ============== 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 40 section 1, of the laws of 2012: 41 Advances for alterations and improvements to facilities for capital 42 critical maintenance, including but not limited to services and 43 expenses, service agreements or service contracts and memoranda of 44 understanding; for capital design including the cost of services 45 provided by private firms, including preparation of designs, plans, 46 specifications and estimates; for property acquisition, and facility 47 reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipment; for health and safety 48 improvements and upgrades to preserve or enhance facility function- 49 ing; for program improvements or program change; to support improve- 50 ments in technology, research, environmental protection, energy and 769 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 resource conservation, and accreditation; to finance costs attribut- 2 able to executive order 111, ADA and code compliance needs, claims, 3 emergencies and remediation of environmental hazards; to ensure the 4 functionality of major building systems such as fire alarms and 5 sprinklers, electrical, mechanical, plumbing, heating/cooling 6 systems and supporting infrastructure, including underground utili- 7 ties; and to provide for facilities for the disabled and related 8 projects including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2011 subject to 9 a plan developed by the state university and approved by the direc- 10 tor of the budget. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or 11 regulation to the contrary, amounts designated as university-wide, 12 may be made available for projects identified and approved by the 13 governor and the chancellor of the state university of New York 14 pursuant to the NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program (28F11103) 15 (45913) ... 550,000,000 ........................... (re. $5,537,000) 16 Project Schedule 17 PROJECT AMOUNT 18 ---------------------------------------------------------- 19 (thousands of dollars) 20 Albany 21 Campus-wide projects, including 22 Rehabilitation/Preservation of Podium 23 Structures ...................................... 32,830 24 Alfred Ceramics 25 Campus-wide projects, including McMahon 26 Hall-Replace Windows ............................. 2,776 27 Alfred State 28 Campus-wide projects, including Adminis- 29 tration Building ADA Improvements ................ 7,503 30 Binghamton 31 Campus-wide projects, including Exterior 32 Building Reconstruction ......................... 31,269 33 Brockport 34 Campus-wide projects, including Exterior 35 ADA Improvements ................................ 18,806 36 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 37 Campus-wide projects, including Basic 38 Science Building-Additional Vertical Util- 39 ity Chases ...................................... 12,738 40 Buffalo College 41 Campus-wide projects, including ADA 42 Improvements .................................... 24,779 43 Buffalo University 44 Campus-wide projects, including Hayes Hall 45 Renovation ...................................... 65,913 46 Canton 47 Campus-wide projects, including Reno- 48 vations to Chaney Dining Center .................. 5,612 49 Cobleskill 50 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 770 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Home Economics-Old Quad Building ................. 7,163 2 Cornell 3 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 4 Ken Post Greenhouse Loop Steam Distrib- 5 ution ........................................... 32,058 6 Cortland 7 Campus-wide projects, including Art & Art 8 History Dept. Safety Upgrades ................... 16,418 9 Delhi 10 Campus-wide projects, including Road and 11 Sidewalk Improvements ............................ 6,269 12 Empire State 13 Campus-wide projects, including Security 14 System Upgrades .................................. 1,301 15 Environmental Science and Forestry 16 Campus-wide projects, including Illick 17 Hall Interior Rehab .............................. 8,355 18 Farmingdale 19 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab 20 Campus Walkways and Plazas ...................... 15,542 21 Fredonia 22 Campus-wide projects, including Rockefel- 23 ler Arts Center Roof and Exterior Rehab ......... 13,234 24 Geneseo 25 Campus-wide projects, including Security 26 Upgrades/Card Access Installation ............... 13,885 27 Maritime 28 Campus-wide projects, including Replace 29 Roof-Heritage Hall ............................... 6,268 30 Morrisville 31 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 32 Bailey Hall ...................................... 8,162 33 New Paltz 34 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 35 Elting Gymnasium ................................ 16,991 36 Old Westbury 37 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab 38 Campus Center Envelope Bldgs 51 & 56 ............. 9,147 39 Oneonta 40 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab 41 Physical Education Building ..................... 13,805 42 Optometry 43 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab 44 Office Areas ..................................... 3,108 45 Oswego 46 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab 47 Lanigan Hall Ph. II ............................. 20,826 48 Plattsburgh 49 Campus-wide projects, including Field 50 House Mechanical Rehab .......................... 13,877 51 Potsdam 771 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide projects, including Rebuild 2 Exterior Plazas ................................. 13,752 3 Purchase 4 Campus-wide projects, including Masonry 5 Repairs-Natural Science Building ................ 18,572 6 State Univ Plaza 7 Campus-wide projects, including Plaza Bldg 8 Boiler Replacement ............................... 4,595 9 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center (HSC) 10 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab 11 Mechanical Systems-Various Bldgs ................ 74,679 12 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 13 Campus-wide projects, including Abate/ 14 Renovate Academic Labs-6 South Univ Hospi- 15 tal ............................................. 10,092 16 Utica-Rome 17 Campus-wide projects, including Upgrade 18 Parking/Landscape-Student Cntr/Field House ....... 3,175 19 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 20 Maintenance Undistributed 21 For university-wide capital critical main- 22 tenance or capital improvement costs, 23 including costs attributable to executive 24 order 111; ADA and code compliance claims; 25 environmental hazards; emergencies health 26 and safety, and energy conservation needs, 27 asbestos and PCB remediation; fire alarms 28 and sprinklers; electrical, mechanical, 29 plumbing and heating and cooling system 30 requirements and other similar university- 31 wide needs ...................................... 16,500 32 -------------- 33 Total .......................................... 550,000 34 ============== 35 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2012: 37 Advances for alterations and improvements to facilities for capital 38 critical maintenance, including but not limited to services and 39 expenses, service agreements or service contracts and memoranda of 40 understanding; for capital design including the cost of services 41 provided by private firms, including preparation of designs, plans, 42 specifications and estimates; for property acquisition, and facility 43 reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipment; for health and safety 44 improvements and upgrades to preserve or enhance facility function- 45 ing; for program improvements or program change; to support improve- 46 ments in technology, research, environmental protection, energy and 47 resource conservation, and accreditation; to finance costs attribut- 48 able to executive order 111, ADA and code compliance needs, claims, 49 emergencies and remediation of environmental hazards; to ensure the 50 functionality of major building systems such a fire alarms and 772 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 sprinklers, electrical, mechanical, plumbing, heating/cooling 2 systems and supporting infrastructure, including underground utili- 3 ties; and to provide for facilities for the disabled and related 4 projects including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2010 subject to 5 a plan developed by the state university and approved by the direc- 6 tor of the budget. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or 7 regulation to the contrary, amounts designated as university-wide, 8 may be made available for projects identified and approved by the 9 governor and the chancellor of the state university of New York 10 pursuant to the NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program (28F11003) 11 (45913) ... 550,000,000 ........................... (re. $3,154,000) 12 Project Schedule 13 PROJECT AMOUNT 14 ---------------------------------------------------------- 15 (thousands of dollars) 16 Albany 17 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 18 University Library ............................ 33,006 19 Alfred Ceramics 20 Campus-wide projects, including Binns 21 Merrill Hall-Structural Upgrades ............... 2,736 22 Alfred State 23 Campus-wide projects, including Replace 24 Roof-Orvis Gym ................................. 7,293 25 Binghamton 26 Campus-wide projects, including Replace 27 Electrical Systems-Various Bldgs .............. 31,910 28 Brockport 29 Campus-wide projects, including Replace 30 Roofs-Various Bldgs, Ph I ..................... 19,150 31 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 32 Campus-wide projects, including Replace 33 Windows-Basic Sci Bldg, Ph I .................. 12,683 34 Buffalo College 35 Campus-wide projects, including Modify/ 36 Replace Storm Sewer Syst Components ........... 24,433 37 Buffalo University 38 Campus-wide projects, including Site 39 Lighting Renewal, North Campus, Ph I .......... 66,230 40 Canton 41 Campus-wide projects, including Reno- 42 vations to Chaney Dining Center ................ 5,401 43 Cobleskill 44 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab 45 Locker Rooms-Bldg. 14A ......................... 7,150 46 Cornell 47 Campus-wide projects, including Martha Van 48 Rensselaer & E. Wing Renovation-Ph, IB ........ 32,212 49 Cortland 50 Campus-wide projects, including Art & Art 773 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 History Dept. Safety Upgrades ................. 16,476 2 Delhi 3 Campus-wide projects, including Interior 4 Upgrades-Alumni Hall ............................. 6,137 5 Empire State 6 Campus-wide projects, including Security 7 System Upgrades ................................ 1,108 8 Environmental Science and Forestry 9 Campus-wide projects, including Illick 10 Hall Interior Rehab ............................ 8,371 11 Farmingdale 12 Campus-wide projects, including Replace 13 Site Lighting-Various Locations ............... 15,278 14 Fredonia 15 Campus-wide projects, including Upgrade UG 16 Electrical Distribution, Study & Ph I ......... 13,390 17 Geneseo 18 Campus-wide projects, including Letchworth 19 Dining Hall Renovations ....................... 13,757 20 Maritime 21 Campus-wide projects, including HVAC Rehab 22 Ph I-Marvin & Tode ............................. 6,093 23 Morrisville 24 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 25 Bailey Hall .................................... 8,367 26 New Paltz 27 Campus-wide projects, including Site Reno- 28 vation-Ph II .................................. 16,664 29 Old Westbury 30 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab 31 Campus Center Envelope Bldgs 51 & 56 ........... 8,922 32 Oneonta 33 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab 34 Physical Science Building ..................... 13,657 35 Optometry 36 Campus-wide projects, including Replace 37 Switchgear/Upgrade Electrical Feeders .......... 3,060 38 Oswego 39 Campus-wide projects, including C-wide 40 Utilities & Infrastructure-Program Study ...... 21,181 41 Plattsburgh 42 Campus-wide projects, including Replace 43 Parking ....................................... 14,045 44 Potsdam 45 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab HVAC 46 Systems-Kellas & Timerman Halls ............... 14,080 47 Purchase 48 Campus-wide projects, including Expansion 49 of University Police Department ............... 18,483 50 State Univ Plaza 51 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 774 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Plaza Bldg-3rd Floor South ..................... 4,592 2 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center (HSC) 3 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab 4 Mechanical Systems-Various Bldgs .............. 75,205 5 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 6 Campus-wide projects, including Abate/ 7 Renovate Academic Labs-6 South Univ 8 Hospital ....................................... 9,122 9 Utica-Rome 10 Campus-wide projects, including Upgrade 11 Parking/Landscape-Student Cntr/Field 12 House .......................................... 3,308 13 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 14 Maintenance Undistributed 15 For university-wide capital critical main- 16 tenance or capital improvement costs, 17 including costs attributable to execu- 18 tive order 111; ADA and code compliance 19 claims; environmental hazards; emergen- 20 cies health and safety, and energy 21 conservation needs, asbestos and PCB 22 remediation; fire alarms and sprin- 23 klers; electrical, mechanical, plumbing 24 and heating and cooling system require- 25 ments and other similar university wide 26 needs ......................................... 16,500 27 Total .......................................... 550,000 28 ============== 29 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 30 section 1, of the laws of 2012: 31 Advances for alterations and improvements to facilities for capital 32 critical maintenance, including but not limited to services and 33 expenses, service agreements or service contracts and memoranda of 34 understanding; for capital design including the cost of services 35 provided by private firms, including preparation of designs, plans, 36 specifications and estimates; for property acquisition, and facility 37 reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipment; for health and safety 38 improvements and upgrades to preserve or enhance facility function- 39 ing; for program improvements or program change; to support improve- 40 ments in technology, research, environmental protection, energy and 41 resource conservation, and accreditation; to finance costs attribut- 42 able to executive order 111, ADA and code compliance needs, claims, 43 emergencies and remediation of environmental hazards; to ensure the 44 functionality of major building systems such a fire alarms and 45 sprinklers, electrical, mechanical, plumbing, heating/cooling 46 systems and supporting infrastructure, including underground utili- 47 ties; and to provide for facilities for the disabled and related 48 projects including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2009 subject to 49 a plan developed by the state university and approved by the direc- 50 tor of the budget. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or 775 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 regulation to the contrary, amounts designated as university-wide, 2 may be made available for projects identified and approved by the 3 governor and the chancellor of the state university of New York 4 pursuant to the NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program (28F10903) 5 (45913) ... 550,000,000 ........................... (re. $1,855,000) 6 Project Schedule 7 PROJECT AMOUNT 8 ---------------------------------------------------------- 9 (thousands of dollars) 10 Albany 11 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 12 Health Center ................................. 33,927 13 Alfred Ceramics 14 Campus-wide projects, including McMahon 15 Hall Full interior Rehab - Phase I ............. 2,845 16 Alfred State 17 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab 18 Central Dining Hall - Phase II ................. 7,343 19 Binghamton 20 Campus-wide projects, including Central 21 Campus Quad Site Reconstruction ............... 32,129 22 Brockport 23 Campus-wide projects, including Infras- 24 tructure Improvements - Tuttle N, Phase 25 II ............................................ 19,429 26 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 27 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 28 for New Labs - Basic Science Building ......... 12,884 29 Buffalo College 30 Campus-wide projects, including UG Steam 31 Distribution System Rehab Butler .............. 23,974 32 Buffalo University 33 Campus-wide projects, including IT 34 Infrastructure Renewal ............................ 67,395 35 Canton 36 Campus-wide projects, including Campus 37 Standby Power System & Sub Stn Rehab ........... 5,174 38 Cobleskill 39 Campus-wide projects, including Roof 40 Replacement - Various Buildings ................ 6,989 41 Cornell 42 Campus-wide projects, including Warren 43 Hall Renovation ............................... 32,817 44 Cortland 45 Campus-wide projects, including Moffett 46 Renovation .................................... 16,646 47 Delhi 48 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 49 Sanford Hall ................................... 6,150 50 Empire State 776 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide projects, including Site Rehab 2 - Parking Lot, No 1 Union Ave .................... 872 3 Environmental Science and Forestry 4 Campus-wide projects, including Illick 5 Hall Interior Rehab ............................ 8,386 6 Farmingdale 7 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab 8 Whitman Hall .................................. 15,095 9 Fredonia 10 Campus-wide projects, including William's 11 Center Interior Rehab ......................... 13,396 12 Geneseo 13 Campus-wide projects, including Bailey 14 Hall Renovation ............................... 14,191 15 Maritime 16 Campus-wide projects, including Replace 17 Roof - Reisenberg Gym .......................... 6,049 18 Morrisville 19 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 20 Charlton Hall .................................. 8,428 21 New Paltz 22 Campus-wide projects, including Comprehen- 23 sive Renov/Demol - Wooster Science Bldg ...... 16,020 24 Old Westbury 25 Campus-wide projects, including Replace 26 Heat/Chill Plant & Distribution System ......... 9,158 27 Oneonta 28 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab 29 Physical Science Building ..................... 13,957 30 Optometry 31 Campus-wide projects, including HVAC Rehab 32 - Phase I ...................................... 3,176 33 Oswego 34 Campus-wide projects, including Piez Hall 35 Reconstruction ................................ 21,400 36 Plattsburgh 37 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 38 Beaumont Hall - Phase I ....................... 14,233 39 Potsdam 40 Campus-wide projects, including Raymond/ 41 Sisson Halls - Replace Windows ................ 13,837 42 Purchase 43 Campus-wide projects, including Rehab HVAC 44 - Visual Arts Bldg ............................ 18,143 45 State Univ Plaza 46 Campus-wide projects, including Repair 47 Facade - Historic Plaza Building ............... 4,596 48 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center (HSC) 49 Campus-wide projects, including Interior 50 Rehab - Various Bldgs ......................... 73,847 51 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 777 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus-wide projects, including Renovate 2 Weiskotten Basement Central Core ............... 7,862 3 Utica-Rome 4 Campus-wide projects, including Site 5 Lighting Upgrades - Campuswide ................. 3,152 6 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 7 Maintenance Undistributed 8 For university-wide capital critical main- 9 tenance or capital improvement costs, 10 including costs attributable to executive 11 order 111; ADA and code compliance claims; 12 environmental hazards; emergencies health 13 and safety, and energy conservation needs, 14 asbestos and PCB remediation; fire alarms 15 and sprinklers; electrical, mechanical, 16 plumbing and heating and cooling system 17 requirements and other similar university 18 wide needs ...................................... 16,500 19 -------------- 20 Total .......................................... 550,000 21 ============== 22 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 23 section 1, of the laws of 2012: 24 Advances for alterations and improvements to facilities for capital 25 critical maintenance, including but not limited to services and 26 expenses, service agreements or service contracts and memoranda of 27 understanding; for capital design including the cost of services 28 provided by private firms, including preparation of designs, plans, 29 specifications and estimates; for property acquisition, and facility 30 reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipment; for health and safety 31 improvements and upgrades to preserve or enhance facility function- 32 ing; for program improvements or program change; to support improve- 33 ments in technology, research, environmental protection, energy and 34 resource conservation, and accreditation; to finance costs attribut- 35 able to executive order 111, ADA and code compliance needs, claims, 36 emergencies and remediation of environmental hazards; to ensure the 37 functionality of major building systems such a fire alarms and 38 sprinklers, electrical, mechanical, plumbing, heating/cooling 39 systems and supporting infrastructure, including underground utili- 40 ties; and to provide for facilities for the disabled and related 41 projects including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2008 subject to 42 a plan developed by the state university and approved by the direc- 43 tor of the budget. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or 44 regulation to the contrary, amounts designated as university-wide, 45 may be made available for projects identified and approved by the 46 governor and the chancellor of the state university of New York 47 pursuant to the NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program (28F10803) 48 (45913) ... 550,000,000 ........................... (re. $2,845,000) 778 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Project Schedule 2 PROJECT AMOUNT 3 ---------------------------------------------------------- 4 (thousands of dollars) 5 Albany 6 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 7 such as Relocation of the Data Center ........ 33,755 8 Alfred Ceramics 9 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 10 such as McMahon Hall Window Replacement ....... 2,924 11 Alfred State 12 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 13 such as Classroom/Lab Upgrades and 14 Central Dining Hall Renovation, Phase II ....... 7,707 15 Binghamton 16 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 17 such as Science II, IV and V Renovations ...... 32,568 18 Brockport 19 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 20 such as Smith Hall Infrastructure/ 21 Exterior Renovations .......................... 19,927 22 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 23 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 24 such as Elevator Upgrades and HVAC 25 Replacement ................................... 13,087 26 Buffalo College 27 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 28 such as Rockwell Hall Renovations ............. 24,908 29 Buffalo University 30 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 31 such as Underground Utility Renovations 32 on both North and South campuses .............. 64,027 33 Canton 34 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 35 such as Structural Renovations to Dana 36 Hall ........................................... 5,286 37 Cobleskill 38 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 39 such as Dairy Complex Infrastructure 40 Improvements ................................... 7,057 41 Cornell 42 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 43 such as Warren Hall Renovation ................ 33,624 44 Cortland 45 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 46 such as Power Plant Upgrades and Lusk 47 Field House Renovations ....................... 16,916 48 Delhi 49 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 50 such as Upgrades to Alumni Hall and Road 779 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 & Sidewalk Improvements ........................ 6,068 2 Empire State 3 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 4 such as Security System Upgrades ................. 736 5 Environmental Science and Forestry 6 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 7 such as Electrical Substation Replace- 8 ment and Illick Hall Exterior Reno- 9 vations ........................................ 8,515 10 Farmingdale 11 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 12 such as Roof and Elevator Replacements ........ 15,199 13 Fredonia 14 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 15 such as Fenton Hall Renovations and 16 Campus Code Compliance, Phase II .............. 13,857 17 Geneseo 18 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 19 such as Security Upgrades and Newton 20 Hall Renovation, Phase II ..................... 14,607 21 Maritime 22 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 23 such as Reisenberg Gym HVAC Upgrades and 24 Roof Replacement ............................... 5,971 25 Morrisville 26 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 27 such as Minor Renovation Projects .............. 8,693 28 New Paltz 29 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 30 such as Elting Gymnasium Renovation ........... 16,456 31 Old Westbury 32 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 33 such as Campus Center Renovations .............. 9,194 34 Oneonta 35 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 36 such as Electrical Upgrades and Heating 37 Plant Renovation, Phase II .................... 14,285 38 Optometry 39 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 40 such as Restroom Renovations, Phase I & 41 II ............................................. 3,248 42 Oswego 43 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 44 such as Penfield Library Renovation and 45 Utilities & Infrastructure Program Study ...... 21,931 46 Plattsburgh 47 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 48 such as Hudson Hall Renovation, Phase II ...... 13,824 49 Potsdam 50 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 51 such as Stowell & Flagg Hall HVAC Reha- 780 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 bilitations ................................... 14,233 2 Purchase 3 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 4 such as various HVAC Rehabilitations .......... 16,015 5 State Univ Plaza 6 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 7 such as Plaza Building Window Replace- 8 ments .......................................... 5,141 9 Stony Brook, incl Health Science 10 Center (HSC) 11 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 12 such as Old Chemistry Building Reno- 13 vation ........................................ 72,893 14 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 15 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 16 such as various Weiskotten Hall Reno- 17 vations ........................................ 7,839 18 Utica-Rome 19 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 20 such as Underground Electrical Upgrades/ 21 Replacements ................................... 3,009 22 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 23 For University-wide capital critical main- 24 tenance or capital improvement costs, 25 including costs attributable to execu- 26 tive order 111; ADA compliance claims; 27 environmental hazards; emergencies for 28 health and safety, and energy conserva- 29 tion needs, asbestos and PCB remedi- 30 ation; fire alarms and sprinklers; elec- 31 trical, mechanical, plumbing and heating 32 and cooling system requirements along 33 with other similar university-wide needs ...... 16,500 34 -------------- 35 Total ........................................ 550,000 36 ============== 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 39 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 41 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 42 various facilities including but not limited to capital design, 43 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 44 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 45 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 46 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 47 maintenance and related projects, acquisition and implementation of 48 equipment, software, hardware and services in consultation with the 49 office of information technology services, including costs incurred 781 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 prior to April 1, 2025 and subject to a plan developed and submitted 2 annually by the state university of New York and approved by the 3 director of the budget. Funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 4 cated to the state university of New York following approval by the 5 chancellor of the state university of New York and the director of 6 the budget (28F22508) (45939) ... 60,000,000 ..... (re. $60,000,000) 7 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 8 research facilities including but not limited to capital design, 9 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 10 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 11 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 12 and accreditation, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2025 13 and subject to a plan approved by the chancellor of the state 14 university of New York and the director of the budget (28IN2508) 15 (45942) ... 200,000,000 ......................... (re. $200,000,000) 16 For additional services and expenses related to alterations and 17 improvements to research facilities including but not limited to 18 capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and 19 equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 20 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 21 energy conservation, and accreditation, including costs incurred 22 prior to April 1, 2025 and subject to a plan approved by the chan- 23 cellor of the state university of New York and the director of the 24 budget (28I22508) (45940) ... 100,000,000 ....... (re. $100,000,000) 25 For services and expenses of the modernization and revitalization of 26 Downstate university hospital, including but not limited to alter- 27 ations and improvements, subject to a plan developed by the chancel- 28 lor of the state university of New York and approved by the director 29 of the budget; provided that notwithstanding any inconsistent 30 provision of law, for purposes of subdivision 5 of section 996 of 31 the executive law, the funds appropriated herein shall not be deemed 32 to constitute "available state appropriated amounts" and shall not 33 increase the maximum cost of the recommendations of the community 34 advisory board for the modernization and revitalization of SUNY 35 Downstate health sciences university pursuant to such subdivision 36 (28DS2508) (45944) ................................................. 37 450,000,000 ..................................... (re. $450,000,000) 38 For services and expenses of the modernization and revitalization of 39 Upstate university hospital, including but not limited to alter- 40 ations and improvements, subject to a plan developed by the chancel- 41 lor of the state university of New York and approved by the director 42 of the budget (28US2508) (45946) ................................... 43 200,000,000 ..................................... (re. $200,000,000) 44 For additional services and expenses of the modernization and revital- 45 ization of Upstate university hospital, including but not limited to 46 alterations and improvements, subject to a plan developed by the 47 chancellor of the state university of New York and approved by the 48 director of the budget (28U22508) (64500) .......................... 49 250,000,000 ..................................... (re. $250,000,000) 50 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 782 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 2 various facilities including but not limited to capital design, 3 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 4 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 5 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 6 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 7 maintenance and related projects, acquisition and implementation of 8 equipment, software, hardware and services in consultation with the 9 office of information technology services, including costs incurred 10 prior to April 1, 2024 and subject to a plan developed and submitted 11 annually by the state university of New York and approved by the 12 director of the budget. Funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 13 cated to the state university of New York following approval by the 14 chancellor of the state university of New York and the director of 15 the budget (28F22408) (45939) ...................................... 16 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $99,976,000) 17 For additional services and expenses related to alterations and 18 improvements to various facilities including but not limited to 19 capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and 20 equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 21 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 22 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 23 disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, acquisition 24 and implementation of equipment, software, hardware and services in 25 consultation with the office of information technology services, 26 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2024 and subject to a 27 plan developed and submitted annually by the state university of New 28 York and approved by the director of the budget. Funds appropriated 29 herein may be suballocated to the state university of New York 30 following approval by the chancellor of the state university of New 31 York and the director of the budget (28F32408) (45940) ............. 32 60,000,000 ....................................... (re. $57,542,000) 33 For services and expenses of state university of New York hospitals 34 for alterations, improvements, services and expenses, and new facil- 35 ities, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2024 subject to a 36 plan developed by the state university and approved by the director 37 of the budget (28FI2403) (45921) ................................... 38 150,000,000 ..................................... (re. $150,000,000) 39 Project Schedule 40 PROJECT AMOUNT 41 ---------------------------------------------------------- 42 (thousands of dollars) 43 Downstate University Hospital 44 For university-wide projects ..................... 50,000 45 Stony Brook University Hospital 46 For university-wide projects ..................... 50,000 47 Upstate University Hospital 48 For university-wide projects ..................... 50,000 49 -------------- 50 Total ........................................... 150,000 783 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ============== 2 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 3 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 4 various facilities including but not limited to capital design, 5 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 6 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 7 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 8 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 9 maintenance and related projects, acquisition and implementation of 10 equipment, software, hardware and services in consultation with the 11 office of information technology services, including costs incurred 12 prior to April 1, 2023 and subject to a plan developed and submitted 13 annually by the state university of New York and approved by the 14 director of the budget. Funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 15 cated to the state university of New York following approval by the 16 chancellor of the state university of New York and the director of 17 the budget (28F22308) (45939) ...................................... 18 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $97,574,000) 19 For additional services and expenses related to alterations and 20 improvements to various facilities including but not limited to 21 capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and 22 equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 23 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 24 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 25 disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, acquisition 26 and implementation of equipment, software, hardware and services in 27 consultation with the office of information technology services, 28 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2023 and subject to a 29 plan developed and submitted annually by the state university of New 30 York and approved by the director of the budget. Funds appropriated 31 herein may be suballocated to the state university of New York 32 following approval by the chancellor of the state university of New 33 York and the director of the budget (28F32308) (45940) ............. 34 370,000,000 ..................................... (re. $341,162,000) 35 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 36 research facilities including but not limited to capital design, 37 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 38 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 39 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 40 and accreditation, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2023 41 and subject to a plan approved by the chancellor of the state 42 university of New York and the director of the budget (28FL2308) 43 (45942) ... 200,000,000 ......................... (re. $193,456,000) 44 Project Schedule 45 PROJECT AMOUNT 46 ---------------------------------------------------------- 47 (thousands of dollars) 48 University at Buffalo 784 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For university-wide projects ................... 100,000 2 Stony Brook University 3 For university-wide projects ................... 100,000 4 -------------- 5 Total ........................................ 200,000 6 ============== 7 For services and expenses of state university of New York hospitals 8 for alterations, improvements, services and expenses, and new facil- 9 ities, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2023 subject to a 10 plan developed by the state university and approved by the director 11 of the budget (28FI2303) (45921) ................................... 12 150,000,000 ..................................... (re. $150,000,000) 13 Project Schedule 14 PROJECT AMOUNT 15 ---------------------------------------------------------- 16 (thousands of dollars) 17 Downstate University Hospital 18 For university-wide projects .................... 50,000 19 Stony Brook University Hospital ................... 50,000 20 For university-wide projects 21 Upstate University Hospital ....................... 50,000 22 For university-wide projects 23 -------------- 24 Total ........................................ 150,000 25 ============== 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 27 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 28 various facilities including but not limited to capital design, 29 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 30 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 31 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 32 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 33 maintenance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 34 April 1, 2022 and subject to a plan developed and submitted annually 35 by the state university of New York and approved by the director of 36 the budget (28F22208) (45939) ... 425,000,000 ... (re. $311,623,000) 37 For additional services and expenses related to alterations and 38 improvements to various facilities including but not limited to 39 capital design, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and 40 equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 41 program improvement or program change, environmental protection, 42 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 43 disabled, preventative maintenance and related projects, including 44 costs incurred prior to April 1, 2022 and subject to a plan devel- 45 oped and submitted annually by the state university of New York and 46 approved by the director of the budget (28F32208) (45940) .......... 47 225,000,000 ..................................... (re. $176,113,000) 785 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses of state university of New York hospitals 2 for alterations, improvements, services and expenses, and new facil- 3 ities, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2022 subject to a 4 plan developed by the state university and approved by the director 5 of the budget (28FI2203) (45921) ................................... 6 150,000,000 ..................................... (re. $149,806,000) 7 Project Schedule 8 PROJECT AMOUNT 9 ---------------------------------------------------------- 10 (thousands of dollars) 11 Downstate University Hospital 12 For university-wide projects .................... 50,000 13 Stony Brook University Hospital ................... 50,000 14 For university-wide projects 15 Upstate University Hospital ....................... 50,000 16 For university-wide projects 17 -------------- 18 Total ........................................ 150,000 19 ============== 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 21 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements to 22 various facilities including but not limited to capital design, 23 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment; for 24 health and safety, preservation of facilities, program improvement 25 or program change, environmental protection, energy conservation, 26 accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, preventative 27 maintenance and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 28 April 1, 2021 and subject to a plan developed and submitted annually 29 by the state university of New York and approved by the director of 30 the budget (28F22108) (45939) ... 100,000,000 .... (re. $32,226,000) 31 For services and expenses of state university of New York hospitals 32 for alterations, improvements, services and expenses, and new facil- 33 ities, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2021 subject to a 34 plan developed by the state university and approved by the director 35 of the budget (28FI2103) (45921) ................................... 36 150,000,000 ..................................... (re. $136,044,000) 37 Project Schedule 38 PROJECT AMOUNT 39 ---------------------------------------------------------- 40 (thousands of dollars) 41 Downstate University Hospital 42 For university-wide projects .................... 50,000 43 Stony Brook University Hospital ................... 50,000 44 For university-wide projects 45 Upstate University Hospital ....................... 50,000 46 For university-wide projects 47 -------------- 48 Total ........................................ 150,000 786 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ============== 2 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 3 For services and expenses of state university of New York hospitals 4 for alterations, improvements, services and expenses, and new facil- 5 ities, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2020 subject to a 6 plan developed by the state university and approved by the director 7 of the budget (28FI2003) (45921) ................................... 8 150,000,000 ...................................... (re. $69,023,000) 9 Project Schedule 10 PROJECT AMOUNT 11 ---------------------------------------------------------- 12 (thousands of dollars) 13 Downstate University Hospital 14 For university-wide projects .................... 50,000 15 Stony Brook University Hospital ................... 50,000 16 For university-wide projects 17 Upstate University Hospital ....................... 50,000 18 For university-wide projects 19 -------------- 20 Total ........................................ 150,000 21 ============== 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as transferred by chapter 23 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 24 For services and expenses of SUNY hospitals for alterations, improve- 25 ments, services and expenses, and new facilities, including costs 26 incurred prior to April 1, 2017 subject to a plan developed by the 27 state university and approved by the director of the budget 28 (28FI1708) (45921) ... 100,000,000 ................ (re. $6,231,000) 29 Project Schedule 30 PROJECT AMOUNT 31 ---------------------------------------------------------- 32 (thousands of dollars) 33 Upstate University Hospital ....................... 50,000 34 For university-wide projects 35 Stony Brook University Hospital ................... 50,000 36 For university-wide projects 37 -------------- 38 Total ........................................ 100,000 39 ============== 40 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as transferred by chapter 41 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 42 For services and expenses of upstate university hospital capital 43 projects and facilities. Moneys from this appropriation shall be 44 made available only as matching funds up to an equal amount of funds 45 awarded to upstate university hospital through the capital restruc- 46 turing financing program pursuant to section 2825 of the public 787 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 health law, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2016 2 (28FH1608) (45903) ... 75,000,000 ................. (re. $8,172,000) 3 For services and expenses of SUNY hospitals for alterations, improve- 4 ments, services and expenses, and new facilities, including costs 5 incurred prior to April 1, 2016 subject to a plan developed by the 6 state university and approved by the director of the budget 7 (28FI1608) (45921) ... 100,000,000 ............... (re. $10,163,000) 8 Project Schedule 9 PROJECT AMOUNT 10 ---------------------------------------------------------- 11 (thousands of dollars) 12 Upstate University Hospital ....................... 50,000 13 For university-wide projects 14 Stony Brook University Hospital ................... 50,000 15 For university-wide projects 16 -------------- 17 Total ........................................ 100,000 18 ============== 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 20 For services and expenses of studies, site acquisitions, planning, 21 design, construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment 22 necessary to establish a school of pharmacy at the state university 23 of New York at Binghamton. Amounts appropriated herein shall be in 24 addition to $25,000,000 appropriated in the urban development corpo- 25 ration projects budget (28F21508) (45922) .......................... 26 25,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,018,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 28 Advances for the cost of studies, site acquisitions, planning, design, 29 construction, reconstruction, renovation, and equipment necessary to 30 establish a school of pharmacy at the state university of New York 31 at Binghamton (28F11408) (45922) ... 10,000,000 ...... (re. $37,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 33 Advances for the design and construction of an emerging technology and 34 entrepreneurial complex, as identified and approved by the governor 35 and the chancellor of the state of New York pursuant to the NY-SUNY 36 2020 challenge grant program for the state university of New York at 37 Albany, including but not limited to services and expenses, service 38 agreements or service contracts and memoranda of understanding; for 39 capital design including the cost of services provided by private 40 firms, including preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 41 estimates; for property acquisition, and facility construction or 42 reconstruction and equipment; claims, emergencies and remediation of 43 environmental hazards (28201308) (45922) ........................... 44 88,000,000 ....................................... (re. $18,520,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 46 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 788 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Advances for the relocation and construction of a medical school and 2 biomedical sciences facility, as identified and approved by the 3 governor and the chancellor of the state of New York pursuant to the 4 NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program for the state university of New 5 York at Buffalo, including but not limited to services and expenses, 6 service agreements or service contracts and memoranda of understand- 7 ing; for capital design including the cost of services provided by 8 private firms, including preparation of designs, plans, specifica- 9 tions and estimates; for property acquisition, and facility 10 construction or reconstruction and equipment; claims, emergencies 11 and remediation of environmental hazards. Notwithstanding any incon- 12 sistent provision of law to the contrary, the state university 13 construction fund is hereby authorized to enter into a service 14 agreement to transfer $25,000,000 of this appropriation to universi- 15 ty at Buffalo-affiliated entities for design, construction, property 16 acquisition and equipment costs related to the relocation and 17 construction of the medical school and biomedical sciences facility 18 and related facilities (28201208) (45922) .......................... 19 215,000,000 .......................................... (re. $14,000) 20 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 21 Advances to SUNY hospitals for alterations, improvements services and 22 expenses, and new facilities, including costs incurred prior to 23 April 1, 2008 subject to a plan developed by the state university 24 and approved by the director of the budget (28FH0808) (45921) ...... 25 450,000,000 ...................................... (re. $16,729,000) 26 Project Schedule 27 PROJECT AMOUNT 28 ---------------------------------------------------------- 29 (thousands of dollars) 30 Brooklyn ......................................... 150,000 31 For university-wide projects which may 32 include but are not limited to: 33 -Ambulatory Services Expansion, Phase I 34 -Ongoing Critical Maintenance Projects 35 Syracuse ......................................... 150,000 36 For university-wide projects which may 37 include but are not limited to: 38 -Heart Center Renovations 39 -Cancer Center Design and Construction 40 -UH North and West Wing Renovations 41 -Ancillary Services Facilities 42 Stony Brook ...................................... 150,000 43 For university-wide projects which may 44 include but are not limited to: 45 -Intensive Care Building Design and 46 Construction 47 -Level 8 & 9 Hospital Floor Rehabili- 48 tation 49 -Hospital Building Exterior Renovation 789 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 -Neorointerventional Program Facilities 2 -------------- 3 Total .......................................... 450,000 4 ============== 5 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 Advances for alterations and improvements to various facilities 8 including services and expenses, service contracts, memoranda of 9 understanding, capital design, construction, acquisition, recon- 10 struction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 11 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 12 program change, technology, environment protection, energy conserva- 13 tion, accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, and 14 related projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2008, 15 subject to an annual plan developed by the state university of New 16 York and approved by the director of the budget. Of the amount 17 appropriated herein, up to $400,000 may be suballocated or trans- 18 ferred to the office of general services for capital costs related 19 to the NY Network (28F20808) (45922) ............................... 20 1,675,613,000 .................................... (re. $39,369,000) 21 Project Schedule 22 PROJECT AMOUNT 23 -------------------------------------------- 24 (thousands of dollars) 25 Albany 26 Construct Business School ......... 54,000 27 Campus Center Expansion/ 28 Improvements ...................... 30,000 29 Campus Revitalization/Site 30 Improvements, Phase II ............. 5,000 31 Alfred Ceramics 32 Infill Project-VariousBuildings .... 9,000 33 Alfred State 34 Student Union / Student Activities 35 Center ............................ 27,500 36 Dining Hall ........................ 6,000 37 Binghamton 38 Nursing Facility ................... 3,000 39 Center for Excellence Building .... 15,000 40 Nursing Facility ................... 5,000 41 Upgrade to Events Center ........... 1,000 42 Brockport 43 Construct Academic Building ....... 29,300 44 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 45 Life & Health Safety 46 Improvements ...................... 25,300 47 Construct Academic Bldg for School 48 of Public Health ................. 100,000 49 Expansion of Administration 790 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Complex ........................... 17,600 2 Traditional and Alternative 3 Notwithstanding any inconsis- 4 tent provision of law to the 5 contrary, the state univer- 6 sity construction fund is 7 authorized to enter into a 8 service agreement to transfer 9 up to $6,000,000 in state 10 university capital construction 11 funds to Bio-Bat, Inc., to be 12 administered by The Research 13 Foundation of State University 14 of New York, for the construc- 15 tion, reconstruction, rehabil- 16 itation and redevelopment of 17 energy sources development at 18 the Brooklyn Army Terminal 19 biotechnology commercial and 20 research center. Bio-Bat, Inc., 21 or its designee is authorized 22 to construct, reconstruct, 23 rehabilitate and redevelop 24 energy sources for such facil- 25 ity using funds transferred 26 from the state university 27 construction fund to Bio-Bat, 28 Inc. ............................. 6,000 29 Buffalo College 30 Renovate/Addition Science 31 Building - Phase I ................ 45,000 32 Renovate/Addition Science 33 Building - Phase II ............... 48,262 34 Buffalo University 35 UB Gateway & Urban Technology 36 Incubator Phases I, II, III 37 Downtown. Notwithstanding 38 any inconsistent 39 provision of law to the 40 contrary, the State University 41 Construction Fund is hereby 42 authorized to enter into a 43 service agreement to transfer 44 up to $32,000,000 of this 45 appropriation in 46 State University capital 47 construction funds to the Buffalo 48 2020 Development Corporation for 49 the purpose of constructing, 50 acquiring, or creating a 51 Clinical/Translational Research 791 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 facility on the downtown 2 campus, an incubator facility 3 on the downtown campus, the UB 4 Gateway project, and reimbursing 5 the University at Buffalo 6 Foundation for property 7 acquisition for the Educational 8 Opportunity Center and the UB 9 Gateway project, provided, 10 that all contracts for the 11 construction of any such 12 facilities shall require compliance 13 with the provisions of 14 section two hundred twenty of 15 the labor law and shall be subject 16 to article XV-a of the executive 17 law ............................... 32,000 18 Construct Clinical/Transitional 19 Research Facility - Ph III. 20 Notwithstanding any inconsistent 21 provision of law to the contrary, 22 the State University Construction 23 Fund is hereby authorized to enter 24 into a service agreement to transfer 25 up to $100,000,000 of this 26 appropriation to the Buffalo 2020 27 Development Corporation for the 28 purpose of constructing, acquiring, 29 or creating a Clinical/Translational 30 Research facility and an incubator 31 facility on the downtown campus, 32 provided, that all contracts for 33 the construction of any such 34 facilities shall require compliance 35 with the provisions of section two 36 hundred twenty of the labor law and 37 shall be subject to article XV-a of 38 the executive law ................ 100,000 39 UB Gateway, Phase IV. 40 Notwithstanding any law to the 41 contrary, the State University 42 Construction Fund is hereby 43 authorized to enter into a service 44 agreement to transfer up to $6,000,000 45 of this appropriation to the Buffalo 46 2020 Development Corporation for the 47 purpose of constructing or creating 48 the UB Gateway project, and 49 reimbursing the University at 50 Buffalo Foundation for property 51 acquisition for the Educational 792 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Opportunity Center and the UB 2 Gateway project, provided, however 3 that to the extent any portion of 4 such appropriation is utilized for 5 construction purposes, all contracts 6 for the construction of such facilities 7 shall require compliance with 8 the provisions of section two 9 hundred twenty of the labor law and 10 shall be subject to article XV-a of 11 the executive law .................. 6,000 12 Canton 13 Center for Athletics/Recreational 14 Complex Phase II .................. 21,200 15 Cobleskill 16 Construct Environmental Science 17 & Technology Center ................ 3,700 18 Construct Agriculture & Technology 19 Center ............................ 38,200 20 Cornell 21 Stocking Hall Renovation and 22 Replacement ....................... 64,000 23 Construct Surge Space for Stocking 24 Hall .............................. 16,000 25 Replacement of the Dairy Barn ...... 7,000 26 Cortland 27 Construct Student Life Center ..... 51,200 28 Delhi 29 Campus Utility Master Plan ......... 1,000 30 Farnsworth Hall .................... 6,000 31 Empire State 32 Construct Regional Center-Suffolk 33 CC Amermann Campus Facility ....... 12,900 34 Environmental Science and Forestry 35 Construct Gateway Building ........ 22,000 36 Renovation and addition for Marshall 37 Hall and Illick hall ............... 6,000 38 Adirondack Ecological Center ....... 2,500 39 Student Recreation Center at 40 Ranger School ........................ 250 41 Farmingdale 42 Construct School of Business ...... 28,900 43 New Daycare Center ................. 7,500 44 Covered Practice Field ............... 175 45 Physical Infrastructure .............. 750 46 Applied Mathematics Center ......... 1,000 47 Information Commons/Green 48 Library ............................ 1,000 49 Fredonia 50 Construct/Renovate Science 51 Technology Building ............... 38,000 793 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Addition/Renovate Rockefeller 2 Arts Center ....................... 40,000 3 Geneseo 4 College Stadium Rehab & 5 Renovation ........................ 16,300 6 Brody Hall ........................... 800 7 HVAC Improvements .................. 1,500 8 Track Improvements ................... 750 9 Maritime 10 Construct Academic Building ....... 30,000 11 Laboratory Accreditation Upgrades .. 4,500 12 Morrisville 13 Upgrade Athletic Fields ............ 5,000 14 Landscape/Campus Beautification .... 1,000 15 New Paltz 16 Library Renovation ................ 12,800 17 Construct Science Building ........ 48,026 18 Old Westbury 19 Renovation of Library/Academic 20 Space ............................. 13,000 21 Oneonta 22 Rehabilitate Fitzelle Hall ........ 36,000 23 Rehabilitate Physical Science 24 Building .......................... 30,000 25 Optometry 26 Renovate to Improve Clinical 27 Space .............................. 2,200 28 Campus Center for Student Life 29 & Learning ......................... 4,500 30 Oswego 31 General Science Lab ............... 69,500 32 Plattsburgh 33 Renovate/Expand School of 34 Business .......................... 20,400 35 Potsdam 36 Performing Arts Building .......... 55,000 37 Purchase 38 Renovate/Construct Center for 39 Integrated Technology Learning .... 20,900 40 Renovate for Theater Arts & 41 Film Programs ..................... 10,400 42 State Univ Plaza 43 Site Rehabilitation / Plaza 44 Renovation ......................... 5,000 45 Stony Brook, incl Health Science Center (HSC) 46 Construct Student Recreation 47 Center - Phase II ................. 18,000 48 Construct Computer Science 49 Building .......................... 40,800 50 To support development of academic 51 and student program space at Stony 794 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Brook Southampton campus ........... 5,000 2 Renovate/modernize classroom 3 buildings, laboratories and 4 new student learning spaces 5 at Stony Brook Southampton ......... 7,500 6 Construct Marine Science Bldg - 7 Southampton ........................ 6,900 8 Long Island State Veteran's 9 Home ............................... 5,000 10 Computational Biomedicine Visual- 11 ization and drug development magnet 12 facility at Stony Brook University . 2,000 13 Stony Brook Long Island Children's 14 Hospital / MART Center ............. 3,000 15 Planning of Stony Brook Law 16 School ............................... 250 17 Stadium Expansion .................. 2,700 18 Stony Brook Long Island Children's 19 Hospital / MART Center ............ 45,000 20 University/Basketball Arena ....... 12,300 21 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 22 Lab Addition/Surge Space - 23 Institute for Human Performance ... 72,000 24 Construct Academic Building ....... 36,000 25 Cord Blood Center Phase II ........ 10,000 26 Utica-Rome 27 Center for Advanced Technol- 28 ogy. Notwithstanding any 29 provision of law to the 30 contrary, the state 31 university construction 32 fund is hereby authorized 33 to enter into a service 34 agreement to transfer up 35 to $27,500,000 in state 36 university capital 37 construction funds to the 38 fort schuyler management 39 corporation, or other 40 appropriate corporation, 41 pursuant to appropriation 42 for the construction of a 43 center for advanced tech- 44 nology and other related 45 facilities for the state 46 university college of 47 technology at utica-rome ........ 27,500 48 Renovate for Tiered Class- 49 room. Notwithstanding any 50 provision of law to the 51 contrary, the state 795 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 university construction 2 fund is hereby authorized 3 to enter into a service 4 agreement to transfer up 5 to $400,000 in state 6 university capital 7 construction funds to the 8 fort schuyler management 9 corporation, or other 10 appropriate corporation, 11 pursuant to appropriation 12 for the construction of a 13 center for advanced tech- 14 nology and other related 15 facilities for the state 16 university college of 17 technology at utica-rome ........... 400 18 Student Center - Equipment ......... 1,250 19 Field House Equipment .............. 1,750 20 Statewide 21 New York Network ................... 2,000 22 Castle Renovation - Notwith- 23 standing any provision of 24 law to the contrary, all 25 or a portion of the funds 26 appropriated hereby may be 27 suballocated or trans- 28 ferred to any department, 29 agency, or public authori- 30 ty pursuant to a plan 31 developed by the urban 32 development corporation 33 and approved by the direc- 34 tor of the division of the 35 budget to support capital 36 costs associated with the 37 implementation of the plan ...... 12,450 38 Albany Emerging Technology 39 and Entrepreneurial Complex, 40 or other project identified 41 and approved by the governor 42 and the chancellor of the 43 state university of New York, 44 pursuant to the NY-SUNY 2020 45 challenge grant program ........... 42,000 46 -------------- 47 Schedule Subtotal ............ 1,675,613 48 ============== 49 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 54, 50 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 796 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Advance for alterations and improvements to various facilities includ- 2 ing services and expenses, service contracts, memorandum of under- 3 standing, capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, 4 rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of 5 facilities, new facilities, program improvement or program change, 6 technology, environmental, protection, energy conservation, accredi- 7 tation, facilities for the physically disabled and related projects 8 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2007 subject to a plan 9 developed by the state university and approved by the director of 10 the budget. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation 11 to the contrary, amounts designated as university-wide, may be made 12 available for projects identified and approved by the governor and 13 the chancellor of the state university of New York pursuant to the 14 NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program (28F10708) (45922) ............ 15 379,700,000 ...................................... (re. $12,878,000) 16 Project Schedule 17 PROJECT AMOUNT 18 ---------------------------------------------------------- 19 (thousands of dollars) 20 Albany 21 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 22 such as Classroom Renovations & Upgrades, 23 Phase I .......................................... 5,988 24 Alfred Ceramics 25 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 26 such as Harder Hall Window Replacement ............. 515 27 Alfred State 28 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 29 such as Administration Building Repairs .......... 1,391 30 Binghamton 31 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 32 such as East Gym Repairs ......................... 5,766 33 Brockport 34 Special Events Recreation Center Construc- 35 tion ............................................ 24,000 36 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 37 such as Smith Hall Renovations ................... 3,572 38 Brooklyn Health Science Center (HSC) 39 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 40 such as Basic Science Building Heating & 41 Air Conditioning Renovations ..................... 1,968 42 Buffalo College 43 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 44 such as Replace Underground Water-Lines .......... 4,384 45 Buffalo University 46 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 47 such as Alumni Hall Replace Pool Condens- 48 ing Units ....................................... 11,004 49 Canton 50 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 797 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 such as Payson Hall Repairs ........................ 938 2 Cobleskill 3 Warm Water Aquaculture Center Construction 4 & Facility Conversion ............................ 3,500 5 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 6 such as Electric Distribution System Reno- 7 vation ........................................... 1,264 8 Cornell 9 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 10 such as Heating & Air Conditioning 11 Upgrades & Energy Conservation ................... 6,038 12 Cortland 13 Studio West Expansion & Renovation .............. 15,000 14 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 15 such as Campus Roads & Sidewalk Repairs, 16 Phase I .......................................... 3,043 17 Delhi 18 Farnsworth Hall .................................. 6,700 19 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 20 such as Classroom and Laboratory Upgrades ........ 1,085 21 Empire State 22 Construct Regional Center ....................... 15,660 23 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 24 such as Union Ave Renovations ...................... 167 25 Environmental Science and Forestry 26 Renovation and addition for Marshall Hall 27 and Illick Hall ................................. 23,000 28 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 29 such as Replace Underground Communications 30 Cabling .......................................... 1,523 31 Farmingdale 32 Student Center Renovation Phase II .............. 18,400 33 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 34 such as Roof Replacements ........................ 2,724 35 Fredonia 36 Child Care Center Construction ................... 4,600 37 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 38 such as Code Compliance Upgrades ................. 2,485 39 Geneseo 40 Doty Building Renovations ....................... 12,000 41 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 42 such as Bailey Hall Renovations .................. 2,545 43 Maritime 44 Health, Safety & Facility Upgrades .............. 18,850 45 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 46 such as Reisenberg Gym Heating & Air 47 Conditioning Repairs ............................. 1,072 48 Morrisville 49 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 50 such as Charlton & Hamilton Halls Roof 798 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Repairs .......................................... 1,497 2 New Paltz 3 Old Main Renovation ............................. 10,740 4 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 5 such as Roof Replacements ........................ 2,988 6 Old Westbury 7 Academic Village Construction ................... 51,275 8 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 9 such as Heating & Air Conditioning Instal- 10 lation ........................................... 1,479 11 Oneonta 12 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 13 such as Fire Alarm Upgrades ...................... 2,545 14 Optometry 15 Safety & Facility Upgrades, Phase I .............. 9,000 16 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 17 such as Emergency Power Generator Instal- 18 lation ............................................. 577 19 Oswego 20 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 21 such as Wilber Hall Renovation ................... 3,817 22 Plattsburgh 23 Combined Science Facilities Renovations & 24 Additions ....................................... 23,000 25 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 26 such as Field House Mechanical System 27 Repairs .......................................... 2,459 28 Potsdam 29 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 30 such as Maxcy, Stillman & Raymond Halls 31 Renovations ...................................... 2,474 32 Purchase 33 Visual Arts Facility - Heating & Air 34 Conditioning Renovations ......................... 8,500 35 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 36 such as Heating & Air Conditioning 37 Repairs, Phase II ................................ 2,807 38 State University Plaza 39 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 40 such as Electrical Switchgear Repairs & 41 Replacement ........................................ 917 42 Stony Brook, including Health Science Center 43 (HSC) 44 Southampton Campus Renovations .................. 20,800 45 LI Veterans Home (Matching Grant Funds) .......... 1,000 46 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 47 such as Campus Walkway & Lighting Upgrades ...... 13,267 48 Syracuse Health Science Center (HSC) 49 Weiskotten Hall Renovations ..................... 13,675 50 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 51 such as Restrooms Renovations for ADA 799 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Compliance ....................................... 2,165 2 Utica-Rome 3 Campus-wide critical maintenance projects 4 such as Campus Electrical System Upgrade ........... 536 5 University-wide Alterations and Improvements 6 For university-wide critical maintenance or 7 capital improvement costs, including costs 8 attributable to executive order 111; ADA 9 and code compliance; claims; environmental 10 hazards; emergencies, health and safety, 11 and energy conservation needs; asbestos 12 and PCB remediation; fire alarms and 13 sprinklers; electrical distribution and 14 heating and cooling system requirements; 15 and other similar university-wide need ........... 5,000 16 -------------- 17 Total ............................................ 379,700 18 ============== 19 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 54, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2014: 21 Advance for alterations and improvements to various facilities includ- 22 ing services and expenses, service contracts, memorandum of under- 23 standing, capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, 24 rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of 25 facilities, new facilities, program improvement or program change, 26 technology, environmental, protection, energy conservation, accredi- 27 tation, facilities for the physically disabled and related projects 28 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2006 subject to a plan 29 developed by the state university and approved by the director of 30 the budget (28F10608) (45922) ... 49,723,000 ........ (re. $981,000) 31 Project Schedule 32 PROJECT AMOUNT 33 ---------------------------------------------------------- 34 (thousands of dollars) 35 Old Westbury 36 Academic village new construction ............... 22,300 37 Empire State 38 Center for Distance Learning construction ........ 6,000 39 Critical maintenance and high priority 40 projects 41 Universitywide .................................... 16,423 42 For services and expenses related to the 43 acquisition, renovation, reconstruction, 44 design, construction or equipping the Neil 45 D. Levin graduate institute of interna- 46 tional relations and commerce .................... 5,000 47 -------------- 48 Total ........................................... 49,723 49 ============== 800 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 3 An additional advance for alterations and improvements to various 4 facilities including services and expenses, service contracts, memo- 5 randum of understanding, capital design, construction, acquisition, 6 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 7 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 8 program change, technology, environmental protection, energy conser- 9 vation, accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled and 10 related projects including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2006 11 subject to an annual plan developed by the state university of New 12 York which shall include projects in the following schedule 13 (28F20608) (45923) ... 436,503,000 ................ (re. $3,784,000) 14 Project Schedule 15 PROJECT AMOUNT 16 ---------------------------------------------------------- 17 (thousands of dollars) 18 Albany 19 Campus Revitalization Project ................... 25,000 20 Alfred State College 21 Grazing/Organic Management at Centennial 22 Farm ............................................. 4,900 23 Binghamton 24 Engineering Science Research and Develop- 25 ment ............................................ 60,000 26 Brockport 27 New Student Recreation Center/Multipurpose 28 Fieldhouse ...................................... 15,000 29 Brooklyn HSC 30 Basic Science Building Renovation ............... 20,000 31 Brooklyn Army Terminal. Notwithstanding any 32 inconsistent provision of law to the 33 contrary, the state university 34 construction fund is hereby authorized to 35 enter into a service agreement to transfer 36 up to $36,000,000 in state university 37 capital construction funds to Bio-Bat, 38 Inc., to be administered by The Research 39 Foundation of State University of New 40 York, for the construction, recon- 41 struction, rehabilitation and redevelop- 42 ment of the Brooklyn Army Terminal for use 43 as a biotechnology commercial and research 44 center. Bio-Bat, Inc., or other appropri- 45 ate corporation, is authorized to 46 construct, reconstruct, rehabilitate and 47 redevelop such facility using funds trans- 48 ferred from the state university 49 construction fund to Bio-Bat, Inc., 50 including costs, not to exceed $1,000,000, 801 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 for costs incurred before July 1, 2006 .......... 36,000 2 Buffalo State 3 Athletic Stadium ................................. 2,577 4 Buffalo University 5 School of Engineering ........................... 24,600 6 Canton 7 Convocation, Athletic & Recreation Center ....... 18,000 8 Ceramic 9 Kazuo Inamori School of Engineering .............. 5,000 10 Cobleskill 11 Old Quad/Wheeler Hall ........................... 11,300 12 Frisbee Hall Renovation .......................... 6,500 13 Cornell 14 ILR faculty Building Cost Escalation ............. 2,000 15 Agriculture Food Technology Park 16 Construction. Notwithstanding any incon- 17 sistent provision of law to the contrary, 18 the state university construction fund is 19 hereby authorized to enter into a service 20 agreement to transfer $1,000,000 in state 21 university capital construction funds to 22 the Cornell Agriculture and Food Technolo- 23 gy Park (CAFTP) for the partial costs of 24 constructing the flexible technology 25 research facility and related site 26 improvements on the parcel of land trans- 27 ferred by the state to Cornell University 28 and leased to the CAFTP for this purpose 29 pursuant to chapter 463 of the laws of 30 2001 ............................................. 1,000 31 Martha Van Rensselaer Hall Building 32 Replacement Project .............................. 5,000 33 Cortland 34 Bowers Hall/Upgrade Science/Tech ................ 20,000 35 Delhi 36 Farnsworth Hall ................................. 10,000 37 Farmingdale 38 Dental Hygiene Care Center ....................... 1,700 39 Construction of Student Center .................. 20,000 40 Forestry 41 Renovation and addition for Marshall Hall 42 and Illick Hall ................................. 15,000 43 Fredonia 44 Dunkirk Incubator ................................ 1,700 45 Morrisville 46 Dairy Facility Reconfiguration ................... 8,500 47 New Paltz 48 Old Main Building ............................... 10,000 49 Oneonta 50 Renovation of Cooperstown Facility ............... 6,000 51 Optometry 802 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Health and Safety Upgrades ....................... 4,000 2 Oswego 3 Renovations/Additions to Science Facili- 4 ties, Phase I ................................... 25,000 5 Plattsburgh 6 Electrical Projects .............................. 6,226 7 Purchase 8 Campuswide renovations including HVAC ............ 8,100 9 Purchase College Heritage Site ................... 6,000 10 Stony Brook 11 Southampton Campus - Renovations ................ 10,000 12 Stadium .......................................... 3,000 13 Gyrodene - Upgrade and renovations ............... 6,000 14 Basketball Arena ................................. 8,000 15 The Living Skin and Cellular Therapy 16 Production Facility ................................ 400 17 Utica-Rome 18 Field House ..................................... 20,000 19 University-wide 20 For services and expenses of a not-for- 21 profit corporation to be created for the 22 development of the East Campus of the 23 State university of New York at Albany for 24 use as biotechnology research and technol- 25 ogy center. Notwithstanding any provisions 26 of law to the contrary, the state univer- 27 sity construction fund is hereby author- 28 ized to enter into a service agreement to 29 transfer up to $10,000,000 in state 30 university capital construction funds to a 31 not-for-profit corporation to be created 32 for the development of biotechnology 33 research and technology center on the East 34 Campus of the State university of New York 35 at Albany ....................................... 10,000 36 -------------- 37 Total .......................................... 436,503 38 ============== 39 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 54, 40 section 1, of the laws of 2014: 41 Advance for alterations and improvements to various facilities includ- 42 ing services and expenses, service contracts, memorandum of under- 43 standing, capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, 44 rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of 45 facilities, new facilities, program improvement or program change, 46 technology, environmental, protection, energy conservation, accredi- 47 tation, facilities for the physically disabled and related projects 48 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2005 subject to a plan 49 developed by the state university and approved by the director of 50 the budget. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation 803 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 to the contrary, amounts designated as university-wide, may be made 2 available for projects identified and approved by the governor and 3 the chancellor of the state university of New York pursuant to the 4 NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program (28F10508) (45922) ............ 5 234,400,000 ......................................... (re. $174,000) 6 Project Schedule 7 PROJECT AMOUNT 8 -------------------------------------------- 9 (thousands of dollars) 10 Albany 11 -CESTM power substation 12 construction. Nothwith- 13 standing any provision of 14 law to the contrary, the 15 state university 16 construction fund is here- 17 by authorized to enter 18 into a service agreement 19 to transfer up to 20 $5,000,000 in state 21 university capital 22 construction funds to the 23 Fuller road management 24 corporation, pursuant to 25 appropriation, for the 26 construction of a power 27 substation for the center 28 for environmental sciences 29 and logy management build- 30 ing and other related 31 facilities on the univer- 32 sity at Albany campus. 33 Fuller road management 34 corporation is authorized 35 to construct such facility 36 using funds transferred 37 from the state university 38 construction fund to Full- 39 er road management corpo- 40 ration, and other funds 41 available to Fuller road 42 management corporation, 43 pursuant to the terms of 44 an executed lease agree- 45 ment with the state 46 university of New York 47 trustees as authorized by 48 chapter 643 of the laws of 49 1997 ............................. 5,000 50 -ASML High Tech Center 804 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 construction. Notwith- 2 standing any provision of 3 law to the contrary, the 4 state university 5 construction fund is here- 6 by authorized to enter 7 into a service agreement 8 to transfer up to 9 $75,000,000 in state 10 university capital 11 construction funds to the 12 Fuller road management 13 corporation, or other 14 appropriate corporation, 15 pursuant to appropriation, 16 for the construction of a 17 high tech center for ASML 18 and other related facili- 19 ties on the university at 20 Albany campus. Fuller road 21 management corporation, or 22 other appropriate corpo- 23 ration, is authorized to 24 construct such facility 25 using funds transferred 26 from the state university 27 construction fund to the 28 Fuller road management 29 corporation, or other 30 appropriate corporation, 31 and other funds available 32 to Fuller road management 33 corporation, or other 34 appropriate corporation, 35 pursuant to the terms of 36 an executed lease agree- 37 ment with the state 38 university of New York 39 trustees as authorized by 40 chapter 643 of the laws of 41 1997 ............................ 75,000 42 Buffalo University 43 -Pharmacy School construction ..... 27,000 44 Cornell 45 -Martha Van Rensselaer 46 construction ..................... 9,000 47 Empire State College 48 -Construction ..................... 20,000 49 Fredonia 50 -Heating system replacement ....... 14,000 51 Stony Brook 805 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 -Long Island Veterans' Home 2 improvements ...................... 400 3 Universitywide 4 -Campuswide priority proj- 5 ects including the Monroe 6 Community College-New Down- 7 town Campus and the Orange 8 County Community College- 9 Newburgh Campus according to 10 the following schedule ............ 83,000 11 sub-schedule 12 Universitywide 13 -Campuswide projects ........... 50,000 14 -Monroe Community 15 College New Downtown 16 Campus (State Share)........... 18,000 17 -Orange County Com- 18 munity College New- 19 burgh Campus (State 20 (Share) ....................... 15,000 21 ---------- 22 Total ...................... 234,400 23 ========== 24 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 54, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 26 An additional advance for alterations and improvements to various 27 facilities including services and expenses, service contracts, memo- 28 randum of understanding, capital design, construction, acquisition, 29 reconstruction, rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, 30 preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or 31 program change, technology, environmental protection, energy conser- 32 vation, accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled and 33 related projects including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2005 34 subject to an annual plan developed by the state university of New 35 York which shall include projects in the following schedule 36 (28F20508) (45923) ... 415,775,000 ............... (re. $12,819,000) 37 Project Schedule 38 Project Amount 39 -------------------------------------------- 40 (thousands of dollars) 41 Albany 42 Nanotechnology Research Facility 43 and Equipment for the Interna- 44 tional Venture for Nanotech- 45 nology (INVENT). Notwithstand- 46 ing any provision of law to 47 the contrary, the state 48 university construction fund 49 is hereby authorized to enter 806 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 into a service agreement to 2 transfer up to $75,000,000 in 3 state university capital 4 construction funds to the 5 Fuller road management corpo- 6 ration, pursuant to appropri- 7 ation, for the construction of 8 a nanotechnology research 9 facility and equipment for the 10 international venture for 11 nanotechnology on the univer- 12 sity at Albany campus. Fuller 13 road management corporation is 14 authorized to construct such 15 facility using funds trans- 16 ferred from the state univer- 17 sity construction fund to 18 Fuller road management corpo- 19 ration, and other funds avail- 20 able to Fuller road management 21 corporation, pursuant to the 22 terms of an executed lease 23 agreement with the state 24 university of New York trus- 25 tees as authorized by chapter 26 643 of the laws of 1997 ......... 75,000 27 East Campus Cancer Research 28 Bldg/Equipment School of 29 Public Health Expansion. 30 Notwithstanding any inconsist- 31 ent provision of law to the 32 contrary, the state university 33 construction fund is hereby 34 authorized to enter into a 35 service agreement to transfer 36 up to $25,000,000 in state 37 university capital 38 construction funds to the 39 university of Albany founda- 40 tion or its designee for 41 construction of a cancer 42 research center at the east 43 campus and equipment and 44 infrastructure for the school 45 of public health expansion, 46 pursuant to appropriation 47 therefor ........................ 25,000 48 Life Sciences Bldg Equipment ...... 14,000 49 New Entry/Admissions Bldg 50 Equipment ........................ 3,500 51 New Entry/Admissions Bldg 807 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Site/Plaza Improvements .......... 5,000 2 Life Sciences Bldg 3 Complete Shelled Wing ............ 2,000 4 Brubacher Hall ..................... 1,000 5 Alfred Ceramics 6 Expansion of the School of Arts 7 & Design ........................ 10,000 8 Binghamton 9 Nanotech Center .................... 6,000 10 Athletic Fields .................... 5,000 11 Downtown Campus .................... 4,000 12 Brooklyn HSC 13 Notwithstanding any inconsistent 14 provision of law to the con- 15 trary, the state university 16 construction fund is hereby 17 authorized to enter into a 18 service agreement to transfer 19 up to $3,000,000 in state 20 university capital construction 21 funds to the Research 22 Foundation of State University of 23 New York, for the construction 24 of phase III incubator for SUNY 25 Downstate's Biotechnology 26 Incubator Project ................ 3,000 27 Canton 28 Nevaldine Hall Improvements ........ 6,000 29 Cornell 30 ILR Faculty Wing Restoration ....... 3,000 31 Cortland 32 Child Care Center ................. 10,000 33 Empire State 34 Additional Construction ............ 5,000 35 Farmingdale 36 Library Renovations, Roof and 37 Renovations ...................... 1,500 38 Athletic Complex Renovation ........ 500 39 Student & Financial Information 40 Sys. Soft/Hardware ............... 1,000 41 Forestry 42 Bio Fuel Initiative .................. 500 43 Distance Learning .................. 3,150 44 Public Display ..................... 3,150 45 Fredonia 46 High Tech Incubator ................ 3,000 47 Geneseo 48 Integrated Science Building 49 Project ......................... 14,500 50 Maritime 51 Campus-wide Projects ................. 700 808 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Pier Replacement and expansion .... 10,000 2 Morrisville 3 Automotive Performance Center 4 Rehabilitation ................... 2,500 5 New Paltz 6 Student Union Building 7 Renovation and Improvements ..... 10,000 8 Oneonta 9 Fine Arts Building ................. 8,000 10 Oswego 11 Renovation of Television and 12 radio facilities ................... 875 13 Plattsburgh 14 Electrical Systems Upgrade ......... 3,000 15 Emergency Power System ............. 3,000 16 Potsdam 17 Cogeneration Facility .............. 8,000 18 Purchase 19 Central Plaza Renovations and 20 Improvements .................... 15,000 21 Stony Brook 22 Student Recreation Center ......... 19,500 23 Athletic Department ................ 1,500 24 Expansion and outdoor athletics 25 stadium and new engineering 26 building ........................ 22,200 27 Stony Brook Long Island Children's 28 Hospital / MART Center ........... 5,000 29 Southampton Acquisition ........... 35,000 30 Utica-Rome 31 Auxiliary Services Building ....... 13,600 32 University at Buffalo 33 School of Engineering - Phase 1 ... 25,000 34 University-wide 35 For services and expenses 36 for the development of a 37 high-tech portal to be 38 developed pursuant to a 39 memorandum of understand- 40 ing to be executed by the 41 Commission on Independent 42 Colleges and Universities 43 (CICU) and the state 44 university of New York 45 (SUNY) ........................... 2,500 46 New York Network ................... 1,600 47 Educational Opportunity 48 Centers Construction, acqui- 49 sition, renovation or reha- 50 bilitation of a facility 51 including equipment and 809 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 other necessary and inci- 2 dental costs related to a 3 new Educational Opportunity 4 Center to be located in the 5 City of Rochester ................. 12,000 6 Construction, acquisition, 7 renovation or rehabilitation 8 of a facility including 9 equipment and other neces- 10 sary and incidental costs 11 related to a new Educational 12 Opportunity Center to be 13 located in the City of 14 Buffalo ........................... 12,000 15 ----------- 16 Total ............................ 415,775 17 =========== 18 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 62, 19 section 3, of the laws of 2005: 20 An advance to SUNY hospitals for alterations, improvements, service 21 and expenses, and new facilities including costs incurred prior to 22 April 1, 2005 (28FH0508) (45921) ................................... 23 69,000,000 ....................................... (re. $19,051,000) 24 Project Schedule 25 AMOUNT 26 -------------------------------------------- 27 (thousands of dollars) 28 Brooklyn 29 Emergency Department Expansion 30 including Bio-terrorism 31 Readiness construction and 32 renovation ......................... 5,000 33 Emergency system Expansion and 34 Information Technology 35 Infrastructure ..................... 3,000 36 Cardiovascular Service 37 restoration and expansion .......... 4,000 38 Intensive Care Unit Expansion ........ 2,000 39 Ambulatory Services Expansion and 40 rehabilitation ..................... 3,000 41 Parking Services Expansion and 42 Rehabilitation ..................... 2,000 43 Clinical Laboratory Relocation ....... 3,000 44 Additional Hospital-wide 45 priorities ......................... 1,000 46 Syracuse 47 Additional costs related to 48 medical/surgical expansion ........ 10,000 49 East Wing Ambulatory Cancer 810 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Center ............................ 10,000 2 Additional Hospital-wide 3 priorities ......................... 3,000 4 Stonybrook HSC 5 Cancer Center ..................... 23,000 6 ---------- 7 69,000 8 ========== 9 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 54, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2012: 11 Advance for alterations and improvements to various facilities includ- 12 ing services and expenses, service contracts, memorandum of under- 13 standing, capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, 14 rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of 15 facilities, new facilities, program improvement or program change, 16 technology, environmental, protection, energy conservation, accredi- 17 tation, facilities for the physically disabled and related projects 18 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2004 subject to a plan 19 developed by the state university and approved by the director of 20 the budget. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation 21 to the contrary, amounts designated as university-wide, may be made 22 available for projects identified and approved by the governor and 23 the chancellor of the state university of New York pursuant to the 24 NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program (28F80408) (45922) ............ 25 1,612,000,000 ..................................... (re. $2,876,000) 26 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 53, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2010: 28 Alterations and improvements for projects university-wide, including 29 services and expenses and minor rehabilitation and improvement, 30 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2004 (28R80408) (45924) 31 ... 25,002,000 ....................................... (re. $86,000) 32 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 33 Advance to SUNY hospitals for alterations, improvements, services and 34 expenses, and new facilities including costs incurred prior to April 35 1, 2003 subject to a plan developed by the state university and 36 approved by the director of the budget (28FH0308) (45921) .......... 37 350,000,000 ....................................... (re. $2,557,000) 38 Schedule 39 PROJECT AMOUNT 40 ---------------------------------------------------------- 41 (thousands of dollars) 42 Brooklyn .......................................... 74,700 43 For university-wide projects which may 44 include but are not limited to: 45 -Cancer Center 46 -Children's Center 47 -General and Ambulatory Surgery 811 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 -Transplant and Renal Services 2 -Geriatrics Center 3 Syracuse ......................................... 126,700 4 For university-wide projects which may 5 include but are not limited to: 6 -Medical/Surgical Expansion 7 -Cancer Center 8 -Pediatric Center 9 -Northwing Renovation 10 -Operating Room Expansion 11 Stony Brook ...................................... 123,600 12 For university-wide projects which may 13 include but are not limited to: 14 -Cardiovascular Expansion 15 -Cancer Center 16 -Neo-natal Intensive Care Unit and Obstet- 17 rics 18 -Expansion Ambulatory Surgery Expansion 19 -Medical/Surgical Expansion 20 University-wide Hospital Projects ................. 25,000 21 -Subject to a plan developed by the state 22 university and approved by the director 23 of the budget 24 -------------- 25 Total .......................................... 350,000 26 ============== 27 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as amended by chapter 55, 28 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 29 For additional General Maintenance and improvements (28R89808) (45923) 30 ... 100,250,000 ................................... (re. $1,195,000) 31 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 32 Federal Capital Projects Fund 33 SUNY Federal Capital Projects Account - 31382 34 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 36 For federally directed construction and equipment spending (28FE2508) 37 (45943) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,000,000) 38 GREEN ENERGY LOAN FUND (CCP) 39 Capital Projects Funds - Other 40 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 41 State University of New York Green Energy Loan Fund 42 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 44 For services and expenses of the state university of New York to fund 45 loans for the alterations and improvements to various facilities for 812 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 energy efficiency and climate change mitigation projects funded 2 through the state university of New York green energy loan fund 3 including, but not limited, to capital design, construction, recon- 4 struction, rehabilitation, and equipment purchases. Up to five 5 percent of the total appropriation amount may be made available for 6 the services and expenses of the state university of New York 7 directly related to the administration of these loans, including 8 personal service, nonpersonal service, and fringe benefits costs. 9 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of 10 the amounts hereby appropriated may be transferred or suballocated 11 to the state university of New York for such purpose 12 (28GL2508)(45945) ... 25,000,000 ................. (re. $25,000,000) 13 STATE UNIVERSITY CAPITAL PROJECTS FUND (CCP) 14 Capital Projects Funds - Other 15 State University Capital Projects Fund 16 State University Capital Projects Account - 32400 17 Administration Purpose 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 19 Alterations and improvements for projects university-wide including, 20 services and expenses, new facilities, and projects approved pursu- 21 ant to the NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program, which may include 22 revenue transfers from various external revenue sources and the 23 payment of liabilities prior to April 1, 2014 (28C11450) (45925) ... 24 150,000,000 ...................................... (re. $34,587,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 26 Alterations and improvements for projects university-wide including, 27 services and expenses, new facilities, and projects approved pursu- 28 ant to the NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program, which may include 29 revenue transfers from various external revenue sources and the 30 payment of liabilities prior to April 1, 2013 (28C11350) (45925) ... 31 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $13,232,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 33 Alterations and improvements for projects university-wide including, 34 services and expenses, new facilities, and projects approved pursu- 35 ant to the NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program. May include revenue 36 transfers from various external revenue sources and the payment of 37 liabilities prior to April 1, 2012 (28C11250) (45925) .............. 38 184,000,000 ...................................... (re. $23,049,000) 39 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 40 Alterations and improvements for projects university-wide including 41 services and expenses and new facilities. May include revenue trans- 42 fer from various external revenue sources and the payment of liabil- 43 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2008 (28C10850) (45925) ........... 44 500,000,000 ...................................... (re. $91,512,000) 813 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as added by chapter 55, 2 section 4, of the laws of 2004: 3 Alterations and improvements for projects university-wide including 4 services and expenses and new facilities. May include revenue trans- 5 fer from various external revenue sources and the payment of liabil- 6 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2004 (28080450) (45925) ........... 7 150,000,000 ...................................... (re. $17,368,000) 8 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 9 Alterations and improvements for projects university-wide including 10 new facilities. May include revenue transfer from various external 11 revenue sources and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 12 April 1, 2002 (28C10250) (45925) ... 20,000,000 ... (re. $9,896,000) 13 Capital Projects Funds - Other 14 State University Capital Projects Fund 15 State University Capital Projects Account - 32400 16 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 18 Alterations and improvements for projects university-wide including, 19 services and expenses, and new facilities, which may include revenue 20 transfers from various external revenue sources and the payment of 21 liabilities prior to April 1, 2024 (28C12403) (45925) .............. 22 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $99,053,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 24 Alterations and improvements for projects university-wide including, 25 services and expenses, new facilities, and projects approved pursu- 26 ant to the NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program, which may include 27 revenue transfers from various external revenue sources and the 28 payment of liabilities prior to April 1, 2020 (28C12003) (45925) ... 29 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $44,244,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 31 Alterations and improvements for projects university-wide including, 32 services and expenses, new facilities, and projects approved pursu- 33 ant to the NY-SUNY 2020 challenge grant program, which may include 34 revenue transfers from various external revenue sources and the 35 payment of liabilities prior to April 1, 2018 (28C11803) (45925) ... 36 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $40,721,000) 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 State University Capital Projects Fund 39 State University Capital Projects Account - 32400 40 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 54, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 43 For services and expenses of capital improvements, available to state 44 university of New York state-operated and statutory colleges as 814 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 defined in section 352 of the education law subject to a plan 2 approved by the director of the budget. Funding from this appropri- 3 ation shall be available for, but not limited to, service contracts, 4 memoranda of understanding, capital design, construction, acquisi- 5 tion, reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipment and personal service 6 costs including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (28MB2008) 7 (45938) ... 100,000,000 .......................... (re. $94,079,000) 8 STATE UNIVERSITY RESIDENCE HALL REHABILITATION FUND (CCP) 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 SUNY Residence Halls Rehabilitation and Repair Fund 11 SUNY Residence Halls Rehabilitation and Repair Account - 30100 12 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 14 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 15 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 16 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 17 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 18 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 19 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 20 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 21 priated may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authori- 22 ty and/or the state university of New York for such purpose 23 (28D32503) (45926) ... 100,000,000 ............... (re. $99,631,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 25 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 26 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 27 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 28 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 29 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 30 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 31 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 32 priated may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authori- 33 ty and/or the state university of New York for such purpose 34 (28D32403) (45926) ... 75,000,000 ................ (re. $40,313,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 36 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 37 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 38 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 39 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 40 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 41 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 42 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 43 priated may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authori- 44 ty and/or the state university of New York for such purpose 45 (28D32303) (45926) ... 75,000,000 ................ (re. $21,205,000) 815 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 2 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 3 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 4 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 5 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 6 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 7 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 8 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 9 priated may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authori- 10 ty and/or the state university of New York for such purpose 11 (28D32203) (45926) ... 75,000,000 ................ (re. $16,109,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 13 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 14 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 15 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 16 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 17 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 18 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 19 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 20 priated may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authori- 21 ty and/or the state university of New York for such purpose 22 (28D32103) (45926) ... 75,000,000 ................. (re. $8,960,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 24 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 25 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 26 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 27 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 28 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 29 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 30 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 31 priated may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authori- 32 ty and/or the state university of New York for such purpose 33 (28D32003) (45926) ... 75,000,000 ................ (re. $10,601,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 35 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 36 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 37 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 38 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 39 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 40 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 41 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 42 priated may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authori- 43 ty and/or the state university of New York for such purpose 44 (28D31903) (45926) ... 50,000,000 ................. (re. $1,357,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 46 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 47 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 816 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 2 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 3 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 4 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 5 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 6 priated may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authori- 7 ty and/or the state university of New York for such purpose 8 (28D31803) (45926) ... 50,000,000 ................. (re. $4,105,000) 9 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 10 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 11 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 12 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 13 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 14 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 15 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 16 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 17 priated may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authori- 18 ty and/or the state university of New York for such purpose 19 (28D31603) (45926) ... 50,000,000 ................. (re. $1,270,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 21 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 22 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 23 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 24 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 25 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 26 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 27 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 28 priated may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authori- 29 ty and/or the state university of New York for such purpose 30 (28D31503) (45926) ... 50,000,000 ................. (re. $1,965,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 32 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 33 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 34 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 35 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 36 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 37 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 38 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 39 priated may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authori- 40 ty and/or the state university of New York for such purpose 41 (28D31403) (45926) ... 50,000,000 ................. (re. $1,632,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 43 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 44 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 45 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 46 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 47 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 817 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 2 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 3 priated may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authori- 4 ty and/or the state university of New York for such purpose 5 (28D31303) (45926) ... 50,000,000 ................... (re. $699,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 7 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 8 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 9 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 10 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 11 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 12 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 13 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 14 priated may be transferred or suballocated to the dormitory authori- 15 ty and/or the state university of New York for such purpose 16 (28D31203) (45926) ... 45,000,000 ................. (re. $3,143,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 18 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 19 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 20 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 21 state university dormitory income fund or other external revenue 22 sources subject to a plan developed by the state university and 23 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 24 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 25 priated may be transferred to the dormitory authority and/or the 26 state university of New York for such purpose (28D31103) (45926) ... 27 90,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,445,000) 28 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 29 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 30 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 31 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 32 state university dormitory income fund - 330 or other external 33 revenue sources subject to a plan developed by the state university 34 and approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any 35 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 36 appropriated may be transferred to the dormitory authority and/or 37 the State University of New York for such purposes (28D30803) 38 (45926) ... 123,000,000 ............................. (re. $842,000) 39 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 40 Alterations and improvements for residence hall rehabilitation 41 projects and for residence hall renovations including services and 42 expenses, to be financed by a transfer from the debt service fund 43 state university dormitory income fund - 330 or other external 44 revenue sources subject to a plan developed by the state university 45 and approved by the director of the budget. 46 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 47 amounts hereby appropriated may be transferred to the dormitory 818 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK (APPROPRIATED TO THE STATE UNIVERSITY CONSTRUCTION FUND) CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 authority for such purposes (28D30303) (45926) ..................... 2 100,000,000 .......................................... (re. $94,000) 819 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 GENERAL MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Administration Purpose 5 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as amended by chapter 55, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 7 For additional state financial assistance to community colleges for 8 alterations and improvements to various facilities including capital 9 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation 10 and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, 11 new facilities, program improvement or program change, environmental 12 protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the 13 physically disabled, and related projects. Notwithstanding any other 14 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 15 priated may be suballocated or transferred to the state university 16 construction fund for such purposes (28PR98C1) (45908) ............. 17 25,000,000 .......................................... (re. $201,000) 18 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as amended by chapter 54, 19 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 20 For an additional advance for state financial assistance to community 21 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 22 including capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, 23 rehabilitation and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of 24 facilities, new facilities, program improvement or program change, 25 environmental protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facil- 26 ities for the physically disabled, and related projects including 27 plan preparation costs incurred prior to April 1, 1998. Notwith- 28 standing any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 29 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 30 the state university construction fund or the dormitory authority of 31 the state of New York for such purposes (28NF98C1) (81067) ......... 32 175,000,000 ....................................... (re. $1,000,000) 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 35 Health and Safety Purpose 36 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 37 section 1, of the laws of 2012: 38 State financial assistance to community colleges for alterations and 39 improvements to various facilities including service contracts, 40 memorandum of understanding, capital design, construction, acquisi- 41 tion, reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipment and personal service 42 costs; for health and safety, preservation of facilities, technology 43 upgrades, new facilities, program improvements or program changes, 44 environmental protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facil- 45 ities for the physically disabled, and related projects, including 820 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 costs incurred prior to April 1, 2008, subject to a plan submitted 2 by the state university and approved by the director of the budget. 3 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 4 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 5 the state university construction fund for such purposes (28R80801) 6 (45909) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $19,441,000) 7 Project Schedule 8 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 9 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 10 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 11 ------------------------------------------------------------- 12 (thousands of dollars) 13 Statewide 14 Subject to a plan developed 15 by the state university 16 and approved by the 17 director of the budget 18 Critical Maintenance, Safety 19 and Security ...................... 40,000 20,000 20 ------- ------- 21 Total ................................. 40,000 20,000 22 ======= ======= 23 Capital Projects Funds - Other 24 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 25 Program Improvement or Program Change Purpose 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 27 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 28 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 29 facilities, including service contracts, memoranda of understanding, 30 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 31 tation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, 32 preservation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, 33 program improvements or program changes, environmental protection, 34 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 35 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 36 April 1, 2025, subject to a plan submitted by the state university 37 and approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any 38 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 39 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the state univer- 40 sity construction fund or the dormitory authority of the state of 41 New York for such purposes (28CC2508) (45931) ...................... 42 130,466,000 ..................................... (re. $130,245,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 44 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 45 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 46 facilities, including service contracts, memoranda of understanding, 47 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 821 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 tation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, 2 preservation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, 3 program improvements or program changes, environmental protection, 4 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 5 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 6 April 1, 2024, subject to a plan submitted by the state university 7 and approved by the director of the budget. 8 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 9 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 10 the state university construction fund or the dormitory authority of 11 the state of New York for such purposes (28CC2408) (45931) ......... 12 138,213,000 ..................................... (re. $128,553,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 14 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 15 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 16 facilities, including service contracts, memoranda of understanding, 17 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 18 tation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, 19 preservation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, 20 program improvements or program changes, environmental protection, 21 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 22 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 23 April 1, 2023, subject to a plan submitted by the state university 24 and approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any 25 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 26 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the state univer- 27 sity construction fund or the dormitory authority of the state of 28 New York for such purposes (28CC2308) (45931) ...................... 29 106,020,000 ...................................... (re. $81,605,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 31 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 32 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 33 facilities, including service contracts, memoranda of understanding, 34 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 35 tation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, 36 preservation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, 37 program improvements or program changes, environmental protection, 38 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 39 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 40 April 1, 2022, subject to a plan submitted by the state university 41 and approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any 42 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 43 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the state univer- 44 sity construction fund or the dormitory authority of the state of 45 New York for such purposes (28CC2208) (45931) ...................... 46 56,883,000 ....................................... (re. $27,617,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 822 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 2 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 3 facilities including service contracts, memoranda of understanding, 4 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 5 tation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, 6 preservation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, 7 program improvements or program changes, environmental protection, 8 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 9 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 10 April 1, 2021, subject to a plan submitted by the state university 11 and approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any 12 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 13 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the state univer- 14 sity construction fund or the dormitory authority of the state of 15 New York for such purposes (28CC2108) (45931) ...................... 16 14,617,000 ........................................ (re. $9,780,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 18 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 19 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 20 facilities including service contracts, memoranda of understanding, 21 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 22 tation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, 23 preservation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, 24 program improvements or program changes, environmental protection, 25 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 26 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 27 April 1, 2020, subject to a plan submitted by the state university 28 and approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any 29 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 30 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the state univer- 31 sity construction fund or the dormitory authority of the state of 32 New York for such purposes (28CC2008) (45931) ...................... 33 46,038,000 ....................................... (re. $19,875,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 35 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 36 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 37 facilities including service contracts, memoranda of understanding, 38 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 39 tation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, 40 preservation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, 41 program improvements or program changes, environmental protection, 42 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 43 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 44 April 1, 2019, subject to a plan submitted by the state university 45 and approved by the director of the budget, and which may include, 46 but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwith- 47 standing any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 48 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 49 the state university construction fund or the dormitory authority of 823 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the state of New York for such purposes (28CC1908) (45931) ......... 2 37,060,000 ....................................... (re. $10,320,000) 3 Project Schedule 4 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 5 TOTAL SHARE 50 PERCENT 6 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 7 ---------------------------------------------------------- 8 (thousands of dollars) 9 Adirondack Community College 10 Campus critical maintenance 11 projects ..................... 1,366 683 12 Broome County Community College 13 CEA Center for Integrated 14 Research ..................... 250 125 15 Campus critical maintenance 16 projects ..................... 96 48 17 Cayuga County Community College 18 Cornell Cooperative Extension 19 Building Renovation .......... 4,800 2,400 20 Childcare Facilities Renovation. 1,000 500 21 Infrastructure Improvements .... 200 100 22 Corning Community College 23 Planetarium Renovations ........ 450 225 24 Campus critical maintenance 25 projects ..................... 280 140 26 Academic Buildings - Safety 27 Upgrades ..................... 150 75 28 Dutchess County Community College 29 Aviation Maintenance and 30 Education Center ............. 5,000 2,500 31 Roof Replacements .............. 3,188 1,594 32 Hudson Hall Critical Maintenance 33 Projects ..................... 100 50 34 Erie Community College 35 Campus critical maintenance 36 projects ..................... 5,200 2,600 37 Fashion Institute of Technology 38 Energy Savings Projects - 39 Campuswide.................... 7,840 3,920 40 HVAC Projects - Campuswide ..... 4,602 2,301 41 Facade Rehabilitation .......... 1,346 673 42 Finger Lakes Community College 43 Campus critical maintenance 44 projects ..................... 1,280 640 45 CMAC Renovation ................ 616 308 46 Parking and Utility Rehabilita- 47 tion ......................... 600 300 48 Master Plan .................... 250 125 49 Athletic Fields Renovation ..... 200 100 50 Fulton-Montgomery Community College 824 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus critical maintenance 2 projects ..................... 1,150 575 3 Lab and Classroom Renovations .. 1,000 500 4 Genesee Community College 5 Backup Power Improvements ...... 700 350 6 Herkimer County Community College 7 Smart Grid Laboratory 8 Improvements ................. 192 96 9 External Stairs Rehabilitation.. 100 50 10 Swimming Pool Rehabilitation ... 60 30 11 Hudson Valley Community College 12 Guenther Enrollment Service 13 Center Repair and Renovation.. 1,310 655 14 Master Plan .................... 350 175 15 Parking Improvements ........... 320 160 16 Jamestown Community College 17 Campus critical maintenance 18 projects ..................... 1,116 558 19 Mohawk Valley Community College 20 Airframe & Powerplant Hangar 21 Renovation ................... 1,000 500 22 Campus Wayfinding & Signage .... 84 42 23 North Country Community College 24 Campus critical maintenance 25 projects ..................... 300 150 26 Orange County Community College 27 Campus critical maintenance 28 projects ..................... 1,436 718 29 Schenectady Community College 30 Begley Hall Renovations ........ 9,492 4,746 31 Suffolk County Community College 32 Campus critical maintenance 33 projects ..................... 5,150 2,575 34 Campus Safety Improvements ..... 200 100 35 Ulster County Community College 36 Roof Replacement and Exterior 37 Improvements ................. 4,490 2,245 38 Campus critical maintenance 39 projects ..................... 1,600 800 40 Campus Sitework ................ 1,500 750 41 Equipment and Technology Upgrade 754 377 42 Westchester Community College 43 Technology Upgrades ............ 1,300 650 44 Library Building A/C Equipment 45 Replacement .................. 1,100 550 46 Roof Replacement Phase V - 47 Campuswide ................... 602 301 48 ---------- ---------- 49 Total ........................ 74,120 37,060 50 ========== ========== 825 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 2 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 3 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 4 facilities including service contracts, memoranda of understanding, 5 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 6 tation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, 7 preservation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, 8 program improvements or program changes, environmental protection, 9 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 10 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 11 April 1, 2018, subject to a plan submitted by the state university 12 and approved by the director of the budget, and which may include, 13 but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwith- 14 standing any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 15 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 16 the state university construction fund or the dormitory authority of 17 the state of New York for such purposes (28CC1808) (45931) ......... 18 74,270,000 ....................................... (re. $21,607,000) 19 Project Schedule 20 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 21 TOTAL SHARE 50 PERCENT 22 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 23 ---------------------------------------------------------- 24 (thousands of dollars) 25 Adirondack Community College 26 Campus wide improvements ......... 798 399 27 Furniture Fixtures and 28 Equipment Culinary Center ...... 300 150 29 Columbia-Greene Community College 30 Renovations and Improvements ..... 20,000 10,000 31 Classroom Upgrades ............... 300 150 32 Corning Community College 33 Critical Maintenance Items ....... 500 250 34 Dutchess County Community College 35 Facility Master Planning ......... 500 250 36 Fire Alarm Upgrade ............... 824 412 37 Erie Community College 38 Building Infrastructure 39 Improvements/Renovations ......... 1,000 500 40 College-wide Sitework ............ 800 400 41 Code Compliance Upgrades ......... 600 300 42 Roof Replacement and Water- 43 proofing ....................... 2,000 1,000 44 Mechanical, Electrical and 45 Plumbing Improvements .......... 1,000 500 46 College-wide Preservation ........ 600 300 47 Fashion Institute of Technology 48 Energy Savings and Refurbishment 49 Projects ....................... 7,372 3,686 50 Classroom Renovations ............ 300 150 826 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 College Bookstore Ph 1 ........... 1,328 664 2 New Academic Building ............ 40,754 20,377 3 Finger Lakes Community College 4 Parking and Utility Upgrades ..... 750 375 5 Athletic Fields Renovation ....... 5,000 2,500 6 Critical Maintenance Items ....... 1,000 500 7 Herkimer County Community College 8 Bookstore/Library Renovations .... 300 150 9 Roofs: RMCC/Tech Centers ......... 1,500 750 10 Stadium Turf Replacement ......... 700 350 11 Hudson Valley Community College 12 Center: Manufacturing Skills ..... 11,600 5,800 13 Update Mechanical Systems ...... 1,022 511 14 Jamestown Community College 15 Critical Maintenance ............. 1,000 500 16 Mohawk Valley Community College 17 Data/WiFi Infrastructure ......... 200 100 18 Athletic Field Revitalization .... 500 250 19 Science/Tech Building Expansion .. 450 225 20 ACC Basement Flooding Mitigation . 250 125 21 Monroe Community College 22 Renovate Science Labs ............ 3,856 1,928 23 Nassau County Community College 24 Historic Theater Building Renova- 25 tion ........................... 6,000 3,000 26 Tunnel Repair .................. 4,200 2,100 27 Campus-wide Facilities Up- 28 grade ........................ 3,000 1,500 29 Culinary Food Service Renova- 30 tion ......................... 3,000 1,500 31 Road and Parking Rehabilitation. 2,350 1,175 32 Infrastructure and Master 33 Plan ......................... 2,252 1,126 34 Road Parking and Paving ........ 2,000 1,000 35 Concrete Repairs ............... 1,200 600 36 Renovation to Cluster C ........ 700 350 37 Building Systems Upgrades ...... 500 250 38 Various Facilities Upgrades .... 500 250 39 Elevator Restoration ........... 200 100 40 North Country Community College 41 Maintenance Upgrades ............. 310 155 42 Dining Services Upgrades ......... 200 100 43 Orange County Community College 44 Horton Hall Site Repairs ......... 350 175 45 Pumps and Motors Replacement ..... 300 150 46 Campus Wayfinding ................ 260 130 47 Instructional Equipment .......... 500 250 48 Kaplan Facade Repair ............. 60 30 49 Schenectady Community College 50 Elston Hall Exterior Renovations . 350 175 51 Begley Learning Commons Ph 1 ..... 672 336 827 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campus Safety Office Relocation .. 142 71 2 Campus Wayfinding ................ 178 89 3 Suffolk County Community College 4 Infrastructure Improvements Ph II. 5,150 2,575 5 SUNY Sullivan 6 Facility Master Planning ......... 200 100 7 Ulster County Community College 8 Infrastructure: Public Safety Fa- 9 cility ......................... 4,552 2,276 10 Westchester Community College 11 Site Improvement/Upgrade Ph II ... 750 375 12 Technology Upgrades On-Campus 13 Cycle 2 Ph I ................... 1,236 618 14 Technology Upgrades Off-Campus 15 Cycle 2 Ph I ................... 100 50 16 Facility Master Planning ......... 224 112 17 ---------- ---------- 18 Total .......................... 148,540 74,270 19 ========== ========== 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 21 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 22 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 23 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 24 facilities including service contracts, memoranda of understanding, 25 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 26 tation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, 27 preservation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, 28 program improvements or program changes, environmental protection, 29 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 30 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 31 April 1, 2017, subject to a plan submitted by the state university 32 and approved by the director of the budget, and which may include, 33 but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwith- 34 standing any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 35 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 36 the state university construction fund or the dormitory authority of 37 the state of New York for such purposes (28CC1708) (45931) ......... 38 55,079,000 ....................................... (re. $11,920,000) 39 Project Schedule 40 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 41 TOTAL SHARE 50 PERCENT 42 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 43 ---------------------------------------------------------- 44 (thousands of dollars) 45 Adirondack Community College 46 Purchase and Improvements ............ 180 90 47 Campus wide improvements ............. 620 310 48 Energy Improvements .................. 100 50 49 Warren hall/Student Success .......... 400 200 828 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Furniture Fixtures and 2 Equipment ........................ 1,300 650 3 Clinton Community College 4 Main Building Upgrades ............ 12,000 6,000 5 Columbia-Greene Community College 6 Critical Maintenance and Safety ...... 100 50 7 Transformer Upgrades ................. 150 75 8 Corning Community College 9 Health Education Center ............ 1,000 500 10 Dutchess County Community College 11 Aviation and Powerplant Program .... 8,090 4,045 12 Erie Community College 13 Building Infrastructure 14 Improvements/Renovations ........... 2,000 1,000 15 College-wide Sitework .............. 1,300 650 16 Code Compliance Upgrades ............. 750 375 17 Roof Replacement and Water- 18 proofing ......................... 2,000 1,000 19 Mechanical, Electrical and 20 Plumbing Improvements ............ 1,000 500 21 Fashion Institute of Technology 22 Energy Savings and Elevator/ 23 Escalator Refurbishment ......... 10,556 5,278 24 Info Lab ............................. 300 150 25 Finger Lakes Community College 26 Maintenance Upgrades ............... 1,508 754 27 Telephone Upgrade .................... 800 400 28 Greenhouse Replacement ............... 100 50 29 Athletic Fields Renovation ........... 100 50 30 Fulton Montgomery Community College 31 Administrative and Community 32 Center ........................... 2,600 1,300 33 Bathroom and Locker Room Upgrades .. 2,200 1,100 34 Campus Upgrades ...................... 900 450 35 Herkimer County Community College 36 Energy Savings Projects ............ 1,898 949 37 Jamestown Community College 38 Maintenance Upgrades ............... 1,000 500 39 Mohawk Valley Community College 40 Technology Upgrades .................. 400 200 41 Nassau County Community College 42 Space Consolidation ................ 8,000 4,000 43 Brick Cafe Renovation .............. 6,000 3,000 44 Building Systems Upgrade ........... 1,000 500 45 Concrete Repairs ..................... 500 250 46 Utility Repairs .................... 2,000 1,000 47 Roof Repairs ....................... 1,200 600 48 Academic Dept Renovation ........... 3,000 1,500 49 Infrastructure Upgrades ............ 1,000 500 50 Parking and Paving ................. 6,200 3,100 51 Cluster C Upgrades ................. 4,000 2,000 829 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Roof and Parking Upgrades .......... 2,950 1,475 2 Health and Safety .................. 1,000 500 3 Library Renovation ................. 1,000 500 4 ADA Compliance ..................... 1,200 600 5 North Country Community College 6 Maintenance Upgrades ............... 1,550 775 7 Orange County Community College 8 Parking Improvements ................. 400 200 9 Heating Upgrades ..................... 376 188 10 Cooling Tower ........................ 252 126 11 Schenectady Community College 12 Elston Hall Facility Improvements .. 2,160 1,080 13 Master Plan ........................... 30 15 14 Suffolk County Community College 15 Roof Upgrade ......................... 408 204 16 Health and Sports Facility ......... 4,000 2,000 17 Tompkins Cortland Community College 18 Childcare Facility ................. 3,000 1,500 19 Ulster County Community College 20 Roof and Exterior Upgrades ........... 396 198 21 Other Sitework ........................ 60 30 22 Infrastructure Upgrades ............ 1,352 676 23 Westchester Community College 24 Phase 4 Roof Replacement ........... 1,886 943 25 Infrastructure Upgrades .............. 786 393 26 Technology Upgrades On-Campus 27 Phase V .......................... 1,000 500 28 Technology Upgrades Off-Campus 29 Phase V ............................ 100 50 30 ---------- ---------- 31 Total .......................... 110,158 55,079 32 ========== ========== 33 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 34 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 35 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 36 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 37 facilities including service contracts, memoranda of understanding, 38 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 39 tation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, 40 preservation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, 41 program improvements or program changes, environmental protection, 42 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 43 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 44 April 1, 2016, subject to a plan submitted by the state university 45 and approved by the director of the budget, and which may include, 46 but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwith- 47 standing any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 48 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 49 the state university construction fund or the dormitory authority of 830 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the state of New York for such purposes (28CC1608) (45931) ......... 2 23,053,000 ........................................ (re. $3,826,000) 3 Project Schedule 4 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 5 TOTAL SHARE 50 PERCENT 6 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 7 ---------------------------------------------------------- 8 (thousands of dollars) 9 Broome County Community College 10 Disabilities Access .................. 500 250 11 HVAC and Roof Replacements ........... 540 270 12 Roads, Parking and Walkway 13 Replacement ........................ 740 370 14 Clinton Community College 15 Mechanical Equipment Replacement ..... 250 125 16 Learning Commons Renovations ....... 3,000 1,500 17 Columbia-Greene Community College 18 Emergency Repairs and Critical 19 Maintenance and Safety ............. 100 50 20 Erie Community College 21 Building Infrastructure 22 Improvements/Renovations ........... 1,200 600 23 College-wide Sitework .............. 1,000 500 24 Roof Replacement and Water- 25 proofing ......................... 2,000 1,000 26 Fashion Institute of Technology 27 Energy Savings Upgrades ........... 10,698 5,349 28 Finger Lakes Community College 29 Classroom Upgrades .................. 356 178 30 Site and Building Improvements ....... 946 473 31 Genesee County Community College 32 Dining Hall/Kitchen Expansion ........ 450 225 33 Herkimer County Community College 34 Master Planning ...................... 100 50 35 Hudson Valley Community College 36 Athletics Facility Upgrades ........ 1,000 500 37 Mohawk Valley Community College 38 Bookstore and Student Commons ........ 900 450 39 Campus Way-finding and Signage ........ 76 38 40 Learning Commons Development and 41 Related Renovation ................. 400 200 42 Monroe Community College 43 Property Preservation Phase 2 ...... 3,604 1,802 44 Orange County Community College 45 PE Building Reconstruction ........... 120 60 46 Roof Reconstruction .................. 400 200 47 Building Demolition/Parking 48 Expansion .......................... 180 90 49 Morrison Hall: Heat Pumps 50 Replacement ........................ 300 150 831 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Safety/Security: Cameras Phase II .... 300 150 2 Schenectady Community College 3 Elston Hall Facility Improvements .. 1,276 638 4 Roof Repairs Phase 3 ................. 300 150 5 Boiler Replacements .................. 120 60 6 Suffolk County Community College 7 Infrastructure Improvements ........ 5,150 2,575 8 Storm Water Initiative ............... 786 393 9 Improvements to New and Existing 10 Facilities ....................... 1,000 500 11 Ulster County Community College 12 Backup Generators .................... 994 497 13 HVAC Controllers ..................... 300 150 14 Leach Field .......................... 208 104 15 Vanderlyn Pedestrian Bridge .......... 176 88 16 Interior Renovation and Equipment .... 150 75 17 Gym Wall Replacement ................. 114 57 18 Technology Facility Upgrades ......... 300 150 19 Water Supply Extension to Public 20 Water ............................ 3,004 1,502 21 Kelder House Renovation .............. 142 71 22 Westchester Community College 23 Site Improvements/Upgrade Phase I .. 1,626 813 24 Technology Upgrades On-Campus 25 Phase IV ......................... 1,200 600 26 Technology Upgrades Off-Campus 27 Phase IV ........................... 100 50 28 ---------- ---------- 29 Total ........................... 46,106 23,053 30 ========== ========== 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 32 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 33 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 34 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 35 facilities including service contracts, memoranda of understanding, 36 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 37 tation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, 38 preservation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, 39 program improvements or program changes, environmental protection, 40 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 41 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 42 April 1, 2015, subject to a plan submitted by the state university 43 and approved by the director of the budget, and which may include, 44 but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwith- 45 standing any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 46 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 47 the state university construction fund or the dormitory authority of 48 the state of New York for such purposes (28C11508) (45931) ......... 49 81,176,000 ....................................... (re. $20,354,000) 832 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Project Schedule 2 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 3 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 4 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 5 ---------------------------------------------------------- 6 (thousands of dollars) 7 Broome County Community College 8 Carnegie Building ............... 10,000 5,000 9 Cayuga Community College 10 Karpinski Stadium ............... 6,000 3,000 11 Fashion Institute of Technology 12 Renovation: Amphitheater ........ 12,000 6,000 13 Classroom Renovation ............ 18,000 9,000 14 Genesee County Community College 15 Admissions Relocation ........... 256 128 16 Admissions Renovation ........... 896 448 17 Success Center .................. 5,188 2,594 18 Event Center .................... 13,850 6,925 19 Herkimer County Community College 20 Johnson Hall .................... 50 25 21 Jefferson Community College 22 Collaborative Learning Center ... 12,300 6,150 23 Dewey Building .................. 1,700 850 24 Monroe Community College 25 Downtown Campus ................. 13,212 6,606 26 Niagara Community College 27 New Learning Commons: Design .... 1,000 500 28 New Learning Commons: Construc- 29 tion .......................... 24,000 12,000 30 Onondaga Community College 31 West Quad Renovation: 32 Ferante/Coulter ................. 17,600 8,800 33 Orange County Community College 34 Biotech Building Renovation ..... 6,800 3,400 35 Suffolk County Community College 36 STEM Building ................... 19,500 9,750 37 ---------- ---------- 38 Total ......................... 162,352 81,176 39 ========== ========== 40 For services and expenses for the state share of financial assistance 41 to community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 42 facilities including service contracts, memoranda of understanding, 43 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 44 tation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, 45 preservation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, 46 program improvements or program changes, environmental protection, 47 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 48 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 49 April 1, 2015, subject to a plan submitted by the state university 50 and approved by the director of the budget, and which may include, 833 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 but not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwith- 2 standing any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 3 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 4 the state university construction fund or the dormitory authority of 5 the state of New York for such purposes (28CC1508) (45912) ......... 6 62,153,000 ........................................ (re. $8,628,000) 7 Project Schedule 8 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 9 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 10 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 11 ---------------------------------------------------------- 12 (thousands of dollars) 13 Adirondack County Community College 14 Critical Maintenance and Facilities 15 Improvements ................... 1,630 815 16 STEM Building Renovation ......... 21,000 10,500 17 Broome County Community College 18 Site Improvements ................ 1,200 600 19 Electrical System Upgrades ....... 350 175 20 Clinton County Community College 21 Athletic Facilities Renovation ... 300 150 22 Columbia-Green Community College 23 Emergency Repairs ................ 70 35 24 Erie County Community College 25 Roof Replacements and Waterproof- 26 ing ............................ 6,000 3,000 27 College Wide Code Compliance .... 300 150 28 Finger Lakes Community College 29 Capital Improvements ............ 2,750 1,375 30 Sanitary Improvements ........... 190 95 31 Site Improvements ............... 200 100 32 Geneva Campus ................... 1,148 574 33 Fulton Montgomery County Community 34 College 35 Site Work and Campus Safety ..... 1,000 500 36 Infrastructure Upgrades ......... 1,876 938 37 Student Union Improvements ...... 2,330 1,165 38 Hudson Valley Community College 39 Athletic Facilities Renovation .. 3,500 1,750 40 Jefferson Community College 41 Maintenance and Facility Upgrades 7,000 3,500 42 Mohawk Valley Community College 43 Plumley Addition & Renovation ... 29,224 14,612 44 Payne Hall Restoration .......... 520 260 45 Trades Building Renovation ...... 2,950 1,475 46 Nassau Community College 47 Building Systems Renovations .... 1,500 750 48 Master Plan Construction ........ 5,338 2,669 49 Hospitality Program Renovation .. 1,500 750 50 Various Facilities Upgrades ..... 500 250 834 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Concrete Repairs ................ 1,200 600 2 ADA Renovations ................. 700 350 3 Site Improvements ............... 950 475 4 Site and Road Improvements ...... 1,400 700 5 Academic Building Renovation .... 2,000 1,000 6 Critical Maintenance Projects ... 5,000 2,500 7 Niagara Community College 8 Grounds Storage and Site Modifica- 9 tion ........................... 300 150 10 Orange County Community College 11 Site Improvements ................ 220 110 12 Boiler Replacements .............. 710 355 13 Critical/Deferred Maintenance .... 200 100 14 Safety and Security Systems ...... 250 125 15 Schenectady County Community College 16 Phase 2 Roof Repairs ............. 350 175 17 Suffolk County Community College 18 Master Plan Update ............... 500 250 19 Sullivan County Community College 20 Energy Savings Improvements ...... 9,000 4,500 21 Roadway Improvements ............. 950 475 22 Ulster County Community College 23 Kingston Extension Center ........ 7,058 3,529 24 Westchester County Community College 25 On Campus Technology Upgrades .... 1,042 521 26 Off Campus Technology Upgrades ... 100 50 27 ---------- ---------- 28 Total .......................... 124,306 62,153 29 ========== ========== 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 31 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 32 An advance for the state share of financial assistance to community 33 colleges for alterations and improvements to existing facilities 34 including service contracts, memorandum of understanding, capital 35 design, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, equipment and 36 personal service costs; for health and safety, preservation of 37 facilities, technology upgrades, program improvements or program 38 changes, environmental protection, energy conservation, accredi- 39 tation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related 40 projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2014, subject 41 to a plan submitted by the state university and approved by the 42 director of the budget, and which may include, but not be limited 43 to, projects in the following schedule. Notwithstanding any other 44 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 45 priated may be suballocated or transferred to the state university 46 construction fund or the dormitory authority of the state of New 47 York for such purposes (28CC1408) (45912) .......................... 48 32,129,000 ....................................... (re. $10,105,000) 49 Project Schedule 835 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 2 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 3 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 4 ---------------------------------------------------------- 5 (thousands of dollars) 6 Adirondack Community College 7 Campus Renovations ................... 710 355 8 Critical/Deferred Maintenance ........ 268 134 9 Health/Safety Projects ............... 854 427 10 Broome County Community College 11 Rehabilitate Campus Buildings ..... 19,500 9,750 12 HVAC and Roof Replacements ........... 500 250 13 Update Facilities Master Plan ........ 300 150 14 Music Practice Suite Renovation ...... 500 250 15 Clinton Community College 16 Science Building Emergency Power ..... 550 275 17 Columbia-Greene Community College 18 Update Facilities Master Plan ........ 120 60 19 Erie Community College 20 Roof Repair and Replacement ........ 1,600 800 21 Masonry Repairs ...................... 150 75 22 Infrastructure Improvements .......... 500 250 23 Fashion Institute of Technology 24 Building Fire Alarm Upgrades ....... 6,000 3,000 25 Renovation: Museum ................ 2,800 1,400 26 Classroom Renovation ................. 200 100 27 Finger Lakes Community College 28 Geneva Campus Renovation ........... 1,424 712 29 Canandaigua Campus Renovation ........ 700 350 30 Fulton-Montgomery Community College 31 Technology Upgrades .................. 800 400 32 Genesee County Community College 33 Main Building Entrance Renovation .... 135 68 34 Herkimer County Community College 35 Flood Damage Reconstruction ........... 20 10 36 Jamestown Community College 37 Food Service Renovation ............ 1,540 770 38 Mohawk Valley Community College 39 Exterior Renovations ................. 147 74 40 Community Room Renovation ............ 345 172 41 Campus Wayfinding and Signage ........ 469 235 42 Monroe Community College 43 Library Renovation ................. 1,004 502 44 Services for Students Renovation ... 2,000 1,000 45 Science Lab Renovation ............... 864 432 46 Nassau Community College 47 Information Technology Upgrades ...... 760 380 48 Window Restoration Program ......... 2,000 1,000 49 Infrastructure Repairs ............. 2,000 1,000 50 Elevator Replacement Program ....... 2,000 1,000 51 Health and Safety Projects ......... 1,000 500 836 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Security Upgrades .................. 2,200 1,100 2 North Country Community College 3 Campus Wide Capital Renovations ...... 400 200 4 Orange County Community College 5 Roof Repair and Replacement .......... 320 160 6 Road and Parking Rehabilitation ...... 500 250 7 Swimming Pool Renovations ............ 310 155 8 Update Facilities Master Plan ........ 150 75 9 Student Services Renovation .......... 268 134 10 Schenectady Community College 11 Workforce Development Renovation ..... 500 250 12 Generator and Transformer ............ 400 200 13 Suffolk County Community College 14 Kreiling Hall Renovation ........... 3,180 1,590 15 Sullivan County Community College 16 Critical Maintenance Upgrades ........ 500 250 17 Road and Parking Rehabilitation ...... 950 475 18 Site Stabilization ................. 1,000 500 19 Equipment Replacement ................ 250 125 20 Instructional Facility Renovation ... 500 250 21 Westchester Community College 22 Historic Roof Replacement .......... 1,068 534 23 ---------- ---------- 24 Total ........................... 64,256 32,129 25 ========== ========== 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 28 An advance for the state share of financial assistance to community 29 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 30 including service contracts, memorandum of understanding, capital 31 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 32 equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, preser- 33 vation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, program 34 improvements or program changes, environmental protection, energy 35 conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, 36 and related projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 37 2013, subject to a plan submitted by the state university and 38 approved by the director of the budget, and which may include, but 39 not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwith- 40 standing any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 41 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 42 the state university construction fund or the dormitory authority of 43 the state of New York for such purposes (28CC1308) (45912) ......... 44 38,499,000 ........................................ (re. $9,670,000) 45 Project Schedule 46 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 47 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 48 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 49 ---------------------------------------------------------- 837 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 (thousands of dollars) 2 Adirondack Community College 3 Renovations: Student Center .......... 850 425 4 Cayuga County Community College 5 Building System Upgrades ............. 786 393 6 Clinton Community College 7 Roofs ................................ 150 75 8 Fire Safety and Security Systems ...... 60 30 9 Corning Community College 10 Facilities Master Plan ............... 180 90 11 Erie Community College 12 Roofs .............................. 2,000 1,000 13 Window and Door Replacement ........ 1,000 500 14 Code Compliance ...................... 400 200 15 Fashion Institute of Technology 16 Building System Upgrades ........... 3,000 1,500 17 Renovation: Museum ................ 2,000 1,000 18 Classroom Renovation ............... 1,800 900 19 Finger Lakes Community College 20 Infrastructure Project ............. 1,220 610 21 Herkimer County Community College 22 Renovation of Alumni Hall .......... 1,000 500 23 Monroe Community College 24 Property Preservation ............. 23,180 11,590 25 Site Improvements .................. 2,400 1,200 26 Renovation of Public Safety 27 Building ......................... 6,140 3,070 28 Nassau Community College 29 Energy/Sustainability Projects ....... 310 155 30 Orange County Community College 31 HVAC Rehabilitation ................. 596 298 32 Critical Maintenance and Safety 33 Projects ........................... 316 158 34 Exterior Renovations ................. 300 150 35 Rockland Community College 36 Building System Upgrades ........... 1,400 700 37 Suffolk County Community College 38 Infrastructure Improvements ....... 10,300 5,150 39 Site Improvements .................. 3,740 1,870 40 Renovation: Plant Operations ...... 3,650 1,825 41 Renovation: Warehouse ............... 680 340 42 Tompkins-Cortland Community College 43 Master Plan Items .................. 7,050 3,525 44 Westchester Community College 45 Roofs .............................. 1,210 605 46 Technology Upgrades ................ 1,280 640 47 ---------- ---------- 48 Total ........................... 76,998 38,499 49 ========== ========== 838 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 3 An advance for the state share of financial assistance to community 4 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 5 including service contracts, memorandum of understanding, capital 6 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 7 equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, preser- 8 vation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, program 9 improvements or program changes, environmental protection, energy 10 conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, 11 and related projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 12 2011, subject to a plan submitted by the state university and 13 approved by the director of the budget, and which may include, but 14 not be limited to, projects in the following schedule. Notwith- 15 standing any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 16 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 17 the state university construction fund or the dormitory authority of 18 the state of New York for such purposes (28CC1208) (45912) ......... 19 86,969,000 ....................................... (re. $21,197,000) 20 Project Schedule 21 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 22 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 23 ---------------------------------------------------------- 24 (thousands of dollars) 25 Adirondack Community College 26 Capital Improvement Program 27 Projects ............................ 544 272 28 Broome Community College 29 Science Technology Building, 30 Construction ....................... 2,000 1,000 31 Cayuga County Community College 32 Fulton Campus Expansion ............ 5,200 2,600 33 Performing Arts Center ............. 2,920 1,460 34 Clinton Community College 35 Boiler System Project .............. 2,500 1,250 36 Corning Community College 37 Renovation and Revitalization: 38 A/C ............................... 12,724 6,362 39 Dutchess Community College Roof 40 Replacement .......................... 450 225 41 Erie Community College 42 New Academic Building: North 43 Campus ............................ 30,000 15,000 44 Masonry Project: City Campus ...... 2,000 1,000 45 Roofs: College-wide ............... 4,000 2,000 46 North Campus Cooling System ........ 2,000 1,000 47 Fire Alarm Systems: College- 48 wide ................................. 500 250 49 Infrastructure Improvements: 50 College-wide ......................... 500 250 839 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Burt Flickinger Athletic Cen- 2 Ter Renovation ....................... 354 177 3 Code Compliance: College- 4 wide ................................. 200 100 5 Fashion Institute of Technology 6 Pomerantz Pavilion .................. 1,000 500 7 Fire Alarm Replacement .............. 3,000 1,500 8 Haft Auditorium: Construc- 9 tion ................................ 1,000 500 10 Finger Lakes Community College 11 Maintenance Capital Projects ........ 1,000 500 12 Viticulture Capital Project ......... 2,526 1,263 13 Fulton Montgomery Community College 14 Physical Education Building/ 15 College Union Renovation ............ 2,276 1,138 16 Jamestown Community College 17 ARSC Building: Expansion/ 18 Renovation .......................... 4,150 2,075 19 MTI Building: Expansion/ 20 Renovation .......................... 1,884 942 21 Land Acquisition, Carnathan 22 Building Renovation ................. 1,600 800 23 CSCE Demolition ....................... 350 175 24 Mohawk Valley Community College 25 Field House/Jorgenson Center: 26 Construction .......................... 200 100 27 Monroe Community College 28 Public Safety Building/Build- 29 ing 12 .............................. 3,790 1,895 30 Window Replacement .................. 2,500 1,250 31 Parking & Loop Road Improve- 32 ments ............................... 1,200 600 33 Nassau Community College 34 Cluster C: Construction ............ 16,000 8,000 35 Space Consolidation: Con- 36 struction ........................... 8,000 4,000 37 IT Phased Infrastructure Up- 38 grades .............................. 8,000 4,000 39 Window Replacements ................. 4,000 2,000 40 Health and Safety Project ............. 500 250 41 Physical Plant Equipment and 42 Vehicles .............................. 600 300 43 Public Safety Building .............. 1,000 500 44 ADA Upgrades: Campus-wide ............ 500 250 45 NCC Fountain House .................... 120 60 46 IT Equipment Upgrades ............... 1,000 500 47 Niagara Community College 48 Culinary Arts/Hospitality/ 49 Tourism Center ..................... 3,000 1,500 50 Orange County Community College 51 Science Engineering and 840 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Technology Center ................. 21,100 10,550 2 Main Power Plant Upgrade ............ 1,000 500 3 Greenhouse II: Replace Green- 4 house Building ........................ 300 150 5 Security/Safety Cameras: 6 Campus-wide ........................... 250 125 7 Schenectady County Community College 8 Roof Repair ........................... 830 415 9 Elevator Repair/Renovation ............ 362 181 10 Land Acquisition ...................... 260 130 11 Electrical Master Plan ................. 40 20 12 Flood Repair Project ................ 3,000 1,500 13 Suffolk County Community College 14 Infrastructure Improvements ........ 10,300 5,150 15 Parking Expansion: Ammerman 16 Campus ................................ 240 120 17 Westchester Community College 18 Technology Upgrades ................ 1,168 584 19 ---------- ---------- 20 Total .......................... 173,938 86,969 21 ========== ========== 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 23 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 24 An advance for the state share of financial assistance to community 25 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 26 including service contracts, memorandum of understanding, capital 27 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 28 equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, preser- 29 vation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, program 30 improvements or program changes, environmental protection, energy 31 conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, 32 and related projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 33 2011, subject to a plan submitted by the state university and 34 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 35 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 36 priated may be suballocated or transferred to the state university 37 construction fund or the dormitory authority of the state of New 38 York for such purposes (28CC1108) (45912) .......................... 39 31,571,000 ........................................ (re. $3,874,000) 40 Project Schedule 41 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 42 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 43 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 44 ---------------------------------------------------------- 45 (thousands of dollars) 46 Adirondack Community College 47 Capital Improvement Program 48 2011 ............................. 1,458 729 49 Fashion Institute of Technology 841 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Gladys Marcus Library 2 Collections Facility ............. 1,000 500 3 Broadcast Studio ................. 1,372 686 4 Wellness Center .................. 1,000 500 5 Finger Lakes Community College 6 Capital Improvement Program ...... 1,000 500 7 Niagara Community College 8 Hospitality & Tourism Institute 9 Project-Culinary ................. 9,650 4,825 10 Nassau County Community College 11 Rehab Plaza, Ph. II .............. 100 50 12 Renovation to Building C-Design .. 950 475 13 Renovation to Building V-Design .. 650 325 14 Renovation to Library-Design ..... 4,000 2,000 15 Elevator Renovations ............. 2,000 1,000 16 Space Consolidation Project- 17 Design ........................... 1,000 500 18 Infrastructure Assessment & MP 19 Update ........................... 500 250 20 Energy Savings Initiatives ....... 6,000 3,000 21 Repair Water Damaged Buildings ... 3,000 1,500 22 Health & Safety Improvements ..... 500 250 23 Tennis Facilities ................ 400 200 24 Orange County Community College 25 Newburgh Project ................. 10,708 5,354 26 Suffolk County Community College 27 Infrastructure Improvements ...... 10,300 5,150 28 Westchester Community College 29 Safety and Security Improve- 30 ments ............................ 1,742 871 31 Classroom Building Renovations ... 284 142 32 Gateway Building ................. 5,528 2,764 33 ---------- ---------- 34 Total .......................... 63,142 31,571 35 ========== ========== 36 For additional advances for the state share of financial assistance to 37 community colleges for alterations and improvements to various 38 facilities including service contracts, memorandum of understanding, 39 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 40 tation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, 41 preservation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, 42 program improvements or program changes, environmental protection, 43 energy conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically 44 disabled, and related projects, including costs incurred prior to 45 April 1, 2011, subject to a plan submitted by the state university 46 and approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any 47 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 48 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the state univer- 49 sity construction fund for such purposes (28CL1108) (45911) ........ 50 799,750 ............................................. (re. $799,000) 842 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Project Schedule 2 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 3 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 4 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 5 ---------------------------------------------------------- 6 Jamestown Community College 7 Renovation of Carnahan 8 Center ......................... 1,199,500 599,750 9 Acquisition of land adjacent 10 to Jamestown campus .............. 400,000 200,000 11 ---------- ---------- 12 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 13 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 14 An advance for the state share of financial assistance to community 15 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 16 including service contracts, memorandum of understanding, capital 17 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 18 equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, preser- 19 vation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, program 20 improvements or program changes, environmental protection, energy 21 conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, 22 and related projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 23 2010, subject to a plan submitted by the state university and 24 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 25 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 26 priated may be suballocated or transferred to the state university 27 construction fund or the dormitory authority of the state of New 28 York for such purposes (28CC1008) (45910) .......................... 29 22,426,000 ........................................ (re. $2,642,000) 30 Project Schedule 31 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 32 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 33 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 34 ---------------------------------------------------------- 35 (thousands of dollars) 36 Cayuga Community College 37 Purchase New Fulton Campus 38 And Expansion ................... 10,904 5,452 39 Performing Arts Center ............ 4,800 2,400 40 Finger Lakes Community College 41 Master Plan Project, Ph I .......... 5,516 2,758 42 Wayne County Science Lab- 43 Equipment .......................... 290 145 44 Fulton-Montgomery Community College 45 Classroom Building Ph, II .......... 2,500 1,250 46 Fashion Institute of Technology 47 FIT Labs Increase .................. 4,500 2,250 48 Gladys Marcus Library Special 49 Collections ...................... 1,000 500 843 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Haft Auditorium .................... 2,000 1,000 2 Orange County Community College 3 Campus Electric Power 4 Distribution ..................... 1,150 575 5 Parking Lot Paving ................... 500 250 6 Nassau County Community College 7 Banner Project/Life Sciences Build- 8 ing ................................ 1,612 806 9 Parking ............................ 4,000 2,000 10 Health and Safety 11 Infrastructure Assessment 12 and Master Plan Update ........... 570 285 13 North Country Community College 14 Capital Planning, Architec- 15 tural and Engineering Site 16 Analysis ........................... 220 110 17 Suffolk County Community College 18 Security Notification ................ 900 450 19 Infrastructure Improvements .......... 300 150 20 Westchester Community College 21 Safety and Security Improve- 22 ments ............................ 4,090 2,045 23 ---------- ---------- 24 Total ........................... 44,852 22,426 25 ========== ========== 26 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 28 An advance for the state share of financial assistance to community 29 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 30 including service contracts, memorandum of understanding, capital 31 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 32 equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, preser- 33 vation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, program 34 improvements or program changes, environmental protection, energy 35 conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, 36 and related projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 37 2009, subject to a plan submitted by the state university and 38 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 39 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 40 priated may be suballocated or transferred to the state university 41 construction fund or the dormitory authority of the state of New 42 York for such purposes (28CC0908) (45910) .......................... 43 45,700,000 ....................................... (re. $10,782,000) 44 Project Schedule 45 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 46 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 47 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 48 ---------------------------------------------------------- 844 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 (thousands of dollars) 2 Adirondack Community College 3 Facilities Master Plan and 4 Facilities Capital Improvement 5 Plan .......................... 1,270 635 6 Corning Community College 7 Athletic Center - Field House 10,274 5,137 8 Commons Renovation ............ 1,013 507 9 Library Expansion and Renova- 10 tion ........................ 10,992 5,496 11 Fulton-Montgomery Community 12 College 13 Critical Maintenance Projects 14 Campuswide .................. 1,250 625 15 Fashion Institute of Technology 16 Improvement Projects Campus- 17 wide .......................... 4,338 2,169 18 Jamestown Community College 19 Critical Maintenance Projects 20 Campuswide .................. 2,000 1,000 21 ARSC Third Floor Renovations .. 2,000 1,000 22 Demolition of Dilapidated 23 Housing ..................... 500 250 24 Parking Lot Expansion 25 (Cattaraugus) ............... 1,000 500 26 Library Learning Center Impv 27 (Cattaraugus) ............... 1,000 500 28 North County Center Purchase .. 4,000 2,000 29 New Science Building .......... 12,000 6,000 30 Monroe Community College 31 Building 9 Renovations, 32 Phase II .................... 4,380 2,190 33 Property Preservation ......... 7,600 3,800 34 Nassau Community College 35 Security System Expansion ..... 700 350 36 Fire Alarm Upgrades ........... 2,000 1,000 37 Road and Parking Lot Paving ... 9,600 4,800 38 Onondaga Community College 39 Renovate the Poor Farm 40 and Van Duyn Buildings ........ 6,200 3,100 41 Tompkins-Cortland Community 42 College 43 Upgrade/Modernization of 44 Electrical Panel ............ 1,600 800 45 Classroom Upgrade ............. 2,000 1,000 46 Westchester Community College 47 Health and Safety Improve- 48 ments, PH I ................. 2,292 1,146 49 To supplement campus-wide 50 improvements for projects 51 previously approved: 845 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Campuswide site; Hartford 2 Hall; Health Sci.; Admin 3 and PE Buildings ............ 3,390 1,695 4 ---------- ---------- 5 Total ....................... 91,400 45,700 6 ========== ========== 7 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 8 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 9 An advance for the state share of financial assistance to community 10 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 11 including service contracts, memorandum of understanding, capital 12 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 13 equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, preser- 14 vation of facilities, technology upgrades, new facilities, program 15 improvements or program changes, environmental protection, energy 16 conservation, accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled, 17 and related projects, including costs incurred prior to April 1, 18 2008, subject to a plan submitted by the state university and 19 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 20 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 21 priated may be suballocated or transferred to the state university 22 construction fund or the dormitory authority of the state of New 23 York for such purposes (28CC0808) (45910) .......................... 24 370,153,000 ...................................... (re. $90,742,000) 25 Project Schedule 26 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 27 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 28 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 29 ------------------------------------------------------------------- 30 (thousands of dollars) 31 Adirondack Community College 32 Regional Higher Education Center ............ 556 278 33 Broome Community College 34 Technology Building ...................... 10,000 5,000 35 Wales Building ............................ 3,000 1,500 36 Columbia-Greene Community College 37 Rehabilitation and Improvement- 38 Various Projects .......................... 1,900 950 39 Corning Community College 40 Renovations & Revitalization 41 Phase 2 .................................. 13,090 6,545 42 Alterations & Additions to Goff 43 Road Facility ............................. 1,436 718 44 Dutchess Community College 45 Hudson Hall Renovation ...................... 962 481 46 Campus Infrastructure ..................... 3,586 1,793 47 Washington Hall - Retaining Wall 48 and Lab Exhaust ............................. 460 230 49 Miscellaneous Repairs ....................... 200 100 846 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Browne Hall Renovations ..................... 600 300 2 Hudson Hall MEP ........................... 2,656 1,328 3 CBI Emergency Generator ..................... 508 254 4 Taconic Hall Addition and 5 Renovations ............................... 6,000 3,000 6 Falcon Hall Improvements .................... 200 100 7 Sitework Repairs and Modifications- 8 Parking Lot B ............................... 400 200 9 Drumlin and Dutchess Renovation ............. 934 467 10 Fashion Institute of Technology 11 Toy Design and Development Lab .............. 300 150 12 C2 Building ............................. 148,000 74,000 13 Finger Lakes Community College 14 Auditorium and Performing Arts 15 Facility ................................. 16,000 8,000 16 Finger Lakes Community College 17 Geneva Expansion ......................... 12,000 6,000 18 Fulton-Montgomery Community College 19 Upgrades to Waste Water Treatment 20 Plant ....................................... 422 211 21 Herkimer County Community College 22 Library Additions & Renovations .............. 50 25 23 Science Lab Updating and 24 Remodeling ................................ 2,200 1,100 25 Hudson Valley Community College 26 New Parking Structure .................... 15,600 7,800 27 Brahan Science Center and 28 Related Building Renovations ............. 54,400 27,200 29 Jamestown Community College 30 Facilities Master Plan Update ............... 140 70 31 Science Building and Facility 32 Enhancements ............................. 12,000 6,000 33 Mohawk Valley Community College 34 Campus Wide Improvements .................. 5,400 2,700 35 Field house .............................. 11,000 5,500 36 Monroe Community College 37 ATEC/DCC Building ........................ 12,900 6,450 38 ATEC/Building 9, Phase I ................. 12,000 6,000 39 Nassau Community College 40 Window Replacement ........................ 1,200 600 41 Road and Parking Paving ................... 4,000 2,000 42 Energy Savings Initiatives ................ 6,000 3,000 43 Fire Alarms and Public Address 44 System .................................... 4,200 2,100 45 New Performing Arts Building ............. 41,600 20,800 46 Niagara County Community College 47 Construct New Culinary Arts 48 Facility ................................. 13,200 6,600 49 Onondaga Community College 50 Athletics Complex ........................ 33,000 16,500 51 Technology Improvements ................... 1,782 891 847 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Upgrade Biology Laboratories .............. 2,700 1,350 2 Mawhinney Hall Renovation- 3 Phase 3 ................................... 4,118 2,059 4 Construct New Academic/Admini- 5 strative Building on East Quad ........... 18,900 9,450 6 Site Improvements ......................... 5,948 2,974 7 Relocate President's Suite ................ 1,012 506 8 Prepare Program Study of 9 Coulter Library ............................. 300 150 10 Campus-Wide Energy Projects ................. 676 338 11 Orange County Community College 12 Science, Engineering and 13 Tech Center .............................. 38,900 19,450 14 Improvements to Classroom 15 Facilities ................................ 2,000 1,000 16 Rockland Community College 17 Multi-Purpose Language Lab .................. 600 300 18 Master Plan Update .......................... 126 63 19 Academic II Building ........................ 500 250 20 Art Gallery and Art Studio/ 21 Cultural Arts Center ........................ 200 100 22 Day Care Center ............................. 500 250 23 Building Energy Conservation .............. 1,000 500 24 Elevators Rehabilitation .................. 1,800 900 25 Library Roof Replacement .................. 1,100 550 26 Cultural Arts Center Roof 27 Replacement ................................. 736 368 28 Field House Resurface ....................... 400 200 29 Campus Site Improvements .................... 400 200 30 Tennis Court Resurface ....................... 76 38 31 Swimming Pool Repairs ....................... 250 125 32 Boiler Equipment Upgrade .................... 300 150 33 Cultural Arts Center HVAC 34 Upgrade ..................................... 150 75 35 Parking Lot and Road Repairs .............. 1,250 625 36 Academic I Roof Replacement ................. 500 250 37 Field House Roof Replacement .............. 1,000 500 38 Library Improvements and 39 Renovations .............................. 10,000 5,000 40 Field House Interior and Ext- 41 erior Improvements ........................ 1,800 900 42 Installation of Emergency No- 43 tification System ........................... 400 200 44 Special Projects ............................ 300 150 45 Schenectady County Community College 46 Building Renovations ...................... 2,410 1,205 47 Athletic Fields Relocation .................. 850 425 48 Building Renovations ...................... 1,146 573 49 Infrastructure Improvements ............... 1,182 591 50 Athletic Field Access/Roadways .............. 252 126 51 HVAC Upgrades ............................. 1,574 787 848 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Building Renovations ........................ 650 325 2 HVAC Upgrades ............................. 1,396 698 3 Infrastructure Improvements ............... 2,602 1,301 4 Landscaping ................................. 500 250 5 HVAC Upgrades ............................. 1,374 687 6 Infrastructure Improvements ............... 2,416 1,208 7 Building Renovations ...................... 1,382 691 8 Athletic Fields Enhancements .............. 1,846 923 9 Infrastructure Improvements ............... 1,034 517 10 Public Safety/Business Center ............ 23,800 11,900 11 Campus Connecting Walkway ................. 4,700 2,350 12 Building Renovations ...................... 4,224 2,112 13 Property Acquisition ........................ 250 125 14 Gateway Building Addition ................. 1,700 850 15 Property Acquisition ........................ 250 125 16 Property Acquisition ........................ 250 125 17 Parking Garage ........................... 22,800 11,400 18 Suffolk County Community College 19 Fire Sprinkler Infrastructure ................ 74 37 20 Reconstruction of Central Plaza ............. 750 375 21 Renovations to Sagikos Bldg ............... 6,100 3,050 22 Health and Sports Facilities- 23 Eastern Campus ........................... 17,750 8,875 24 Learning Resource Center-Grant 25 Campus ................................... 32,400 16,200 26 Air Conditioning-College-wide ............. 7,550 3,775 27 Sullivan County Community College 28 Safety Equipment Across Campus .............. 800 400 29 Upgrade Current Computer Labs ............. 1,000 500 30 Replacement of Roofs ...................... 2,250 1,125 31 Complete Mainframe Computer 32 Upgrade ................................... 2,400 1,200 33 Center for Advanced Science and 34 Technology ................................ 6,000 3,000 35 Renovations for Instructional ............... 250 125 36 Center for Advanced Science and 37 Technology/Green Building 38 Initiative ............................... 15,000 7,500 39 Ulster County Community College 40 Update Facilities Master Plan 41 Phase 1 ..................................... 840 420 42 Improvements to Classroom 43 Facilities ................................ 2,000 1,000 44 Westchester Community College 45 Administration Building 46 Renovations ............................... 2,548 1,274 47 Air Conditioning and CFC .................... 244 122 48 Physical Education Field 49 Improvements .............................. 2,866 1,433 50 Physical Education Building 51 Renovations ............................... 4,196 2,098 849 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Health Science Building 2 Renovations ............................... 2,174 1,087 3 Technology Improvements ................... 2,702 1,351 4 ------- ------- 5 Total ................................. 740,306 370,153 6 ======= ======= 7 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 54, 8 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 9 An advance for the state share of financial assistance to community 10 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 11 including service contracts, memorandum of understanding, capital 12 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 13 equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, preser- 14 vation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or program 15 change, environmental protection, energy conservation, accredi- 16 tation, facilities for the physically disabled and relate projects 17 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2006 subject to a plan 18 submitted by the SUNY trustees and approved by the director of the 19 budget. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a 20 portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or 21 transferred to the state university construction fund or the dormi- 22 tory authority of the state of New York for such purposes (28FE0608) 23 (45907) ... 41,700,000 .............................. (re. $669,000) 24 Project Schedule 25 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 26 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 27 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 28 ------------------------------------------------------------ 29 (thousands of dollars) 30 Cayuga County Community College 31 Master Plan Projects 800 400 32 Finger Lakes Community College 33 Student Services Center and 34 Auditorium, Phase 1B 35 Renovations 12,000 6,000 36 Herkimer County Community College 37 Library Addition and Renovation 38 Phase II 6,850 3,400 39 Jamestown Community College 40 Master Plan Phases II and III 5,400 2,700 41 Jefferson Community College 42 Renovation and Revitalization Project 43 Phase II 2,400 1,200 44 Monroe Community College 45 Athletic Field House 12,000 6,000 46 Niagara County Community College 47 Bookstore Expansion Project 1,000 500 48 Orange County Community College 850 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Newburgh Campus 30,000 15,000 2 Westchester Community College 3 Master Plan Projects 13,000 6,500 4 ------- ------- 5 Total ............................ 83,400 41,700 6 ======= ======= 7 Additional advance for state financial assistance to community 8 colleges for alterations and improvements to various facilities 9 including capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, 10 rehabilitation, equipment and personal service costs; for health and 11 safety, preservation of facilities, new facilities, program improve- 12 ment or program change, environmental protection, energy conserva- 13 tion, accreditation, facilities for the physically disabled and 14 related projects including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2006. 15 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 16 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 17 the state university construction fund or the dormitory authority of 18 the state of New York for such purposes (28FD0608) (45908) ......... 19 40,936,000 ........................................ (re. $2,781,000) 20 Project Schedule 21 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 22 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 23 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 24 ------------------------------------------------------------ 25 (thousands of dollars) 26 Adirondack Community College 27 Regional Higher Education Center .... 4,000 2,000 28 Erie Community College 29 Industrial Refrigeration Lab ........ 400 200 30 Fashion Institute of Technology 31 Bill Blass Center ................... 400 200 32 Hudson Valley Community College 33 Site Improvements and Improvements 34 for Pedestrian and Vehicular 35 Circulation ......................... 2,000 1,000 36 Jefferson Community College 37 McVean Gymnasium/Renovation Projects . 2,926 1,463 38 Nassau County Community College 39 Performing Arts Center Design ....... 4,500 2,250 40 Plaza Reconstruction Phase 2 ........ 5,300 2,650 41 Fire Alarm Upgrade Phase 1 .......... 500 250 42 Rockland Community College 43 Children's Day Care Center .......... 800 400 44 Simulated Nursing Skills 45 Training Center ..................... 400 200 46 Suffolk County Community College 47 Culinary Equipment & Technology Expenses 300 150 48 Fire Sprinkler System ............... 546 273 851 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Science and Technology Building ..... 15,000 7,500 2 Tompkins Cortland Community College 3 Master Plan Amendment Increase ...... 4,800 2,400 4 Westchester Community College 5 Additional Master Plan Projects ..... 40,000 20,000 6 ------- ------- 7 Total.............................. 81,872 40,936 8 ======= ======= 9 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 54, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 11 An advance for state financial assistance to community colleges for 12 alterations and improvements to various facilities including capital 13 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 14 equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, preser- 15 vation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or program 16 change, environmental protection, energy conservation, accredi- 17 tation, facilities for the physically disabled and related projects 18 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2005. Notwithstanding any 19 other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby 20 appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to the state univer- 21 sity construction fund or the dormitory authority of the state of 22 New York for such purposes (28FC0508) (45907) ...................... 23 53,270,000 .......................................... (re. $963,000) 24 Project Schedule 25 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 26 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 27 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 28 ------------------------------------------------------------ 29 (thousands of dollars) 30 Tompkins Cortland Community College 31 College Athletic Complex ............ 21,200 10,600 32 Hudson Valley Community College 33 Facility Design and Planning ........ 1,000 500 34 Master Plan ......................... 11,400 5,700 35 Finger Lakes Community College 36 Auditorium and Performing Arts 37 Program Facility .................... 2,000 1,000 38 Orange County Community College 39 Master Plan ......................... 1,618 809 40 Erie Community College 41 North Campus conversion of 42 Lab Space to Classrooms ............. 30 15 43 North Campus Industrial 44 Refrigeration Technology 45 Center .............................. 600 300 46 Corning Community College 47 Academic and Career Advancement 48 Center .............................. 1,000 500 49 Onondaga Community College 852 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Academic Building - HVAC, 2 electrical, mechancial 3 systems upgrades .................... 526 263 4 Children's Learning Center .......... 2,500 1,250 5 Coulter Library - HVAC, elec- 6 trical, mechanical systems 7 upgrades ............................ 2,750 1,375 8 Coulter Library - Safety and 9 Security Enhancements ............... 1,838 919 10 Gordon Student Center ............... 2,852 1,426 11 Health and Physical Education 12 Building - Humdification sys- 13 tem and renovations ................. 1,598 799 14 J. Stanley Coyne Building - 15 HVAC, electrical, mechanical 16 systems upgrades .................... 300 150 17 Roof Replacement - Gordon 18 Student Center and Ferrante 19 Hall ................................ 946 473 20 Service and Maintenance 21 Building - HVAC, electrical, 22 mechanical systems upgrades ......... 570 285 23 Technology upgrades and 24 Expansion ........................... 1,984 992 25 Ulster Community College 26 Microbiology Lab Upgrades ........... 572 286 27 Fashion Institute of Technology 28 For the Establishment of a 29 Bill Blass Center for 30 Innovative Design ................... 400 200 31 Schenectady Community College 32 Workforce training program in 33 superconductive tech ................ 1,110 555 34 The completion of the Master Plan ... 10,000 5,000 35 Jefferson Community College 36 Construction ........................ 2,400 1,200 37 Suffolk County Community College 38 Construction ........................ 14,276 7,138 39 Westchester Community College 40 Technology Bldg Renovation .......... 14,097 7,049 41 Classroom Building Renovation ....... 2,895 1,448 42 Academic Arts Building 43 Renovation .......................... 4,078 2,039 44 Broome Community College 45 Capital Projects ................... 2,000 1,000 46 ------- ------- 47 Total ........................... 106,540 53,270 48 ======== ======= 49 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 54, 50 section 1, of the laws of 2012: 853 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 State financial assistance to community colleges for alterations and 2 improvements to various facilities including services and expenses, 3 capital design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabili- 4 tation and equipment; for health and safety, preservation of facili- 5 ties, new facilities, program improvement or program change, envi- 6 ronmental protection, energy conservation, accreditation, facilities 7 for the physically disabled, and related projects including costs 8 incurred prior to April 1, 2003 subject to a plan developed by the 9 state university and approved by the director of the budget. 10 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 11 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 12 the state university construction fund for such purposes (28RC0308) 13 (45910) ... 25,000,000 ............................ (re. $4,791,000) 14 Project Schedule 15 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 16 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 17 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 18 ---------------------------------------------------------- 19 (thousands of dollars) 20 Adirondack Community College ........... 700 350 21 Broome County College ................ 1,358 679 22 Cayuga Community College ............... 634 317 23 Clinton Community College .............. 452 226 24 Columbia-Greene Community College ...... 376 188 25 Corning Community College .............. 974 487 26 Dutchess Community College ........... 1,518 759 27 Erie Community College ............... 3,108 1,554 28 Fashion Institute of Technology ...... 2,720 1,360 29 Finger Lakes Community College ....... 1,084 542 30 Fulton-Montgomery Community College .... 516 258 31 Genesee Community College ............ 1,036 518 32 Herkimer County Community College ...... 754 377 33 Hudson Valley Community College ...... 2,472 1,236 34 Jamestown Community College ............ 880 440 35 Jefferson Community College ............ 726 363 36 Mohawk Valley Community College ...... 1,342 671 37 Monroe Community College ............. 4,060 2,030 38 Nassau Community College ............. 5,134 2,567 39 Niagara County Community College ..... 1,292 646 40 North Country Community College ........ 286 143 41 Onondaga Community College ........... 1,932 966 42 Orange County Community College ...... 1,236 618 43 Rockland Community College ........... 1,524 762 44 Schenectady County Community College ... 790 395 45 Suffolk County Community College ..... 4,372 2,186 46 Sullivan County Community College ...... 380 190 47 Tompkins-Cortland Community College .... 806 403 48 Ulster County Community College ........ 674 337 49 Westchester Community College ........ 3,164 1,582 50 University-Wide 854 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For University-wide projects 2 which may include, but are not 3 limited to funding for a comm- 4 unity college capital condition 5 assessment study ................... 3,700 1,850 6 -------- 7 Total .............................. 25,000 8 ======== 9 State financial assistance to community colleges for alterations and 10 improvements for technology including costs incurred prior to April 11 1, 2003 subject to a plan developed by the state university and 12 approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other 13 law to the contrary, all or a portion of the amounts hereby appro- 14 priated may be suballocated or transferred to the state university 15 construction fund for such purposes (28RT0308) (45911) ............. 16 10,000,000 ........................................... (re. $71,000) 17 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 54, 18 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 19 An advance for state financial assistance to community colleges for 20 alterations and improvements to various facilities including capital 21 design, construction, acquisition, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 22 equipment and personal service costs; for health and safety, preser- 23 vation of facilities, new facilities, program improvement or program 24 change, environmental protection, energy conservation, accredi- 25 tation, facilities for the physically disabled, and related projects 26 including costs incurred prior to April 1, 2003 subject to a plan 27 developed by the state university and approved by the director of 28 the budget. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a 29 portion of the amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or 30 transferred to the state university construction fund or the dormi- 31 tory authority of the state of New York for such purposes (28FC0308) 32 (45912) ... 175,000,000 .......................... (re. $13,793,000) 33 Project Schedule 34 ESTIMATED ESTIMATED 35 TOTAL STATE 50 PERCENT 36 & LOCAL SHARE STATE SHARE 37 ---------------------------------------------------------- 38 (thousands of dollars) 39 Adirondack Community College ......... 5,000 2,500 40 For university-wide projects which 41 may include, but are not limited to: 42 -Humanities Building expansion 43 -Student Center and Randles Hall 44 renovation 45 -Eisenhart Hall renovation 46 Broome Community College ............. 9,600 4,800 47 For university-wide projects which 48 may include, but are not limited to: 855 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 -Parking lot relocation and repair 2 -Boiler replacement 3 -Student Center expansion 4 Cayuga Community College ............. 4,600 2,300 5 For university-wide projects which 6 may include, but are not limited to: 7 -Mechanical and electrical improve- 8 ments 9 -Roof repair 10 -HVAC System improvements 11 Clinton Community College ............ 3,200 1,600 12 For university-wide projects which 13 may include, but are not limited to: 14 -Campus Master Plan update 15 -Emergency Generator replacement 16 -Stucco repair 17 Columbia-Greene Community College .... 2,800 1,400 18 For university-wide projects which 19 may include, but are not limited to: 20 -Master plan update 21 -Kiln Building construction 22 -Water Tank Rehabilitation 23 Corning Community College ............ 7,000 3,500 24 For university-wide projects which 25 may include, but are not limited to: 26 -Health and Safety renovations 27 -Gymnasium renovations 28 -Learning Center roof replacement 29 Dutchess Community College .......... 10,800 5,400 30 For university-wide projects which 31 may include, but are not limited to: 32 -Property acquisition 33 -Master plan development 34 -Brown Hall renovations 35 Erie Community College .............. 21,800 10,900 36 For university-wide projects which 37 may include, but are not limited to: 38 -Dental Hygiene Clinic renovations 39 -Masonry restoration 40 -Heating Plant renovations 41 Fashion Institute of Technology ..... 19,200 9,600 42 For university-wide projects which 43 may include, but are not limited to: 44 -Fire alarm and sprinkler upgrade 45 -Turbine retrofit 46 -Instructional space addition 47 Finger Lakes Community College ....... 7,600 3,800 48 For university-wide projects which 49 may include, but are not limited to: 50 -Auditorium & Performing Arts 51 Program Facility 856 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 -Student Center Facility 2 -Wellness Center Facility 3 Fulton-Montgomery Community College .. 3,800 1,900 4 For university-wide projects which 5 may include, but are not limited to: 6 -Campus Fire Alarms integration 7 -Library & Comm Arts Bldg connection 8 -Exterior Lighting and Security Cameras 9 Genesee Community College ............ 7,400 3,700 10 For university-wide projects which 11 may include, but are not limited to: 12 -Update Main Building Mechanical 13 Systems 14 -Pool Dehumidification System 15 replacement 16 -Smart Classrooms construction 17 Herkimer County Community College .... 5,400 2,700 18 For university-wide projects which 19 may include, but are not limited to: 20 -Athletic Complex Master Plan 21 -Library roof replacement 22 -Track Facility improvement 23 Hudson Valley Community College ..... 17,512 8,756 24 For university-wide projects which 25 may include, but are not limited to: 26 -Campus Center Rehab 27 -Acad/Admin Bldg construction 28 -Loop Road renovation 29 Jamestown Community College .......... 6,200 3,100 30 For university-wide projects which 31 may include, but are not limited to: 32 -Hamilton Collegiate Center 33 Improvements 34 -Central Heating Plant renovations 35 -Gymnasium improvements 36 Jefferson Community College .......... 5,200 2,600 37 For university-wide projects which 38 may include, but are not limited to: 39 -Dewey Library renovation 40 -McVean College Center A/C 41 -Guthrie Science/Engr Building 42 renovation 43 Mohawk Valley Community College ...... 9,600 4,800 44 For university-wide projects which 45 may include, but are not limited to: 46 -Rome Campus Master Plan update 47 -Campus-wide Road Drainage, Walk- 48 ways, and Signage improvements 49 -Athletic Facilities Master Plan 50 (Ice Arena, Field House) update 51 Monroe Community College ............ 28,388 14,194 857 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For university-wide projects which 2 may include, but are not limited to: 3 -Advanced Training & Ed Center 4 construction 5 -Building 9 Renovation for 6 training and education 7 -Health and Safety renovations 8 Nassau Community College ............ 36,000 18,000 9 For university-wide projects which 10 may include, but are not limited to: 11 -Emergency Generator upgrade 12 -HVAC upgrade 13 -Library Renovation 14 Niagara County Community College ..... 9,200 4,600 15 For university-wide projects which 16 may include, but are not limited to: 17 -Cafeteria Floor replacement 18 -Campus Signage upgrade 19 -Emergency System upgrade 20 North Country Community College ...... 2,200 1,100 21 For university-wide projects which 22 may include, but are not limited to: 23 -Classroom renovations 24 -Hodson Hall roof replacement 25 -Campus Master Plan update 26 Onondaga Community College .......... 13,600 6,800 27 For university-wide projects which 28 may include, but are not limited to: 29 -Coyne Building elevator renovations 30 -Security System upgrade 31 -Signage improvements 32 Orange County Community College ...... 8,800 4,400 33 For university-wide projects which 34 may include, but are not limited to: 35 -Bio-Tech Facility upgrades 36 -Cooling Tower replacement 37 -Retaining wall repair 38 Rockland Community College .......... 10,800 5,400 39 For university-wide projects which 40 may include, but are not limited to: 41 -Master Plan update 42 -Student Union/Library HVAC 43 renovations 44 -Elevator upgrades 45 Schenectady County Community College . 5,600 2,800 46 For university-wide projects which 47 may include, but are not limited to: 48 -Boiler Replacement 49 -Van Curler Room renovations 50 -Property acquisition 51 Suffolk County Community College .... 30,600 15,300 858 12654-09-6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK COMMUNITY COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For university-wide projects which 2 may include, but are not limited to: 3 -Health & Safety projects 4 -Roofs repairs 5 -ADA Compliance 6 Sullivan County Community College .... 2,800 1,400 7 For university-wide projects which 8 may include, but are not limited to: 9 -Paul Gerry Field House renovations 10 -Window replacement 11 -Student Union renovation 12 Tompkins-Cortland Community College .. 5,800 2,900 13 For university-wide projects which 14 may include, but are not limited to: 15 -Sports Complex construction 16 -Cyber Cafe/Student Event Area 17 construction 18 -Infrastructure repairs 19 Ulster County Community College ...... 4,800 2,400 20 For university-wide projects which 21 may include, but are not limited to: 22 -Master Plan update 23 -Gymnasium rehabilitation 24 -Parking lots, roads and side- 25 walk repairs 26 Westchester Community College ....... 22,200 11,100 27 For university-wide projects which 28 may include, but are not limited to: 29 -Academic Building renovation 30 -Instructional Building construction 31 -Student Center improvements/ 32 expansion 33 Systemwide .......................... 22,500 11,250 34 For university-wide projects which 35 may include, but are not limited to: 36 -program improvement 37 -------- 38 Total ........................................ 175,000 39 ======== 859 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 3,866,846,000 17,416,432,038 6 Capital Projects Funds - Federal ... 3,520,000,000 17,413,107,000 7 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 24,937,000 163,522,000 8 Fiduciary Funds .................... 50,000,000 668,699,000 9 ---------------- ---------------- 10 All Funds ........................ 7,461,783,000 35,661,760,038 11 ================ ================ 12 AIRPORT OR AVIATION STATE PROGRAM (CCP) ..................... 14,000,000 13 -------------- 14 Capital Projects Funds - Other 15 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 16 Aviation Purpose Account - 30053 17 Aviation Purpose 18 For state aid to municipal corporations, 19 private airports as authorized by section 20 14-h of the transportation law and for 21 payment of the cost of projects at Stewart 22 and Republic Airports, for the acquisi- 23 tion, construction, reconstruction, and 24 improvement of airport or aviation capital 25 projects, including the acquisition of 26 real property and liabilities incurred 27 prior to April 1, 2026. 28 Prior to requesting approval of a certif- 29 icate of approval of availability for 30 moneys appropriated, the commissioner of 31 transportation shall certify that each 32 airport or aviation project progressed 33 under the program, other than state owned 34 airports, has received federal approval 35 and the federally authorized level of 36 financial assistance (17232614) (54293) ..... 14,000,000 37 ENGINEERING SERVICES PROGRAM (CCP) .......................... 24,937,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 40 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 41 DOT Federal Account - 25381 42 Preparation of Plans Purpose 43 New York Metropolitan Transportation Council 860 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the continuing comprehensive transporta- 2 tion planning and coordinated support 3 undertaken as part of the united work 4 programs of participating local planning 5 or municipal agreements in accordance with 6 grant agreements approved by the federal 7 transit administration or the federal 8 highway administration (53243). 9 Personal service (17M12630) (50000) ............ 5,873,000 10 Nonpersonal service (17M42630) (57050) ........ 14,841,000 11 Fringe benefits (17M82630) (60090) ............. 3,500,000 12 Indirect costs (17M92630) (58850) ................ 295,000 13 Watertown Jefferson County Area Transportation Council 14 For the continuing comprehensive transporta- 15 tion planning and coordinated support 16 undertaken as part of the united work 17 programs of participating local planning 18 or municipal agreements in accordance with 19 grant agreements approved by the federal 20 transit administration or the federal 21 highway administration (54203). 22 Personal service (17W12630) (50000) .............. 178,000 23 Nonpersonal service (17W42630) (57050) ........... 134,000 24 Fringe benefits (17W82630) (60090) ............... 107,000 25 Indirect costs (17W92630) (58850) .................. 9,000 26 FEDERAL AID HIGHWAYS FEDERAL PURPOSE (CCP) ............... 3,510,000,000 27 -------------- 28 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 29 Federal Capital Projects Fund 30 Transportation Account - 31354 31 Federal Aid Highways Purpose 32 For the federal share, from any federal 33 agency under any federal program, of state 34 transportation projects including but not 35 limited to construction, reconstruction, 36 reconditioning and preservation, operating 37 costs as provided for in the bipartisan 38 infrastructure law (BIL) and related prior 39 and successive federal legislation, and 40 the payment of liabilities incurred prior 41 to April 1, 2026. 42 Notwithstanding section 93 of the state 43 finance law or any other law, rule or 44 regulation to the contrary, all or a 45 portion of the funds appropriated herein 46 may be suballocated or transferred to any 47 department, agency, or public authority 861 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 for the implementation of any eligible 2 electric or zero-emission vehicle activ- 3 ities authorized under P.L. 117-58 4 (17032620) (53163) ....................... 3,000,000,000 5 For the federal share, from any federal 6 agency under any federal program, of the 7 acquisition of property for state trans- 8 portation projects including but not 9 limited to construction, reconstruction, 10 reconditioning and preservation, including 11 the payment of liabilities incurred prior 12 to April 1, 2026 (17RW2620) (54259) ......... 50,000,000 13 For the federal share of engineering costs, 14 or for reimbursements to the dedicated 15 highway and bridge trust fund of the 16 department of transportation, of the 17 federal share of engineering costs, 18 including fringe benefits, personal 19 services, and nonpersonal services, for 20 activities including but not limited to 21 the preparation of designs, plans, spec- 22 ifications and estimates; construction 23 management and supervision; and 24 appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 25 mental impact statements for transporta- 26 tion projects, the payment of liabilities 27 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 and other 28 such purposes as specified in section 89-b 29 of the state finance law as amended 30 (17EG2620) (54260) ......................... 260,000,000 31 For the federal share of engineering costs, 32 or for reimbursements to the dedicated 33 highway and bridge trust fund of the 34 department of transportation, of the 35 federal share of engineering costs, 36 including the contract services provided 37 by private firms, for activities including 38 but not limited to the preparation of 39 designs, plans, specifications and esti- 40 mates; construction management and super- 41 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, 42 and environmental impact statements for 43 transportation projects, the payment of 44 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 45 2026 and other such purposes as specified 46 in section 89-b of the state finance law 47 as amended (17EC2620) (54261) .............. 200,000,000 48 FEDERAL AIRPORT OR AVIATION (CCP) ........................... 10,000,000 49 -------------- 50 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 862 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Federal Capital Projects Fund 2 Federal Capital Projects Account - 31350 3 Aviation Purpose 4 For payment by the state of the federal 5 share of the cost, including payment of 6 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 7 2026, of construction, reconstruction, 8 alteration and rehabilitation of airport 9 and aviation facilities at Republic 10 airport, including the cost of acquisition 11 of real property, the acquisition of 12 equipment and other related incidental 13 expenses thereto and for the federal share 14 of consultant services in carrying out 15 federally approved aviation studies. 16 Within the amount appropriated herein, 17 authorization is granted to the department 18 of transportation to enter into all neces- 19 sary contracts and agreements, subject to 20 the approval of the director of the budg- 21 et, to carry out the purposes of this 22 appropriation. 23 Prior to requesting a certificate of 24 approval of availability for any of the 25 moneys authorized herein, the commissioner 26 of transportation shall certify to the 27 director of the budget that the federal 28 government has agreed to finance the 29 federal share of the project. However with 30 the approval of the director of the budg- 31 et, projects may be designed prior to 32 federal approval upon the written assur- 33 ance by the commissioner of transportation 34 that federal funds are likely to be forth- 35 coming (17522614) (53248) ................... 10,000,000 36 MAINTENANCE FACILITIES (CCP) ................................ 37,405,000 37 -------------- 38 Capital Projects Funds - Other 39 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 40 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 41 Highway Maintenance Facilities Purpose 42 For the preparation of designs, plans, spec- 43 ifications and estimates, for the acquisi- 44 tion, alterations, and rehabilitation of 45 existing facilities, for the acquisition 46 of land and construction of new facilities 47 for highway maintenance purposes, for the 48 contract engineering services provided by 49 private firms, including the payment of 863 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2 2026 (17252613) (53249) ..................... 31,634,000 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 5 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 6 Preparation of Plans Purpose 7 For payment to the design and construction 8 management account of the centralized 9 services fund of the New York state office 10 of general services for the purpose of 11 preparation and review of plans, specifi- 12 cations, estimates, services, construction 13 management and supervision, inspection, 14 studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and 15 environmental impact statements, including 16 the payment of liabilities incurred prior 17 to April 1, 2026 (17D12630) (53250) .......... 5,771,000 18 MASS TRANSPORTATION (CCP) ................................... 50,600,000 19 -------------- 20 Capital Projects Funds - Other 21 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 22 Mass Transit Purpose 23 For the costs of mass transportation capital 24 projects and facilities including replace- 25 ment of buses meeting federal standards 26 for replacement, related bus equipment and 27 the acquisition, design and construction, 28 including engineering and consulting 29 costs, of mass transit bus garages or 30 other mass transportation projects and 31 facilities approved by the commissioner of 32 transportation in a program of projects. 33 Such funding may be part of a total 34 project of which a portion is federally 35 funded. The moneys hereby appropriated are 36 to be made available for projects under- 37 taken by mass transit systems which are 38 outside of the Metropolitan Transportation 39 Commuter District (17KC26MT) (54242) ........ 20,000,000 40 Project Schedule 41 Project Amount 42 -------------------------------------------- 43 To the Capital District trans- 44 portation authority for 45 capital projects in support 46 of public transportation 47 services provided directly 864 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 or under contract .............. 3,596,000 2 To the Central New York 3 regional transportation 4 authority for capital 5 projects in support of 6 public transportation 7 services provided directly 8 or under contract .............. 3,282,600 9 To the Rochester-Genesee 10 regional transportation 11 authority for capital 12 projects in support of 13 public transportation bus 14 services provided directly 15 or under contract .............. 3,985,700 16 To the Niagara Frontier trans- 17 portation authority for 18 capital projects in support 19 of public transportation 20 services provided directly 21 or under contract .............. 5,177,500 22 To all other public transpor- 23 tation systems serving 24 primarily outside the metro- 25 politan commuter transporta- 26 tion district, as defined in 27 section 1262 of the public 28 authorities law and eligible 29 to receive operating assist- 30 ance under the provisions of 31 section 18-b of the trans- 32 portation law, for capital 33 projects in support of 34 public transportation 35 services provided directly 36 or under contract in accord- 37 ance with a formula to be 38 established by the commis- 39 sioner of transportation 40 with the approval of the 41 director of the budget ......... 3,958,200 42 -------------- 43 Total ....................... 20,000,000 44 ============== 45 Capital Projects Funds - Other 46 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 47 Omnibus and Transit Purpose 48 For state aid to municipal corporations for 49 the preparation of designs, plans, spec- 50 ifications and estimates, for the acquisi- 865 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 tion, construction, reconstruction, and 2 improvement of mass transportation capital 3 projects including the acquisition of real 4 property, for other mass transportation 5 projects including local transportation 6 planning studies. Notwithstanding any 7 inconsistent provisions of law, the state 8 share of such projects shall be 50 percent 9 of the non-federal share, but in no event 10 shall the state share exceed 10 percent of 11 project costs. 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 13 the commissioner of transportation shall 14 make available directly to the City of New 15 York (City) an amount commensurate with 16 the state share of (i) federal funds 17 previously awarded to the City and reallo- 18 cated to the metropolitan transportation 19 authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 20 authorized level of financial assistance 21 transferred by resolution of the metropol- 22 itan planning organization (MPO) to the 23 metropolitan transportation authority 24 (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 25 for capital expenses. 26 The state share of such reimbursement shall 27 be 50 percent of the non-federal share of 28 the federally authorized level of finan- 29 cial assistance transferred to the MTA, 30 but in no event shall the state share 31 exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior 32 to requesting reimbursement for projects 33 progressed by the MTA on behalf of the 34 City, the City shall certify to the 35 commissioner of transportation that each 36 eligible project progressed under this 37 provision is federally eligible and that 38 the match amount requested does not exceed 39 the state share of the federally author- 40 ized level of financial assistance. In 41 addition, the City must provide an appli- 42 cation to the commissioner of transporta- 43 tion certifying that the work to be funded 44 under the project has been performed and 45 that the City has reimbursed the MTA for 46 100 percent of the match amount for the 47 project. Upon such application, the 48 commissioner of transportation shall 49 review and approve eligible activities for 50 reimbursement. 51 Prior to requesting approval of a certif- 52 icate of approval of availability for the 866 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 moneys hereby appropriated, the commis- 2 sioner of transportation shall certify 3 that each omnibus project progressed under 4 the program has received federal approval. 5 Such certificate shall report the federally 6 authorized level of financial assistance 7 (17OM2629) (53252) .......................... 30,600,000 8 MASS TRANSPORTATION AND RAIL FREIGHT (CCP) .................. 72,830,000 9 -------------- 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 12 Non-MTA Capital Purpose 13 For the payment of the costs of mass trans- 14 portation capital projects and facilities 15 including replacement of buses meeting 16 federal standards for replacement, related 17 bus equipment and the acquisition, design 18 and construction, including engineering 19 and consulting costs, of mass transit bus 20 garages or other mass transportation 21 projects and facilities approved by the 22 commissioner of transportation in a 23 program of projects. Such funding may be 24 part of a total project of which a portion 25 is federally funded but shall not be used 26 in substitution for the required non-fed- 27 eral matching shares of the federally- 28 funded portion of the project to which it 29 is added. The moneys hereby appropriated 30 are to be made available for projects 31 undertaken by mass transit systems other 32 than those mass transit operating agencies 33 which receive money from the metropolitan 34 transportation authority dedicated tax 35 fund. The receipt of funding from this 36 appropriation to a municipality may be 37 conditioned upon a certification by the 38 Division of Housing and Community Renewal 39 that such municipality is a pro-housing 40 community (17NM2631) (53253) ................ 18,500,000 41 Capital Projects Funds - Other 42 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 43 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 44 Rail Service Preservation Purpose 45 For the payment of the costs, including the 46 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 47 April 1, 2026, of the construction and 867 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 improvement of passenger rail, freight 2 rail, and, notwithstanding any inconsist- 3 ent provisions of law, for port capital 4 facilities outside the jurisdiction of the 5 port authority of New York and New Jersey, 6 including but not limited to the acquisi- 7 tion, construction, reconstruction, 8 improvement or rehabilitation of railroad 9 or port capital facilities, and any capi- 10 tal improvement used in connection here- 11 with, and for the acquisition of real 12 property or interests in real property 13 required or expected to be required there- 14 for (17162641) (53256) ...................... 10,000,000 15 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 16 89-b of the state finance law, for 17 contractual agreements entered into for 18 rail passenger service (17172641) (54278) ... 44,330,000 19 NEW YORK STATE AGENCY FUND (CCP) ............................ 50,000,000 20 -------------- 21 Fiduciary Funds 22 Miscellaneous New York State Agency Fund 23 DOT Land Acquisition Projects Account - 60606 24 Non-Federal Aided Highway Purpose 25 For that portion of liabilities incurred by 26 the department of transportation on behalf 27 of entities other than state departments 28 or agencies pursuant to the highway law or 29 transportation law (17502622) (53259) ....... 50,000,000 30 NEW YORK WORKS (CCP) ....................................... 757,358,000 31 -------------- 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 34 Aviation Purpose 35 For state aid to municipal corporations and 36 private airports as authorized by section 37 14-h of the transportation law and for 38 payment of the cost of projects at Stewart 39 and Republic airports, for the acquisi- 40 tion, construction, reconstruction, and 41 improvement of airport or aviation capital 42 projects, including the acquisition of 43 real property and liabilities incurred 44 prior to April 1, 2026. Prior to request- 45 ing approval of a certificate of approval 46 of availability for moneys appropriated, 868 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 the commissioner of transportation shall 2 certify that each airport or aviation 3 project progressed under the program, 4 other than state owned airports, has 5 received federal approval and the feder- 6 ally authorized level of financial assist- 7 ance. Funds from this appropriation may 8 also be utilized for grants to municipal 9 corporations and private airports for the 10 cost of projects authorized by section 11 14-l of the transportation law, including 12 the acquisition of real property and 13 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 14 2026 (17552614) (53101) ..................... 12,500,000 15 Capital Projects Funds - Other 16 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 17 Non-Federal Aided Highway Purpose 18 Transportation infrastructure and facilities 19 in the department of transportation plan, 20 for the payment of costs, including the 21 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 22 April 1, 2026, of transportation infras- 23 tructure projects, including but not 24 limited to, state and local roads and 25 bridges; airport, freight and passenger 26 rail, port and transit projects or multi- 27 modal facilities, including work appurten- 28 ant and ancillary thereto. Project costs 29 funded from this appropriation may include 30 but shall not be limited to construction, 31 reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 32 vation, the acquisition of property, and 33 engineering services, including personal 34 services, nonpersonal services, fringe 35 benefits, the contract services provided 36 by private firms, and reimbursements to 37 the dedicated highway and bridge trust 38 fund and capital projects funds, for 39 activities including but not limited to, 40 the preparation of designs, plans, spec- 41 ifications and estimates; construction 42 management and supervision; and 43 appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 44 mental impact statements for transporta- 45 tion infrastructure projects. 46 Notwithstanding section 93 of the state 47 finance law or any other law, rule or 48 regulation to the contrary, all or a 49 portion of the funds appropriated herein 869 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 may be interchanged, or transferred from 2 this appropriation to any other capital 3 projects appropriation or appropriations 4 (17992622) (54201) ......................... 525,000,000 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other 6 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 7 Non-MTA Capital Purpose 8 For the costs of mass transportation capital 9 projects and facilities including replace- 10 ment of buses meeting federal standards 11 for replacement, related bus equipment and 12 the acquisition, design and construction, 13 including engineering and consulting 14 costs, of mass transit bus garages or 15 other mass transportation projects and 16 facilities approved by the commissioner of 17 transportation in a program of projects. 18 Such funding may be part of a total 19 project of which a portion is federally 20 funded but shall not be used in substi- 21 tution for the required non-federal match- 22 ing shares of the federally-funded portion 23 of the project to which it is added. The 24 moneys hereby appropriated are to be made 25 available for projects undertaken by mass 26 transit systems other than those mass 27 transit operating agencies which receive 28 money from the metropolitan transportation 29 authority dedicated tax fund. The receipt 30 of funding from this appropriation to a 31 municipality may be conditioned upon a 32 certification by the Division of Housing 33 and Community Renewal that such munici- 34 pality is a pro-housing community 35 (17552631) (53102) .......................... 50,400,000 36 For the additional costs of mass transporta- 37 tion capital projects and facilities 38 including replacement of buses meeting 39 federal standards for replacement, related 40 bus equipment and the acquisition, design 41 and construction, including engineering 42 and consulting costs, of mass transit bus 43 garages or other mass transportation 44 projects and facilities approved by the 45 commissioner of transportation in a 46 program of projects. Such funding may be 47 part of a total project of which a portion 48 is federally funded but shall not be used 49 in substitution for the required non-fed- 50 eral matching shares of the federally- 870 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 funded portion of the project to which it 2 is added. The moneys hereby appropriated 3 are to be made available for projects 4 undertaken by mass transit systems other 5 than those mass transit operating agencies 6 which receive money from the metropolitan 7 transportation authority dedicated tax 8 fund. The receipt of funding from this 9 appropriation to a municipality may be 10 conditioned upon a certification by the 11 Division of Housing and Community Renewal 12 that such municipality is a pro-housing 13 community (17562631) (54115) ............... 104,000,000 14 For the payment of the costs, which shall be 15 reimbursed from bond proceeds, of the 16 reconstruction, improvement, rehabili- 17 tation and maintenance of the existing 18 passenger rail system of the Niagara Fron- 19 tier transportation authority. 20 Funds shall be made available pursuant to a 21 plan approved by the commissioner of 22 transportation (17NF2631) (54220) ........... 26,000,000 23 For capital costs of the Rochester-Genesee 24 regional transportation authority related 25 to the provision of public transportation 26 service in the County of Yates (17YC2631) .... 4,000,000 27 Capital Projects Funds - Other 28 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 29 Rail Service Preservation Purpose 30 For the construction and improvement of rail 31 freight projects including, but not limit- 32 ed to, the acquisition, construction, 33 reconstruction, improvement or rehabili- 34 tation of any railroad capital facility 35 and any capital improvement used in 36 connection herewith, and for the acquisi- 37 tion of real property or interests in real 38 property required or expected to be 39 required therefor (17552641) (53104) ........ 35,458,000 40 NON-FEDERALLY AIDED HIGHWAY CAPITAL PROJECTS (CCP) ....... 1,956,856,000 41 -------------- 42 Capital Projects Funds - Other 43 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 44 Aviation Purpose Account - 30053 45 Aviation Purpose 46 For Aviation Bureau including personal 47 services, nonpersonal services, fringe 871 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 benefits and the contract services 2 provided by private firms. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2026-27 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated (17012614) (54205). 13 Expense accounts (00000) ....................... 1,382,000 14 Capital Projects Funds - Other 15 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 16 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 17 Highway Maintenance Purpose 18 For the payment of costs, including the 19 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 20 April 1, 2026, of preventive maintenance 21 on state roads and bridges as defined in 22 paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 23 10-d of the highway law, and snow and ice 24 control on state highways, including 25 personal services, nonpersonal services, 26 fringe benefits and contractual services 27 provided by private firms and munici- 28 palities, but not including the costs of 29 heavy equipment (53260). 30 Personal service (170126HM) (50000) .......... 190,804,000 31 Nonpersonal service (170426HM) (57050) ....... 163,767,000 32 Fringe benefits (170826HM) (60090) ........... 122,880,000 33 Indirect costs (170926HM) (58850) .............. 6,011,000 34 For the payment of the costs of heavy equip- 35 ment, including the payment of liabilities 36 incurred prior to April 1, 2026 (54275). 37 Nonpersonal service (170526HM) (57050) ........ 60,953,000 38 Capital Projects Funds - Other 39 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 40 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 41 Non-Federal Aided Highway Purpose 42 For the payment of the costs, including the 43 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 44 April 1, 2026, of state highways, park- 45 ways, bridges, the New York State Thruway, 46 Indian reservation roads, and facilities 47 for which the responsibility is vested 48 with the state department of transporta- 872 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 tion including work appurtenant and ancil- 2 lary thereto, for the state share of 3 federally authorized high speed rail 4 improvement projects, and for the cost of 5 administrative services of the department 6 of transportation and the cost of services 7 provided by private firms; including the 8 costs of preventive maintenance on state 9 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph 10 (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of 11 the highway law for contractual preventive 12 maintenance services provided by private 13 firms; and including but not limited to 14 the preparation of designs, plans, spec- 15 ifications and estimates; construction 16 management and supervision, and 17 appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 18 mental impact statements for transporta- 19 tion projects. Project costs funded from 20 this appropriation may include but shall 21 not be limited to construction, recon- 22 struction, reconditioning and preserva- 23 tion, and preventive maintenance. Up to 24 $5,000,000 of this appropriation may be 25 used for traffic maintenance and traffic 26 protection services provided by the divi- 27 sion of state police. 28 With the approval of the director of the 29 budget, the commissioner of transportation 30 is authorized to enter into agreements 31 with any municipality to finance local 32 bridge projects through state non-federal- 33 ly aided highway funds appropriated herein 34 when the use of federal aid funds for such 35 local bridge projects would not be cost 36 effective and the federal aid and state 37 matching funds saved as a result of the 38 use of non-federal aid funds for local 39 bridge projects are made available for 40 bridge projects on the state highway 41 system. The total amount of non-federally 42 aided highway funds made available for 43 local bridge projects from this appropri- 44 ation shall not exceed $2,500,000 in state 45 fiscal year 2026-27 (53164). 46 Personal service (17012622) (50000) ............ 5,000,000 47 Nonpersonal service (17042622) (57050) ........ 20,000,000 48 Capital projects (17082622) (60551) .......... 449,150,000 49 For the payment of the costs, including the 50 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 51 April 1, 2026, of the acquisition of prop- 52 erty related to construction, recon- 873 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 struction, reconditioning and preserva- 2 tion, and preventive maintenance of state 3 highways, parkways, bridges, the New York 4 State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, 5 and facilities for which the responsibil- 6 ity is vested with the state department of 7 transportation (17092622) (54276) ........... 22,000,000 8 Capital Projects Funds - Other 9 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 10 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 11 Preparation of Plans Purpose 12 Capital Project Management and Traffic and Safety 13 For capital project management and traffic 14 and safety, including personal services, 15 nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and 16 the contract services provided by private 17 firms (53263). 18 Personal service (17P12630) (50000) ........... 49,445,000 19 Nonpersonal service (17P42630) (57050) ......... 9,597,000 20 Fringe benefits (17P82630) (60090) ............ 29,480,000 21 Indirect costs (17P92630) (58850) .............. 1,558,000 22 Department Management and Administration 23 For department management and administration 24 including personal services, nonpersonal 25 services, fringe benefits and the contract 26 services provided by private firms. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 28 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 29 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 30 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 31 2026-27 state fiscal year state operations 32 appropriation for the budget division 33 program of the division of the budget, are 34 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 35 part of this appropriation as if fully 36 stated (53262). 37 Personal service (17A12630) (50000) ........... 38,095,000 38 Nonpersonal service (17A42630) (57050) ........ 33,354,000 39 Fringe benefits (17A82630) (60090) ............ 22,713,000 40 Indirect costs (17A92630) (58850) .............. 1,200,000 41 Design and Construction 42 For engineering services, including personal 43 services, nonpersonal services, and fringe 44 benefits, including, but not limited to, 45 the preparation of designs, plans, spec- 874 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 ifications and estimates; construction 2 management and supervision; and 3 appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 4 mental impact statements for transporta- 5 tion projects. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 7 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 8 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 9 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 10 2026-27 state fiscal year state operations 11 appropriation for the budget division 12 program of the division of the budget, are 13 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 14 part of this appropriation as if fully 15 stated (53166). 16 Personal service (17E12630) (50000) .......... 244,387,000 17 Nonpersonal service (17E42630) (57050) ........ 10,741,000 18 Fringe benefits (17E82630) (60090) ........... 157,945,000 19 Indirect costs (17E92630) (58850) .............. 8,345,000 20 For the costs of the contract services 21 provided by private firms including, but 22 not limited to, the preparation of 23 designs, plans, specifications and esti- 24 mates; construction management and super- 25 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, 26 and environmental impact statements for 27 transportation projects (53105). 28 Nonpersonal service (17EP2630) (57050) ....... 282,965,000 29 Real Estate 30 For real estate services, including personal 31 services, nonpersonal services, fringe 32 benefits and the contract services 33 provided by private firms. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 35 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 36 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 37 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 38 2026-27 state fiscal year state operations 39 appropriation for the budget division 40 program of the division of the budget, are 41 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully 43 stated (53264). 44 Personal service (17R12630) (50000) ........... 15,165,000 45 Nonpersonal service (17R42630) (57050) ........... 302,000 46 Fringe benefits (17R82630) (60090) ............. 9,139,000 47 Indirect costs (17R92630) (58850) ................ 478,000 48 OTHER TRANSPORTATION AID (CCP) ............................. 977,797,000 49 -------------- 875 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 Highway Aid Purpose 4 For capital grants to municipalities under 5 the municipal streets and highways program 6 for repayment of eligible costs of federal 7 aid municipal street and highway projects 8 pursuant to section 15 of chapter 329 of 9 the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of 10 chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 11 amended. The department of transportation 12 shall provide such information to the 13 municipalities as may be necessary to 14 maintain the federal tax exempt status of 15 any bonds, notes, or other obligations 16 issued by such municipalities to provide 17 for the non-federal share of the cost of 18 projects pursuant to chapter 330 of the 19 laws of 1991 or section 80-b of the high- 20 way law (17MA2621) (54265) .................. 39,700,000 21 For capital grants to municipalities under 22 the consolidated local street and highway 23 improvement program: 24 The sum of $639,300,000 to counties, cities, 25 towns and villages for reimbursement of 26 eligible costs of local highway and bridge 27 projects pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a 28 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as 29 added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the 30 laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes 31 of computing allocations to munici- 32 palities, the amount distributed pursuant 33 to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 34 of 1991 shall be deemed to be 35 $132,787,000. The amount distributed 36 pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of 37 the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 38 $506,513,000. Notwithstanding the 39 provisions of any general or special law, 40 the amounts deemed distributed in accord- 41 ance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the 42 laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so that 43 such amounts will not be less than 91.578 44 percent of the "funding level" as defined 45 in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the 46 highway law for each such municipality. In 47 order to achieve the objectives of section 48 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to 49 the extent necessary, the amounts in 50 excess of 91.578 percent of the funding 51 level to be deemed distributed to each 876 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 municipality under this subdivision shall 2 be reduced in equal proportion. 3 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for 4 reimbursement of eligible costs of local 5 highway and bridge projects pursuant to 6 sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the 7 laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of 8 chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 9 amended. For the purposes of computing 10 allocations to municipalities, the amount 11 distributed pursuant to section 16 of 12 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 13 deemed to be $12,213,000. The amount 14 distributed pursuant to section 16-a of 15 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 16 deemed to be $46,584,000. Notwithstanding 17 the provisions of any general or special 18 law, the amounts deemed distributed in 19 accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 20 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 21 that such amounts will not be less than 22 8.422 percent of the "funding level" as 23 defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c 24 of the highway law for each such munici- 25 pality. In order to achieve the objectives 26 of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 27 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the 28 amounts in excess of 8.422 percent of the 29 funding level to be deemed distributed to 30 each municipality under this paragraph 31 shall be reduced in equal proportion. To 32 the extent that the total of remaining 33 payment allocations calculated herein 34 varies from $58,797,000, the payment 35 amounts to each locality shall be adjusted 36 by a uniform percentage so that the total 37 payments equal $58,797,000. 38 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day 39 of June, September, December and March 40 (17CH2621) (54267) ......................... 698,097,000 41 For capital grants to municipalities for 42 extreme winter recovery: The sum of 43 $100,000,000 to municipalities for 44 reimbursement of eligible costs of local 45 highway and bridge projects pursuant to 46 section 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 47 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 330 48 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the 49 purposes of computing allocations to muni- 50 cipalities, the amount distributed pursu- 51 ant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of the 52 laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 877 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 $100,000,000. To the extent that the total 2 of payment allocations calculated herein 3 varies from $100,000,000, the payment 4 amounts to each locality shall be adjusted 5 by a uniform percentage so that the total 6 payments equal $100,000,000. Payments 7 shall be made on the fifteenth day of 8 June, September, December and March 9 (17EW2621) (53160) ......................... 100,000,000 10 For capital grants to cities, towns and 11 villages for the reimbursement of eligible 12 capital costs of local highway and bridge 13 projects within such municipality. 14 Funds shall be allocated to cities, towns 15 and villages based on the total number of 16 New York or United States or interstate 17 signed touring route miles for which such 18 municipality has capital maintenance 19 responsibility, as determined pursuant to 20 the most recent local highway inventory 21 conducted by the highway data services 22 bureau of the department of transporta- 23 tion. 24 Eligible capital costs include the costs of 25 construction and repair of highways, 26 bridges, highway-railroad crossings, and 27 other transportation facilities for 28 projects with a service life of ten years 29 or more (17TR2621) (54229) ................. 140,000,000 878 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 All or a portion of the disbursements made pursuant to the reappropri- 2 ations made hereinafter from the dedicated highway and bridge trust 3 fund may be repaid from the proceeds of bonds and notes issued 4 pursuant to chapter 56 of the laws of 1993. 5 ACCELERATED CAPACITY AND TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENTS FUND (CCP) 6 Capital Projects Funds - Other 7 Accelerated Capacity and Transportation Improvements Bond Fund 8 accelerated Capacity and Transportation Improvements Bond Fund Account 9 - 30680 10 Bond Proceeds Purpose 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1989, as amended by chapter 55, 12 section 1, of the laws of 1996: 13 The sum of $2,530,000,000, or so much thereof as may be necessary and 14 available, is hereby appropriated from the accelerated capacity and 15 transportation improvements fund as established by section 77 of the 16 state finance law in accordance with the provisions of such section 17 for payment to the capital projects fund in order to reimburse such 18 fund for disbursements certified by the state comptroller as bonda- 19 ble under the provisions of section 50 of chapter 261 of the laws of 20 1988. 21 The director of the budget is hereby authorized to designate to the 22 state comptroller specific appropriations made from the capital 23 projects fund for purposes for which accelerated capacity and trans- 24 portation improvements fund expenditures are authorized. The state 25 comptroller shall at the commencement of each month certify to the 26 director of the budget, the chairman of the senate finance commit- 27 tee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee, the 28 amounts disbursed from the appropriations so designated by the 29 director of the budget from the capital projects fund for such 30 purposes for the month preceding such certification and such certif- 31 ications shall not exceed in the aggregate the moneys hereby appro- 32 priated. A copy of each such certificate shall also be delivered to 33 state departments and agencies to which such capital projects fund 34 appropriations are made available. 35 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, no 36 moneys shall be available from the accelerated capacity and trans- 37 portation improvements fund until a certificate of approval of 38 availability shall have been issued by the director of the budget, 39 and a copy of such certificate of approval filed with the state 40 comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance committee and the 41 chairman of the assembly ways and means committee. Such certificate 42 may be amended from time to time by the director of the budget, and 43 a copy of each such amendment shall be filed with the state comp- 44 troller, the chairman of the senate finance committee and the chair- 45 man of the assembly ways and means committee (71258910) (80923) .... 46 2,530,000,000 .................................... (re. $20,232,000) 47 AIRPORT OR AVIATION PROGRAM (CCP) 879 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 Aviation Purpose 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1990: 5 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 6 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law, and to the depart- 7 ment of transportation for the preparation of designs, plans, spec- 8 ifications and estimates, for the contract engineering services 9 provided by private firms, and for the acquisition, construction, 10 reconstruction, and improvement of airport or aviation capital 11 projects, including the acquisition of real property, pursuant to 12 the provisions of the rebuild New York through transportation 13 infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983, in accordance with the 14 schedule set forth below. The moneys hereby appropriated are to be 15 made available for payment of state aid to municipal corporations 16 including payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1990. 17 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 18 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 19 subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg- 20 et. 21 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 22 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 23 transportation shall certify that each airport or aviation project 24 progressed under the program categories listed in the schedule below 25 has received federal approval. Such certification shall report the 26 amount of the federally authorized level of financial assistance 27 (17239014) (53230) ... ... 2,800,000 ............... (re. $10,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1989, for: 29 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 30 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law, and to the depart- 31 ment of transportation for the preparation of designs, plans, spec- 32 ifications and estimates, for the contract engineering services 33 provided by private firms, and for the acquisition, construction, 34 reconstruction, and improvement of airport or aviation capital 35 projects, including the acquisition of real property, pursuant to 36 the provisions of the rebuild New York through transportation 37 infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983, in accordance with the 38 schedule set forth below. The moneys hereby appropriated are to be 39 made available for payment of state aid to municipal corporations 40 including payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1989. 41 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 42 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 43 subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg- 44 et. 45 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 46 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 47 transportation shall certify that each airport or aviation project 48 progressed under the program categories listed in the schedule below 49 has received federal approval and the amount of federally authorized 880 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 level of financial assistance (17238914) (53230) ... ............. 2 2,800,000 ............................................. (re. $3,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1988, as amended by chapter 4 262, section 1, of the laws of 1988: 5 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 6 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law, and to the depart- 7 ment of transportation for the preparation of designs, plans, spec- 8 ifications and estimates, for the contract engineering services 9 provided by private firms, and for the acquisition, construction, 10 reconstruction, and improvement of airport or aviation capital 11 projects, including the acquisition of real property, pursuant to 12 the provisions of the rebuild New York through transportation 13 infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983, in accordance with the 14 schedule set forth below. The moneys hereby appropriated are to be 15 made available for payment of state aid to municipal corporations 16 including payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1988. 17 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 18 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 19 subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg- 20 et. 21 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 22 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 23 transportation shall certify that each airport or aviation project 24 progressed under the program categories listed in the schedule below 25 has received federal approval and the federally authorized level of 26 financial assistance (17238814) (53230) ... ...................... 27 10,400,000 ........................................... (re. $52,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1987: 29 For state aid to municipal corporations and to the department of 30 transportation for the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 31 and estimates, for the contract engineering services provided by 32 private firms, and for the acquisition, construction, recon- 33 struction, and improvement of airport or aviation capital projects, 34 including the acquisition of real property, pursuant to the 35 provisions of the rebuild New York through transportation infras- 36 tructure renewal bond act of 1983, in accordance with the schedule 37 set forth below. The moneys hereby appropriated are to be made 38 available for payment of state aid to municipal corporations includ- 39 ing payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1987. The 40 items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects with 41 a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject 42 to the approval of the director of the division of the budget. 43 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 44 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner shall 45 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 46 program categories listed in the schedule below has received federal 47 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 48 (17168714) (53230) ... ... 3,900,000 .............. (re. $183,000) 881 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1986, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 3, of the laws of 1988: 3 For state aid to municipal corporations and to the department of 4 transportation for the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 5 and estimates, for the contract engineering services provided by 6 private firms, and for the acquisition, construction, recon- 7 struction, and improvement of airport or aviation capital projects, 8 including the acquisition of real property, pursuant to the 9 provisions of the rebuild New York through transportation infras- 10 tructure renewal bond act of 1983, in accordance with the schedule 11 set forth below. The moneys hereby appropriated are to be made 12 available for payment of state aid to municipal corporations includ- 13 ing payment of liabilities incurred prior to April one, nineteen 14 hundred eighty-six. The items shown in the project schedule below 15 shall be for projects with a common purpose and may be interchanged 16 without limitation subject to the approval of the director of the 17 division of the budget. 18 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 19 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner shall 20 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 21 program categories listed in the schedule below has received federal 22 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 23 (17238614) (53230) ... ... 5,100,000 .............. (re. $110,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1986, as amended by chapter 54, 25 section 3, of the laws of 1987: 26 For payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 27 incurred prior to April one, nineteen hundred eighty-six, for the 28 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the 29 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of airport or aviation 30 capital projects, including infrastructure improvements at Stewart 31 airport, for the costs of real property acquisition, contract engi- 32 neering services provided by private firms, and other expenses 33 related thereto, pursuant to the transportation capital facilities 34 development act of nineteen hundred sixty-seven, notwithstanding any 35 inconsistent provisions of law. 36 No funds shall be allocated that are directly related to a private 37 facility until the commissioner of transportation enters into a 38 written agreement, subject to the approval of the director of the 39 budget, with such private entity providing that such entity is 40 committed to locate its facilities at Stewart airport and has 41 arranged financing for the costs of construction of such facilities. 42 Funds shall not be allocated from this appropriation for infrastruc- 43 ture improvements or other development purposes not directly related 44 to a private facility until the commissioner of transportation has 45 provided the director of the budget with the following projections 46 to support any such allocation of funds: (a) effect on Stewart 47 airport net operating revenues; (b) effect on new jobs for the state 48 of New York; and (c) effect on net revenues of amortization of state 49 capital expenditures. 50 The commissioner of transportation shall secure and use any federal 51 funds which are or may become available for the purposes of this 882 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 appropriation. Any such funds shall be used to reduce the state's 2 share of project costs for which federal funds become available 3 (17A18614) (53231) ... 19,500,000 ................... (re. $134,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1985, as amended by chapter 54, 5 section 3, of the laws of 1988: 6 For state aid to municipal corporations for the acquisition, 7 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of airport or aviation 8 capital projects, including the acquisition of real property, pursu- 9 ant to the transportation capital facilities development act of 10 nineteen hundred sixty-seven notwithstanding any inconsistent 11 provisions of law, in accordance with the schedule set forth below. 12 The moneys hereby appropriated are to be made available for payment 13 of state aid to municipal corporations including payment of liabil- 14 ities incurred prior to April one, nineteen hundred eighty-five, as 15 defined in the transportation capital facilities development act of 16 nineteen hundred sixty-seven. The items shown in the project sched- 17 ule below shall be for projects with a common purpose and may be 18 interchanged without limitation subject to the approval of the 19 director of the division of the budget. 20 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 21 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner shall 22 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 23 program categories listed in the schedule below has received federal 24 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 25 (17158514) (53230) ... ... 3,700,000 .............. (re. $726,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1984: 27 For state aid to municipal corporations for the acquisition, 28 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of airport or aviation 29 capital projects, including the acquisition of real property, pursu- 30 ant to the transportation capital facilities development act of 31 nineteen hundred sixty-seven notwithstanding any inconsistent 32 provisions of law, in accordance with the schedule set forth below. 33 The moneys hereby appropriated are to be made available for payment 34 of state aid to municipal corporations including payment of liabil- 35 ities incurred prior to April one, nineteen hundred eighty-four, as 36 defined in the transportation capital facilities development act of 37 nineteen hundred sixty-seven. 38 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 39 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner shall 40 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 41 program categories listed in the schedule below has received federal 42 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 43 (17178414) (53230) ... 1,721,000 .................... (re. $313,000) 44 REPUBLIC AND STEWART AIRPORTS 45 By chapter 54, section 7, of the laws of 1973, as transferred by chapter 46 370, section 3, of the laws of 1982, and as amended by chapter 54, 47 section 3, of the laws of 1986: 883 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 To the department of transportation, notwithstanding the provisions of 2 title one of chapter seven hundred seventeen of the laws of nineteen 3 hundred sixty-seven, as amended, or of any agreements entered into 4 pursuant to such provisions (which agreements shall no longer be 5 applicable to such projects), for one hundred percentum of the net 6 project cost of the acquisition, construction, reconstruction and 7 improvement, with expected federal aid as indicated, of airport or 8 aviation capital projects in accordance with the schedule set forth 9 below, including the completion of those of the said projects 10 already commenced, which amount shall be available for the payment 11 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1971, provided that as to 12 any project in the foregoing schedule which has not heretofore been 13 authorized by the legislature in an appropriation act, no certif- 14 icate of approval of availability shall be issued until the commis- 15 sioner of transportation has delivered to the director of the budget 16 his certification that such project is consistent with the 17 provisions of subdivision 1 of section 15 of the transportation law. 18 The amount hereby appropriated is in addition to and supplemental to 19 the amounts heretofore expended from the capital construction fund 20 as part of the "net project cost" as set forth in the schedule 21 below: 22 AIRPORT OR AVIATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 23 project schedule 24 ADDITIONAL 25 ADDITIONAL ESTIMATED ADDITIONAL 26 COMPLETION ESTIMATED FEDERAL NET PROJECT 27 CAPITAL PROJECT DATE TOTAL COST SHARE COST 28 ----------------------------------------------------------------------- 29 (thousands) 30 To supplement the project 31 appropriated by 320/23/71 as 32 supplemented by 34/8/72, for 33 the project reading: 34 "Acquire and develop Republic 35 Airport, including new 36 hangars, administration 37 building, and other capital 38 improvements; 39 acquire lands; 40 close Zahn's Airport" ..... 12/74 $4,205 ........ $4,205 41 ------- ------- 42 Total ................... $4,205 $4,205 43 ======= ======= 44 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, no part 45 of any such appropriation shall be available for the purposes desig- 46 nated until a certificate of approval of availability shall have 47 been issued by the director of the budget and a copy of such certif- 48 icate filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the senate 49 finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means 884 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 committee. Such certificate may be amended from time to time subject 2 to the approval of the director of the budget and a copy of each 3 such amendment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chair- 4 man of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 5 ways and means committee. 6 The moneys hereby appropriated, when made available pursuant to a 7 certificate of approval of availability, issued by the director of 8 the budget, shall be paid from the capital construction fund on the 9 audit and warrant of the state comptroller on vouchers approved by 10 the commissioner of transportation or his duly designated officer 11 (02412614) (53232) ... 4,205,000 .................... (re. $837,000) 12 AIRPORT OR AVIATION PROGRAM--BONDABLE (CCP) 13 Capital Projects Funds - Other 14 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 15 Aviation Purpose 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1991: 17 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 18 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 19 the state share of federally aided projects at Stewart and Republic 20 Airports, for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and 21 improvement of airport or aviation capital projects, including the 22 acquisition of real property, pursuant to the transportation capital 23 facilities development act of 1967 notwithstanding any inconsistent 24 provisions of law, in accordance with the schedule set forth below. 25 The moneys hereby appropriated are to be made available for payment 26 of state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 27 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 28 the state share of federally aided projects at Stewart and Republic 29 Airports, including payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 30 1, 1991, as defined in the transportation capital facilities devel- 31 opment act of 1967. The items shown in the project schedule below 32 shall be for projects with a common purpose and may be interchanged 33 without limitation subject to the approval of the director of the 34 division of the budget. 35 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 36 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 37 transportation shall certify that each airport or aviation project 38 progressed under the program categories listed in the schedule below 39 has received federal approval and the federally authorized level of 40 financial assistance. 41 No funds shall be allocated for projects at Stewart Airport that are 42 directly related to a private facility until the commissioner of 43 transportation enters into a written agreement, subject to the 44 approval of the director of the budget, with such private entity 45 providing that such entity is committed to locate its facilities at 46 Stewart airport and has arranged financing for the costs of 47 construction of such facilities. 48 Funds shall not be allocated for projects at Stewart airport from this 49 appropriation for infrastructure improvements or other development 885 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 purposes not directly related to a private facility until the 2 commissioner of transportation has provided the director of the 3 budget with the following projections to support any such allocation 4 of funds: (a) effect on Stewart airport net operating revenues; (b) 5 effect on new jobs for the state of New York; and (c) effect on net 6 revenues of amortization of state capital expenditures. It is 7 acknowledged that funds provided herein pursuant to the transporta- 8 tion capital facilities development act of 1967 are made available 9 by repealing a portion of an appropriation for the payment of the 10 state's share to the Niagara frontier transportation authority for 11 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of airport or aviation 12 capital projects at Buffalo international airport. It is the intent 13 of the legislature that the repeal of such funds appropriated to the 14 Niagara frontier transportation authority does not void the state's 15 commitment to provide alternative state share funding sources to the 16 authority to complete the airport or aviation capital projects at 17 Buffalo international airport as originally provided by chapter 54, 18 section 1, of the laws of 1982, as amended by chapter 54, section 3, 19 of the laws of 1988. It is further the intent of the legislature 20 that such alternative state share funding be provided to the author- 21 ity no later than March 31, 1993 (17439114) (53271) ................ 22 11,800,000 .......................................... (re. $824,000) 23 AIRPORT OR AVIATION STATE PROGRAM (CCP) 24 Capital Projects Funds - Other 25 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 26 Aviation Purpose Account - 30053 27 Aviation Purpose 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 29 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 30 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 31 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 32 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 33 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 34 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025. 35 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 36 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 37 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 38 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 39 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 40 (17232514) (54293) ................................................. 41 14,000,000 ....................................... (re. $14,000,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 43 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 44 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 45 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 46 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 47 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 48 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024. 886 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 2 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 3 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 4 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 5 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 6 (17232414) (54293) ................................................. 7 14,000,000 ....................................... (re. $13,962,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 9 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 10 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 11 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 12 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 13 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 14 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023. 15 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 16 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 17 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 18 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 19 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 20 (17232314) (54293) ................................................. 21 14,000,000 ....................................... (re. $13,986,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 23 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 24 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 25 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 26 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 27 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 28 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022. 29 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 30 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 31 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 32 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 33 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 34 (17232214) (54293) ... 14,000,000 ................ (re. $11,509,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 36 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 37 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 38 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 39 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 40 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 41 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021. 42 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 43 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 44 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 45 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 46 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 47 (17232114) (54293) ... 4,000,000 .................. (re. $3,876,000) 48 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 887 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 2 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 3 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 4 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 5 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 6 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020. 7 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 8 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 9 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 10 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 11 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 12 Provided, however, that no obligations against, or spending from 13 this appropriation shall be authorized unless the director of the 14 division of the budget certifies that such obligations or spending 15 can be accommodated within the State's multi-year financial plan 16 without adversely affecting the funding available for (a) capital 17 projects currently authorized that are deemed essential to the 18 health and safety of the public, or (b) essential governmental 19 services (17232014) (54293) ... 4,000,000 ......... (re. $1,288,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 21 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 22 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 23 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 24 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 25 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 26 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019. 27 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 28 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 29 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 30 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 31 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 32 (17231914) (54293) ... 4,000,000 .................... (re. $276,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 34 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 35 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 36 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 37 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 38 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 39 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018. 40 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 41 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 42 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 43 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 44 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 45 (17231814) (54293) ... 4,000,000 .................... (re. $134,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 47 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 48 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 49 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 888 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 2 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 3 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017. 4 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 5 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 6 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 7 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 8 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 9 (17231714) (54293) ... 4,000,000 .................... (re. $547,000) 10 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as transferred by chapter 11 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 12 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 13 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 14 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 15 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 16 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 17 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016. 18 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 19 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 20 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 21 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 22 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 23 (17231614) (54293) ... 4,000,000 .................... (re. $129,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as transferred by chapter 25 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 26 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 27 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 28 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 29 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 30 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 31 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2015. 32 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 33 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 34 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 35 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 36 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 37 (17231514) (54293) ... 4,000,000 .................... (re. $675,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as transferred by chapter 39 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 40 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 41 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 42 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 43 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 44 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 45 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014. 46 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 47 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 48 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 49 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 889 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 2 (17231414) (54293) ... 4,000,000 .................... (re. $124,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as transferred by chapter 4 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 5 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 6 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 7 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 8 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 9 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 10 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2013. 11 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 12 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 13 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 14 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 15 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 16 (17231314) (54293) ... 4,000,000 .................... (re. $161,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as transferred by chapter 18 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 19 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 20 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 21 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 22 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 23 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 24 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2012. 25 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 26 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 27 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 28 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 29 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 30 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 31 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 32 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 33 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 34 1, 2012; provided, however, that funds available for this purpose 35 shall not exceed the amount by which $1,000,000 exceeds the sum of 36 the amount in such state fiscal year necessary for the state share 37 of federal projects provided pursuant to section 14-h of the trans- 38 portation law and the amount in such state fiscal year required for 39 payment of the costs of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, 40 upon certification by the commissioner of transportation at the end 41 of the calendar year (17231214) (54293) ............................ 42 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $420,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as transferred by chapter 44 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 45 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 46 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 47 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 48 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 890 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 2 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2011. 3 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 4 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 5 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 6 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 7 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 8 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 9 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 10 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 11 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 12 1, 2011; provided, however, that funds available for this purpose 13 shall not exceed the amount by which $4,000,000 exceeds the sum of 14 the amount in such state fiscal year necessary for the state share 15 of federal projects provided pursuant to section 14-h of the trans- 16 portation law and the amount in such state fiscal year required for 17 payment of the costs of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, 18 upon certification by the commissioner of transportation at the end 19 of the calendar year (17231114) (54293) ............................ 20 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000) 21 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as transferred by chapter 22 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 23 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 24 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 25 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 26 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 27 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 28 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2010. 29 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 30 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 31 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 32 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 33 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 34 (17231014) (54293) ... 4,000,000 .................. (re. $4,000,000) 35 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as transferred by chapter 36 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 37 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 38 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 39 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 40 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 41 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 42 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2009. 43 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 44 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 45 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 46 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 47 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 48 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 49 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 50 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 891 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 2 1, 2008; provided, however, that funds available for this purpose 3 shall not exceed the amount by which $4,000,000 exceeds the sum of 4 the amount in such state fiscal year necessary for the state share 5 of federal projects provided pursuant to section 14-h of the trans- 6 portation law and the amount in such state fiscal year required for 7 payment of the costs of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, 8 upon certification by the commissioner of transportation at the end 9 of the calendar year (17230914) (54293) ............................ 10 4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000) 11 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as transferred by chapter 12 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 13 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 14 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 15 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 16 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 17 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 18 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2008. 19 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 20 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 21 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 22 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 23 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 24 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 25 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 26 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 27 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 28 1, 2008; provided, however, that funds available for this purpose 29 shall not exceed the amount by which $8,000,000 exceeds the sum of 30 the amount in such state fiscal year necessary for the state share 31 of federal projects provided pursuant to section 14-h of the trans- 32 portation law and the amount in such state fiscal year required for 33 payment of the costs of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, 34 upon certification by the commissioner of transportation at the end 35 of the calendar year (17230814) (54293) ............................ 36 8,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,851,000) 37 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as transferred by chapter 38 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 39 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 40 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 41 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 42 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 43 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 44 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2007. 45 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 46 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 47 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 48 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 49 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 892 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 2 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 3 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 4 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 5 1, 2007; provided, however, that funds available for this purpose 6 shall not exceed the amount by which $8,000,000 exceeds the sum of 7 the amount in such state fiscal year necessary for the state share 8 of federal projects provided pursuant to section 14-h of the trans- 9 portation law and the amount in such state fiscal year required for 10 payment of the costs of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, 11 upon certification by the commissioner of transportation at the end 12 of the calendar year (17230714) (54293) ............................ 13 8,000,000 ........................................... (re. $734,000) 14 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as transferred by chapter 15 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 16 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 17 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 18 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 19 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 20 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 21 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2006. 22 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 23 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 24 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 25 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 26 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 27 (17230614) (54293) ... 8,000,000 .................. (re. $1,266,000) 28 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as transferred by chapter 29 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 30 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 31 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 32 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 33 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 34 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 35 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2005. 36 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 37 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 38 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 39 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 40 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 41 (17230514) (54293) ... 8,000,000 .................. (re. $1,111,000) 42 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as transferred by chapter 43 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 44 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 45 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 46 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 47 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 48 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 49 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2004. 893 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 2 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 3 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 4 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 5 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 6 (17230414) (54293) ... 8,000,000 ..................... (re. $38,000) 7 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2002, as transferred by chapter 8 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 9 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 10 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 11 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 12 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 13 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 14 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2002. Prior 15 to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of availability 16 for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation shall 17 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 18 program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 19 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 20 (17230214) (54293) ... 8,000,000 ..................... (re. $66,000) 21 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2001, as transferred by chapter 22 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 23 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 24 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 25 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 26 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 27 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 28 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2001, in 29 accordance with the following project schedule. 30 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 31 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 32 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 33 the program categories listed in a project schedule other than state 34 owned airports, has received federal approval and the federally 35 authorized level of financial assistance. 36 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 37 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 38 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (17230114) 39 (54293) ... 6,000,000 ................................ (re. $41,000) 40 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000, as transferred by chapter 41 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 42 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 43 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 44 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 45 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 46 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 47 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2000, in 48 accordance with the following project schedule. 894 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 2 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 3 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 4 the program categories listed in a project schedule other than state 5 owned airports, has received federal approval and the federally 6 authorized level of financial assistance. 7 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 8 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 9 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (17230014) 10 (54293) ... ... 6,000,000 .......................... (re. $79,000) 11 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999, as transferred by chapter 12 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 13 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 14 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 15 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 16 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 17 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 18 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1999, in 19 accordance with the following project schedule. 20 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 21 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 22 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 23 the program categories listed in a project schedule other than state 24 owned airports, has received federal approval and the federally 25 authorized level of financial assistance. 26 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 27 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 28 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (17239914) 29 (54293) ... ... 4,500,000 .......................... (re. $19,000) 30 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as transferred by chapter 31 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 32 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 33 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 34 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 35 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 36 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 37 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1998, in 38 accordance with the following project schedule. 39 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 40 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 41 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 42 the program categories listed in a project schedule other than state 43 owned airports, has received federal approval and the federally 44 authorized level of financial assistance. 45 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 46 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 47 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (17239814) 48 (54293) ... ... 4,500,000 .......................... (re. $12,000) 895 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997, as transferred by chapter 2 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 3 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 4 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 5 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 6 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 7 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 8 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1997, in 9 accordance with the following project schedule. 10 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 11 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 12 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 13 the program categories listed in a project schedule other than state 14 owned airports, has received federal approval and the federally 15 authorized level of financial assistance. 16 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 17 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 18 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (17249714) 19 (54293) ... ... 4,500,000 .......................... (re. $11,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1995, as transferred by chapter 21 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 22 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 23 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 24 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 25 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 26 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 27 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1995, in 28 accordance with the following project schedule. The items shown in 29 the project schedule below shall be for projects with a common 30 purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to the 31 approval of the director of the budget (17239514) (54293) ... .... 32 6,500,000 ............................................ (re. $60,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1993, as transferred by chapter 34 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 35 For payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 36 incurred prior to April 1, 1993, for the preparation of designs, 37 plans, specifications, estimates and studies, for the construction, 38 reconstruction, and improvement of airport or aviation capital 39 projects, including infrastructure improvements at Stewart and 40 Republic airports, for the costs of real property acquisition, 41 contract engineering services provided by private firms, and other 42 expenses related thereto. 43 The commissioner of transportation shall secure and use any federal 44 funds which are or may become available for the purposes of this 45 appropriation. Any such funds shall be used to reduce the state's 46 share of project costs for which federal funds become available. 47 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 48 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 49 subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg- 50 et (17229314) (53234) ... ... 10,840,000 ........ (re. $1,211,000) 896 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1992, as transferred by chapter 2 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 3 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 4 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 5 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 6 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 7 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 8 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1992, in 9 accordance with the schedule set forth below. 10 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 11 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 12 subject to the approval of the director of the budget. 13 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 14 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 15 transportation shall certify that each airport or aviation project 16 progressed under the program categories listed in the schedule 17 below, other than state owned airports, has received federal 18 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 19 (17239214) (54293) ... ... 12,300,000 .............. (re. $12,000) 20 Capital Projects Funds - Other 21 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 22 Stewart Airport-15 Account - 32210 23 Aviation Purpose 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 25 For state aid to municipal corporations, private airports as author- 26 ized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment of 27 the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, for the 28 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 29 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 30 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2012. 31 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 32 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 33 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 34 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 35 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 36 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 37 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 38 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 39 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 40 1, 2012; provided, however, that funds available for this purpose 41 shall not exceed the amount by which $3,000,000 exceeds the sum of 42 the amount in such state fiscal year necessary for the state share 43 of federal projects provided pursuant to section 14-h of the trans- 44 portation law and the amount in such state fiscal year required for 45 payment of the costs of projects at Stewart and Republic Airports, 46 upon certification by the commissioner of transportation at the end 47 of the calendar year (17241214) (54293) ............................ 48 3,000,000 ........................................... (re. $162,000) 49 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 897 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of costs related to Stewart Airport, including but not 2 limited to environmental remediation; acquisition, construction, 3 reconstruction, demolition and improvement of capital projects; 4 acquisition of real property and facilities; projects related to 5 passenger, cargo, and commercial development; acquisition of equip- 6 ment; funding of operating needs; and for liabilities incurred prior 7 to April 1, 2008 (17RA0814) (53233) ... 4,000,000 . (re. $4,000,000) 8 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 9 For payment of costs related to municipal, private, state owned and 10 public authority airports and aviation facilities, including but not 11 limited to environmental remediation; acquisition, construction, 12 reconstruction, demolition and improvement of capital projects; 13 acquisition of real property and facilities; projects related to 14 passenger, cargo, and commercial development; acquisition of equip- 15 ment; funding of operating needs; and for liabilities incurred prior 16 to April 1, 2006. 17 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 18 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 19 the approval of the director of the budget (17RA0614) (54290) ...... 20 5,300,000 ........................................... (re. $831,000) 21 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999, as amended by chapter 22 108, section 5, of the laws of 2006: 23 For payment of costs related to Stewart International Airport includ- 24 ing, but not limited to, acquisition of real property and facili- 25 ties; construction, reconstruction, demolition and improvement of 26 capital facilities; and payment of liabilities incurred prior to 27 April 1, 1999. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, of 28 amounts appropriated herein, $1,000,000 shall be made available to 29 labor organizations for training programs (17RA9914) (53233) ....... 30 17,500,000 .......................................... (re. $531,000) 31 For payment of the costs of capital projects as set forth in a memo- 32 randum of understanding among the governor, the majority leader of 33 the senate, and the speaker of the assembly (17RD9914) (53235) 34 4,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000) 35 For expenses and payments incurred in implementation of the airport 36 improvement and revitalization program (17RE9914) (53236) .......... 37 2,500,000 ............................................ (re. $69,000) 38 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999, as amended by chapter 39 295, part A, section 1, of the laws of 2001: 40 For payment of the costs of operating and capital projects including, 41 but not limited to, acquisition of real property and facilities; 42 construction, reconstruction, demolition and improvement of capital 43 facilities; and payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 44 1999 (17RB9914) (53237) ... 2,500,000 ............... (re. $757,000) 45 AMERICAN RECOVERY AND REINVESTMENT ACT (CCP) 46 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 47 Federal Capital Projects Fund 898 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 DOT American Recovery and Reinvestment Act Account - 31372 2 American Recovery and Reinvestment Act Purpose 3 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 4 For Transit Capital Assistance funded by Title 12 of the American 5 Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009. Funds appropriated herein 6 shall be subject to all applicable reporting and accountability 7 requirements contained in such act. 8 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 9 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 10 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 11 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 12 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 13 and facilities, including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 14 2009 (170509FS) (53242) ... 26,300,000 ............ (re. $3,085,000) 15 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 17 For Highway Infrastructure Investment funded by Title 12 of the Ameri- 18 can Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009. Funds appropriated herein 19 shall be subject to all applicable reporting and accountability 20 requirements contained in such act. 21 For the payment of eligible costs, including but not limited to 22 construction, reconstruction, replacement, improvement, recondition- 23 ing, rehabilitation, preservation, related appurtenances, equipment, 24 facilities, the acquisition of real property and interests therein, 25 the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 26 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 27 testing and environmental impact statements, including the payment 28 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2009. 29 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 30 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund, including but not limited 31 to personal services, nonpersonal services and fringe benefits, for 32 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 33 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 34 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 35 impact statements, including the payment of liabilities incurred 36 prior to April 1, 2009 (170309FS) (53162) .......................... 37 950,700,000 ...................................... (re. $26,547,000) 38 For Capital Assistance for High Speed Rail Corridors and Intercity 39 Passenger Rail Service funded by Title 12 of the American Recovery 40 and Reinvestment Act of 2009. Funds appropriated herein shall be 41 subject to all applicable reporting and accountability requirements 42 contained in such act. 43 For the payment of eligible costs, including but not limited to 44 construction, reconstruction, replacement, improvement, recondition- 45 ing, rehabilitation, preservation, related appurtenances, equipment, 46 facilities, the acquisition of real property and interests therein, 47 the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 48 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 49 testing and environmental impact statements, including the payment 50 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2009. 899 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 2 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund, including but not limited 3 to personal services, nonpersonal services and fringe benefits, for 4 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 5 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 6 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 7 impact statements, including the payment of liabilities incurred 8 prior to April 1, 2009 (170409FS) (53241) .......................... 9 600,000,000 ..................................... (re. $114,879,000) 10 AVIATION (CCP) 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Transportation Capital Facilities Bond Fund 13 Transportation Capital Facilities Bond Fund Account - 30630 14 Bond Proceeds Purpose 15 By chapter 54, section 9, of the laws of 1981, as amended by chapter 55, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2008: 17 The sum of $17,305,787, or so much thereof as may be necessary is 18 hereby appropriated from the transportation capital facilities bond 19 fund pursuant to the provisions of chapter seven hundred fifteen of 20 the laws of nineteen hundred sixty-seven, known as the "Transporta- 21 tion Capital Facilities Bond Act", for payment to the capital 22 projects fund for disbursements from such fund pursuant to appropri- 23 ations for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction and 24 improvement of any airport or aviation capital facility and of any 25 capital equipment used in connection therewith, by the State, any 26 county, city, town, village, special transportation district, public 27 benefit corporation or other public corporation, or two or more of 28 the foregoing acting jointly in accordance with the provisions of 29 the transportation capital facilities development act and as herein- 30 after referred to as "airport or aviation capital project bond 31 disbursements." 32 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, no 33 moneys shall be available from the transportation capital facilities 34 bond fund until a certificate of approval of availability shall have 35 been issued by the director of the division of the budget, and a 36 copy of such certificate filed with the state comptroller, the 37 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 38 assembly ways and means committee. Such certificate may be amended 39 from time to time by the director of the division of the budget and 40 a copy of each such amendment shall be filed with the state comp- 41 troller, the chairman of the senate finance committee and the chair- 42 man of the assembly ways and means committee. 43 The director of the division of the budget is hereby authorized to 44 designate to the state comptroller specific appropriations made from 45 the capital projects fund for purposes for which airport or aviation 46 capital project bond expenditures are authorized. The state comp- 47 troller shall, at the commencement of each month, certify to the 48 director of the division of the budget, the chairman of the senate 49 finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means 900 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 committee, the amounts disbursed from the appropriations designated 2 by the director of the division of the budget from the capital 3 projects fund for these disbursements pursuant to appropriations 4 from such fund for such purposes for the month preceding such 5 certification and such certifications shall not exceed in the aggre- 6 gate the moneys hereby appropriated (03025510) (80919) ............. 7 17,305,787 ............................................ (re. $1,000) 8 CANALS AND WATERWAYS - BONDABLE (CCP) 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 Capital Projects Fund - Infrastructure Renewal (Bondable) - 30000 11 Canals and Waterways Purpose 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1988, as amended by chapter 54, 13 section 3, of the laws of 1991: 14 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 15 for the contract engineering services provided by private firms, for 16 the acquisition of property, reconstruction and improvement of dams, 17 canal locks, embankments and related structures and facilities on 18 the state barge canal system, including the payment of liabilities 19 incurred prior to April 1, 1988, pursuant to the rebuild New York 20 through transportation infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983. 21 The moneys hereby appropriated, when made available pursuant to a 22 certificate of approval of availability issued by the director of 23 the budget, shall be made available in accordance with the schedule 24 shown below. The items shown in the project schedule below shall be 25 for projects with a common purpose and may be interchanged without 26 limitation subject to the approval of the director of the division 27 of the budget (17328816) (53272) ... ............................. 28 2,823,657 ........................................... (re. $158,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1987, as amended by chapter 54, 30 section 3, of the laws of 1989: 31 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 32 for the contract engineering services provided by private firms, for 33 the acquisition of property, reconstruction and improvement of dams, 34 canal locks, embankments and related structures and facilities on 35 the state barge canal system, including the payment of liabilities 36 incurred prior to April 1, 1987, pursuant to the rebuild New York 37 through transportation infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983. 38 The moneys hereby appropriated, when made available pursuant to a 39 certificate of approval of availability issued by the director of 40 the budget, shall be made available in accordance with the schedule 41 shown below. The items shown in the project schedule below shall be 42 for projects with a common purpose and may be interchanged without 43 limitation subject to the approval of the director of the division 44 of the budget (17208716) (53272) ... ............................. 45 6,200,000 ........................................... (re. $326,000) 46 ENGINEERING SERVICES PROGRAM (CCP) 901 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Department of Transportation Engineering Services Fund 3 Highway Facility Purpose Account - 31951 4 Preparation of Plans Purpose 5 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2002, as amended by chapter 55, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2004: 7 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 8 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 9 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 10 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 11 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 12 mental impact statements for transportation projects. 13 For suballocation of $170,000 to the office of inspector general for 14 services and expenses including fringe benefits .................... 15 (17H10230) (53244) ... 546,256,000 ................ (re. $9,700,000) 16 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 17 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the 18 contract services provided by private firms (17H20230) (53245) 19 57,259,000 .......................................... (re. $526,000) 20 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2001, as amended by chapter 55, 21 section 1, of the laws of 2003: 22 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 23 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 24 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 25 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 26 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 27 mental impact statements for transportation projects. 28 For suballocation of $170,000 to the office of inspector general for 29 services and expenses including fringe benefits (17H10130) (53244) 30 ... 566,922,000 ................................... (re. $7,682,000) 31 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 32 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the 33 contract services provided by private firms (17H20130) (53245) ... 34 53,384,000 .......................................... (re. $334,000) 35 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000, as amended by chapter 55, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2002: 37 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 38 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 39 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 40 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 41 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 42 mental impact statements for transportation projects. 43 For suballocation of $170,000 to the office of inspector general for 44 services and expenses including fringe benefits (17H10030) (53244) 45 ... 513,628,000 ................................... (re. $6,092,000) 46 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 47 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the 48 contract services provided by private firms (17H20030) (53245) ..... 49 51,892,000 .......................................... (re. $830,000) 902 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 2 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 3 private firms (17H30030) (53246) ... 16,684,000 ..... (re. $615,000) 4 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999, as amended by chapter 55, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2005: 6 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 7 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 8 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 9 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 10 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 11 mental impact statements for transportation projects. 12 For suballocation of $170,000 to the office of inspector general for 13 services and expenses including fringe benefits (17H19930) (53244) 14 ... 492,101,680 ................................... (re. $1,815,000) 15 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as amended by chapter 55, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2000: 17 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 18 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 19 private firms (17H19830) (53244) ... ............................. 20 532,078,000 ...................................... (re. $23,709,000) 21 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 22 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the 23 contract services provided by private firms (17H29830) (53245) 24 ... ... 56,876,000 ................................ (re. $674,000) 25 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997, as amended by chapter 55, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2000: 27 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 28 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 29 private firms (17H19730) (53244) ... ............................. 30 490,281,000 ....................................... (re. $5,660,000) 31 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1996: 32 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 33 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 34 private firms. 35 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 36 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 37 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (17H19630) 38 (53244) ... ... 471,758,000 ..................... (re. $2,833,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1995: 40 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 41 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 42 private firms (17H19530) (53244) ................................... 43 470,364,000 ...................................... (re. $19,725,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1994: 45 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 46 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 903 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 private firms (17H19430) (53244) ... ............................. 2 530,329,000 ...................................... (re. $21,829,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1993, as amended by chapter 54, 4 section 3, of the laws of 1995: 5 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 6 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 7 private firms (17H19330) (53244) ... ............................. 8 500,923,000 ....................................... (re. $4,528,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1992, as amended by chapter 54, 10 section 3, of the laws of 1995: 11 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 12 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 13 private firms (17H19230) (53244) ... ............................. 14 455,207,200 ...................................... (re. $15,615,000) 15 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 16 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 17 DOT Federal Account - 25381 18 Preparation of Plans Purpose 19 New York Metropolitan Transportation Council 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 21 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 22 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 23 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 24 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 25 or the federal highway administration (53243). 26 Personal service (17M12530) (50000) ... 5,873,000 ... (re. $4,470,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (17M42530) (57050) ............................... 28 14,841,000 ....................................... (re. $13,864,000) 29 Fringe benefits (17M82530) (60090) ... 3,500,000 .... (re. $2,772,000) 30 Indirect costs (17M92530) (58850) ... 292,000 ......... (re. $128,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 32 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 33 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 34 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 35 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 36 or the federal highway administration (53243). 37 Personal service (17M12430) (50000) ... 5,873,000 ...... (re. $73,000) 38 Nonpersonal service (17M42430) (57050) ............................... 39 14,841,000 ....................................... (re. $11,279,000) 40 Fringe benefits (17M82430) (60090) ... 3,726,000 ...... (re. $150,000) 41 Indirect costs (17M92430) (58850) ... 294,000 .......... (re. $76,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 43 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 44 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 45 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 904 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 2 or the federal highway administration (53243). 3 Personal service (17M12330) (50000) ... 5,873,000 ... (re. $2,203,000) 4 Nonpersonal service (17M42330) (57050) ............................... 5 14,841,000 ........................................ (re. $6,562,000) 6 Fringe benefits (17M82330) (60090) ... 3,786,000 .... (re. $1,447,000) 7 Indirect costs (17M92330) (58850) ... 314,000 .......... (re. $60,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 9 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 10 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 11 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 12 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 13 or the federal highway administration (53243). 14 Personal service (17M12230) (50000) ... 5,873,000 ... (re. $2,410,000) 15 Nonpersonal service (17M42230) (57050) ............................... 16 14,841,000 ........................................ (re. $9,906,000) 17 Fringe benefits (17M82230) (60090) ... 3,743,000 .... (re. $1,613,000) 18 Indirect costs (17M92230) (58850) ... 214,000 .......... (re. $39,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 20 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 21 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 22 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 23 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 24 or the federal highway administration (53243). 25 Personal service (17M12130) (50000) ... 4,518,000 ... (re. $3,310,000) 26 Nonpersonal service (17M42130) (57050) ............................... 27 11,416,000 ........................................ (re. $8,705,000) 28 Fringe benefits (17M82130) (60090) ... 2,795,000 .... (re. $1,754,000) 29 Indirect costs (17M92130) (58850) ... 191,000 .......... (re. $46,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 31 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 32 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 33 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 34 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 35 or the federal highway administration (53243). 36 Personal service (17M12030) (50000) ... 4,518,000 ...... (re. $11,000) 37 Nonpersonal service (17M42030) (57050) ............................... 38 11,416,000 ........................................ (re. $9,389,000) 39 Fringe benefits (17M82030) (60090) ... 2,608,000 ....... (re. $18,000) 40 Indirect costs (17M92030) (58850) ... 221,000 .......... (re. $31,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 42 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 43 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 44 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 45 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 46 or the federal highway administration (53243). 47 Personal service (17M11930) (50000) ... 4,518,000 ..... (re. $138,000) 905 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Nonpersonal service (17M41930) (57050) ............................... 2 11,416,000 ....................................... (re. $10,326,000) 3 Fringe benefits (17M81930) (60090) ... 2,755,000 ...... (re. $384,000) 4 Indirect costs (17M91930) (58850) ... 221,000 .......... (re. $35,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 6 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 7 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 8 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 9 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 10 or the federal highway administration (53243). 11 Personal service (17M11830) (50000) ... 4,518,000 ..... (re. $911,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (17M41830) (57050) ............................... 13 11,416,000 ........................................ (re. $2,682,000) 14 Fringe benefits (17M81830) (60090) ... 2,823,000 ...... (re. $263,000) 15 Indirect costs (17M91830) (58850) ... 287,000 .......... (re. $25,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 17 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 18 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 19 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 20 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 21 or the federal highway administration (53243). 22 Nonpersonal service (17M41730) (57050) ............................... 23 11,416,000 ........................................ (re. $7,488,000) 24 Fringe benefits (17M81730) (60090) ... 2,690,000 ...... (re. $263,000) 25 Indirect costs (17M91730) (58850) ... 197,000 ........... (re. $5,000) 26 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 28 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 29 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 30 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 31 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 32 or the federal highway administration (53243). 33 Personal service (17M11630) (50000) ... 841,179 ....... (re. $744,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (17M41630) (57050) ............................... 35 9,365,163 ......................................... (re. $6,244,000) 36 Fringe benefits (17M81630) (60090) ... 865,985 ........ (re. $865,000) 37 Indirect costs (17M91630) (58850) ... 44,621 ........... (re. $21,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 39 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 40 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 41 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 42 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 43 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 44 or the federal highway administration (53243). 45 Personal service (17M11530) (50000) ... 933,623 ....... (re. $933,000) 46 Nonpersonal service (17M41530) (57050) ............................... 47 8,977,108 ......................................... (re. $6,063,000) 48 Fringe benefits (17M81530) (60090) ... 560,252 ......... (re. $27,000) 906 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Indirect costs (17M91530) (58850) ... 25,886 ............ (re. $2,000) 2 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 3 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 4 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 5 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 6 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 7 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 8 or the federal highway administration (53243). 9 Personal service (17M11430) (50000) ... 383,260 ....... (re. $383,000) 10 Nonpersonal service (17M41430) (57050) ............................... 11 8,138,071 ......................................... (re. $6,941,000) 12 Fringe benefits (17M81430) (60090) ... 235,268 ........ (re. $235,000) 13 Indirect costs (17M91430) (58850) ... 12,741 ........... (re. $12,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 15 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 16 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 17 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 18 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 19 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 20 or the federal highway administration (53243). 21 Personal service (17M11330) (50000) ... 325,828 ....... (re. $325,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (17M41330) (57050) ............................... 23 10,450,902 ........................................ (re. $7,199,000) 24 Fringe benefits (17M81330) (60090) ... 323,259 ........ (re. $323,000) 25 Indirect costs (17M91330) (58850) ... 44,494 ........... (re. $44,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 28 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 29 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 30 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 31 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 32 or the federal highway administration (53243). 33 Personal service (17M11230) (50000) ... 358,282 ....... (re. $358,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (17M41230) (57050) ............................... 35 6,907,424 ......................................... (re. $5,924,000) 36 Fringe benefits (17M81230) (60090) ... 87,098 .......... (re. $87,000) 37 Indirect costs (17M91230) (58850) ... 49,174 ........... (re. $49,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 39 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 40 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 41 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 42 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 43 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 44 or the federal highway administration (17NC1130) (53243) ........... 45 4,520,393 ......................................... (re. $2,615,000) 46 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 47 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 907 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 2 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 3 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 4 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 5 or the federal highway administration (17NC1030) (53243) ........... 6 6,462,022 ......................................... (re. $6,430,000) 7 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 8 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 9 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 10 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 11 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 12 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 13 or the federal highway administration (17NC0930) (53243) ........... 14 3,325,948 ......................................... (re. $2,756,000) 15 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 17 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 18 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 19 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 20 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 21 or the federal highway administration (17NC0830) (53243) ........... 22 5,471,502 ......................................... (re. $4,642,000) 23 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 54, 24 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 25 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 26 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 27 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 28 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 29 or the federal highway administration (17NC0730) (53243) ........... 30 1,080,731 ........................................... (re. $729,000) 31 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 54, 32 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 33 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 34 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 35 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 36 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 37 or the federal highway administration (17NC0630) (53243) ... ..... 38 659,748 ............................................. (re. $659,000) 39 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 54, 40 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 41 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 42 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 43 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 44 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 45 or the federal highway administration (17NC0530) (53243) ... ..... 46 1,494,680 ......................................... (re. $1,343,000) 908 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 3 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 4 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 5 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 6 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 7 or the federal highway administration (17NC0430) (53243) ... ..... 8 442,854 ............................................. (re. $442,000) 9 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 54, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 11 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 12 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 13 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 14 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 15 or the federal highway administration (17NC0330) (53243) ... ..... 16 1,251,229 ......................................... (re. $1,088,000) 17 Watertown Jefferson County Area Transportation Council 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 19 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 20 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 21 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 22 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 23 or the federal highway administration (54203). 24 Personal service (17W12530) (50000) ... 178,000 ....... (re. $178,000) 25 Nonpersonal service (17W42530) (57050) ... 134,000 .... (re. $134,000) 26 Fringe benefits (17W82530) (60090) ... 107,000 ........ (re. $107,000) 27 Indirect costs (17W92530) (58850) ... 9,000 ............. (re. $9,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 29 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 30 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 31 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 32 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 33 or the federal highway administration (54203). 34 Personal service (17W12430) (50000) ... 178,000 ....... (re. $178,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (17W42430) (57050) ... 134,000 .... (re. $131,000) 36 Fringe benefits (17W82430) (60090) ... 113,000 ........ (re. $111,000) 37 Indirect costs (17W92430) (58850) ... 9,000 ............. (re. $2,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 39 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 40 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 41 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 42 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 43 or the federal highway administration (54203). 44 Personal service (17W12330) (50000) ... 178,000 ....... (re. $169,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (17W42330) (57050) ... 134,000 .... (re. $133,000) 46 Fringe benefits (17W82330) (60090) ... 115,000 ........ (re. $109,000) 909 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 2 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 3 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 4 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 5 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 6 or the federal highway administration (54203). 7 Personal service (17W12230) (50000) ... 178,000 ....... (re. $162,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (17W42230) (57050) ... 134,000 .... (re. $134,000) 9 Fringe benefits (17W82230) (60090) ... 114,000 ........ (re. $104,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 11 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 12 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 13 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 14 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 15 or the federal highway administration (54203). 16 Personal service (17W12130) (50000) ... 137,000 ....... (re. $128,000) 17 Nonpersonal service (17W42130) (57050) ... 103,000 .... (re. $103,000) 18 Fringe benefits (17W82130) (60090) ... 85,000 .......... (re. $79,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 20 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 21 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 22 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 23 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 24 or the federal highway administration (54203). 25 Personal service (17W12030) (50000) ... 137,000 ....... (re. $137,000) 26 Nonpersonal service (17W42030) (57050) ... 103,000 ..... (re. $77,000) 27 Fringe benefits (17W82030) (60090) ... 80,000 .......... (re. $80,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 29 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 30 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 31 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 32 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 33 or the federal highway administration (54203). 34 Personal service (17W11930) (50000) ... 137,000 ....... (re. $125,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (17W41930) (57050) ... 103,000 ..... (re. $88,000) 36 Fringe benefits (17W81930) (60090) ... 84,000 .......... (re. $77,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 39 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 40 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 41 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 42 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 43 or the federal highway administration (54203). 44 Personal service (17W11830) (50000) ... 126,000 ....... (re. $118,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (17W41830) (57050) ... 114,000 .... (re. $113,000) 46 Fringe benefits (17W81830) (60090) ... 86,000 .......... (re. $81,000) 910 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 3 For the continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordi- 4 nated support undertaken as part of the united work programs of 5 participating local planning or municipal agreements in accordance 6 with grant agreements approved by the federal transit administration 7 or the federal highway administration (54203). 8 Nonpersonal service (17W41730) (57050) ... 1,261,000 .. (re. $336,000) 9 FEDERAL AID HIGHWAYS BONDABLE PURPOSE (CCP) 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 12 Federal Aid Highways Purpose 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1988: 14 For the state share of highway projects to be reimbursed from the 15 infrastructure renewal bond fund and pursuant to the provisions of 16 that bond act (17028820) (54295) ... 56,000,000 ... (re. $1,419,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1987: 18 For the state share of highway projects to be reimbursed from the 19 infrastructure renewal bond fund and pursuant to the provisions of 20 that bond act (17028720) (54295) ... 66,000,000 ... (re. $1,126,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1986: 22 For the state share of highway projects to be reimbursed from the 23 infrastructure renewal bond fund and pursuant to the provisions of 24 that bond act (17428620) (54295) ... 66,000,000 ..... (re. $356,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1985: 26 For the state share of highway projects to be reimbursed from the 27 infrastructure renewal bond fund and pursuant to the provisions of 28 that bond act (17028520) (54295) ... 66,000,000 ... (re. $1,210,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1984: 30 For the state share of highway projects to be reimbursed from the 31 infrastructure renewal bond fund and pursuant to the provisions of 32 that bond act (17028420) (54295) ... 66,000,000 ... (re. $1,969,000) 33 FEDERAL AID HIGHWAYS FEDERAL PURPOSE (CCP) 34 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 35 Federal Capital Projects Fund 36 Transportation Account - 31354 37 Federal Aid Highways Purpose 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 39 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 40 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 41 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 42 operating costs as provided for in the bipartisan infrastructure law 911 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 (BIL) and related prior and successive federal legislation, and the 2 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025. 3 Notwithstanding section 93 of the state finance law or any other law, 4 rule or regulation to the contrary, all or a portion of the funds 5 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 6 department, agency, or public authority for the implementation of 7 any eligible electric or zero-emission vehicle activities authorized 8 under P.L. 117-58 (17032520) (53163) ............................... 9 3,000,000,000 ................................. (re. $2,933,478,000) 10 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 11 program, of the acquisition of property for state transportation 12 projects including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, 13 reconditioning and preservation, including the payment of liabil- 14 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (17RW2520) (54259) ........... 15 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $49,624,000) 16 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 17 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 18 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 19 fringe benefits, personal services, and nonpersonal services, for 20 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 21 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 22 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 23 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 24 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 and other such purposes 25 as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended 26 (17EG2520) (54260) ... 260,000,000 .............. (re. $260,000,000) 27 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 28 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 29 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 30 the contract services provided by private firms, for activities 31 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 32 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 33 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 34 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 35 incurred prior to April 1, 2025 and other such purposes as specified 36 in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17EC2520) 37 (54261) ... 200,000,000 ......................... (re. $200,000,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 39 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 40 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 41 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 42 operating costs as provided for in the bipartisan infrastructure law 43 (BIL) and related prior and successive federal legislation, and the 44 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024. 45 Notwithstanding section 93 of the state finance law or any other law, 46 rule or regulation to the contrary, all or a portion of the funds 47 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 48 department, agency, or public authority for the implementation of 49 any eligible electric or zero-emission vehicle activities authorized 50 under P.L. 117-58 (17032420) (53163) ............................... 51 3,000,000,000 ................................. (re. $2,171,266,000) 912 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 2 program, of the acquisition of property for state transportation 3 projects including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, 4 reconditioning and preservation, including the payment of liabil- 5 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (17RW2420) (54259) ........... 6 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $48,264,000) 7 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 8 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 9 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 10 fringe benefits, personal services, and nonpersonal services, for 11 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 12 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 13 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 14 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 15 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 and other such purposes 16 as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended 17 (17EG2420) (54260) ... 260,000,000 .............. (re. $260,000,000) 18 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 19 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 20 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 21 the contract services provided by private firms, for activities 22 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 23 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 24 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 25 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 26 incurred prior to April 1, 2024 and other such purposes as specified 27 in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17EC2420) 28 (54261) ... 200,000,000 ......................... (re. $200,000,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 30 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 31 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 32 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 33 operating costs as provided for in the bipartisan infrastructure law 34 (BIL) and related prior and successive federal legislation, and the 35 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023. 36 Notwithstanding section 93 of the state finance law or any other law, 37 rule or regulation to the contrary, all or a portion of the funds 38 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 39 department, agency, or public authority for the implementation of 40 any eligible electric or zero-emission vehicle activities authorized 41 under P.L. 117-58 (17032320) (53163) ............................... 42 3,000,000,000 ................................. (re. $1,599,938,000) 43 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 44 program, of the acquisition of property for state transportation 45 projects including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, 46 reconditioning and preservation, including the payment of liabil- 47 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (17RW2320) (54259) ........... 48 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $47,852,000) 49 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 50 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 51 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 913 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 fringe benefits, personal services, and nonpersonal services, for 2 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 3 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 4 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 5 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 6 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 and other such purposes 7 as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended 8 (17EG2320) (54260) ... 260,000,000 .............. (re. $260,000,000) 9 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 10 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 11 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 12 the contract services provided by private firms, for activities 13 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 14 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 15 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 16 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 17 incurred prior to April 1, 2023 and other such purposes as specified 18 in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17EC2320) 19 (54261) ... 200,000,000 ......................... (re. $200,000,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 22 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 23 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 24 operating costs as provided for in the bipartisan infrastructure law 25 (BIL) and related prior and successive federal legislation, and the 26 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022. 27 Notwithstanding section 93 of the state finance law or any other law, 28 rule or regulation to the contrary, all or a portion of the funds 29 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 30 department, agency, or public authority for the implementation of 31 any eligible electric or zero-emission vehicle activities authorized 32 under P.L. 117-58 (17032220) (53163) ............................... 33 3,000,000,000 ................................. (re. $1,082,633,000) 34 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 35 program, of the acquisition of property for state transportation 36 projects including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, 37 reconditioning and preservation, including the payment of liabil- 38 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (17RW2220) (54259) ........... 39 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $47,880,000) 40 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 41 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 42 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 43 fringe benefits, personal services, and nonpersonal services, for 44 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 45 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 46 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 47 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 48 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 and other such purposes 49 as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended 50 (17EG2220) (54260) ... 260,000,000 .............. (re. $260,000,000) 914 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 2 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 3 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 4 the contract services provided by private firms, for activities 5 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 6 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 7 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 8 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 9 incurred prior to April 1, 2022 and other such purposes as specified 10 in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17EC2220) 11 (54261) ... 200,000,000 ......................... (re. $200,000,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 13 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 14 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 15 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 16 operating costs as provided for in the fixing America's surface 17 transportation (FAST) act and related prior and successive federal 18 legislation, and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 19 1, 2021 (17032120) (53163) ... 2,010,000,000 .... (re. $255,352,000) 20 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 21 program, of the acquisition of property for state transportation 22 projects including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, 23 reconditioning and preservation, including the payment of liabil- 24 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (17RW2120) (54259) ........... 25 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $47,160,000) 26 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 27 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 28 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 29 fringe benefits, personal services, and nonpersonal services, for 30 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 31 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 32 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 33 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 34 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 and other such purposes 35 as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended 36 (17EG2120) (54260) ... 260,000,000 .............. (re. $260,000,000) 37 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 38 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 39 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 40 the contract services provided by private firms, for activities 41 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 42 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 43 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 44 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 45 incurred prior to April 1, 2021 and other such purposes as specified 46 in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17EC2120) 47 (54261) ... 200,000,000 ......................... (re. $200,000,000) 48 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 49 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 50 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 915 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 2 operating costs as provided for in the fixing America's surface 3 transportation (FAST) act and related prior and successive federal 4 legislation, and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 5 1, 2020. Provided, however, that during state fiscal year 2020-21, 6 the department of transportation shall, ten calendar days prior to 7 the start of each quarter or as soon as practicable thereafter, 8 provide to the director of the budget, the secretary of the senate 9 finance committee, and the secretary of the assembly ways and means 10 committee, a schedule of planned highway and bridge capital project 11 lettings to take place during such quarter; and provided, further, 12 that the projects to be let by the department may differ from the 13 schedules so provided due to emergencies, environmental concerns, 14 federal mandates, unforeseen conditions, design changes or other 15 factors (17032020) (53163) ... 2,010,000,000 .... (re. $331,265,000) 16 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 17 program, of the acquisition of property for state transportation 18 projects including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, 19 reconditioning and preservation, including the payment of liabil- 20 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (17RW2020) (54259) ........... 21 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $49,875,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 54, 23 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 24 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 25 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 26 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 27 fringe benefits, personal services, and nonpersonal services, for 28 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 29 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 30 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 31 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 32 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 and other such purposes 33 as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended 34 (17EG2020) (54260) ... 260,000,000 ............... (re. $70,020,000) 35 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 36 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 37 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 38 the contract services provided by private firms, for activities 39 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 40 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 41 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 42 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 43 incurred prior to April 1, 2020 and other such purposes as specified 44 in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17EC2020) 45 (54261) ... 200,000,000 ......................... (re. $182,911,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 47 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 48 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 49 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 50 operating costs as provided for in the fixing America's surface 916 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 transportation (FAST) act and related prior and successive federal 2 legislation, and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 3 1, 2019 (17031920) (53163) ... 2,010,000,000 .... (re. $175,469,000) 4 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 5 program, of the acquisition of property for state transportation 6 projects including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, 7 reconditioning and preservation, including the payment of liabil- 8 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (17RW1920) (54259) ........... 9 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $47,985,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 54, 11 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 12 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 13 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 14 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 15 fringe benefits, personal services, and nonpersonal services, for 16 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 17 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 18 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 19 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 20 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 and other such purposes 21 as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended 22 (17EG1920) (54260) ... 260,000,000 .............. (re. $241,239,000) 23 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 24 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 25 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 26 the contract services provided by private firms, for activities 27 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 28 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 29 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 30 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 31 incurred prior to April 1, 2019 and other such purposes as specified 32 in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17EC1920) 33 (54261) ... 200,000,000 ......................... (re. $131,643,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 35 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 36 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 37 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 38 operating costs as provided for in the fixing America's surface 39 transportation (FAST) act and related prior and successive federal 40 legislation, and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 41 1, 2018 (17031820) (53163) ... 2,010,000,000 .... (re. $187,727,000) 42 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 43 program, of the acquisition of property for state transportation 44 projects including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, 45 reconditioning and preservation, including the payment of liabil- 46 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (17RW1820) (54259) ........... 47 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $48,324,000) 48 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 49 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 917 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 2 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 3 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 4 fringe benefits, personal services, and nonpersonal services, for 5 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 6 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 7 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 8 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 9 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 and other such purposes 10 as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended 11 (17EG1820) (54260) ... 260,000,000 ............... (re. $77,298,000) 12 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 13 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 14 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 15 the contract services provided by private firms, for activities 16 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 17 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 18 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 19 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 20 incurred prior to April 1, 2018 and other such purposes as specified 21 in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17EC1820) 22 (54261) ... 160,000,000 ......................... (re. $113,438,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 24 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 25 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 26 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 27 operating costs as provided for in the fixing America's surface 28 transportation (FAST) act and related prior and successive federal 29 legislation, and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 30 1, 2017 (17031720) (53163) ... 1,950,000,000 .... (re. $139,201,000) 31 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 32 program, of the acquisition of property for state transportation 33 projects including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, 34 reconditioning and preservation, including the payment of liabil- 35 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (17RW1720) (54259) ........... 36 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $37,371,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 39 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 40 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 41 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 42 fringe benefits, personal services, and nonpersonal services, for 43 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 44 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 45 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 46 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 47 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 and other such purposes 48 as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended 49 (17EG1720) (54260) ... 260,000,000 ............... (re. $70,353,000) 918 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 2 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 3 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 4 the contract services provided by private firms, for activities 5 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 6 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 7 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 8 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 9 incurred prior to April 1, 2017 and other such purposes as specified 10 in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17EC1720) 11 (54261) ... 160,000,000 .......................... (re. $72,167,000) 12 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 13 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 14 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 15 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 16 operating costs as provided for in the fixing America's surface 17 transportation (FAST) act and related prior and successive federal 18 legislation, and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 19 1, 2016 (17031620) (53163) ... 1,711,000,000 .... (re. $445,842,000) 20 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 21 program, of the acquisition of property for state transportation 22 projects including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, 23 reconditioning and preservation, including the payment of liabil- 24 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (17RW1620) (54259) ........... 25 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $32,254,000) 26 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 28 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 29 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 30 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 31 fringe benefits, personal services, and nonpersonal services, for 32 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 33 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 34 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 35 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 36 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 and other such purposes 37 as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended 38 (17EG1620) (54260) ... 250,000,000 ............... (re. $84,261,000) 39 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 40 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 41 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 42 the contract services provided by private firms, for activities 43 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 44 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 45 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 46 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 47 incurred prior to April 1, 2016 and other such purposes as specified 48 in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17EC1620) 49 (54261) ... 151,000,000 .......................... (re. $64,062,000) 919 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 2 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 3 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 4 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 5 operating costs as provided for in the moving ahead for progress in 6 the 21st century legislation and related prior and successive feder- 7 al legislation, and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 8 April 1, 2015 (17031520) (53163) ................................... 9 1,600,000,000 ................................... (re. $451,275,000) 10 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 11 program, of the acquisition of property for state transportation 12 projects including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, 13 reconditioning and preservation, including the payment of liabil- 14 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2015 (17RW1520) (54259) ........... 15 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $37,468,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 17 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 18 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 19 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 20 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 21 fringe benefits, personal services, and nonpersonal services, for 22 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 23 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 24 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 25 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 26 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2015 and other such purposes 27 as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended 28 (17EG1520) (54260) ... 225,000,000 ............... (re. $38,093,000) 29 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 30 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 31 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 32 the contract services provided by private firms, for activities 33 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 34 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 35 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 36 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 37 incurred prior to April 1, 2015 and other such purposes as specified 38 in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17EC1520) 39 (54261) ... 125,000,000 .......................... (re. $34,833,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 41 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 42 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 43 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 44 operating costs as provided for in the moving ahead for progress in 45 the 21st century legislation and related prior and successive feder- 46 al legislation, and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 47 April 1, 2014 (17031420) (53163) ................................... 48 1,600,000,000 ................................... (re. $602,719,000) 49 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 50 program, of the acquisition of property for state transportation 920 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 projects including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, 2 reconditioning and preservation, including the payment of liabil- 3 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2014 (17RW1420) (54259) ........... 4 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $17,506,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 7 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 8 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 9 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 10 fringe benefits, personal services, and nonpersonal services, for 11 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 12 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 13 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 14 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 15 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014 and other such purposes 16 as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended 17 (17EG1420) (54260) ... 225,000,000 ............... (re. $46,727,000) 18 For the federal share of engineering costs, or for reimbursements to 19 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of 20 transportation, of the federal share of engineering costs, including 21 the contract services provided by private firms, for activities 22 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 23 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 24 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 25 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 26 incurred prior to April 1, 2014 and other such purposes as specified 27 in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17EC1420) 28 (54261) ... 125,000,000 .......................... (re. $49,416,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 30 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 31 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 32 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 33 the acquisition of property, operating costs as provided for in the 34 Moving Ahead for Progress in the 21st Century legislation and 35 related prior and successive federal legislation, payment of 36 reimbursements to the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the 37 department of transportation, including but not limited to fringe 38 benefits, and the contract services provided by private firms; 39 personal services, nonpersonal services, for activities including 40 but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 41 and estimates; construction management and supervision; and 42 appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact statements 43 for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities incurred 44 prior to April 1, 2013 and any other such purposes as specified in 45 section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17031320) (53163) 46 ... 2,000,000,000 ............................... (re. $533,264,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 48 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 921 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 2 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 3 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 4 the acquisition of property, operating costs as provided for in the 5 Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transportation Equity Act: A 6 Legacy for Users and any successive legislation, payment of 7 reimbursements to the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the 8 department of transportation, including but not limited to fringe 9 benefits, and the contract services provided by private firms; 10 personal services, nonpersonal services, for activities including 11 but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 12 and estimates; construction management and supervision; and 13 appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact statements 14 for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities incurred 15 prior to April 1, 2012 and any other such purposes as specified in 16 section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17031220) (53163) 17 ... 1,800,000,000 ............................... (re. $137,209,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 19 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 20 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 21 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 22 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 23 the acquisition of property, operating costs as provided for in the 24 Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transportation Equity Act: A 25 Legacy for Users and any successive legislation, payment of 26 reimbursements to the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the 27 department of transportation, including but not limited to fringe 28 benefits, and the contract services provided by private firms; 29 personal services, nonpersonal services, for activities including 30 but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 31 and estimates; construction management and supervision; and 32 appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact statements 33 for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities incurred 34 prior to April 1, 2011 and any other such purposes as specified in 35 section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17031120) (53163) 36 ... 1,600,000,000 ............................... (re. $217,280,000) 37 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 39 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 40 program, of state transportation projects including but not limited 41 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 42 the acquisition of property, operating costs as provided for in the 43 Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transportation Equity Act: A 44 Legacy for Users and any successive legislation, payment of 45 reimbursements to the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the 46 department of transportation, including but not limited to fringe 47 benefits, and the contract services provided by private firms; 48 personal services, nonpersonal services, for activities including 49 but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 50 and estimates; construction management and supervision; and 922 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact statements 2 for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities incurred 3 prior to April 1, 2010 and any other such purposes as specified in 4 section 89-b of the state finance law as amended (17031020) (53163) 5 ... 1,725,000,000 ............................... (re. $198,133,000) 6 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 7 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 8 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 9 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 10 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 11 provided for in the Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transpor- 12 tation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users and any successive legis- 13 lation, payment of reimbursements to the dedicated highway and 14 bridge trust fund of the department of transportation, including but 15 not limited to fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 16 by private firms; personal services, nonpersonal services, for 17 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 18 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 19 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 20 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 21 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2009 and any other such 22 purposes as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as 23 amended (17030920) (53163) ... 1,550,000,000 .... (re. $162,908,000) 24 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 25 For the federal share of state transportation maintenance projects 26 including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 27 tioning and preservation, the acquisition of property, operating 28 costs as provided for in the Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient 29 Transportation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users, and any successive 30 legislation, payment of reimbursements to the dedicated highway and 31 bridge trust fund of the department of transportation, including but 32 not limited to fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 33 by private firms; personal services, nonpersonal services, for 34 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 35 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 36 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 37 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 38 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2008 and any other such 39 purposes as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as 40 amended (17440820) (53247) ... 50,000,000 ........ (re. $50,000,000) 41 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 55, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 43 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 44 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 45 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 46 provided for in the Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transpor- 47 tation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users and any successive legis- 48 lation, payment of reimbursements to the dedicated highway and 49 bridge trust fund of the department of transportation, including but 923 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 not limited to fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 2 by private firms; personal services, nonpersonal services, for 3 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 4 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 5 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 6 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 7 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2008 and any other such 8 purposes as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as 9 amended (17030820) (53163) ... 1,915,000,000 .... (re. $128,793,000) 10 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 11 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 12 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 13 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 14 provided for in the Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transpor- 15 tation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users and any successive legis- 16 lation, payment of reimbursements to the dedicated highway and 17 bridge trust fund of the department of transportation, including but 18 not limited to fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 19 by private firms; personal services, nonpersonal services, for 20 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 21 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 22 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 23 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 24 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2007 and any other such 25 purposes as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as 26 amended (17030720) (53163) ... 1,977,299,000 ..... (re. $99,734,000) 27 For the federal share of state transportation maintenance projects 28 including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 29 tioning and preservation, the acquisition of property, operating 30 costs as provided for in the Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient 31 Transportation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users, and any successive 32 legislation, payment of reimbursements to the dedicated highway and 33 bridge trust fund of the department of transportation, including but 34 not limited to fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 35 by private firms; personal services, nonpersonal services, for 36 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 37 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 38 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 39 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 40 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2007 and any other such 41 purposes as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as 42 amended. 43 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 44 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 45 the approval of the director of budget (17440720) (53247) .......... 46 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $14,754,000) 924 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service--regular ...................... 5,000,000 3 Holiday/overtime compensation .................... 500,000 4 -------------- 5 Amount available for personal service .......... 5,500,000 6 -------------- 7 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 8 Supplies and materials ......................... 4,200,000 9 Travel ........................................... 300,000 10 Contractual services .......................... 11,850,000 11 Equipment ..................................... 25,386,000 12 Fringe benefits ................................ 2,534,000 13 Indirect costs ................................... 230,000 14 -------------- 15 Amount available for nonpersonal service .... 44,500,000 16 -------------- 17 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 54, 18 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 19 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 20 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 21 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 22 provided for in the Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Transpor- 23 tation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users and any successive legis- 24 lation, payment of reimbursements to the dedicated highway and 25 bridge trust fund of the department of transportation, including but 26 not limited to fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 27 by private firms; personal services, nonpersonal services, for 28 activities including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 29 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 30 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental 31 impact statements for transportation projects, the payment of 32 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2006 and any other such 33 purposes as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law as 34 amended (17030620) (53163) ... 1,580,000,000 ..... (re. $89,551,000) 35 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 37 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 38 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 39 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 40 provided for in the Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century 41 and any successive legislation, payment of reimbursements to the 42 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 43 portation, including but not limited to fringe benefits, and the 44 contract services provided by private firms; personal services, 45 nonpersonal services, for activities including but not limited to 46 the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 47 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 925 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 2 projects, the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2005 3 and any other such purposes as specified in section 89-b of the 4 state finance law as amended (17030520) (53163) .................... 5 1,580,000,000 .................................... (re. $56,199,000) 6 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 54, 7 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 8 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 9 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 10 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 11 provided for in the Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century 12 and any successive legislation, payment of reimbursements to the 13 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 14 portation, including but not limited to fringe benefits, and the 15 contract services provided by private firms; personal services, 16 nonpersonal services, for activities including but not limited to 17 the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 18 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 19 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 20 projects, the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2004 21 and any other such purposes as specified in section 89-b of the 22 state finance law as amended (17030420) (53163) .................... 23 1,610,000,000 .................................... (re. $67,389,000) 24 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 54, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 26 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 27 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 28 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 29 provided for in the Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century 30 and any successive legislation, payment of reimbursements to the 31 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 32 portation, including but not limited to fringe benefits, and the 33 contract services provided by private firms; personal services, 34 nonpersonal services, for activities including but not limited to 35 the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 36 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 37 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 38 projects, the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2003 39 and any other such purposes as specified in section 89-b of the 40 state finance law as amended (17030320) (53163) .................... 41 1,597,000,000 .................................... (re. $55,742,000) 42 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2002, as amended by chapter 54, 43 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 44 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 45 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 46 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 47 provided for in the Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century 48 and any successive legislation, payment of reimbursements to the 49 engineering services fund of the department of transportation, 926 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 including but not limited to fringe benefits, and the contract 2 services provided by private firms; personal services, nonpersonal 3 services, for activities including but not limited to the prepara- 4 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction 5 management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and 6 environmental impact statements for transportation projects, the 7 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2002 and any other 8 such purposes as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law 9 as amended (17030220) (53163) ... 1,451,000,000 .. (re. $54,637,000) 10 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2001, as amended by chapter 54, 11 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 12 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 13 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 14 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 15 provided for in the Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century 16 and any successive legislation, payment of reimbursements to the 17 engineering services fund of the department of transportation, 18 including but not limited to fringe benefits, and the contract 19 services provided by private firms; personal services, nonpersonal 20 services, for activities including but not limited to the prepara- 21 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction 22 management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and 23 environmental impact statements for transportation projects, the 24 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2001 and any other 25 such purposes as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law 26 as amended (17030120) (53163) ... 1,440,500,000 .. (re. $26,604,000) 27 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000, as amended by chapter 54, 28 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 29 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 30 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 31 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 32 provided for in the Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century 33 and any successive legislation, payment of reimbursements to the 34 engineering services fund of the department of transportation, 35 including but not limited to fringe benefits, and the contract 36 services provided by private firms; personal services, nonpersonal 37 services, for activities including but not limited to the prepara- 38 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction 39 management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and 40 environmental impact statements for transportation projects, the 41 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2000 and any other 42 such purposes as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law 43 as amended (17030020) (53163) ... 1,205,500,000 .. (re. $25,925,000) 44 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999, as amended by chapter 54, 45 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 46 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 47 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 48 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 49 provided for in the Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century 927 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 and any successive legislation, payment of reimbursements to the 2 engineering services fund of the department of transportation, 3 including but not limited to fringe benefits, and the contract 4 services provided by private firms; personal services, nonpersonal 5 services, for activities including but not limited to the prepara- 6 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction 7 management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and 8 environmental impact statements for transportation projects, the 9 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1999 and any other 10 such purposes as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law 11 as amended (17039920) (53163) ... 1,260,000,000 .. (re. $13,439,000) 12 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as amended by chapter 54, 13 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 14 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 15 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 16 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 17 provided for in the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act 18 of 1991 and any successive legislation, payment of reimbursements to 19 the engineering services fund of the department of transportation, 20 including but not limited to fringe benefits, and the contract 21 services provided by private firms; personal services, nonpersonal 22 services, for activities including but not limited to the prepara- 23 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction 24 management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and 25 environmental impact statements for transportation projects, the 26 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1998 and any other 27 such purposes as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law 28 as amended (17039820) (53163) ... 1,175,000,000 .. (re. $25,075,000) 29 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997, as amended by chapter 54, 30 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 31 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 32 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 33 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 34 provided for in the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act 35 of 1991 and any successive legislation, payment of reimbursements to 36 the engineering services fund of the department of transportation, 37 including but not limited to fringe benefits, and the contract 38 services provided by private firms; personal services, nonpersonal 39 services, for activities including but not limited to the prepara- 40 tion of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction 41 management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and 42 environmental impact statements for transportation projects, the 43 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1997 and any other 44 such purposes as specified in section 89-b of the state finance law 45 as amended by chapter 56 of the laws of 1993 (17039720) (53163) .... 46 1,120,000,000 .................................... (re. $31,383,000) 47 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1996, as amended by chapter 54, 48 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 928 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 2 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 3 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 4 provided for in the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act 5 of 1991, payment of reimbursements to the engineering services fund 6 of the department of transportation, including but not limited to 7 fringe benefits, and the contract services provided by private 8 firms; personal services, nonpersonal services, for activities 9 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 10 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 11 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 12 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 13 incurred prior to April 1, 1996 and any other such purposes as spec- 14 ified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended by chapter 15 56 of the laws of 1993 (17039620) (53163) .......................... 16 1,135,000,000 .................................... (re. $26,821,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1995, as amended by chapter 54, 18 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 19 For the federal share of state transportation projects including but 20 not limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 21 preservation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as 22 provided for in the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act 23 of 1991, payment of reimbursements to the engineering services fund 24 of the department of transportation, including but not limited to 25 fringe benefits, and the contract services provided by private 26 firms; personal services, nonpersonal services, for activities 27 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 28 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 29 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 30 statements for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities 31 incurred prior to April 1, 1995 and any other such purposes as spec- 32 ified in section 89-b of the state finance law as amended by chapter 33 56 of the laws of 1993 (17039520) (53163) .......................... 34 908,000,000 ...................................... (re. $59,286,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1994, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 37 For the federal share of state highway projects including but not 38 limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 39 vation, the acquisition of property, operating costs as provided for 40 in the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991, 41 payment of reimbursements to the engineering services fund of the 42 department of transportation, including but not limited to fringe 43 benefits, and the contract services provided by private firms; 44 personal services, nonpersonal services, for activities including 45 but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 46 and estimates; construction management and supervision; and 47 appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact statements 48 for transportation projects, the payment of liabilities incurred 49 prior to April 1, 1994 and any other such purposes as specified in 50 section 89-b of the state finance law as amended by chapter 56 of 929 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the laws of 1993 (17039420) (53163) ... .......................... 2 670,100,000 ...................................... (re. $20,719,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1993, as amended by chapter 54, 4 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 5 For the federal share of highway projects including the state thruway 6 (17039320) (53163) ... ... 780,100,000 ......... (re. $16,967,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1992, as amended by chapter 54, 8 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 9 For the federal share of highway projects including the state thruway 10 (17039220) (53163) ... ... 892,100,000 ......... (re. $26,349,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1991, as amended by chapter 54, 12 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 13 For the federal share of highway projects including the state thruway 14 (17039120) (53163) ... ... 690,000,000 ......... (re. $17,297,000) 15 FEDERAL AIRPORT OR AVIATION (CCP) 16 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 17 Federal Capital Projects Fund 18 Federal Capital Projects Account - 31350 19 Aviation Purpose 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 21 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 22 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025, of 23 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 24 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 25 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 26 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 27 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 28 aviation studies. 29 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 30 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 31 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 32 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 33 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 34 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 35 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 36 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 37 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 38 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 39 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 40 forthcoming (17522514) (53248) ..................................... 41 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 43 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 44 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024, of 45 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 930 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 2 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 3 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 4 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 5 aviation studies. 6 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 7 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 8 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 9 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 10 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 11 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 12 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 13 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 14 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 15 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 16 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 17 forthcoming (17522414) (53248) ..................................... 18 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 21 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023, of 22 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 23 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 24 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 25 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 26 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 27 aviation studies. 28 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 29 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 30 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 31 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 32 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 33 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 34 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 35 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 36 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 37 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 38 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 39 forthcoming (17522314) (53248) ..................................... 40 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 42 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 43 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022, of 44 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 45 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 46 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 47 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 48 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 49 aviation studies. 931 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 2 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 3 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 4 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 5 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 6 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 7 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 8 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 9 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 10 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 11 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 12 forthcoming (17522214) (53248) ..................................... 13 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 15 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 16 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021, of 17 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 18 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 19 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 20 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 21 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 22 aviation studies. 23 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 24 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 25 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 26 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 27 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 28 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 29 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 30 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 31 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 32 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 33 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 34 forthcoming (17522114) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ...... (re. $6,000,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 36 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 37 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020, of 38 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 39 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 40 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 41 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 42 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 43 aviation studies. 44 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 45 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 46 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 47 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 48 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 49 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 50 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 932 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 2 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 3 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 4 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 5 forth-coming (17522014) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ..... (re. $6,000,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 7 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 8 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019, of 9 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 10 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 11 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 12 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 13 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 14 aviation studies. 15 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 16 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 17 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 18 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 19 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 20 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 21 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 22 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 23 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 24 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 25 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 26 forthcoming (17521914) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ...... (re. $6,000,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 28 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 29 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018, of 30 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 31 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 32 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 33 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 34 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 35 aviation studies. 36 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 37 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 38 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 39 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 40 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 41 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 42 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 43 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 44 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 45 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 46 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 47 forthcoming (17521814) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ...... (re. $6,000,000) 48 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 933 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 2 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017, of 3 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 4 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 5 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 6 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 7 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 8 aviation studies. 9 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 10 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 11 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 12 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 13 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 14 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 15 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 16 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 17 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 18 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 19 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 20 forthcoming (17521714) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ...... (re. $6,000,000) 21 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 22 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 23 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016, of 24 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 25 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 26 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 27 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 28 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 29 aviation studies. 30 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 31 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 32 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 33 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 34 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 35 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 36 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 37 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 38 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 39 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 40 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 41 forthcoming (17521614) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ...... (re. $6,000,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 43 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 44 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2015, of 45 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 46 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 47 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 48 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 49 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 50 aviation studies. 934 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 2 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 3 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 4 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 5 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 6 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 7 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 8 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 9 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 10 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 11 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 12 forthcoming (17521514) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ...... (re. $6,000,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 14 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 15 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014, of 16 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 17 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 18 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 19 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 20 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 21 aviation studies. 22 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 23 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 24 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 25 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 26 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 27 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 28 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 29 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 30 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 31 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 32 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 33 forthcoming (17521414) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ...... (re. $2,474,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 35 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 36 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2013, of 37 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 38 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 39 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 40 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 41 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 42 aviation studies. 43 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 44 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 45 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 46 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 47 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 48 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 49 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 50 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 935 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 2 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 3 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 4 forthcoming (17521314) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ...... (re. $2,965,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 6 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 7 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2011, of 8 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 9 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 10 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 11 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 12 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 13 aviation studies. 14 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 15 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 16 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 17 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 18 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 19 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 20 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 21 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 22 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 23 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 24 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 25 forthcoming (17521114) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ......... (re. $83,000) 26 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 27 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 28 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2010, of 29 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 30 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 31 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 32 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 33 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 34 aviation studies. 35 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 36 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 37 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 38 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 39 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 40 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 41 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 42 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 43 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 44 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 45 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 46 forthcoming (17521014) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ...... (re. $3,571,000) 47 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 48 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 49 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2008, of 936 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 2 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 3 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 4 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 5 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 6 aviation studies. 7 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 8 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 9 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 10 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 11 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 12 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 13 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 14 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 15 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 16 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 17 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 18 forthcoming (17520814) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ...... (re. $2,384,000) 19 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 20 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 21 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2007, of 22 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 23 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 24 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 25 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 26 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 27 aviation studies. 28 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 29 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 30 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 31 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 32 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 33 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 34 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 35 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 36 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 37 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 38 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 39 forthcoming (17520714) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ...... (re. $2,041,000) 40 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 41 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 42 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2006, of 43 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 44 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 45 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 46 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 47 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 48 aviation studies. 49 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 50 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 937 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 2 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 3 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 4 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 5 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 6 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 7 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 8 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 9 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 10 forthcoming (17520614) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ...... (re. $1,496,000) 11 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 12 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 13 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2005, of 14 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 15 airport and aviation facilities at Republic airport, including the 16 cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition of equipment 17 and other related incidental expenses thereto and for the federal 18 share of consultant services in carrying out federally approved 19 aviation studies. 20 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 21 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 22 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 23 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 24 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 25 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 26 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 27 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 28 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 29 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 30 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 31 forth coming (17520514) (53248) ... 6,000,000 ....... (re. $113,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1991: 33 For payment by the state of the federal share of the cost, including 34 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1991, of 35 construction, reconstruction, alteration and rehabilitation of 36 airport and aviation facilities at Stewart and Republic airports, 37 including the cost of acquisition of real property, the acquisition 38 of equipment and other related incidental expenses thereto and for 39 the federal share of consultant services in carrying out federally 40 approved aviation studies. 41 Within the amount appropriated herein, authorization is granted to the 42 department of transportation to enter into all necessary contracts 43 and agreements, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 44 et, to carry out the purposes of this appropriation. 45 Prior to requesting a certificate of approval of availability for any 46 of the moneys authorized herein, the commissioner of transportation 47 shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal govern- 48 ment has agreed to finance the federal share of the project. Howev- 49 er with the approval of the director of the budget, projects may be 50 designed prior to federal approval upon the written assurance by the 938 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 commissioner of transportation that federal funds are likely to be 2 forthcoming (17529114) (53248) ... 40,000,000 ..... (re. $1,286,000) 3 HIGHWAY FACILITIES (CCP) 4 Capital Projects Funds - Other 5 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 6 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 7 Highway Facilities Purpose 8 STATE HIGHWAYS 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1987, as amended by chapter 55, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2000: 11 The sum of $37,310,801 is hereby appropriated for the preparation of 12 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the contract engi- 13 neering services provided by private firms, for the acquisition of 14 property, and the construction of highway, bridge and traffic 15 improvements related to the expansion of Fort Drum, with or without 16 Federal aid, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 17 April 1, 1987 (17068711) (53273) ... 36,926,559 ... (re. $9,489,000) 18 STATE GATEWAY INFORMATION CENTERS 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 1986, as amended by chapter 55, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2000, and as transferred from state oper- 21 ations - miscellaneous by chapter 54, section 3, of the laws of 22 1988: 23 For construction of state gateway information centers on the state's 24 major highways by the department of transportation. Such centers 25 shall be established on Interstate Route 90 in the vicinity of the 26 Massachusetts border; on Interstate Route 87 in the vicinity of 27 Chazy in the county of Clinton; on Interstate Route 81 in the vicin- 28 ity of the Canadian border; in Chautauqua county in the vicinity of 29 the Pennsylvania border; on Interstate Route 81 in the vicinity of 30 the Pennsylvania border; and on Interstate Route 87 in the vicinity 31 of State Route 17 (17B18611) (53274) ... 1,999,373 .. (re. $656,000) 32 HIGHWAY - RAILROAD 33 GRADE CROSSING ELIMINATIONS 34 MINEOLA GRADE CROSSING 35 By chapter 998, section 3, of the laws of 1983: 36 For the payment of the State's share of the cost of construction, with 37 or without federal aid, of a grade crossing elimination project in 38 Mineola, Nassau County, including the cost of the acquisition of 39 property and other related work. No expenditures shall be made from 40 this appropriation for services and expenses other than the cost of 41 consulting services (03334811) (53275) ............ (re. $1,773,000) 42 INFRASTRUCTURE BOND ACT PROJECTS (CCP) 939 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 Infrastructure Bond Act Purpose 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1988: 5 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild New York 6 through transportation infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983, of 7 capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund proceeds for the 8 improvement of highways, parkways, commuter parking facilities, and 9 other highway facilities including bridges, other structures, and 10 appurtenances. 11 Project costs funded from this appropriation may include, but shall 12 not be limited to, preliminary planning and feasibility studies; 13 survey and design; acquisition of property, construction, recon- 14 struction, reconditioning and preservation; the supervision and 15 inspection of construction; and for the cost of engineering 16 services. No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation for 17 personal services and expenses other than consulting services. 18 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 19 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 20 subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg- 21 et. 22 Funds from this appropriation may be made available for the payment of 23 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1988 (17068823) (53276) 24 ... ... 22,673,000 .............................. (re. $1,304,000) 25 For payment of the costs of acquisition of real property and for the 26 elimination of existing highway-railroad crossings at grade in 27 accordance with the provisions of article ten of the transportation 28 law or other highway/bridge projects identified in the project sche- 29 dule below, for the costs of preparation of designs, plans, specifi- 30 cations and estimates and for contract engineering services provided 31 by private firms, including the payment of liabilities incurred 32 prior to April 1, 1988, pursuant to the rebuild New York through 33 transportation infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983. The items 34 shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects with a 35 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 36 the approval of the director of the budget (17428823) (53277) 37 ... ... 7,727,000 ............................... (re. $3,311,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1987: 39 For the costs pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild New York 40 through transportation infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983, of 41 the cost of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 42 proceeds for the improvement of highways, parkways, commuter parking 43 facilities, and other highway facilities including bridges, other 44 structures, and appurtenances. 45 Project costs funded from this appropriation may include, but shall 46 not be limited to, preliminary planning and feasibility studies; 47 survey and design; acquisition of property, construction, recon- 48 struction, reconditioning and preservation; the supervision and 49 inspection of construction; and for the cost of engineering 50 services. 940 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation for personal 2 services and expenses other than consulting services. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 4 portation is authorized to acquire all necessary land not on the 5 state highway system for the purpose of highway projects at the 6 request of the locality under whose jurisdiction the project is 7 constructed or reconstructed. 8 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 9 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 10 subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg- 11 et. 12 Funds from this appropriation may be made available for the payment of 13 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1987 (17078723) (53276) 14 ... ... 92,000,000 ................................ (re. $429,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1987, as amended by chapter 54, 16 section 3, of the laws of 1988: 17 For payment of the costs of acquisition of real property and for the 18 elimination of existing highway-railroad crossings at grade in 19 accordance with the provisions of article ten of the transportation 20 law or other highway/bridge projects identified in the project sche- 21 dule below, for the costs of preparation of designs, plans, specifi- 22 cations and estimates and for contract engineering services provided 23 by private firms, including the payment of liabilities incurred 24 prior to April 1, 1987, pursuant to the rebuild New York through 25 transportation infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983. The items 26 shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects with a 27 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 28 the approval of the director of the budget (17088723) (53277) 29 ... ... 8,700,000 ............................... (re. $1,118,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1986, as amended by chapter 54, 31 section 3, of the laws of 1988: 32 For the costs pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild New York 33 through transportation infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983, of 34 the cost of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 35 proceeds for the improvement of highways, parkways, commuter parking 36 facilities, and other highway facilities including bridges, other 37 structures, and appurtenances. 38 Project costs funded from this appropriation may include, but shall 39 not be limited to, preliminary planning and feasibility studies; 40 survey and design; acquisition of property, construction, recon- 41 struction, reconditioning and preservation; the supervision and 42 inspection of construction; and for the cost of engineering 43 services. No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation for 44 personal services and expenses other than consulting services. 45 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 46 portation is authorized to acquire all necessary land not on the 47 state highway system for the purpose of highway projects at the 48 request of the locality under whose jurisdiction the project is 49 constructed or reconstructed. 941 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 2 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 3 subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg- 4 et. 5 Funds from this appropriation may be made available for the payment of 6 liabilities incurred prior to April one, nineteen hundred eighty-six 7 (17068623) (53276) ... ... 76,000,000 ............. (re. $429,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1985, as amended by chapter 54, 9 section 3, of the laws of 1988: 10 For the costs pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild New York 11 through transportation infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983, of 12 the cost of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 13 proceeds for the improvement of highways, parkways, commuter parking 14 facilities, and other highway facilities including bridges, other 15 structures, and appurtenances. 16 Project costs funded from this appropriation may include, but shall 17 not be limited to, preliminary planning and feasibility studies; 18 survey and design; acquisition of property, construction, recon- 19 struction, reconditioning and preservation; the supervision and 20 inspection of construction; and for the cost of engineering 21 services. No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation for 22 personal services and expenses other than consulting services. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 24 portation is authorized to acquire all necessary land not on the 25 state highway system for the purpose of highway projects at the 26 request of the locality under whose jurisdiction the project is 27 constructed or reconstructed. 28 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 29 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation or 30 certification subject to the approval of the director of the divi- 31 sion of the budget. 32 Funds from this appropriation may be made available for the payment of 33 liabilities incurred prior to April one, nineteen hundred eightyfive 34 but not for the payment of liabilities incurred prior to November 35 eight, nineteen hundred eighty-three (17058523) (53276) ............ 36 92,400,000 .......................................... (re. $346,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1984, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 3, of the laws of 1988: 39 For the costs pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild New York 40 through transportation infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983, of 41 the cost of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 42 proceeds for the improvement of highways, parkways, commuter parking 43 facilities, and other highway facilities including bridges, other 44 structures, and appurtenances. 45 Project costs funded from this appropriation may include, but shall 46 not be limited to, preliminary planning and feasibility studies; 47 survey and design; acquisition of property, construction, recon- 48 struction, reconditioning and preservation; the supervision and 49 inspection of construction; and for the cost of engineering 942 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 services. No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation for 2 personal services and expenses other than consulting services. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 4 portation is authorized to acquire all necessary land not on the 5 state highway system for the purpose of highway projects at the 6 request of the locality under whose jurisdiction the project is 7 constructed or reconstructed. 8 The items in the schedule below for the purpose of infrastructure 9 bonds are projects with a common purpose and as such, may be inter- 10 changed without limitation subject to the approval of the director 11 of the budget. 12 Funds from this appropriation may be made available for the payment of 13 liabilities incurred prior to April one, nineteen hundred eightyfour 14 but not for the payment of liabilities incurred prior to November 15 eight, nineteen hundred eighty-three (17278423) (53276) ............ 16 78,600,000 .......................................... (re. $314,000) 17 MAINTENANCE FACILITIES (CCP) 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 20 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 21 Equipment Management Facilities Purpose 22 EQUIPMENT MANAGEMENT FACILITIES 23 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 24 For the purchase of transportation related equipment, including the 25 cost of all vehicles under 8,500 pounds, and including the payment 26 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2003 (17260318) (53251) 27 ... 18,100,000 ...................................... (re. $342,000) 28 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 29 For the purchase of transportation related equipment, including the 30 cost of all vehicles under 8,500 pounds, and including the payment 31 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2002 (17260218) (53251) 32 ... 18,100,000 ....................................... (re. $28,000) 33 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998: 34 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 35 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation and improvement 36 of existing equipment management facilities, for the acquisition of 37 land and construction of new facilities for equipment management 38 purposes, and for the contract engineering services provided by 39 private firms and for the purchase of transportation related equip- 40 ment, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 41 1, 1998 (17269818) (53251) ... 16,300,000 ............ (re. $47,000) 42 Capital Projects Funds - Other 43 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 44 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 45 Highway Maintenance Facilities Purpose 943 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 2 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 3 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 4 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 5 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, for the contract engi- 6 neering services provided by private firms, including the payment of 7 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (17252513) (53249) ... 8 31,634,000 ....................................... (re. $31,486,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 10 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 11 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 12 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 13 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, for the contract engi- 14 neering services provided by private firms, including the payment of 15 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (17252413) (53249) ..... 16 31,634,000 ....................................... (re. $18,580,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 18 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 19 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 20 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 21 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, for the contract engi- 22 neering services provided by private firms, including the payment of 23 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (17252313) (53249) ..... 24 31,634,000 ........................................ (re. $5,484,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 26 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 27 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 28 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 29 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, for the contract engi- 30 neering services provided by private firms, including the payment of 31 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (17252213) (53249) ..... 32 31,634,000 ........................................ (re. $1,941,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 34 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 35 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 36 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 37 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, for the contract engi- 38 neering services provided by private firms, including the payment of 39 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (17252113) (53249) ..... 40 27,405,000 ........................................ (re. $1,345,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 42 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 43 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 44 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 45 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, for the contract engi- 46 neering services provided by private firms, including the payment of 47 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020. Provided, however, that 944 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 no obligations against, or spending from this appropriation shall be 2 authorized unless the director of the division of the budget certi- 3 fies that such obligations or spending can be accommodated within 4 the State's multi-year financial plan without adversely affecting 5 the funding available for (a) capital projects currently authorized 6 that are deemed essential to the health and safety of the public, or 7 (b) essential governmental services (17252013) (53249) ............. 8 27,405,000 .......................................... (re. $270,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 10 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 11 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 12 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 13 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, for the contract engi- 14 neering services provided by private firms, including the payment of 15 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (17251913) (53249) ..... 16 27,405,000 ........................................... (re. $38,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 18 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 19 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 20 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 21 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, for the contract engi- 22 neering services provided by private firms, including the payment of 23 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (17251813) (53249) ..... 24 27,405,000 ........................................... (re. $35,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 26 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 27 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 28 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 29 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, for the contract engi- 30 neering services provided by private firms, including the payment of 31 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (17251713) (53249) ..... 32 15,965,000 ........................................... (re. $21,000) 33 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 34 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 35 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 36 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 37 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, for the contract engi- 38 neering services provided by private firms, including the payment of 39 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (17251613) (53249) ..... 40 15,965,000 ........................................ (re. $8,067,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 42 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 43 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 44 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 45 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, for the contract engi- 46 neering services provided by private firms, including the payment of 945 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2012 (17251213) (53249) ..... 2 15,965,000 ............................................ (re. $9,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 4 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 5 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 6 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 7 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, and for the contract 8 engineering services provided by private firms, including the 9 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2011 (17251113) 10 (53249) ... 15,965,000 ............................ (re. $4,790,000) 11 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 12 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 13 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 14 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 15 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, and for the contract 16 engineering services provided by private firms, including the 17 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2010 (17251013) 18 (53249) ... 15,965,000 ............................ (re. $7,965,000) 19 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 20 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 21 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 22 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 23 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, and for the contract 24 engineering services provided by private firms, including the 25 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2009 (17250913) 26 (53249) ... 15,965,000 ........................... (re. $12,772,000) 27 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 28 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 29 for the acquisition, alterations, and rehabilitation of existing 30 facilities, for the acquisition of land and construction of new 31 facilities for highway maintenance purposes, and for the contract 32 engineering services provided by private firms, including the 33 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2008 (17250813) 34 (53249) ... 15,485,000 ............................ (re. $2,485,000) 35 Capital Projects Funds - Other 36 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 37 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 38 Preparation of Plans Purpose 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 40 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 41 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 42 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 43 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 44 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 45 ronmental impact statements, including the payment of liabilities 946 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (17D12530) (53250) ................. 2 5,771,000 ......................................... (re. $5,231,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 4 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 5 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 6 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 7 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 8 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 9 ronmental impact statements, including the payment of liabilities 10 incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (17D12430) (53250) ................. 11 5,771,000 ........................................... (re. $138,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 14 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 15 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 16 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 17 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 18 ronmental impact statements, including the payment of liabilities 19 incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (17D12330) (53250) ................. 20 5,771,000 ............................................ (re. $64,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 22 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 23 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 24 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 25 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 26 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 27 ronmental impact statements, including the payment of liabilities 28 incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (17D12230) (53250) ................. 29 5,771,000 ........................................... (re. $744,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 31 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 32 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 33 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 34 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 35 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 36 ronmental impact statements, including the payment of liabilities 37 incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (17D12130) (53250) ................. 38 5,000,000 ............................................ (re. $46,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 40 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 41 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 42 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 43 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 44 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 45 ronmental impact statements, including the payment of liabilities 46 incurred prior to April 1, 2020. Provided, however, that no obli- 47 gations against, or spending from this appropriation shall be 947 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 authorized unless the director of the division of the budget certi- 2 fies that such obligations or spending can be accommodated within 3 the State's multi-year financial plan without adversely affecting 4 the funding available for (a) capital projects currently authorized 5 that are deemed essential to the health and safety of the public, or 6 (b) essential governmental services (17D12030) (53250) ............. 7 5,000,000 ............................................ (re. $59,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 9 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 10 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 11 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 12 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 13 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 14 ronmental impact statements, including the payment of liabilities 15 incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (17D11930) (53250) ................. 16 5,000,000 ............................................ (re. $17,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 18 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 19 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 20 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 21 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 22 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 23 ronmental impact statements, including the payment of liabilities 24 incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (17D11730) (53250) ................. 25 2,200,000 ............................................ (re. $14,000) 26 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 27 For payment to the design and construction management account of the 28 centralized services fund of the New York state office of general 29 services for the purpose of preparation and review of plans, spec- 30 ifications, estimates, services, construction management and super- 31 vision, inspection, studies, appraisals, surveys, testing and envi- 32 ronmental impact statements, including the payment of liabilities 33 incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (17D11630) (53250) ................. 34 2,200,000 ............................................. (re. $2,000) 35 MASS TRANSPORTATION (CCP) 36 Capital Projects Funds - Other 37 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 38 Mass Transit Purpose 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 40 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 41 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 42 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 43 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 44 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 45 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 46 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 948 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 portion is federally funded. The moneys hereby appropriated are to 2 be made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems 3 which are outside of the Metropolitan Transportation Commuter 4 District (17KC25MT) (54242) ........................................ 5 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,000,000) 6 Project Schedule 7 Project Amount 8 -------------------------------------------- 9 To the Capital District trans- 10 portation authority for 11 capital projects in support 12 of public transportation 13 services provided directly 14 or under contract .............. 3,596,000 15 To the Central New York 16 regional transportation 17 authority for capital 18 projects in support of 19 public transportation 20 services provided directly 21 or under contract .............. 3,282,600 22 To the Rochester-Genesee 23 regional transportation 24 authority for capital 25 projects in support of 26 public transportation bus 27 services provided directly 28 or under contract .............. 3,985,700 29 To the Niagara Frontier trans- 30 portation authority for 31 capital projects in support 32 of public transportation 33 services provided directly 34 or under contract .............. 5,177,500 35 To all other public transpor- 36 tation systems serving 37 primarily outside the metro- 38 politan commuter transporta- 39 tion district, as defined in 40 section 1262 of the public 41 authorities law and eligible 42 to receive operating assist- 43 ance under the provisions of 44 section 18-b of the trans- 45 portation law, for capital 46 projects in support of 47 public transportation 48 services provided directly 49 or under contract in accord- 50 ance with a formula to be 51 established by the commis- 949 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 sioner of transportation 2 with the approval of the 3 director of the budget ......... 3,958,200 4 -------------- 5 Total ....................... 20,000,000 6 ============== 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 8 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 9 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 10 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 11 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 12 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 13 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 14 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 15 portion is federally funded. The moneys hereby appropriated are to 16 be made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems 17 which are outside of the Metropolitan Transportation Commuter 18 District (17KC24MT) (54242) ........................................ 19 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $19,990,000) 20 Project Schedule 21 Project Amount 22 -------------------------------------------- 23 To the Capital District trans- 24 portation authority for 25 capital projects in support 26 of public transportation 27 services provided directly 28 or under contract .............. 3,596,000 29 To the Central New York 30 regional transportation 31 authority for capital 32 projects in support of 33 public transportation 34 services provided directly 35 or under contract .............. 3,282,600 36 To the Rochester-Genesee 37 regional transportation 38 authority for capital 39 projects in support of 40 public transportation bus 41 services provided directly 42 or under contract .............. 3,985,700 43 To the Niagara Frontier trans- 44 portation authority for 45 capital projects in support 46 of public transportation 47 services provided directly 48 or under contract .............. 5,177,500 49 To all other public transpor- 50 tation systems serving 950 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 primarily outside the metro- 2 politan commuter transporta- 3 tion district, as defined in 4 section 1262 of the public 5 authorities law and eligible 6 to receive operating assist- 7 ance under the provisions of 8 section 18-b of the trans- 9 portation law, for capital 10 projects in support of 11 public transportation 12 services provided directly 13 or under contract in accord- 14 ance with a formula to be 15 established by the commis- 16 sioner of transportation 17 with the approval of the 18 director of the budget ......... 3,958,200 19 -------------- 20 Total ....................... 20,000,000 21 ============== 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 23 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 24 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 25 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 26 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 27 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 28 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 29 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 30 portion is federally funded. The moneys hereby appropriated are to 31 be made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems 32 which are outside of the Metropolitan Transportation Commuter 33 District (17KC23MT) (54242) ........................................ 34 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $13,310,000) 35 Project Schedule 36 Project Amount 37 -------------------------------------------- 38 To the Capital District trans- 39 portation authority for 40 capital projects in support 41 of public transportation 42 services provided directly 43 or under contract .............. 3,596,000 44 To the Central New York 45 regional transportation 46 authority for capital 47 projects in support of 48 public transportation 49 services provided directly 951 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 or under contract .............. 3,282,600 2 To the Rochester-Genesee 3 regional transportation 4 authority for capital 5 projects in support of 6 public transportation bus 7 services provided directly 8 or under contract .............. 3,985,700 9 To the Niagara Frontier trans- 10 portation authority for 11 capital projects in support 12 of public transportation 13 services provided directly 14 or under contract .............. 5,177,500 15 To all other public transpor- 16 tation systems serving 17 primarily outside the metro- 18 politan commuter transporta- 19 tion district, as defined in 20 section 1262 of the public 21 authorities law and eligible 22 to receive operating assist- 23 ance under the provisions of 24 section 18-b of the trans- 25 portation law, for capital 26 projects in support of 27 public transportation 28 services provided directly 29 or under contract in accord- 30 ance with a formula to be 31 established by the commis- 32 sioner of transportation 33 with the approval of the 34 director of the budget ......... 3,958,200 35 -------------- 36 Total ....................... 20,000,000 37 ============== 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 39 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 40 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 41 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 42 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 43 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 44 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 45 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 46 portion is federally funded. The moneys hereby appropriated are to 47 be made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems 48 which are outside of the Metropolitan Transportation Commuter 49 District (17KC22MT) (54242) ........................................ 50 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,885,000) 952 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Project Schedule 2 Project Amount 3 -------------------------------------------- 4 To the Capital District trans- 5 portation authority for 6 capital projects in support 7 of public transportation 8 services provided directly 9 or under contract .............. 3,596,000 10 To the Central New York 11 regional transportation 12 authority for capital 13 projects in support of 14 public transportation 15 services provided directly 16 or under contract .............. 3,282,600 17 To the Rochester-Genesee 18 regional transportation 19 authority for capital 20 projects in support of 21 public transportation bus 22 services provided directly 23 or under contract .............. 3,985,700 24 To the Niagara Frontier trans- 25 portation authority for 26 capital projects in support 27 of public transportation 28 services provided directly 29 or under contract .............. 5,177,500 30 To all other public transpor- 31 tation systems serving 32 primarily outside the metro- 33 politan commuter transporta- 34 tion district, as defined in 35 section 1262 of the public 36 authorities law and eligible 37 to receive operating assist- 38 ance under the provisions of 39 section 18-b of the trans- 40 portation law, for capital 41 projects in support of 42 public transportation 43 services provided directly 44 or under contract in accord- 45 ance with a formula to be 46 established by the commis- 47 sioner of transportation 48 with the approval of the 49 director of the budget ......... 3,958,200 50 -------------- 51 Total ....................... 20,000,000 52 ============== 953 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 2 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 3 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 4 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 5 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 6 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 7 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 8 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 9 portion is federally funded. The moneys hereby appropriated are to 10 be made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems 11 which are outside of the Metropolitan Transportation Commuter 12 District (17KC21MT) (54242) ........................................ 13 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,553,000) 14 Project Schedule 15 Project Amount 16 -------------------------------------------- 17 To the Capital District trans- 18 portation authority for 19 capital projects in support 20 of public transportation 21 services provided directly 22 or under contract .............. 3,596,000 23 To the Central New York 24 regional transportation 25 authority for capital 26 projects in support of 27 public transportation 28 services provided directly 29 or under contract .............. 3,282,600 30 To the Rochester-Genesee 31 regional transportation 32 authority for capital 33 projects in support of 34 public transportation bus 35 services provided directly 36 or under contract .............. 3,985,700 37 To the Niagara Frontier trans- 38 portation authority for 39 capital projects in support 40 of public transportation 41 services provided directly 42 or under contract .............. 5,177,500 43 To all other public transpor- 44 tation systems serving 45 primarily outside the metro- 46 politan commuter transporta- 47 tion district, as defined in 48 section 1262 of the public 49 authorities law and eligible 50 to receive operating assist- 51 ance under the provisions of 954 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 section 18-b of the trans- 2 portation law, for capital 3 projects in support of 4 public transportation 5 services provided directly 6 or under contract in accord- 7 ance with a formula to be 8 established by the commis- 9 sioner of transportation 10 with the approval of the 11 director of the budget ......... 3,958,200 12 -------------- 13 Total ....................... 20,000,000 14 ============== 15 For the Metropolitan Transportation Authority for the costs of renam- 16 ing the Newkirk Avenue subway station on the IRT Nostrand Avenue 17 line of the New York city subway to the Newkirk Avenue - Little 18 Haiti station (17SC21MT) (54228) ... 250,000 ........ (re. $250,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 20 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 21 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 22 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 23 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 24 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 25 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 26 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 27 portion is federally funded. The moneys hereby appropriated are to 28 be made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems 29 which are outside of the Metropolitan Transportation Commuter 30 District. Provided, however, that no obligations against, or spend- 31 ing from this appropriation shall be authorized unless the director 32 of the division of the budget certifies that such obligations or 33 spending can be accommodated within the State's multi-year financial 34 plan without adversely affecting the funding available for (a) capi- 35 tal projects currently authorized that are deemed essential to the 36 health and safety of the public, or (b) essential governmental 37 services (17KC20MT) (54242) ... 20,000,000 ........ (re. $2,080,000) 38 Project Schedule 39 Project Amount 40 -------------------------------------------- 41 To the Capital District trans- 42 portation authority for 43 capital projects in support 44 of public transportation 45 services provided directly 46 or under contract .............. 3,596,000 47 To the Central New York 48 regional transportation 49 authority for capital 955 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 projects in support of 2 public transportation 3 services provided directly 4 or under contract .............. 3,282,600 5 To the Rochester-Genesee 6 regional transportation 7 authority for capital 8 projects in support of 9 public transportation bus 10 services provided directly 11 or under contract .............. 3,985,700 12 To the Niagara Frontier trans- 13 portation authority for 14 capital projects in support 15 of public transportation 16 services provided directly 17 or under contract .............. 5,177,500 18 To all other public transpor- 19 tation systems serving 20 primarily outside the metro- 21 politan commuter transporta- 22 tion district, as defined in 23 section 1262 of the public 24 authorities law and eligible 25 to receive operating assist- 26 ance under the provisions of 27 section 18-b of the trans- 28 portation law, for capital 29 projects in support of 30 public transportation 31 services provided directly 32 or under contract in accord- 33 ance with a formula to be 34 established by the commis- 35 sioner of transportation 36 with the approval of the 37 director of the budget ......... 3,958,200 38 -------------- 39 Total ....................... 20,000,000 40 ============== 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 42 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 43 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 44 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 45 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 46 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 47 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 48 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 49 portion is federally funded. The moneys hereby appropriated are to 50 be made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems 956 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 which are outside of the Metropolitan Transportation Commuter 2 District (17KC19MT) (54242) ... 20,000,000 .......... (re. $705,000) 3 Project Schedule 4 Project Amount 5 -------------------------------------------- 6 To the Capital District trans- 7 portation authority for 8 capital projects in support 9 of public transportation 10 services provided directly 11 or under contract .............. 3,596,000 12 To the Central New York 13 regional transportation 14 authority for capital 15 projects in support of 16 public transportation 17 services provided directly 18 or under contract .............. 3,282,600 19 To the Rochester-Genesee 20 regional transportation 21 authority for capital 22 projects in support of 23 public transportation bus 24 services provided directly 25 or under contract .............. 3,985,700 26 To the Niagara Frontier trans- 27 portation authority for 28 capital projects in support 29 of public transportation 30 services provided directly 31 or under contract .............. 5,177,500 32 To all other public transpor- 33 tation systems serving 34 primarily outside the metro- 35 politan commuter transporta- 36 tion district, as defined in 37 section 1262 of the public 38 authorities law and eligible 39 to receive operating assist- 40 ance under the provisions of 41 section 18-b of the trans- 42 portation law, for capital 43 projects in support of 44 public transportation 45 services provided directly 46 or under contract in accord- 47 ance with a formula to be 48 established by the commis- 49 sioner of transportation 50 with the approval of the 51 director of the budget ......... 3,958,200 957 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 -------------- 2 Total ....................... 20,000,000 3 ============== 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 5 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 6 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 7 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 8 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 9 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 10 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 11 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 12 portion is federally funded. The moneys hereby appropriated are to 13 be made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems 14 which are outside of the Metropolitan Transportation Commuter 15 District (17KC18MT) (54242) ... 20,000,000 ........ (re. $2,123,000) 16 Project Schedule 17 Project Amount 18 -------------------------------------------- 19 To the Capital District trans- 20 portation authority for 21 capital projects in support 22 of public transportation 23 services provided directly 24 or under contract .............. 3,596,000 25 To the Central New York 26 regional transportation 27 authority for capital 28 projects in support of 29 public transportation 30 services provided directly 31 or under contract .............. 3,282,600 32 To the Rochester-Genesee 33 regional transportation 34 authority for capital 35 projects in support of 36 public transportation bus 37 services provided directly 38 or under contract .............. 3,985,700 39 To the Niagara Frontier trans- 40 portation authority for 41 capital projects in support 42 of public transportation 43 services provided directly 44 or under contract .............. 5,177,500 45 To all other public transpor- 46 tation systems serving 47 primarily outside the metro- 48 politan commuter transporta- 49 tion district, as defined in 50 section 1262 of the public 958 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 authorities law and eligible 2 to receive operating assist- 3 ance under the provisions of 4 section 18-b of the trans- 5 portation law, for capital 6 projects in support of 7 public transportation 8 services provided directly 9 or under contract in accord- 10 ance with a formula to be 11 established by the commis- 12 sioner of transportation 13 with the approval of the 14 director of the budget ......... 3,958,200 15 -------------- 16 Total ....................... 20,000,000 17 ============== 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 19 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 20 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 21 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 22 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 23 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 24 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 25 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 26 portion is federally funded. The moneys hereby appropriated are to 27 be made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems 28 which are outside of the Metropolitan Transportation Commuter 29 District (17KC17MT) (54242) ... 20,000,000 ........ (re. $1,371,000) 30 Project Schedule 31 Project Amount 32 -------------------------------------------- 33 To the Capital District trans- 34 portation authority for 35 capital projects in support 36 of public transportation 37 services provided directly 38 or under contract .............. 3,596,000 39 To the Central New York 40 regional transportation 41 authority for capital 42 projects in support of 43 public transportation 44 services provided directly 45 or under contract .............. 3,282,600 46 To the Rochester-Genesee 47 regional transportation 48 authority for capital 49 projects in support of 50 public transportation bus 959 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 services provided directly 2 or under contract .............. 3,985,700 3 To the Niagara Frontier trans- 4 portation authority for 5 capital projects in support 6 of public transportation 7 services provided directly 8 or under contract .............. 5,177,500 9 To all other public transpor- 10 tation systems serving 11 primarily outside the metro- 12 politan commuter transporta- 13 tion district, as defined in 14 section 1262 of the public 15 authorities law and eligible 16 to receive operating assist- 17 ance under the provisions of 18 section 18-b of the trans- 19 portation law, for capital 20 projects in support of 21 public transportation 22 services provided directly 23 or under contract in accord- 24 ance with a formula to be 25 established by the commis- 26 sioner of transportation 27 with the approval of the 28 director of the budget ......... 3,958,200 29 -------------- 30 Total ....................... 20,000,000 31 ============== 32 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 33 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 34 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 35 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 36 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 37 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 38 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 39 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 40 portion is federally funded. The moneys hereby appropriated are to 41 be made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems 42 which are outside of the Metropolitan Transportation Commuter 43 District (17KC16MT) (54242) ... 20,000,000 ........ (re. $1,894,000) 44 Project Schedule 45 Project Amount 46 -------------------------------------------- 47 To the Capital District trans- 48 portation authority for 49 capital projects in support 50 of public transportation 960 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 services provided directly 2 or under contract .............. 3,596,000 3 To the Central New York 4 regional transportation 5 authority for capital 6 projects in support of 7 public transportation 8 services provided directly 9 or under contract .............. 3,282,600 10 To the Rochester-Genesee 11 regional transportation 12 authority for capital 13 projects in support of 14 public transportation bus 15 services provided directly 16 or under contract .............. 3,985,700 17 To the Niagara Frontier trans- 18 portation authority for 19 capital projects in support 20 of public transportation 21 services provided directly 22 or under contract .............. 5,177,500 23 To all other public transpor- 24 tation systems serving 25 primarily outside the metro- 26 politan commuter transporta- 27 tion district, as defined in 28 section 1262 of the public 29 authorities law and eligible 30 to receive operating assist- 31 ance under the provisions of 32 section 18-b of the trans- 33 portation law, for capital 34 projects in support of 35 public transportation 36 services provided directly 37 or under contract in accord- 38 ance with a formula to be 39 established by the commis- 40 sioner of transportation 41 with the approval of the 42 director of the budget ......... 3,958,200 43 -------------- 44 Total ....................... 20,000,000 45 ============== 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 47 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 48 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 49 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 50 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 51 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 961 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 2 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 3 portion is federally funded. The moneys hereby appropriated are to 4 be made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems 5 which are outside of the Metropolitan Transportation Commuter 6 District (17KC15MT) (54242) ... 15,000,000 .......... (re. $511,000) 7 Project Schedule 8 Project Amount 9 -------------------------------------------- 10 To the Capital District trans- 11 portation authority for 12 capital projects in support 13 of public transportation 14 services provided directly 15 or under contract .............. 2,697,022 16 To the Central New York 17 regional transportation 18 authority for capital 19 projects in support of 20 public transportation 21 services provided directly 22 or under contract .............. 2,461,947 23 To the Rochester-Genesee 24 regional transportation 25 authority for capital 26 projects in support of 27 public transportation bus 28 services provided directly 29 or under contract .............. 2,989,262 30 To the Niagara Frontier trans- 31 portation authority for 32 capital projects in support 33 of public transportation 34 services provided directly 35 or under contract .............. 3,883,115 36 To all other public transpor- 37 tation systems serving 38 primarily outside the metro- 39 politan commuter transporta- 40 tion district, as defined in 41 section 1262 of the public 42 authorities law and eligible 43 to receive operating assist- 44 ance under the provisions of 45 section 18-b of the trans- 46 portation law, for capital 47 projects in support of 48 public transportation 49 services provided directly 50 or under contract in accord- 51 ance with a formula to be 962 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 established by the commis- 2 sioner of transportation 3 with the approval of the 4 director of the budget ......... 2,968,654 5 -------------- 6 Total ....................... 15,000,000 7 -------------- 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 55, 9 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 10 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following 11 appropriations are for payment of capital expenses including but not 12 limited to the planning and design, acquisition, construction, 13 reconstruction, replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabili- 14 tation and preservation of mass transit facilities, vehicles, 15 related equipment and rolling stock with an average service life of 16 no less than 5 years. Such elements will be set forth in plans to be 17 approved by the director of the budget (17KW15MT) (54271) .......... 18 121,547,600 ....................................... (re. $1,476,000) 19 Project Schedule 20 Project Amount 21 -------------------------------------------- 22 To the metropolitan transpor- 23 tation authority for capital 24 projects in support of 25 public transportation 26 services provided directly 27 or under contract ............ 104,127,375 28 To the county of Rockland for 29 capital projects in support 30 of public transportation 31 services provided directly 32 or under contract ................ 193,212 33 To the city of New York for 34 capital projects in support 35 of the Staten Island ferry ..... 1,884,829 36 To the county of Westchester 37 for capital projects in 38 support of public transpor- 39 tation services provided 40 directly or under contract ..... 3,163,599 41 To the county of Nassau for 42 capital projects in support 43 of public transportation 44 services provided directly 45 or under contract .............. 3,826,323 46 To the county of Suffolk for 47 capital projects in support 48 of public transportation 49 services provided directly 963 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 or under contract .............. 1,488,296 2 To the city of New York for 3 capital projects in support 4 of public transportation bus 5 services provided directly 6 or under contract .............. 5,036,899 7 To all other public transpor- 8 tation systems serving 9 primarily within the metro- 10 politan commuter transporta- 11 tion district, as defined in 12 section 1262 of the public 13 authorities law and eligible 14 to receive operating assist- 15 ance under the provisions of 16 section 18-b of the trans- 17 portation law, for capital 18 projects in support of 19 public transportation 20 services provided directly 21 or under contract in accord- 22 ance with a formula to be 23 established by the commis- 24 sioner of transportation 25 with the approval of the 26 director of the budget ......... 1,827,067 27 -------------- 28 Total ........................ 121,547,600 29 -------------- 30 Capital Projects Funds - Other 31 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 32 Omnibus and Transit Purpose 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 34 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 35 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 36 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 37 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 38 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 39 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 40 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 41 non-federal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 42 percent of project costs. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 44 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 45 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 46 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 47 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 48 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 49 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 964 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 2 for capital expenses. 3 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the non- 4 federal share of the federally authorized level of financial assist- 5 ance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state share 6 exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting reimburse- 7 ment for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the City, the 8 City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation that each 9 eligible project progressed under this provision is federally eligi- 10 ble and that the match amount requested does not exceed the state 11 share of the federally authorized level of financial assistance. In 12 addition, the City must provide an application to the commissioner 13 of transportation certifying that the work to be funded under the 14 project has been performed and that the City has reimbursed the MTA 15 for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. Upon such 16 application, the commissioner of transportation shall review and 17 approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 18 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 19 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 20 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 21 under the program has received federal approval. 22 Such certificate shall report the federally authorized level of finan- 23 cial assistance (17OM2529) (53252) ................................. 24 30,600,000 ....................................... (re. $30,600,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 27 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 28 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 29 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 30 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 31 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 32 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 33 non-federal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 34 percent of project costs. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 36 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 37 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 38 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 39 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 40 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 41 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 42 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 43 for capital expenses. 44 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the non- 45 federal share of the federally authorized level of financial assist- 46 ance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state share 47 exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting reimburse- 48 ment for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the City, the 49 City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation that each 50 eligible project progressed under this provision is federally eligi- 51 ble and that the match amount requested does not exceed the state 965 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 share of the federally authorized level of financial assistance. In 2 addition, the City must provide an application to the commissioner 3 of transportation certifying that the work to be funded under the 4 project has been performed and that the City has reimbursed the MTA 5 for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. Upon such 6 application, the commissioner of transportation shall review and 7 approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 8 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 9 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 10 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 11 under the program has received federal approval. 12 Such certificate shall report the federally authorized level of finan- 13 cial assistance (17OM2429) (53252) ................................. 14 30,600,000 ....................................... (re. $30,600,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 16 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 17 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 18 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 19 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 20 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 21 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 22 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 23 non-federal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 24 percent of project costs. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 26 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 27 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 28 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 29 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 30 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 31 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 32 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 33 for capital expenses. The state share of such reimbursement shall 34 be 50 percent of the non-federal share of the federally authorized 35 level of financial assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no 36 event shall the state share exceed 10 percent of project costs. 37 Prior to requesting reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA 38 on behalf of the City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of 39 transportation that each eligible project progressed under this 40 provision is federally eligible and that the match amount requested 41 does not exceed the state share of the federally authorized level of 42 financial assistance. In addition, the City must provide an applica- 43 tion to the commissioner of transportation certifying that the work 44 to be funded under the project has been performed and that the City 45 has reimbursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the 46 project. Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation 47 shall review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 48 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 49 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 50 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 51 under the program has received federal approval. 966 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Such certificate shall report the federally authorized level of finan- 2 cial assistance (17OM2329) (53252) ................................. 3 30,600,000 ....................................... (re. $20,590,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 5 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 6 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 7 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 8 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 9 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 10 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 11 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 12 non-federal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 13 percent of project costs. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 15 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 16 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 17 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 18 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 19 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 20 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 21 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 22 for capital expenses. 23 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the non- 24 federal share of the federally authorized level of financial assist- 25 ance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state share 26 exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting reimburse- 27 ment for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the City, the 28 City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation that each 29 eligible project progressed under this provision is federally eligi- 30 ble and that the match amount requested does not exceed the state 31 share of the federally authorized level of financial assistance. In 32 addition, the City must provide an application to the commissioner 33 of transportation certifying that the work to be funded under the 34 project has been performed and that the City has reimbursed the MTA 35 for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. Upon such 36 application, the commissioner of transportation shall review and 37 approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 38 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 39 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 40 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 41 under the program has received federal approval. 42 Such certificate shall report the federally authorized level of finan- 43 cial assistance (17OM2229) (53252) ................................. 44 30,600,000 ....................................... (re. $27,153,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 46 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 47 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 48 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 49 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 50 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 967 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 2 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 3 non-federal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 4 percent of project costs. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 6 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 7 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 8 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 9 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 10 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 11 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 12 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 13 for capital expenses. 14 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the non- 15 federal share of the federally authorized level of financial assist- 16 ance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state share 17 exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting reimburse- 18 ment for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the City, the 19 City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation that each 20 eligible project progressed under this provision is federally eligi- 21 ble and that the match amount requested does not exceed the state 22 share of the federally authorized level of financial assistance. In 23 addition, the City must provide an application to the commissioner 24 of transportation certifying that the work to be funded under the 25 project has been performed and that the City has reimbursed the MTA 26 for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. Upon such 27 application, the commissioner of transportation shall review and 28 approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 29 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 30 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 31 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 32 under the program has received federal approval. 33 Such certificate shall report the federally authorized level of finan- 34 cial assistance (17OM2129) (53252) ................................. 35 18,500,000 ........................................ (re. $2,559,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 37 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 38 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 39 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 40 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 41 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 42 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 43 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 44 non-federal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 45 percent of project costs. 46 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 47 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 48 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 49 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 50 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 51 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 968 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 2 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 3 for capital expenses. 4 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the non- 5 federal share of the federally authorized level of financial assist- 6 ance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state share 7 exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting reimburse- 8 ment for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the City, the 9 City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation that each 10 eligible project progressed under this provision is federally eligi- 11 ble and that the match amount requested does not exceed the state 12 share of the federally authorized level of financial assistance. In 13 addition, the City must provide an application to the commissioner 14 of transportation certifying that the work to be funded under the 15 project has been performed and that the City has reimbursed the MTA 16 for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. Upon such 17 application, the commissioner of transportation shall review and 18 approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 19 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 20 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 21 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 22 under the program has received federal approval. 23 Such certificate shall report the federally authorized level of finan- 24 cial assistance. Provided, however, that no obligations against, or 25 spending from this appropriation shall be authorized unless the 26 director of the division of the budget certifies that such obli- 27 gations or spending can be accommodated within the State's multiyear 28 financial plan without adversely affecting the funding available for 29 (a) capital projects currently authorized that are deemed essential 30 to the health and safety of the public, or (b) essential govern- 31 mental services (17OM2029) (53252) ................................. 32 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $11,020,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 34 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 35 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 36 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 37 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 38 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 39 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 40 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 41 non-federal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 42 percent of project costs. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 44 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 45 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 46 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 47 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 48 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 49 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 50 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 51 for capital expenses. 969 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the non- 2 federal share of the federally authorized level of financial assist- 3 ance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state share 4 exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting reimburse- 5 ment for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the City, the 6 City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation that each 7 eligible project progressed under this provision is federally eligi- 8 ble and that the match amount requested does not exceed the state 9 share of the federally authorized level of financial assistance. In 10 addition, the City must provide an application to the commissioner 11 of transportation certifying that the work to be funded under the 12 project has been performed and that the City has reimbursed the MTA 13 for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. Upon such 14 application, the commissioner of transportation shall review and 15 approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 16 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 17 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 18 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 19 under the program has received federal approval. 20 Such certificate shall report the federally authorized level of finan- 21 cial assistance (17OM1929) (53252) ................................. 22 18,500,000 ........................................ (re. $1,469,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 24 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 25 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 26 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 27 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 28 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 29 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 30 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 31 non-federal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 32 percent of project costs. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 34 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 35 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 36 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 37 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 38 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 39 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 40 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 41 for capital expenses. 42 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the non- 43 federal share of the federally authorized level of financial assist- 44 ance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state share 45 exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting reimburse- 46 ment for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the City, the 47 City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation that each 48 eligible project progressed under this provision is federally eligi- 49 ble and that the match amount requested does not exceed the state 50 share of the federally authorized level of financial assistance. In 51 addition, the City must provide an application to the commissioner 970 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of transportation certifying that the work to be funded under the 2 project has been performed and that the City has reimbursed the MTA 3 for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. Upon such 4 application, the commissioner of transportation shall review and 5 approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 6 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 7 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 8 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 9 under the program has received federal approval. 10 Such certificate shall report the federally authorized level of finan- 11 cial assistance (17OM1829) (53252) ................................. 12 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $12,653,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 14 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 15 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 16 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 17 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 18 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 19 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 20 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 21 non-federal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 22 percent of project costs. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 24 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 25 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 26 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 27 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 28 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 29 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 30 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 31 for capital expenses. 32 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the non- 33 federal share of the federally authorized level of financial assist- 34 ance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state share 35 exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting reimburse- 36 ment for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the City, the 37 City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation that each 38 eligible project progressed under this provision is federally eligi- 39 ble and that the match amount requested does not exceed the state 40 share of the federally authorized level of financial assistance. In 41 addition, the City must provide an application to the commissioner 42 of transportation certifying that the work to be funded under the 43 project has been performed and that the City has reimbursed the MTA 44 for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. Upon such 45 application, the commissioner of transportation shall review and 46 approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 47 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 48 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 49 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 50 under the program has received federal approval. 971 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Such certificate shall report the federally authorized level of finan- 2 cial assistance (17OM1729) (53252) ................................. 3 18,500,000 ........................................ (re. $8,558,000) 4 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 5 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 6 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 7 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 8 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 9 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 10 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 11 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 12 non-federal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 13 percent of project costs. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 15 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 16 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 17 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 18 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 19 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 20 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 21 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 22 for capital expenses. 23 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the 24 nonfederal share of the federally authorized level of financial 25 assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state 26 share exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting 27 reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the 28 City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation 29 that each eligible project progressed under this provision is feder- 30 ally eligible and that the match amount requested does not exceed 31 the state share of the federally authorized level of financial 32 assistance. In addition, the City must provide an application to the 33 commissioner of transportation certifying that the work to be funded 34 under the project has been performed and that the City has reim- 35 bursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. 36 Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation shall 37 review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 38 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 39 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 40 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 41 under the program has received federal approval. 42 Such certificate shall report the federally authorized level of finan- 43 cial assistance (17OM1629) (53252) ................................. 44 18,500,000 .......................................... (re. $497,000) 45 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 55, 46 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 47 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 48 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 49 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 50 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 972 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 2 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 3 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 4 non-federal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 5 percent of project costs. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 7 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 8 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 9 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 10 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 11 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 12 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 13 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 14 for capital expenses. 15 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the 16 nonfederal share of the federally authorized level of financial 17 assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state 18 share exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting 19 reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the 20 City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation 21 that each eligible project progressed under this provision is feder- 22 ally eligible and that the match amount requested does not exceed 23 the state share of the federally authorized level of financial 24 assistance. In addition, the City must provide an application to the 25 commissioner of transportation certifying that the work to be funded 26 under the project has been performed and that the City has reim- 27 bursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. 28 Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation shall 29 review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 30 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 31 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 32 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 33 under the program has received federal approval. 34 Such certificate shall report the federally authorized level of finan- 35 cial assistance (17OM1529) (53252) ................................. 36 18,500,000 ........................................ (re. $2,886,000) 37 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 55, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 39 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 40 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 41 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 42 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 43 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 44 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 45 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 46 nonfederal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 47 percent of project costs. 48 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 49 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 50 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 51 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 973 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 2 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 3 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 4 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 5 for capital expenses. 6 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the 7 nonfederal share of the federally authorized level of financial 8 assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state 9 share exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting 10 reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the 11 City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation 12 that each eligible project progressed under this provision is feder- 13 ally eligible and that the match amount requested does not exceed 14 the state share of the federally authorized level of financial 15 assistance. In addition, the City must provide an application to the 16 commissioner of transportation certifying that the work to be funded 17 under the project has been performed and that the City has reim- 18 bursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. 19 Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation shall 20 review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 21 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 22 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner 23 oftransportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 24 under the program has received federal approval. 25 Such certificate shall report the federally authorized level of finan- 26 cial assistance (17OM1429) (53252) ................................. 27 18,500,000 ........................................ (re. $3,083,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 29 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 30 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 31 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 32 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 33 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 34 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 35 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 36 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 37 nonfederal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 38 percent of project costs. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 40 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 41 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 42 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 43 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 44 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 45 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 46 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 47 for capital expenses. 48 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the 49 nonfederal share of the federally authorized level of financial 50 assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state 51 share exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting 974 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the 2 City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation 3 that each eligible project progressed under this provision is feder- 4 ally eligible and that the match amount requested does not exceed 5 the state share of the federally authorized level of financial 6 assistance. In addition, the City must provide an application to the 7 commissioner of transportation certifying that the work to be funded 8 under the project has been performed and that the City has reim- 9 bursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. 10 Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation shall 11 review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 12 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 13 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 14 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 15 under the program has received federal approval. 16 Such certificate shall report the federally authorized level of finan- 17 cial assistance (17OM1329) (53252) ................................. 18 17,740,294 .......................................... (re. $263,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 21 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 22 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 23 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 24 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 25 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 26 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 27 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 28 nonfederal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 29 percent of project costs. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 31 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 32 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 33 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 34 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 35 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 36 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 37 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 38 for capital expenses. 39 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the 40 nonfederal share of the federally authorized level of financial 41 assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state 42 share exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting 43 reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the 44 City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation 45 that each eligible project progressed under this provision is feder- 46 ally eligible and that the match amount requested does not exceed 47 the state share of the federally authorized level of financial 48 assistance. In addition, the City must provide an application to the 49 commissioner of transportation certifying that the work to be funded 50 under the project has been performed and that the City has reim- 51 bursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. 975 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation shall 2 review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 3 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 4 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 5 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 6 under the program has received federal approval. Such certificate 7 shall report the federally authorized level of financial assistance 8 (17OM1229) (53252) ... 11,709,313 ................... (re. $873,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 11 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 12 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 13 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 14 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 15 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 16 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 17 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 18 nonfederal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 19 percent of project costs. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 21 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 22 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 23 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 24 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 25 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 26 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 27 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 28 for capital expenses. 29 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the 30 nonfederal share of the federally authorized level of financial 31 assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state 32 share exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting 33 reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the 34 City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation 35 that each eligible project progressed under this provision is feder- 36 ally eligible and that the match amount requested does not exceed 37 the state share of the federally authorized level of financial 38 assistance. In addition, the City must provide an application to the 39 commissioner of transportation certifying that the work to be funded 40 under the project has been performed and that the City has reim- 41 bursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. 42 Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation shall 43 review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 44 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 45 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 46 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 47 under the program has received federal approval. Such certificate 48 shall report the federally authorized level of financial assistance 49 (17OM1129) (53252) ... 4,694,992 .................... (re. $258,000) 976 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 3 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 4 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 5 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 6 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 7 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 8 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 9 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 10 nonfederal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 11 percent of project costs. 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 13 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 14 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 15 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 16 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 17 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 18 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 19 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 20 for capital expenses. 21 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the 22 nonfederal share of the federally authorized level of financial 23 assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state 24 share exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting 25 reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the 26 City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation 27 that each eligible project progressed under this provision is feder- 28 ally eligible and that the match amount requested does not exceed 29 the state share of the federally authorized level of financial 30 assistance. In addition, the City must provide an application to the 31 commissioner of transportation certifying that the work to be funded 32 under the project has been performed and that the City has reim- 33 bursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. 34 Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation shall 35 review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 36 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 37 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 38 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 39 under the program has received federal approval. Such certificate 40 shall report the federally authorized level of financial assistance 41 (17OM1029) (53252) ... 4,394,227 .................... (re. $596,000) 42 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 43 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 44 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 45 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 46 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 47 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 48 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 49 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 50 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 977 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 nonfederal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 2 percent of project costs. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 4 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 5 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 6 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 7 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 8 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 9 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 10 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 11 for capital expenses. 12 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the 13 nonfederal share of the federally authorized level of financial 14 assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state 15 share exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting 16 reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the 17 City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation 18 that each eligible project progressed under this provision is feder- 19 ally eligible and that the match amount requested does not exceed 20 the state share of the federally authorized level of financial 21 assistance. In addition, the City must provide an application to the 22 commissioner of transportation certifying that the work to be funded 23 under the project has been performed and that the City has reim- 24 bursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. 25 Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation shall 26 review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 27 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 28 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 29 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 30 under the program has received federal approval. Such certificate 31 shall report the federally authorized level of financial assistance 32 (17OM0929) (53252) ... 4,278,964 .................... (re. $195,000) 33 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 34 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 35 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 36 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 37 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 38 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 39 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 40 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 41 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 42 nonfederal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 43 percent of project costs. 44 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 45 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 46 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 47 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 48 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 49 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 50 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 978 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 2 for capital expenses. 3 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the 4 nonfederal share of the federally authorized level of financial 5 assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state 6 share exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting 7 reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the 8 City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation 9 that each eligible project progressed under this provision is feder- 10 ally eligible and that the match amount requested does not exceed 11 the state share of the federally authorized level of financial 12 assistance. In addition, the City must provide an application to the 13 commissioner of transportation certifying that the work to be funded 14 under the project has been performed and that the City has reim- 15 bursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. 16 Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation shall 17 review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 18 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 19 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 20 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 21 under the program has received federal approval. Such certificate 22 shall report the federally authorized level of financial assistance 23 (17OM0829) (53252) ... 3,162,902 .................... (re. $266,000) 24 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 54, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 26 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 27 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 28 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 29 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 30 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 31 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 32 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 33 nonfederal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 34 percent of project costs. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 36 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 37 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 38 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 39 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 40 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 41 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 42 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 43 for capital expenses. 44 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the 45 nonfederal share of the federally authorized level of financial 46 assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state 47 share exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting 48 reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the 49 City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation 50 that each eligible project progressed under this provision is feder- 51 ally eligible and that the match amount requested does not exceed 979 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the state share of the federally authorized level of financial 2 assistance. In addition, the City must provide an application to the 3 commissioner of transportation certifying that the work to be funded 4 under the project has been performed and that the City has reim- 5 bursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. 6 Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation shall 7 review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 8 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 9 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 10 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 11 under the program has received federal approval. Such certificate 12 shall report the federally authorized level of financial assistance 13 (17OM0729) (53252) ... 3,272,225 .................... (re. $722,000) 14 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 54, 15 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 16 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 17 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 18 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 19 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 20 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 21 dlanning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 22 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 23 nonfederal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 24 percent of project costs. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 26 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 27 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 28 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 29 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 30 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 31 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 32 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 33 for capital expenses. 34 The state share of such reimbursement shall be 50 percent of the 35 nonfederal share of the federally authorized level of financial 36 assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no event shall the state 37 share exceed 10 percent of project costs. Prior to requesting 38 reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA on behalf of the 39 City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of transportation 40 that each eligible project progressed under this provision is feder- 41 ally eligible and that the match amount requested does not exceed 42 the state share of the federally authorized level of financial 43 assistance. In addition, the City must provide an application to the 44 commissioner of transportation certifying that the work to be funded 45 under the project has been performed and that the City has reim- 46 bursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the project. 47 Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation shall 48 review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 49 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 50 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 51 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 980 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 under the program has received federal approval. Such certificate 2 shall report the federally authorized level of financial assistance 3 (17OM0629) (53252) ... 1,000,246 .................... (re. $371,000) 4 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 54, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 6 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 7 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 8 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 9 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 10 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 11 planning studies and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2005. 12 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law, the state share 13 of such projects shall be 50 percent of the non-federal share, but 14 in no event shall the state share exceed 10 percent of project 15 costs. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 17 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 18 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 19 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 20 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 21 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 22 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 23 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 24 for capital expenses. The state share of such reimbursement shall be 25 50 percent of the non-federal share of the federally authorized 26 level of financial assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no 27 event shall the state share exceed 10 percent of project costs. 28 Prior to requesting reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA 29 on behalf of the City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of 30 transportation that each eligible project progressed under this 31 provision is federally eligible and that the match amount requested 32 does not exceed the state share of the federally authorized level of 33 financial assistance. In addition, the City must provide an applica- 34 tion to the commissioner of transportation certifying that the work 35 to be funded under the project has been performed and that the City 36 has reimbursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the 37 project. Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation 38 shall review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 39 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 40 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 41 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 42 under the program has received federal approval. Such certificate 43 shall report the federally authorized level of financial assistance 44 (17OB0529) (54296) ... 772,717 ...................... (re. $727,000) 45 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 46 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 47 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 48 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 49 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 50 planning studies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of 51 law, the state share of such projects shall be 50 percent of the 981 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 nonfederal share, but in no event shall the state share exceed 10 2 percent of project costs. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 4 portation shall make available directly to the City of New York 5 (City) an amount commensurate with the state share of (i) federal 6 funds previously awarded to the City and reallocated to the metro- 7 politan transportation authority (MTA), and (ii) the federally 8 authorized level of financial assistance transferred by resolution 9 of the metropolitan planning organization (MPO) to the metropolitan 10 transportation authority (MTA) and credited to the City by the MTA 11 for capital expenses. The state share of such reimbursement shall be 12 50 percent of the non-federal share of the federally authorized 13 level of financial assistance transferred to the MTA, but in no 14 event shall the state share exceed 10 percent of project costs. 15 Prior to requesting reimbursement for projects progressed by the MTA 16 on behalf of the City, the City shall certify to the commissioner of 17 transportation that each eligible project progressed under this 18 provision is federally eligible and that the match amount requested 19 does not exceed the state share of the federally authorized level of 20 financial assistance. In addition, the City must provide an applica- 21 tion to the commissioner of transportation certifying that the work 22 to be funded under the project has been performed and that the City 23 has reimbursed the MTA for 100 percent of the match amount for the 24 project. Upon such application, the commissioner of transportation 25 shall review and approve eligible activities for reimbursement. 26 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 27 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 28 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 29 under the program has received federal approval. Such certificate 30 shall report the federally authorized level of financial assistance 31 (17OM0529) (53252) ... 406,613 ...................... (re. $197,000) 32 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 54, 33 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 34 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 35 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 36 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 37 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 38 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 39 planning studies and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2004. 40 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law, the state share of 41 such projects shall be 50 percent of the non-federal share, but in 42 no event shall the state share exceed 10 percent of project costs. 43 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 44 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 45 transportation shall certify that each omnibus project progressed 46 under the program has received federal approval. Such certificate 47 shall report the federally authorized level of financial assistance 48 (17OM0429) (53252) ... 1,365,089 .................... (re. $510,000) 49 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 54, 50 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 982 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 2 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 3 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 4 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 5 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 6 planning studies and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2003 7 (17OM0329) (53252) ... 55,159 ........................ (re. $55,000) 8 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2002, as amended by chapter 54, 9 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 10 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 11 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 12 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 13 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 14 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 15 planning studies and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2002 16 (17OM0229) (53252) ... 136,853 ....................... (re. $28,000) 17 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2001, as amended by chapter 54, 18 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 19 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 20 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 21 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 22 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 23 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 24 planning studies and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2001 25 (17OM0129) (53252) ... 447,258 ...................... (re. $198,000) 26 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 28 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 29 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 30 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 31 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 32 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 33 planning studies and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2000 34 (17OM0029) (53252) ... 6,854,619 .................. (re. $5,292,000) 35 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 37 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 38 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 39 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 40 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 41 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 42 planning studies and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1999 43 (17OM9929) (53252) ... 1,130,662 .................... (re. $723,000) 44 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as amended by chapter 54, 45 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 46 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 47 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 983 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 2 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 3 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 4 planning studies and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1998 5 (17OM9829) (53252) ... 380,078 ...................... (re. $324,000) 6 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997, as amended by chapter 54, 7 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 8 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 9 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 10 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 11 capital projects including the acquisition of real property, for 12 other mass transportation projects including local transportation 13 planning studies and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1997 14 (17OM9729) (53252) ... 434,519 ...................... (re. $244,000) 15 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1996, as amended by chapter 54, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 17 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 18 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 19 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 20 capital projects including the acquisition of real property and 21 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1996 (17OM9629) (53252) ..... 22 487,483 ............................................. (re. $354,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1994, as amended by chapter 54, 24 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 25 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 26 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 27 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 28 capital projects including the acquisition of real property and 29 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1994 (17OM9429) (53252) ..... 30 9,075,757 ......................................... (re. $8,190,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1993, as amended by chapter 54, 32 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 33 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 34 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 35 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 36 capital projects including the acquisition of real property and 37 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1993 (17OM9329) (53252) ..... 38 4,181,445 ......................................... (re. $2,981,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1986, as amended by chapter 54, 40 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 41 For state aid to municipal corporations for the preparation of 42 designs, plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 43 construction, reconstruction, and improvement of mass transportation 44 capital projects notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law, 45 including the acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred 46 prior to April one, nineteen hundred eighty-six (17OS8629) (53252) 47 ... 641,834 ......................................... (re. $124,000) 984 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 MASS TRANSPORTATION AND RAIL FREIGHT (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 High Speed Rail Purpose 5 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as added by chapter 108, 6 section 5, of the laws of 2006: 7 For the construction and reconstruction of rail capital and highway 8 railroad crossings, facilities and intercity rail passenger service 9 improvements to the New York State Empire Rail Corridor between New 10 York City and Niagara Falls. A corridor program of projects shall be 11 advanced in accordance with a memorandum of understanding between 12 the commissioner and the senate task force on high speed rail 13 (17270641) (53257) ... 22,000,000 ................... (re. $867,000) 14 Capital Projects Funds - Other 15 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 16 Mass Transportation and Rail Freight Purpose 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 18 For the payment of costs associated with feasibility studies, environ- 19 mental reviews, preliminary design and engineering work, and rede- 20 signs necessary to advance passenger rail improvements between New 21 York City and Poughkeepsie, including but not limited to additions 22 and upgrades of tracks, signals, yards, and interlockings. Notwith- 23 standing section 93 of the state finance law or any other law, rule, 24 or regulation to the contrary, all or a portion of the funds appro- 25 priated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any department, 26 agency, or public authority (17HV2512) (54114) ..................... 27 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $25,000,000) 28 RAIL AND RAPID TRANSIT 29 By chapter 369, section 2, of the laws of 1979, as amended by chapter 30 54, section 3, of the laws of 1988, for: 31 The acquisition, construction, reconstruction, establishment, improve- 32 ment and rehabilitation of urban, commuter and intercity rail 33 passenger and rapid transit systems and rail freight capital facili- 34 ties, for the acquisition of real property and interests in real 35 roperty required or expected to be required therefor, and for any 36 capital equipment to be used in connection therewith, including all 37 costs incidental thereto in accordance with the following schedule: 38 (01395012) (53110) ... ............................ (re. $148,000) 39 The commissioner of transportation shall prepare and submit to the 40 governor as part of his annual budget request submission a report 41 which shall make findings and recommendations with respect to the 42 state's intercity rail passenger service and rail service energy 43 conservation programs. Such report shall include, in addition to any 44 other information the commissioner shall determine appropriate, the 45 following: (a) the impact and effectiveness of the state's programs 46 to continue and preserve rail passenger and rail freight services, 985 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 including federal and state operating subsidy payments actually made 2 and projected to be made during each of the two next succeeding 3 state fiscal years; and (b) the development of operating, pricing 4 and fare guidelines and standards of service and equipment and 5 facility maintenance standards that may be applied in evaluating the 6 cost and quality of service on those rail lines receiving state 7 and/or federal operating and/or capital assistance. 8 Capital Projects Funds - Other 9 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 10 Non-MTA Capital Purpose 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 12 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 13 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 14 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 15 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 16 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 17 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 18 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 19 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 20 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 21 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 22 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 23 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 24 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 25 authority dedicated tax fund. The receipt of funding from this 26 appropriation to a municipality may be conditioned upon a certif- 27 ication by the Division of Housing and Community Renewal that such 28 municipality is a pro-housing community (17NM2531) (53253) ......... 29 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $18,500,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 31 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 32 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 33 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 34 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 35 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 36 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 37 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 38 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 39 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 40 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 41 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 42 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 43 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 44 authority dedicated tax fund. The receipt of funding from this 45 appropriation to a municipality may be conditioned upon a certif- 46 ication by the Division of Housing and Community Renewal that such 47 municipality is a pro-housing community (17NM2431) (53253) ......... 48 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $18,500,000) 986 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 3 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 4 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 5 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 6 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 7 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 8 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 9 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 10 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 11 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 12 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 13 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 14 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 15 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM2331) (53253) .................... 16 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $18,500,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 18 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 19 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 20 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 21 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 22 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 23 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 24 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 25 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 26 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 27 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 28 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 29 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 30 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 31 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM2231) (53253) .................... 32 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $18,500,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 34 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 35 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 36 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 37 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 38 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 39 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 40 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 41 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 42 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 43 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 44 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 45 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 46 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 47 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM2131) (53253) .................... 48 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $18,500,000) 49 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 987 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 2 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 3 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 4 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 5 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 6 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 7 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 8 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 9 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 10 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 11 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 12 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 13 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 14 authority dedicated tax fund. Provided, however, that no obligations 15 against, or spending from this appropriation shall be authorized 16 unless the director of the division of the budget certifies that 17 such obligations or spending can be accommodated within the State's 18 multi-year financial plan without adversely affecting the funding 19 available for (a) capital projects currently authorized that are 20 deemed essential to the health and safety of the public, or (b) 21 essential governmental services (17NM2031) (53253) ................. 22 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $17,710,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 24 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 25 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 26 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 27 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 28 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 29 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 30 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 31 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 32 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 33 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 34 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 35 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 36 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 37 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM1931) (53253) .................... 38 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $18,128,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 40 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 41 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 42 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 43 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 44 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 45 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 46 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 47 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 48 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 49 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 50 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 988 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 2 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 3 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM1831) (53253) .................... 4 18,500,000 ........................................ (re. $7,560,000) 5 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 6 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 7 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 8 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 9 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 10 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 11 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 12 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 13 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 14 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 15 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 16 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 17 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 18 authority dedicated tax fund (17NP1831) (54207) .................... 19 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,307,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 21 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 22 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 23 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 24 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 25 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 26 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 27 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 28 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 29 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 30 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 31 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 32 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 33 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 34 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM1731) (53253) .................... 35 18,500,000 ........................................ (re. $4,337,000) 36 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 37 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 38 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 39 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 40 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 41 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 42 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 43 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 44 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 45 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 46 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 47 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 48 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 49 authority dedicated tax fund (17NP1731) (54207) .................... 50 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,261,000) 989 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 2 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 3 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 4 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 5 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 6 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 7 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 8 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 9 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 10 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 11 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 12 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 13 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 14 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 15 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM1631) (53253) .................... 16 18,500,000 ........................................ (re. $5,463,000) 17 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 55, 18 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 19 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 20 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 21 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 22 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 23 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 24 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 25 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 26 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 27 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 28 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 29 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 30 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 31 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 32 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM1531) (53253) .................... 33 18,500,000 ........................................ (re. $2,731,000) 34 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 55, 35 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 36 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 37 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 38 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 39 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 40 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 41 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 42 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 43 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 44 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 45 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 46 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 47 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 48 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 49 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM1431) (53253) .................... 50 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $18,500,000) 990 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 3 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 4 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 5 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 6 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 7 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 8 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 9 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 10 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 11 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 12 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 13 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 14 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 15 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 16 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM1331) (53253) .................... 17 7,667,146 ......................................... (re. $6,686,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 55, 19 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 20 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 21 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 22 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 23 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 24 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 25 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 26 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 27 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 28 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 29 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 30 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 31 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 32 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 33 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM1231) (53253) .................... 34 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $18,500,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 55, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 37 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 38 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 39 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 40 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 41 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 42 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 43 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 44 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 45 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 46 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 47 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 48 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 49 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 991 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM1131) (53253) .................... 2 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $18,500,000) 3 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 55, 4 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 5 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 6 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 7 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 8 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 9 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 10 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 11 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 12 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 13 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 14 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 15 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 16 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 17 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 18 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM1031) (53253) .................... 19 18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $18,500,000) 20 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 55, 21 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 22 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 23 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 24 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 25 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 26 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 27 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 28 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 29 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 30 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 31 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 32 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 33 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 34 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 35 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM0931) (53253) .................... 36 21,000,000 ....................................... (re. $21,000,000) 37 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 55, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 39 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 40 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 41 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 42 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 43 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 44 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 45 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 46 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 47 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 48 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 49 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 992 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 2 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 3 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM0831) (53253) .................... 4 21,000,000 ....................................... (re. $21,000,000) 5 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 8 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 9 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 10 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 11 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 12 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 13 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 14 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 15 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 16 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 17 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 18 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 19 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 20 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM0731) (53253) .................... 21 13,577,598 ....................................... (re. $13,242,000) 22 For the payment of the costs of clean air-related mass transportation 23 capital infrastructure projects, designed to achieve significant 24 environmental benefit including but not limited to the acquisition 25 of clean fuel buses. The moneys hereby appropriated are to be made 26 available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems other than 27 those mass transit operating agencies which receive money from the 28 metropolitan transportation authority dedicated tax fund (17CA0731) 29 (53254) ... 17,500,000 ........................... (re. $17,500,000) 30 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 54, 31 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 32 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 33 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 34 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 35 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 36 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 37 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 38 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 39 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 40 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 41 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 42 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 43 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 44 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 45 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM0631) (53253) .................... 46 4,456,030 ......................................... (re. $4,147,000) 47 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 54, 48 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 993 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 2 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 3 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 4 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 5 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 6 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 7 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 8 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 9 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 10 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 11 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 12 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 13 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 14 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM0531) (53253) .................... 15 3,441,336 ......................................... (re. $2,937,000) 16 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 54, 17 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 18 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 19 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 20 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 21 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 22 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 23 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 24 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 25 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 26 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 27 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 28 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 29 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 30 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 31 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM0431) (53253) .................... 32 1,732,542 ......................................... (re. $1,675,000) 33 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 54, 34 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 35 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 36 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 37 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 38 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 39 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 40 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 41 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 42 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 43 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 44 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 45 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 46 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 47 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 48 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM0331) (53253) .................... 49 715,460 ............................................. (re. $715,460) 994 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2002, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 3 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 4 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 5 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 6 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 7 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 8 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 9 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 10 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 11 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 12 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 13 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 14 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 15 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 16 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM0231) (53253) .................... 17 713,410 ............................................. (re. $713,410) 18 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2001, as amended by chapter 54, 19 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 20 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 21 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 22 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 23 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 24 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 25 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 26 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 27 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 28 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 29 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 30 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 31 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 32 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 33 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM0131) (53253) .................... 34 210,034 ............................................. (re. $200,000) 35 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 37 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 38 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 39 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 40 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 41 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 42 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 43 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 44 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 45 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 46 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 47 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 48 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 49 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 995 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM0031) (53253) .................... 2 79,647 ............................................... (re. $79,647) 3 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999, as amended by chapter 54, 4 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 5 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 6 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 7 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 8 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 9 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 10 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 11 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 12 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 13 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 14 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 15 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 16 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 17 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 18 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM9931) (53253) .................... 19 2,516,669 ......................................... (re. $1,910,000) 20 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as amended by chapter 54, 21 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 22 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 23 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 24 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 25 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 26 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 27 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 28 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 29 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 30 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 31 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 32 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 33 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 34 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 35 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM9831) (53253) .................... 36 107,917 ............................................. (re. $107,917) 37 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 39 For the payment of the costs of mass transportation capital projects 40 and facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal stand- 41 ards for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, 42 design and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, 43 of mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects 44 and facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 45 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 46 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 47 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 48 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 49 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 996 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 2 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 3 authority dedicated tax fund (17NM9731) (53253) .................... 4 9,604 ................................................. (re. $9,604) 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other 6 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 7 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 8 Rail Service Preservation Purpose 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 10 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 11 incurred prior to April 1, 2025, of the construction and improvement 12 of passenger rail, freight rail, and, notwithstanding any inconsist- 13 ent provisions of law, for port capital facilities outside the 14 jurisdiction of the port authority of New York and New Jersey, 15 including but not limited to the acquisition, construction, recon- 16 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of railroad or port capital 17 facilities, and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 18 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 19 erty required or expected to be required therefor (17162541) (53256) 20 ... 10,000,000 ................................... (re. $10,000,000) 21 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 22 law, for contractual agreements entered into for rail passenger 23 service (17172541) (54278) ... 44,330,000 ........ (re. $44,330,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 25 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 26 incurred prior to April 1, 2024, of the construction and improvement 27 of passenger rail, freight rail, and, notwithstanding any inconsist- 28 ent provisions of law, for port capital facilities outside the 29 jurisdiction of the port authority of New York and New Jersey, 30 including but not limited to the acquisition, construction, recon- 31 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of railroad or port capital 32 facilities, and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 33 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 34 erty required or expected to be required therefor (17162441) (53256) 35 ... 10,000,000 ................................... (re. $10,000,000) 36 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 37 law, for contractual agreements entered into for rail passenger 38 service (17172441) (54278) ... 44,330,000 ........ (re. $32,958,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 40 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 41 incurred prior to April 1, 2023, of the construction and improvement 42 of passenger rail, freight rail, and, notwithstanding any inconsist- 43 ent provisions of law, for port capital facilities outside the 44 jurisdiction of the port authority of New York and New Jersey, 45 including but not limited to the acquisition, construction, recon- 46 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of railroad or port capital 47 facilities, and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 48 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 997 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 erty required or expected to be required therefor (17162341) (53256) 2 ... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $9,838,000) 3 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 4 law, for contractual agreements entered into for rail passenger 5 service (17172341) (54278) ... 44,330,000 ........ (re. $17,303,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 7 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 8 incurred prior to April 1, 2022, of the construction and improvement 9 of passenger rail, freight rail, and, notwithstanding any inconsist- 10 ent provisions of law, for port capital facilities outside the 11 jurisdiction of the port authority of New York and New Jersey, 12 including but not limited to the acquisition, construction, recon- 13 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of railroad or port capital 14 facilities, and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 15 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 16 erty required or expected to be required therefor (17162241) (53256) 17 ... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $9,349,000) 18 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 19 law, for contractual agreements entered into for rail passenger 20 service (17172241) (54278) ... 44,330,000 ........ (re. $18,799,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 22 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 23 incurred prior to April 1, 2021, of the construction and improvement 24 of passenger rail, freight rail, and, notwithstanding any inconsist- 25 ent provisions of law, for port capital facilities outside the 26 jurisdiction of the port authority of New York and New Jersey, 27 including but not limited to the acquisition, construction, recon- 28 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of railroad or port capital 29 facilities, and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 30 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 31 erty required or expected to be required therefor (17162141) (53256) 32 ... 10,000,000 ................................... (re. $10,000,000) 33 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 34 law, for contractual agreements entered into for rail passenger 35 service (17172141) (54278) ... 44,330,000 ......... (re. $6,786,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 37 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 38 incurred prior to April 1, 2020, of the construction and improvement 39 of passenger rail, freight rail, and, notwithstanding any inconsist- 40 ent provisions of law, for port capital facilities outside the 41 jurisdiction of the port authority of New York and New Jersey, 42 including but not limited to the acquisition, construction, recon- 43 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of railroad or port capital 44 facilities, and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 45 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 46 erty required or expected to be required therefor. Provided, howev- 47 er, that no obligations against, or spending from this appropriation 48 shall be authorized unless the director of the division of the budg- 49 et certifies that such obligations or spending can be accommodated 998 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 within the State's multi-year financial plan without adversely 2 affecting the funding available for (a) capital projects currently 3 authorized that are deemed essential to the health and safety of the 4 public, or (b) essential governmental services (17162041) (53256) 5 ... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $8,500,000) 6 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 7 law, for contractual agreements entered into for rail passenger 8 service. Provided, however, that no obligations against, or spending 9 from this appropriation shall be authorized unless the director of 10 the division of the budget certifies that such obligations or spend- 11 ing can be accommodated within the State's multi-year financial plan 12 without adversely affecting the funding available for (a) capital 13 projects currently authorized that are deemed essential to the 14 health and safety of the public, or (b) essential governmental 15 services (17172041) (54278) ... 44,330,000 ....... (re. $15,149,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 17 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 18 incurred prior to April 1, 2019, of the construction and improvement 19 of passenger rail, freight rail, and, notwithstanding any inconsist- 20 ent provisions of law, for port capital facilities outside the 21 jurisdiction of the port authority of New York and New Jersey, 22 including but not limited to the acquisition, construction, recon- 23 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of railroad or port capital 24 facilities, and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 25 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 26 erty required or expected to be required therefor (17161941) (53256) 27 ... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $4,775,000) 28 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 29 law, for contractual agreements entered into for rail passenger 30 service (17171941) (54278) ... 44,330,000 ......... (re. $3,470,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 32 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 33 incurred prior to April 1, 2018, of the construction and improvement 34 of passenger rail, freight rail, and, notwithstanding any inconsist- 35 ent provisions of law, for port capital facilities outside the 36 jurisdiction of the port authority of New York and New Jersey, 37 including but not limited to the acquisition, construction, recon- 38 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of railroad or port capital 39 facilities, and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 40 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 41 erty required or expected to be required therefor (17161841) (53256) 42 ... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $6,225,000) 43 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 44 law, for contractual agreements entered into for rail passenger 45 service (17171841) (54278) ... 44,330,000 ............ (re. $84,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 47 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 48 incurred prior to April 1, 2017, of the construction and improvement 49 of passenger rail, freight rail, and, notwithstanding any inconsist- 999 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ent provisions of law, for port capital facilities outside the 2 jurisdiction of the port authority of New York and New Jersey, 3 including but not limited to the acquisition, construction, recon- 4 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of railroad or port capital 5 facilities, and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 6 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 7 erty required or expected to be required therefor (17161741) (53256) 8 ... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $4,229,000) 9 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 10 law, for contractual agreements entered into for rail passenger 11 service (17171741) (54278) ... 44,330,000 ........... (re. $848,000) 12 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 13 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 14 incurred prior to April 1, 2016, of the construction and improvement 15 of passenger rail, freight rail, and, notwithstanding any inconsist- 16 ent provisions of law, for port capital facilities outside the 17 jurisdiction of the port authority of New York and New Jersey, 18 including but not limited to the acquisition, construction, recon- 19 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of railroad or port capital 20 facilities, and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 21 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 22 erty required or expected to be required therefor (17161641) (53256) 23 ... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $3,329,000) 24 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 25 law, for contractual agreements entered into for rail passenger 26 service (17171641) (54278) ... 44,330,000 ......... (re. $1,839,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 28 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 29 incurred prior to April 1, 2015, of the construction and improvement 30 of passenger rail, freight rail, and, notwithstanding any inconsist- 31 ent provisions of law, for port capital facilities outside the 32 jurisdiction of the port authority of New York and New Jersey, 33 including but not limited to the acquisition, construction, recon- 34 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of railroad or port capital 35 facilities, and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 36 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 37 erty required or expected to be required therefor (17161541) (53256) 38 ... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $2,003,000) 39 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 40 law, for contractual agreements entered into for rail passenger 41 service (17171541) (54278) ... 44,330,000 ......... (re. $1,139,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 43 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 44 law, for the construction and improvement of passenger and rail 45 freight projects including, but not limited to, the acquisition, 46 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 47 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 48 connection herewith, and for the acquisition of real property or 1000 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 interests in real property required or expected to be required 2 therefor (17161441) (53256) ... 10,000,000 .......... (re. $230,000) 3 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 4 law, for contractual agreements entered into for rail passenger 5 service (17171441) (54278) ... 44,330,000 ........... (re. $100,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 7 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 8 law, for the construction and improvement of passenger and rail 9 freight projects including, but not limited to, the acquisition, 10 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 11 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 12 connection herewith, and for the acquisition of real property or 13 interests in real property required or expected to be required 14 therefor (17161341) (53256) ... 10,000,000 ........ (re. $3,183,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 16 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 17 law, for the construction and improvement of passenger and rail 18 freight projects including, but not limited to, the acquisition, 19 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 20 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 21 connection herewith, for contractual agreements entered into for 22 rail passenger service, and for the acquisition of real property or 23 interests in real property required or expected to be required 24 therefor (17161241) (53256) ... 26,620,000 ........ (re. $4,614,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 26 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 27 law, for the construction and improvement of passenger and rail 28 freight projects including, but not limited to, the acquisition, 29 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 30 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 31 connection herewith, for contractual agreements entered into for 32 rail passenger service, and for the acquisition of real property or 33 interests in real property required or expected to be required 34 therefor (17161141) (53256) ... 16,930,000 ........ (re. $1,079,000) 35 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 36 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 37 law, for the construction and improvement of passenger and rail 38 freight projects including, but not limited to, the acquisition, 39 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 40 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 41 connection herewith, for contractual agreements entered into for 42 rail passenger service, and for the acquisition of real property or 43 interests in real property required or expected to be required 44 therefor (17161041) (53256) ... 15,300,000 ........ (re. $1,078,000) 45 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 46 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 47 law, for the construction and improvement of passenger and rail 1001 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 freight projects including, but not limited to, the acquisition, 2 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 3 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 4 connection herewith, for contractual agreements entered into for 5 rail passenger service, and for the acquisition of real property or 6 interests in real property required or expected to be required 7 therefor (17150941) (53256) ... 7,500,000 ............ (re. $85,000) 8 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 9 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 10 law, for the construction and improvement of passenger and rail 11 freight projects including, but not limited to, the acquisition, 12 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 13 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 14 connection herewith, for contractual agreements entered into for 15 rail passenger service, and for the acquisition of real property or 16 interests in real property required or expected to be required 17 therefor (17150841) (53256) ... 20,000,000 ........ (re. $4,079,000) 18 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 19 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 20 law, for the construction and improvement of passenger and rail 21 freight projects including, but not limited to, the acquisition, 22 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 23 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 24 connection herewith, for contractual agreements entered into for 25 rail passenger service, and for the acquisition of real property or 26 interests in real property required or expected to be required 27 therefor (17150741) (53256) ... 20,000,000 .......... (re. $331,000) 28 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 29 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 30 law, for the construction and improvement of passenger and rail 31 freight projects including, but not limited to, the acquisition, 32 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 33 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 34 connection herewith, for contractual agreements entered into for 35 rail passenger service, and for the acquisition of real property or 36 interests in real property required or expected to be required 37 therefor (17150641) (53256) ... 20,000,000 ........ (re. $2,456,000) 38 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 39 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 40 law, for the construction and improvement of passenger and rail 41 freight projects including, but not limited to, the acquisition, 42 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 43 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 44 connection herewith, for contractual agreements entered into for 45 rail passenger service, and for the acquisition of real property or 46 interests in real property required or expected to be required 47 therefor (17150541) (53256) ... 20,000,000 .......... (re. $244,000) 1002 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004: 2 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 3 law, for the construction and improvement of passenger and rail 4 freight projects including, but not limited to, the acquisition, 5 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 6 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 7 connection herewith, for contractual agreements entered into for 8 rail passenger service, and for the acquisition of real property or 9 interests in real property required or expected to be required 10 therefor (17150441) (53256) ... 20,000,000 ........ (re. $1,906,000) 11 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 12 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 89-b of the state finance 13 law, for the construction and improvement of passenger and rail 14 freight projects including, but not limited to, the acquisition, 15 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 16 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 17 connection herewith, for contractual agreements entered into for 18 rail passenger service, and for the acquisition of real property or 19 interests in real property required or expected to be required 20 therefor (17150341) (53256) ... 20,000,000 .......... (re. $413,000) 21 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000: 22 For the construction and improvement of passenger and rail freight 23 projects including, but not limited to, the acquisition, 24 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 25 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 26 connection herewith, and for the acquisition of real property or 27 interests in real property required or expected to be required 28 therefore (17150041) (53256) ... 10,000,000 ......... (re. $316,000) 29 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999, as amended by chapter 30 295, part A, section 1, of the laws of 2001: 31 For the state share of the construction and improvement of rail 32 freight facilities identified by the department of transportation in 33 a rail freight capital needs survey, including, but not limited to, 34 the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement or reha- 35 bilitation of any railroad capital facility and any capital improve- 36 ment used in connection herewith, and for the acquisition of real 37 property or interests in real property required or expected to be 38 required therefore, in accordance with the following schedule. 39 Project costs funded from this appropriation shall not exceed 80 40 percent of total project costs. In addition, projects to be funded 41 from this appropriation shall comply with eligibility criteria 42 established in program guidelines to be issued by the commissioner 43 of transportation. 44 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 45 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 46 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (17159941) 47 (53256) ... ... 13,000,000 ......................... (re. $32,000) 48 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 1003 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Federal Capital Projects Fund 2 Transportation Account - 31354 3 Mass Transportation and Rail Freight Purpose 4 RAIL AND RAPID TRANSIT 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1993, as added by chapter 259, 6 section 4, of the laws of 1993: 7 For payment of the federal share of high speed ground transportation 8 projects including high speed conventional rail, very high speed 9 rail and magnetic levitation systems. The moneys hereby appropriated 10 shall be used for the federal share of costs of any program aspect 11 including, but not limited to, research, development, study, demon- 12 stration, implementation, operation, real property acquisition, 13 construction, reconstruction, improvement and rehabilitation of any 14 capital facility (17419312) (53110) ... .......................... 15 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $12,309,000) 16 RAIL SERVICE PRESERVATION 17 By chapter 257, section 8, of the laws of 1975, as amended by chapter 18 54, section 5, of the laws of 1982: 19 The sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) or so much thereof as 20 may be necessary to accomplish the purpose designated, is hereby 21 appropriated to the department of transportation from the capital 22 projects fund in accordance with section ninety-three of the state 23 finance law for payment by the state of the share of the federal 24 government for acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improve- 25 ment or rehabilitation by the state or a municipality of any rail- 26 road capital facility and any capital equipment used in connection 27 therewith and for branch line operation and maintenance costs pursu- 28 ant to the provisions of section fourteen-d or article ten-a of the 29 transportation law (01393212) (53110) ... ....... (re. $7,264,000) 30 MASS TRANSPORTATION AND RAIL FREIGHT--BONDABLE (CCP) 31 Capital Projects Funds - Other 32 Capital Projects Fund - Infrastructure Renewable (Bondable) - 30000 33 Mass Transportation and Rail Freight Purpose 34 RAIL AND RAPID TRANSIT 35 By chapter 998, section 4, of the laws of 1983, as amended by chapter 36 54, section 3, of the laws of 1984: 37 For the cost of the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 38 estimates and for the acquisition of property and rehabilitation 39 projects, for railroad capital facilities, mass transportation capi- 40 tal projects, excluding projects of the New York city transit 41 authority, its subsidiaries, and the commuter railroads under the 42 jurisdiction of the metropolitan transportation authority, notwith- 43 standing any inconsistent provisions of law provided however that 44 all such costs shall be made pursuant to the provisions of the 1004 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 rebuild New York through transportation infrastructure renewal bond 2 act of 1983 and such costs shall be reimbursed from the infrastruc- 3 ture renewal bond fund (03064812) (53283) ........... (re. $178,000) 4 Capital Projects Funds - Other 5 Capital Projects Fund - Infrastructure Renewable (Bondable) - 30000 6 Omnibus and Transit Bondable Purpose 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1990: 8 For payment to the department of transportation pursuant to the 9 provisions of the rebuild New York through transportation infras- 10 tructure renewal bond act of 1983, for state aid to the Niagara 11 Frontier Transportation Authority for the preparation of designs, 12 plans, specifications and estimates, for the acquisition, 13 construction, reconstruction and improvement of mass transportation 14 capital projects including the acquisition of real property and 15 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1990 (17199040) (53279) ..... 16 1,840,000 ............................................ (re. $18,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1988: 18 For payment to the department of transportation pursuant to the 19 provisions of the rebuild New York through transportation infras- 20 tructure renewal bond act of 1983, for state aid to municipal corpo- 21 rations for the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 22 estimates, for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction and 23 improvement of mass transportation capital projects including the 24 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 25 1, 1988, in accordance with the schedule shown below. The items 26 shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects with a 27 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 28 the approval of the director of the budget. 29 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 30 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 31 transportation shall certify that each project progressed under the 32 program listed in the schedule below has received federal approval 33 and the federally authorized level of financial assistance 34 (17198840) (53280) ... ... 10,045,000 ............. (re. $859,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1986: 36 For payment to the department of transportation pursuant to the 37 provisions of the rebuild New York through transportation infras- 38 tructure renewal bond act of 1983, for state aid to municipal corpo- 39 rations for the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 40 estimates, for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction and 41 improvement of mass transportation capital projects including the 42 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 43 one, nineteen hundred eighty-six, in accordance with the schedule 44 shown below. The items shown in the project schedule below shall be 45 for projects with a common purpose and may be interchanged without 46 limitation subject to the approval of the director of the budget. 47 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 48 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner shall 1005 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 certify that each omnibus project progressed under the program list- 2 ed in the schedule below has received federal approval and the 3 federally authorized level of financial assistance (17198640) 4 (53280) ... ... 5,800,000 ......................... (re. $315,000) 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1984, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 3, of the laws of 1986: 7 For payment to the department of transportation pursuant to the 8 provisions of the rebuild New York through transportation infras- 9 tructure renewal bond act of 1983, notwithstanding any inconsistent 10 provisions of law: (1) on behalf of the Niagara Frontier Transporta- 11 tion Authority to the extent needed to match federal funds to 12 finance the state share of construction of the Buffalo light rail 13 rapid transit (LRRT) project including the acquisition of real prop- 14 erty and to match local funds for the acquisition of property for a 15 possible Tonawanda extension of the Buffalo light rail rapid transit 16 system and, (2) for state aid to municipal corporations for the 17 acquisition, construction, reconstruction and improvement of Mass 18 Transportation Omnibus projects including the acquisition of real 19 property, in accordance with the following schedule. No part of this 20 appropriation shall be available until the commissioner of transpor- 21 tation shall certify to the director of the budget that the federal 22 share of costs has been approved for the purposes authorized and 23 that the local share is available for the acquisition of property 24 for a possible Tonawanda extension of the Buffalo light rail rapid 25 transit system. 26 The moneys hereby appropriated, when made available pursuant to a 27 certificate of approval of availability issued by the director of 28 the budget, shall be paid from the state treasury on the warrant of 29 the state comptroller on vouchers approved by the commissioner of 30 transportation (17148440) (53281) ... ............................ 31 6,087,000 ........................................... (re. $930,000) 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Capital Projects Fund - Infrastructure Renewable (Bondable) - 30000 34 Rail Service Preservation Purpose 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1994: 36 For payment of the state share of the costs of acquisition, 37 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 38 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 39 connection therewith, for the acquisition of real property or inter- 40 ests in real property required or expected to be required therefore, 41 pursuant to the rebuild New York through Transportation Infrastruc- 42 ture Renewal Bond Act of 1983 notwithstanding any inconsistent 43 provisions of law and pursuant to the provisions of section 14-d of 44 the transportation law and including all costs incidental thereto 45 (17159441) (53282) ... 1,390,000 ..................... (re. $43,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1984, as amended by chapter 54, 47 section 3, of the laws of 1985: 1006 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For payment of the state share of the costs of the acquisition, 2 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 3 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 4 connection therewith, for the acquisition of real property or inter- 5 ests in real property required or expected to be required therefor, 6 pursuant to rebuild New York through the transportation bond act of 7 1983 notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law and pursuant 8 to the provisions of section fourteen-d of the transportation law, 9 as the commissioner may elect for the purpose of improving freight 10 service, and including all costs incidental thereto in accordance 11 with the following schedule (17158441) (53282) ... ............... 12 35,013,000 .......................................... (re. $339,000) 13 MULTI-MODAL (CCP) 14 Capital Projects Funds - Other 15 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 16 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 17 Multi-Modal Purpose 18 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000: 19 For the cost of multi-modal projects designated as part of the multi- 20 modal program established by section 14-k of the transportation law 21 and in accordance with a memorandum of understanding among the 22 governor, the majority leader of the senate, and the speaker of the 23 assembly, or their designees (17M100MR) (53284) .................... 24 150,000,000 ...................................... (re. $31,263,000) 25 MUNICIPAL HIGHWAY - RAILROAD CROSSING ALTERATIONS (CCP) 26 Capital Projects Funds - Other 27 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 28 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 29 Railroad Crossing Alteration Purpose 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1988: 31 For payment of the state share of the cost of the reconstruction or 32 removal of existing highway-railway grade crossing or grade sepa- 33 ration structures, pursuant to the provisions of section 91 of the 34 railroad law, and in accordance with the schedule below (17108826) 35 (53285) ... ... 1,700,000 ......................... (re. $443,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1986: 37 For payment of the state share of the cost of the reconstruction or 38 removal of existing highway-railway grade crossing or grade sepa- 39 ration structures, pursuant to the provisions of section ninety-one 40 of the railroad law, and in accordance with the schedule below. 41 Project costs funded from this appropriation may include, but shall 42 not be limited to, preliminary planning and feasibility studies; 43 survey and design; acquisition of property; reconstruction and 44 removal; materials testing; the contract engineering services 1007 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 provided by private firms; and the payment of liabilities incurred 2 prior to April one, nineteen hundred eighty-six. 3 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 4 ability for the moneys hereby appropriated, the commissioner of 5 transportation shall certify that he has applied for and made 6 reasonable efforts to secure federal assistance for each project 7 authorized herein. Any such federal assistance received shall be 8 used to reduce the total project cost prior to the calculation of 9 the state and local shares in accordance with section ninety-one of 10 the railroad law. 11 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 12 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 13 subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg- 14 et (17108626) (53285) ... ... 2,500,000 ......... (re. $1,124,000) 15 NEW YORK STATE AGENCY FUND (CCP) 16 Fiduciary Funds 17 Miscellaneous New York State Agency Fund 18 Localities Share Highway Improvement Account - 60612 19 Highway Facilities Purpose 20 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 21 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 22 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 23 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law for 24 border crossing studies and activities (17500211) (53258) .......... 25 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 26 Fiduciary Funds 27 Miscellaneous New York State Agency Fund 28 DOT Land Acquisition Projects Account - 60606 29 Non-Federal Aided Highway Purpose 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 31 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 32 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 33 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 34 (17502522) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $50,000,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 36 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 37 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 38 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 39 (17502422) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $50,000,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 41 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 42 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 43 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 44 (17502322) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $50,000,000) 1008 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 2 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 3 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 4 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 5 (17502222) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $50,000,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 7 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 8 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 9 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 10 (17502122) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $49,944,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 12 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 13 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 14 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 15 (17502022) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $10,000,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 17 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 18 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 19 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 20 (17501922) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................. (re. $9,752,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 22 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 23 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 24 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 25 (17501822) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $30,096,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 27 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 28 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 29 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 30 (17501722) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................. (re. $8,650,000) 31 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 32 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 33 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 34 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 35 (17501622) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................. (re. $8,748,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 37 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 38 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 39 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 40 (17501522) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $12,373,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 42 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 43 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 1009 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 2 (17501422) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $50,000,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 4 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 5 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 6 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 7 (17501322) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $24,751,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 9 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 10 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 11 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 12 (17501222) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $19,168,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 14 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 15 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 16 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 17 (17501122) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $23,541,000) 18 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 19 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 20 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 21 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 22 (17501022) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $10,615,000) 23 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 24 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 25 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 26 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 27 (17500922) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $16,895,000) 28 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 29 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 30 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 31 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 32 (17500822) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $22,401,000) 33 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 34 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 35 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 36 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 37 (17500722) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $11,117,000) 38 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 39 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 40 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 41 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 42 (17500622) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $39,189,000) 43 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 1010 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 2 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 3 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 4 (17500522) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $28,825,000) 5 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004: 6 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 7 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 8 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 9 (17500422) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $10,019,000) 10 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 11 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 12 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 13 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 14 (17500322) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $37,110,000) 15 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 16 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 17 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 18 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 19 (17500222) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................. (re. $8,887,000) 20 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2001: 21 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 22 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 23 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 24 (17500122) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................. (re. $6,981,000) 25 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000: 26 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 27 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 28 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 29 (17500022) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $15,837,000) 30 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 31 For that portion of liabilities incurred by the department of trans- 32 portation on behalf of entities other than state departments or 33 agencies pursuant to the highway law or transportation law 34 (17509922) (53259) ... 50,000,000 ................ (re. $11,800,000) 35 NEW YORK WORKS (CCP) 36 Capital Projects Funds - Other 37 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 38 Aviation Purpose 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 40 For state aid to municipal corporations and private airports as 41 authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment 42 of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic airports, for the 43 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 1011 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 2 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025. Prior 3 to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of availability 4 for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation shall 5 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 6 program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 7 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 8 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 9 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 10 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 11 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 12 1, 2025 (17552514) (53101) ... 12,500,000 ........ (re. $12,500,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 For state aid to municipal corporations and private airports as 15 authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment 16 of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic airports, for the 17 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 18 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 19 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024. Prior 20 to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of availability 21 for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation shall 22 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 23 program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 24 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 25 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 26 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 27 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 28 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 29 1, 2024 (17552414) (53101) ... 12,500,000 ........ (re. $12,500,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 31 For state aid to municipal corporations and private airports as 32 authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment 33 of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic airports, for the 34 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 35 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 36 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023. Prior 37 to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of availability 38 for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation shall 39 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 40 program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 41 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 42 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 43 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 44 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 45 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 46 1, 2023 (17552314) (53101) ... 12,500,000 ........ (re. $12,500,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 48 For state aid to municipal corporations and private airports as 49 authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment 1012 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic airports, for the 2 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 3 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 4 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022. Prior 5 to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of availability 6 for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation shall 7 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 8 program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 9 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 10 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 11 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 12 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 13 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 14 1, 2022 (17552214) (53101) ... 12,500,000 ........ (re. $11,631,000) 15 For state aid to municipal corporations, public authorities or public 16 benefit corporations, except a bi-state authority, and other owners 17 of public-use airports located in counties or cities with a popu- 18 lation of less than two million; for projects related to passenger 19 air service, cargo service, and commercial development, including 20 but not limited to the acquisition of real property; preparation of 21 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; environmental impact 22 statements; construction; construction management and supervision; 23 the contract services provided by private firms; demolition; recon- 24 struction; and improvement of airport or aviation-related facili- 25 ties. Eligible project costs may also include measures to enhance 26 connections to airports through roadway redesign; increased parking; 27 improved public transportation service; and liabilities incurred 28 prior to April 1, 2022 (17AC2214) (54202) .......................... 29 150,000,000 ...................................... (re. $57,721,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 31 For state aid to municipal corporations and private airports as 32 authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment 33 of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic airports, for the 34 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 35 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 36 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021. Prior 37 to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of availability 38 for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation shall 39 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 40 program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 41 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 42 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 43 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 44 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 45 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 46 1, 2021 (17552114) (53101) ... 12,500,000 ........ (re. $11,192,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 48 For state aid to municipal corporations and private airports as 49 authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment 50 of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic airports, for the 1013 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 2 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 3 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020. Prior 4 to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of availability 5 for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation shall 6 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 7 program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 8 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 9 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 10 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 11 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 12 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 13 1, 2020. Provided, however, that no obligations against, or spending 14 from this appropriation shall be authorized unless the director of 15 the division of the budget certifies that such obligations or spend- 16 ing can be accommodated within the State's multi-year financial plan 17 without adversely affecting the funding available for (a) capital 18 projects currently authorized that are deemed essential to the 19 health and safety of the public, or (b) essential governmental 20 services (17552014) (53101) ... 12,500,000 ....... (re. $12,187,000) 21 For state aid to municipal corporations, public authorities or public 22 benefit corporations, except a bi-state authority, and other owners 23 of public-use airports located in counties or cities with a popu- 24 lation of less than one million; for projects related to passenger 25 air service, cargo service, and commercial development, including 26 but not limited to the acquisition of real property; preparation of 27 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; environmental impact 28 statements; construction; construction management and supervision; 29 the contract services provided by private firms; demolition; recon- 30 struction; and improvement of airport or aviation-related facili- 31 ties. Eligible project costs may also include measures to enhance 32 connections to airports through roadway redesign; increased parking; 33 improved public transportation service; and liabilities incurred 34 prior to April 1, 2020. Provided, however, that no obligations 35 against, or spending from this appropriation shall be authorized 36 unless the director of the division of the budget certifies that 37 such obligations or spending can be accommodated within the State's 38 multi-year financial plan without adversely affecting the funding 39 available for (a) capital projects currently authorized that are 40 deemed essential to the health and safety of the public, or (b) 41 essential governmental services (17AC2014) (54202) ................. 42 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $23,516,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 44 For state aid to municipal corporations and private airports as 45 authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment 46 of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic airports, for the 47 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 48 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 49 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019. Prior 50 to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of availability 51 for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation shall 1014 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 2 program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 3 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 4 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 5 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 6 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 7 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 8 1, 2019 (17551914) (53101) ... 12,500,000 ......... (re. $9,276,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 10 For state aid to municipal corporations and private airports as 11 authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment 12 of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic airports, for the 13 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 14 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 15 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018. Prior 16 to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of availability 17 for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation shall 18 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 19 program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 20 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 21 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 22 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 23 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 24 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 25 1, 2018 (17551814) (53101) ... 12,500,000 ......... (re. $7,253,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 27 For state aid to municipal corporations and private airports as 28 authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment 29 of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic airports, for the 30 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 31 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 32 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017. Prior 33 to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of availability 34 for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation shall 35 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 36 program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 37 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 38 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 39 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 40 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 41 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 42 1, 2017 (17551714) (53101) ... 12,500,000 ......... (re. $2,678,000) 43 For additional state aid to municipal corporations and private 44 airports as authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and 45 for payment of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic 46 airports, for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and 47 improvement of airport or aviation capital projects, including the 48 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 49 1, 2017. Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval 50 of availability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of trans- 1015 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 portation shall certify that each airport or aviation project 2 progressed under the program, other than state owned airports, has 3 received federal approval and the federally authorized level of 4 financial assistance. Funds from this appropriation may also be 5 utilized for grants to municipal corporations and private airports 6 for the cost of projects authorized by section 14-1 of the transpor- 7 tation law, including the acquisition of real property and liabil- 8 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2017 (17561714) (54208) ........... 9 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,374,000) 10 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 11 For state aid to municipal corporations and private airports as 12 authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment 13 of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic airports, for the 14 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 15 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 16 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016. Prior 17 to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of availability 18 for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation shall 19 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 20 program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 21 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 22 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 23 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 24 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 25 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 26 1, 2016 (17551614) (53101) ... 12,500,000 ......... (re. $3,538,000) 27 For state aid to municipal corporations, public authorities or public 28 benefit corporations, except a bi-state authority, and other owners 29 of public-use airports located in counties or cities with a popu- 30 lation of less than one million; for projects related to passenger 31 air service, cargo service, and commercial development, including 32 but not limited to the acquisition of real property; preparation of 33 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; environmental impact 34 statements; construction; construction management and supervision; 35 the contract services provided by private firms; demolition; recon- 36 struction; and improvement of airport or aviation-related facili- 37 ties. Eligible project costs may also include measures to enhance 38 connections to airports through roadway redesign; increased parking; 39 improved public transportation service; and liabilities incurred 40 prior to April 1, 2016 (17AC1614) (54202) .......................... 41 200,000,000 ....................................... (re. $6,173,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 43 For state aid to municipal corporations and private airports as 44 authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment 45 of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic airports, for the 46 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 47 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 48 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2015. 49 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 50 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 1016 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 2 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 3 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 4 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 5 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 6 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 7 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 8 1, 2015 (17551514) (53101) ... 10,000,000 ......... (re. $3,821,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 10 For state aid to municipal corporations and private airports as 11 authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment 12 of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic airports, for the 13 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 14 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 15 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014. Prior 16 to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of availability 17 for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation shall 18 certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under the 19 program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 20 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 21 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 22 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 23 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 24 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 25 1, 2014 (17551414) (53101) ... 10,000,000 ......... (re. $2,089,000) 26 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 27 For state aid to municipal corporations and private airports as 28 authorized by section 14-h of the transportation law and for payment 29 of the cost of projects at Stewart and Republic airports, for the 30 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of 31 airport or aviation capital projects, including the acquisition of 32 real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2013. 33 Prior to requesting approval of a certificate of approval of avail- 34 ability for moneys appropriated, the commissioner of transportation 35 shall certify that each airport or aviation project progressed under 36 the program, other than state owned airports, has received federal 37 approval and the federally authorized level of financial assistance. 38 Funds from this appropriation may also be utilized for grants to 39 municipal corporations and private airports for the cost of projects 40 authorized by section 14-l of the transportation law, including the 41 acquisition of real property and liabilities incurred prior to April 42 1, 2013 (17551314) (53101) ... 10,000,000 ........... (re. $599,000) 43 Capital Projects Funds - Other 44 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 45 Capital Assistance Purpose 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 47 The sum of $15,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 48 expenses, grants, and costs of design and construction for projects 1017 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 related to capital investment in state and local roads and bridges, 2 including work appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Funding under this 3 appropriation shall be pursuant to a plan approved by the director 4 of the division of the budget (17CA2592) (54218) ................... 5 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 7 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 8 The sum of $78,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York State 9 Capital Assistance Program for Transportation, Infrastructure, and 10 Economic Development. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 11 services and expenses, grants, and costs of program administration 12 for projects related to capital investment in: transportation; 13 aviation; water and sewer infrastructure improvements; industrial 14 and manufacturing water supply infrastructure renovations and 15 improvements; and other economic development purposes. Individual 16 grants issued pursuant to this appropriation shall be in an amount 17 no less than $125,000. Funding under this appropriation shall be 18 pursuant to a plan submitted to the director of the division of the 19 budget. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds 20 appropriated herein may, subject to the approval of the director of 21 the budget, be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred from this appro- 22 priation to any other appropriation of any state department, agency, 23 or public benefit corporation, or (iii) suballocated to any other 24 state department, agency or public benefit corporation, to achieve 25 this purpose (17CA1892) (54218) .................................... 26 78,000,000 ....................................... (re. $29,347,000) 27 Capital Projects Funds - Other 28 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 29 Mass Transportation and Rail Freight Purpose 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 31 For payment of design and construction costs of a bus terminal at the 32 Rochester Intermodal station, constituting the second phase of the 33 Louise M. Slaughter Station project, provided that such funding 34 shall be contingent upon the approval by the commissioner of trans- 35 portation of an operating plan providing for facility management, 36 maintenance and continuity of services (17RI2412) (54111) .......... 37 18,000,000 ....................................... (re. $18,000,000) 38 Capital Projects Funds - Other 39 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 40 Non-Federal Aided Highway Purpose 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 42 Transportation infrastructure and facilities in the department of 43 transportation plan, for the payment of costs, including the payment 44 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025, of transportation 45 infrastructure projects, including but not limited to, state and 46 local roads and bridges; airport, freight and passenger rail, port 47 and transit projects or multi-modal facilities, including work 1018 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from this 2 appropriation may include but shall not be limited to construction, 3 reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, the acquisition of 4 property, and engineering services, including personal services, 5 nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, the contract services 6 provided by private firms, and reimbursements to the dedicated high- 7 way and bridge trust fund and capital projects funds, for activities 8 including but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 9 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 10 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 11 statements for transportation infrastructure projects. 12 Notwithstanding section 93 of the state finance law or any other law, 13 rule or regulation to the contrary, all or a portion of the funds 14 appropriated herein may be interchanged, or transferred from this 15 appropriation to any other capital projects appropriation or appro- 16 priations (17992522) (54201) ....................................... 17 765,000,000 ..................................... (re. $683,872,000) 18 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 19 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 20 April 1, 2025, of core projects on state highways, parkways, bridg- 21 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 22 ities, including work appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project 23 costs funded from this appropriation may include but shall not be 24 limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 25 vation, and the acquisition of property, and for engineering 26 services, including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe 27 benefits, and the contract services provided by private firms, and 28 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 29 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 30 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 31 statements for transportation projects (17JS2522)(54255) ........... 32 800,000,000 ..................................... (re. $800,000,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 34 Transportation infrastructure and facilities in the department of 35 transportation plan, for the payment of costs, including the payment 36 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024, of transportation 37 infrastructure projects, including but not limited to, state and 38 local roads and bridges; airport, freight and passenger rail, port 39 and transit projects or multi-modal facilities, including work 40 appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from this 41 appropriation may include but shall not be limited to construction, 42 reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, the acquisition of 43 property, and engineering services, including personal services, 44 nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, the contract services 45 provided by private firms, and reimbursements to the dedicated high- 46 way and bridge trust fund and capital projects funds, for activities 47 including but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 48 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 49 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 50 statements for transportation infrastructure projects. 1019 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding section 93 of the state finance law or any other law, 2 rule or regulation to the contrary, all or a portion of the funds 3 appropriated herein may be interchanged, or transferred from this 4 appropriation to any other capital projects appropriation or appro- 5 priations (17992422) (54201) ....................................... 6 2,750,000,000 ................................. (re. $2,414,016,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 8 Transportation infrastructure and facilities in the department of 9 transportation plan, for the payment of costs, including the payment 10 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023, of transportation 11 infrastructure projects, including but not limited to, state and 12 local roads and bridges; airport, freight and passenger rail, port 13 and transit projects or multi-modal facilities, including work 14 appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from this 15 appropriation may include but shall not be limited to construction, 16 reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, the acquisition of 17 property, and engineering services, including personal services, 18 nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, the contract services 19 provided by private firms, and reimbursements to the dedicated high- 20 way and bridge trust fund and capital projects funds, for activities 21 including but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 22 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 23 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 24 statements for transportation infrastructure projects. 25 Notwithstanding section 93 of the state finance law or any other law, 26 rule or regulation to the contrary, all or a portion of the funds 27 appropriated herein may be interchanged, or transferred from this 28 appropriation to any other capital projects appropriation or appro- 29 priations (17992322) (54201) ....................................... 30 2,000,000,000 ................................. (re. $1,322,386,000) 31 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 32 incurred prior to April 1, 2023, of complete street transportation 33 infrastructure projects and complete street designs as determined by 34 the commissioner of transportation, including but not limited to, 35 state and local roads and bridges, including work appurtenant and 36 ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 37 include but shall not be limited to engineering services, including 38 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, the 39 contract services provided by private firms, and reimbursements to 40 the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund and capital projects 41 funds, for activities including but not limited to, the preparation 42 of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; and appraisals, 43 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 44 tion infrastructure projects (17CS2322) (54100) .................... 45 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 47 Transportation infrastructure and facilities in the department of 48 transportation plan, for the payment of costs, including the payment 49 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022, of transportation 50 infrastructure projects, including but not limited to, state and 1020 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 local roads and bridges; airport, freight and passenger rail, port 2 and transit projects or multi-modal facilities, including work 3 appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from this 4 appropriation may include but shall not be limited to construction, 5 reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, the acquisition of 6 property, and engineering services, including personal services, 7 nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, the contract services 8 provided by private firms, and reimbursements to the dedicated high- 9 way and bridge trust fund and capital projects funds, for activities 10 including but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 11 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 12 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 13 statements for transportation infrastructure projects. 14 Notwithstanding section 93 of the state finance law or any other law, 15 rule or regulation to the contrary, all or a portion of the funds 16 appropriated herein may be interchanged, or transferred from this 17 appropriation to any other capital projects appropriation or appro- 18 priations (17992222) (54201) ....................................... 19 1,300,000,000 ................................... (re. $468,528,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 21 Transportation infrastructure and facilities in the department of 22 transportation plan, for the payment of costs, including the payment 23 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021, of transportation 24 infrastructure projects, including but not limited to, state and 25 local roads and bridges; airport, freight and passenger rail, port 26 and transit projects or multimodal facilities, including work appur- 27 tenant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from this appro- 28 priation may include but shall not be limited to construction, 29 reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, the acquisition of 30 property, and engineering services, including personal services, 31 nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, the contract services 32 provided by private firms, and reimbursements to the dedicated high- 33 way and bridge trust fund and capital projects funds, for activities 34 including but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 35 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 36 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 37 statements for transportation infrastructure projects. 38 Notwithstanding section 93 of the state finance law or any other law, 39 rule or regulation to the contrary, all or a portion of the funds 40 appropriated herein may be interchanged, or transferred from this 41 appropriation to any other capital projects appropriation or appro- 42 priations of the department of transportation (17992122) (54201) ... 43 1,600,000,000 ................................... (re. $845,049,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 45 Transportation infrastructure and facilities in the department of 46 transportation plan, for the payment of costs, including the payment 47 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020, of transportation 48 infrastructure projects, including but not limited to, state and 49 local roads and bridges; airport, freight and passenger rail, port 50 and transit projects or multi-modal facilities, including work 1021 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from this 2 appropriation may include but shall not be limited to construction, 3 reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, the acquisition of 4 property, and engineering services, including personal services, 5 nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, the contract services 6 provided by private firms, and reimbursements to the dedicated high- 7 way and bridge trust fund and capital projects funds, for activities 8 including but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 9 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 10 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 11 statements for transportation infrastructure projects. 12 Notwithstanding section 93 of the state finance law or any other law, 13 rule or regulation to the contrary, all or a portion of the funds 14 appropriated herein may be interchanged, or transferred from this 15 appropriation to any other capital projects appropriation or appro- 16 priations of the department of transportation. Provided, however, 17 that no obligations against, or spending from this appropriation 18 shall be authorized unless the director of the division of the budg- 19 et certifies that such obligations or spending can be accommodated 20 within the State's multi-year financial plan without adversely 21 affecting the funding available for (a) capital projects currently 22 authorized that are deemed essential to the health and safety of the 23 public, or (b) essential governmental services. Provided, however, 24 that during state fiscal year 2020-21, the department of transporta- 25 tion shall, ten calendar days prior to the start of each quarter or 26 as soon as practicable thereafter, provide to the director of the 27 budget, the secretary of the senate finance committee, and the 28 secretary of the assembly ways and means committee, a schedule of 29 planned highway and bridge capital project lettings to take place 30 during such quarter; and provided, further, that the projects to be 31 let by the department may differ from the schedules so provided due 32 to emergencies, environmental concerns, federal mandates, unforeseen 33 conditions, design changes or other factors (17992022) (54201) ..... 34 2,030,000,000 ................................... (re. $395,998,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 36 Transportation infrastructure and facilities in the five-year depart- 37 ment of transportation plan for 2015-16 through 2019-20, for the 38 payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities incurred 39 prior to April 1, 2019, of transportation infrastructure projects, 40 including but not limited to, state and local roads and bridges; 41 airport, freight and passenger rail, port and transit projects or 42 multi-modal facilities, including work appurtenant and ancillary 43 thereto. Project costs funded from this appropriation may include 44 but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 45 tioning and preservation, the acquisition of property, and engineer- 46 ing services, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 47 fringe benefits, the contract services provided by private firms, 48 and reimbursements to the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund 49 and capital projects funds, for activities including but not limited 50 to, the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 51 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 1022 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 2 infrastructure projects (17991922) (54201) ......................... 3 196,175,000 ....................................... (re. $7,981,000) 4 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 5 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 6 April 1, 2019, of state highways, parkways, bridges, the New York 7 State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facilities, including 8 work appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from 9 this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 10 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 11 the acquisition of property, and for engineering services, including 12 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 13 contract services provided by private firms, and including but not 14 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 15 estimates; construction management and supervision; and appraisals, 16 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 17 tion projects (17JS1922) (54255) ................................... 18 77,214,000 .......................................... (re. $798,000) 19 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 20 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 21 April 1, 2019, of state and local bridges, including work appurten- 22 ant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from this appropri- 23 ation may include but shall not be limited to construction, recon- 24 struction, reconditioning and preservation, and the acquisition of 25 property, and for engineering services, including personal services, 26 nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services 27 provided by private firms, and including but not limited to the 28 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 29 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 30 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 31 projects (17BR1922) (54272) ... 150,000,000 ...... (re. $18,817,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 33 Transportation infrastructure and facilities in the five-year depart- 34 ment of transportation plan for 2015-16 through 2019-20, for the 35 payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities incurred 36 prior to April 1, 2018, of transportation infrastructure projects, 37 including but not limited to, state and local roads and bridges; 38 airport, freight and passenger rail, port and transit projects or 39 multi-modal facilities, including work appurtenant and ancillary 40 thereto. Project costs funded from this appropriation may include 41 but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 42 tioning and preservation, the acquisition of property, and engineer- 43 ing services, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 44 fringe benefits, the contract services provided by private firms, 45 and reimbursements to the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund 46 and capital projects funds, for activities including but not limited 47 to, the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 48 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 49 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 50 infrastructure projects (17991822) (54201) ......................... 51 206,175,000 ...................................... (re. $14,883,000) 1023 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 2 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 3 April 1, 2018, of state highways, parkways, bridges, the New York 4 State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facilities, including 5 work appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from 6 this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 7 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 8 the acquisition of property, and for engineering services, including 9 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 10 contract services provided by private firms, and including but not 11 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 12 estimates; construction management and supervision; and appraisals, 13 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 14 tion projects (17JS1822) (54255) ................................... 15 102,904,000 ....................................... (re. $1,532,000) 16 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 17 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 18 April 1, 2018, of state and local bridges, including work appurten- 19 ant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from this appropri- 20 ation may include but shall not be limited to construction, recon- 21 struction, reconditioning and preservation, and the acquisition of 22 property, and for engineering services, including personal services, 23 nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services 24 provided by private firms, and including but not limited to the 25 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 26 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 27 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 28 projects (17BR1822) (54272) ... 150,000,000 ...... (re. $44,281,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 30 Transportation infrastructure and facilities in the five-year depart- 31 ment of transportation plan for 2015-16 through 2019-20, for the 32 payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities incurred 33 prior to April 1, 2017, of transportation infrastructure projects, 34 including but not limited to, state and local roads and bridges; 35 airport, freight and passenger rail, port and transit projects or 36 multi-modal facilities, including work appurtenant and ancillary 37 thereto. Project costs funded from this appropriation may include 38 but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 39 tioning and preservation, the acquisition of property, and engineer- 40 ing services, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 41 fringe benefits, the contract services provided by private firms, 42 and reimbursements to the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund 43 and capital projects funds, for activities including but not limited 44 to, the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 45 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 46 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 47 infrastructure projects (17991722) (54201) ......................... 48 503,175,000 ...................................... (re. $36,617,000) 49 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 50 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 51 April 1, 2017, of state highways, parkways, bridges, the New York 1024 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facilities, including 2 work appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from 3 this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 4 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 5 the acquisition of property, and for engineering services, including 6 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 7 contract services provided by private firms, and including but not 8 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 9 estimates; construction management and supervision; and appraisals, 10 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 11 tion projects (17JS1722) (54255) ................................... 12 327,528,000 ...................................... (re. $15,441,000) 13 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 14 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 15 April 1, 2017, of state highways, parkways, bridges, and facilities, 16 including work appurtenant and ancillary thereto, to improve access 17 to and from the John F. Kennedy International Airport, including 18 capacity improvements to the interchange between the Grand Central 19 Parkway, Union Turnpike, Jackie Robinson Parkway and the Van Wyck 20 Expressway and expansion of the Van Wyck Expressway. Project costs 21 funded from this appropriation may include but shall not be limited 22 to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, 23 and the acquisition of property, and for engineering services, 24 including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, 25 and the contract services provided by private firms, and including 26 but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 27 and estimates; construction management and supervision; and 28 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 29 transportation projects (17JK1722) (54204) ......................... 30 564,000,000 ....................................... (re. $9,259,000) 31 Transportation infrastructure and facilities of regional and community 32 importance to be accelerated in a manner consistent with the Depart- 33 ment's planning and engineering processes and pursuant to plans 34 provided by the speaker of the assembly and the temporary president 35 and majority leader of the senate, and posted to the Department's 36 public-facing website: for the payment of costs, including the 37 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017, of transpor- 38 tation infrastructure projects, including but not limited to, state 39 and local roads and bridges; airport, freight and passenger rail, 40 port and transit projects or multi-modal facilities, including work 41 appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from this 42 appropriation may include but shall not be limited to construction, 43 reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, the acquisition of 44 property, and engineering services, including personal services, 45 nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, the contract services 46 provided by private firms, and reimbursements to the dedicated high- 47 way and bridge trust fund and capital projects funds, for activities 48 including but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 49 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 50 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 51 statements for transportation infrastructure projects (17RE1722) 52 (54209) ... 130,000,000 ......................... (re. $130,000,000) 1025 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 2 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 3 April 1, 2017, of state and local bridges, including work appurten- 4 ant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from this appropri- 5 ation may include but shall not be limited to construction, recon- 6 struction, reconditioning and preservation, and the acquisition of 7 property, and for engineering services, including personal services, 8 nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services 9 provided by private firms, and including but not limited to the 10 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 11 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 12 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 13 projects (17BR1722) (54272) ... 150,000,000 ...... (re. $11,529,000) 14 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 15 Transportation infrastructure and facilities in the five-year depart- 16 ment of transportation plan for 2015-16 through 2019-20, for the 17 payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities incurred 18 prior to April 1, 2016, of transportation infrastructure projects, 19 including but not limited to, state and local roads and bridges; 20 airport, freight and passenger rail, port and transit projects or 21 multi-modal facilities, including work appurtenant and ancillary 22 thereto. Project costs funded from this appropriation may include 23 but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 24 tioning and preservation, the acquisition of property, and engineer- 25 ing services, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 26 fringe benefits, the contract services provided by private firms, 27 and reimbursements to the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund 28 and capital projects funds, for activities including but not limited 29 to, the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 30 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 31 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 32 infrastructure projects (17991622) (54201) ......................... 33 84,475,000 ........................................ (re. $5,798,000) 34 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 35 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 36 April 1, 2016, of state highways, parkways, bridges, the New York 37 State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facilities, including 38 work appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from 39 this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 40 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 41 the acquisition of property, and for engineering services, including 42 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 43 contract services provided by private firms, and including but not 44 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 45 estimates; construction management and supervision; and appraisals, 46 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 47 tion projects (17JS1622) (54255) ................................... 48 208,354,000 ....................................... (re. $6,526,000) 49 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 50 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 51 April 1, 2016, of state and local bridges, including work appurten- 1026 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from this appropri- 2 ation may include but shall not be limited to construction, recon- 3 struction, reconditioning and preservation, and the acquisition of 4 property, and for engineering services, including personal services, 5 nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services 6 provided by private firms, and including but not limited to the 7 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 8 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 9 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 10 projects (17BR1622) (54272) ... 150,000,000 ....... (re. $6,699,000) 11 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 12 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 13 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 14 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 15 April 1, 2016, of state highways, parkways, bridges, transit 16 projects, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and 17 facilities, including work appurtenant and ancillary thereto. 18 Project costs funded from this appropriation may include but shall 19 not be limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 20 preservation, and the acquisition of property, and for engineering 21 services, including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe 22 benefits, and the contract services provided by private firms, and 23 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 24 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 25 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 26 statements for transportation projects (17LA1622) (54241) .......... 27 150,000,000 ...................................... (re. $90,401,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 29 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 30 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 31 April 1, 2015, of state highways, parkways, bridges, the New York 32 State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facilities, including 33 work appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from 34 this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 35 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 36 the acquisition of property, and for engineering services, including 37 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 38 contract services provided by private firms, and including but not 39 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 40 estimates; construction management and supervision; and appraisals, 41 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 42 tion projects (17JS1522) (54255) ................................... 43 200,000,000 ....................................... (re. $3,687,000) 44 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 45 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 46 April 1, 2015, of state highways, parkways, bridges, the New York 47 State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facilities, including 48 work appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from 49 this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 50 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 1027 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the acquisition of property, and for engineering services, including 2 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 3 contract services provided by private firms, and including but not 4 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 5 estimates; construction management and supervision; and appraisals, 6 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 7 tion projects (17LA1522) (54241) ................................... 8 100,000,000 ....................................... (re. $4,312,000) 9 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 10 proceeds, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 11 April 1, 2015, of state and local bridges, including work appurten- 12 ant and ancillary thereto. Project costs funded from this appropri- 13 ation may include but shall not be limited to construction, recon- 14 struction, reconditioning and preservation, and the acquisition of 15 property, and for engineering services, including personal services, 16 nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services 17 provided by private firms, and including but not limited to the 18 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 19 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 20 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 21 projects (17BR1522) (54272) ... 150,000,000 ...... (re. $11,682,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 23 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 24 incurred prior to April 1, 2014, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 25 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 26 ities, including work appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project 27 costs funded from this appropriation may include but shall not be 28 limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 29 vation, and the acquisition of property, and for engineering 30 services, including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe 31 benefits, and the contract services provided by private firms, and 32 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 33 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 34 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 35 statements for transportation projects (17191422) (54255) .......... 36 155,000,000 ....................................... (re. $4,064,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 38 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 39 incurred prior to April 1, 2013, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 40 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 41 ities, including work appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Project 42 costs funded from this appropriation may include but shall not be 43 limited to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 44 vation, and the acquisition of property, and for engineering 45 services, including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe 46 benefits, and the contract services provided by private firms, and 47 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 48 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 49 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 1028 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 statements for transportation projects (17191322) (54255) .......... 2 155,000,000 ....................................... (re. $1,222,000) 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 5 Non-MTA Capital Purpose 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 7 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 8 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 9 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 10 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 11 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 12 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 13 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 14 portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substitution 15 for the required non-federal matching shares of the federally-funded 16 portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys hereby 17 appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken by 18 mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating agen- 19 cies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 20 authority dedicated tax fund. The receipt of funding from this 21 appropriation to a municipality may be conditioned upon a certif- 22 ication by the Division of Housing and Community Renewal that such 23 municipality is a pro-housing community (17552531) (53102) ......... 24 50,400,000 ....................................... (re. $50,400,000) 25 For the additional costs of mass transportation capital projects and 26 facilities including replacement of buses meeting federal standards 27 for replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design 28 and construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of 29 mass transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and 30 facilities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a 31 program of projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of 32 which a portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substi- 33 tution for the required non-federal matching shares of the federal- 34 ly-funded portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys 35 hereby appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken 36 by mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating 37 agencies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 38 authority dedicated tax fund. The receipt of funding from this 39 appropriation to a municipality may be conditioned upon a certif- 40 ication by the Division of Housing and Community Renewal that such 41 municipality is a pro-housing community (17562531) (54115) ......... 42 80,000,000 ....................................... (re. $80,000,000) 43 For the payment of the costs of the electrification of mass transit 44 bus fleets, including the replacement of conventional fossil-fueled 45 buses with electric buses. The moneys hereby appropriated are to be 46 made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems other 47 than those mass transit operating agencies which receive money from 48 the metropolitan transportation authority dedicated tax fund 49 (17EB2531) (54222) ... 20,000,000 ................ (re. $20,000,000) 1029 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 2 proceeds, of the reconstruction, improvement, rehabilitation and 3 maintenance of the existing passenger rail system of the Niagara 4 Frontier transportation authority. Funds shall be made available 5 pursuant to a plan approved by the commissioner of transportation 6 (17NF2531) (54220) ... 26,000,000 ................ (re. $26,000,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 8 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 9 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 10 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 11 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 12 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 13 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 14 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 15 portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substitution 16 for the required non-federal matching shares of the federally-funded 17 portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys hereby 18 appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken by 19 mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating agen- 20 cies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 21 authority dedicated tax fund. The receipt of funding from this 22 appropriation to a municipality may be conditioned upon a certif- 23 ication by the Division of Housing and Community Renewal that such 24 municipality is a pro-housing community (17552431) (53102) ......... 25 50,400,000 ....................................... (re. $49,932,000) 26 For the payment of the costs of the electrification of mass transit 27 bus fleets, including the replacement of conventional fossil-fueled 28 buses with electric buses. The moneys hereby appropriated are to be 29 made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems other 30 than those mass transit operating agencies which receive money from 31 the metropolitan transportation authority dedicated tax fund 32 (17EB2431) (54222) ... 20,000,000 ................ (re. $20,000,000) 33 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 34 proceeds, of the reconstruction, improvement, rehabilitation and 35 maintenance of the existing passenger rail system of the Niagara 36 Frontier transportation authority. 37 Funds shall be made available pursuant to a plan approved by the 38 commissioner of transportation (17NF2431) (54220) .................. 39 26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $26,000,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 41 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 42 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 43 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 44 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 45 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 46 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 47 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 48 portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substitution 49 for the required non-federal matching shares of the federally-funded 50 portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys hereby 1030 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken by 2 mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating agen- 3 cies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 4 authority dedicated tax fund (17552331) (53102) .................... 5 50,400,000 ....................................... (re. $38,267,000) 6 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 7 proceeds, of the reconstruction, improvement, rehabilitation and 8 maintenance of the existing passenger rail system of the Niagara 9 Frontier transportation authority (17NF2331) (54220) ............... 10 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $16,567,000) 11 For the payment of the costs of the electrification of mass transit 12 bus fleets, including the replacement of conventional fossil-fueled 13 buses with electric buses. The moneys hereby appropriated are to be 14 made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems other 15 than those mass transit operating agencies which receive money from 16 the metropolitan transportation authority dedicated tax fund 17 (17EB2331) (54222) ... 20,000,000 ................ (re. $20,000,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 19 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 20 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 21 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 22 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 23 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 24 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 25 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 26 portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substitution 27 for the required non-federal matching shares of the federally-funded 28 portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys hereby 29 appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken by 30 mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating agen- 31 cies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 32 authority dedicated tax fund (17552231) (53102) .................... 33 50,400,000 ....................................... (re. $33,633,000) 34 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 35 proceeds, of the reconstruction, improvement, rehabilitation and 36 maintenance of the existing passenger rail system of the Niagara 37 Frontier transportation authority (17NF2231) (54220) ............... 38 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,355,000) 39 For the payment of the costs of the electrification of mass transit 40 bus fleets, including the replacement of conventional fossil-fueled 41 buses with electric buses. The moneys hereby appropriated are to be 42 made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems other 43 than those mass transit operating agencies which receive money from 44 the metropolitan transportation authority dedicated tax fund 45 (17EB2231) (54222) ... 20,000,000 ................ (re. $20,000,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 47 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 48 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 49 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 50 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 1031 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 2 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 3 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 4 portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substitution 5 for the required non-federal matching shares of the federally-funded 6 portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys hereby 7 appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken by 8 mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating agen- 9 cies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 10 authority dedicated tax fund (17552131) (53102) .................... 11 27,500,000 ....................................... (re. $17,858,000) 12 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 13 proceeds, of the reconstruction, improvement, rehabilitation and 14 maintenance of the existing passenger rail system of the Niagara 15 Frontier transportation authority (17NF2131) (54220) ............... 16 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,463,000) 17 For the payment of the costs of the electrification of mass transit 18 bus fleets, including the replacement of conventional fossil-fueled 19 buses with electric buses. The moneys hereby appropriated are to be 20 made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems other 21 than those mass transit operating agencies which receive money from 22 the metropolitan transportation authority dedicated tax fund 23 (17EB2131) (54222) ... 20,000,000 ................ (re. $20,000,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 25 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 26 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 27 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 28 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 29 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 30 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 31 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 32 portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substitution 33 for the required non-federal matching shares of the federally-funded 34 portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys hereby 35 appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken by 36 mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating agen- 37 cies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 38 authority dedicated tax fund. Provided, however, that no obligations 39 against, or spending from this appropriation shall be authorized 40 unless the director of the division of the budget certifies that 41 such obligations or spending can be accommodated within the State's 42 multi-year financial plan without adversely affecting the funding 43 available for (a) capital projects currently authorized that are 44 deemed essential to the health and safety of the public, or (b) 45 essential governmental services (17552031) (53102) ................. 46 27,500,000 ........................................ (re. $6,755,000) 47 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 48 proceeds, of the reconstruction, improvement, rehabilitation and 49 maintenance of the existing passenger rail system of the Niagara 50 Frontier transportation authority. Provided, however, that no obli- 51 gations against, or spending from this appropriation shall be 1032 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 authorized unless the director of the division of the budget certi- 2 fies that such obligations or spending can be accommodated within 3 the State's multi-year financial plan without adversely affecting 4 the funding available for (a) capital projects currently authorized 5 that are deemed essential to the health and safety of the public, or 6 (b) essential governmental services (17NF2031) (54220) ............... 7 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,781,000) 8 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects, studies, and 9 facilities including replacement of buses, related bus equipment and 10 the acquisition, design and construction, including engineering and 11 consulting costs, of mass transit bus garages or other mass trans- 12 portation projects, studies, and facilities approved by the commis- 13 sioner of transportation in a program of projects. Such funding may 14 be part of a total project of which a portion is federally funded. 15 The moneys hereby appropriated are to be made available for the 16 Niagara Frontier transportation authority. Provided, however, that 17 no obligations against, or spending from this appropriation shall be 18 authorized unless the director of the division of the budget certi- 19 fies that such obligations or spending can be accommodated within 20 the State's multi-year financial plan without adversely affecting 21 the funding available for (a) capital projects currently authorized 22 that are deemed essential to the health and safety of the public, or 23 (b) essential governmental services (17AM2031) (54221) ............. 24 6,000,000 ........................................... (re. $434,000) 25 For the payment of the costs of the electrification of mass transit 26 bus fleets, including the replacement of conventional fossil-fueled 27 buses with electric buses. The moneys hereby appropriated are to be 28 made available for projects undertaken by mass transit systems other 29 than those mass transit operating agencies which receive money from 30 the metropolitan transportation authority dedicated tax fund. 31 Provided, however, that no obligations against, or spending from 32 this appropriation shall be authorized unless the director of the 33 division of the budget certifies that such obligations or spending 34 can be accommodated within the State's multi-year financial plan 35 without adversely affecting the funding available for (a) capital 36 projects currently authorized that are deemed essential to the 37 health and safety of the public, or (b) essential governmental 38 services (17EB2031) (54222) ... 20,000,000 ....... (re. $20,000,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 40 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 41 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 42 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 43 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 44 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 45 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 46 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 47 portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substitution 48 for the required non-federal matching shares of the federally-funded 49 portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys hereby 50 appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken by 51 mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating agen- 1033 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 cies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 2 authority dedicated tax fund (17551931) (53102) .................... 3 27,500,000 ....................................... (re. $11,121,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 54, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 6 For the payment of the costs, which shall be reimbursed from bond 7 proceeds, of the reconstruction, improvement, rehabilitation and 8 maintenance of the existing passenger rail system of the Niagara 9 Frontier transportation authority (17NF1931) (54220) ............... 10 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,468,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 12 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 13 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 14 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 15 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 16 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 17 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 18 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 19 portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substitution 20 for the required non-federal matching shares of the federally-funded 21 portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys hereby 22 appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken by 23 mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating agen- 24 cies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 25 authority dedicated tax fund (17551831) (53102) .................... 26 27,500,000 ........................................ (re. $3,578,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 28 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 29 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 30 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 31 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 32 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 33 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 34 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 35 portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substitution 36 for the required non-federal matching shares of the federally-funded 37 portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys hereby 38 appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken by 39 mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating agen- 40 cies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 41 authority dedicated tax fund (17551731) (53102) .................... 42 27,500,000 .......................................... (re. $889,000) 43 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 44 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 45 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 46 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 47 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 48 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 1034 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 2 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 3 portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substitution 4 for the required non-federal matching shares of the federally-funded 5 portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys hereby 6 appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken by 7 mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating agen- 8 cies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 9 authority dedicated tax fund (17551631) (53102) .................... 10 27,500,000 ........................................ (re. $2,685,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 12 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 13 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 14 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 15 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 16 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 17 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 18 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 19 portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substitution 20 for the required non-federal matching shares of the federallyfunded 21 portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys hereby 22 appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken by 23 mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating agen- 24 cies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 25 authority dedicated tax fund (17551531) (53102) .................... 26 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,095,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 28 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 29 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 30 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 31 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 32 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 33 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 34 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 35 portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substitution 36 for the required non-federal matching shares of the federallyfunded 37 portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys hereby 38 appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken by 39 mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating agen- 40 cies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 41 authority dedicated tax fund (17551431) (53102) .................... 42 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 44 For the costs of mass transportation capital projects and facilities 45 including replacement of buses meeting federal standards for 46 replacement, related bus equipment and the acquisition, design and 47 construction, including engineering and consulting costs, of mass 48 transit bus garages or other mass transportation projects and facil- 49 ities approved by the commissioner of transportation in a program of 1035 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 projects. Such funding may be part of a total project of which a 2 portion is federally funded but shall not be used in substitution 3 for the required non-federal matching shares of the federallyfunded 4 portion of the project to which it is added. The moneys hereby 5 appropriated are to be made available for projects undertaken by 6 mass transit systems other than those mass transit operating agen- 7 cies which receive money from the metropolitan transportation 8 authority dedicated tax fund (17551331) (53102) .................... 9 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,532,000) 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 12 Preparation of Plans Purpose 13 Design and Construction 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 15 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 16 services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided by 17 private firms, and including but not limited to the preparation of 18 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 19 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 20 mental impact statements for transportation projects (17551330) 21 (53103) ... 45,000,000 ............................ (re. $5,368,000) 22 Capital Projects Funds - Other 23 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 24 Rail Service Preservation Purpose 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 26 For the construction and improvement of rail freight projects includ- 27 ing, but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, recon- 28 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of any railroad capital 29 facility and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 30 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 31 erty required or expected to be required therefor (17552541) (53104) 32 ... 35,458,000 ................................... (re. $35,458,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 34 For the construction and improvement of rail freight projects includ- 35 ing, but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, recon- 36 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of any railroad capital 37 facility and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 38 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 39 erty required or expected to be required therefor (17552441) (53104) 40 ... 35,458,000 ................................... (re. $35,458,000) 41 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, is 42 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 43 For the construction and improvement of rail freight projects includ- 44 ing, but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, recon- 45 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of any railroad capital 1036 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 facility and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 2 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 3 erty required or expected to be required therefor. Of this appropri- 4 ation, the amount of up to $3,000,000 will be provided [to the 5 metropolitan transportation authority] for costs associated with 6 implementing a program to upgrade diesel train engines owned by the 7 Long Island Rail Road to improve emissions standards, [and the] 8 provided that of this amount, up to $2,000,000 will be provided as a 9 match for a Federal Consolidated Rail Infrastructure and Safety 10 Improvements grant, if awarded, to upgrade locomotives owned by the 11 New York and Atlantic Railway. An additional amount of up to 12 $1,000,000 will be provided for other diesel train engine retrofit 13 uses (17552341) (53104) ... 35,458,000 ........... (re. $35,333,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 15 For the construction and improvement of rail freight projects includ- 16 ing, but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, recon- 17 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of any railroad capital 18 facility and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 19 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 20 erty required or expected to be required therefor. Of this appropri- 21 ation, the amount of up to $3,000,000 will be provided to the metro- 22 politan transportation authority for costs associated with 23 implementing a program to upgrade diesel train engines owned by the 24 Long Island Rail Road to improve emissions standards, and the amount 25 of up to $1,000,000 for other diesel train engine retrofit uses 26 (17552241) (53104) ... 35,458,000 ................ (re. $35,456,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 28 For the construction and improvement of rail freight projects includ- 29 ing, but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, recon- 30 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of any railroad capital 31 facility and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 32 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 33 erty required or expected to be required therefor. Of this appropri- 34 ation, the amount of up to $3,000,000 will be provided to the metro- 35 politan transportation authority for costs associated with 36 implementing a program to upgrade diesel train engines owned by the 37 Long Island Rail Road to improve emissions standards, and the amount 38 of up to $1,000,000 for other diesel train engine retrofit uses 39 (17552141) (53104) ... 17,500,000 ................ (re. $17,493,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 41 For the construction and improvement of rail freight projects includ- 42 ing, but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, recon- 43 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of any railroad capital 44 facility and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 45 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 46 erty required or expected to be required therefor. Of this appropri- 47 ation, the amount of up to $3,000,000 will be provided to the metro- 48 politan transportation authority for costs associated with 49 implementing a program to upgrade diesel train engines owned by the 1037 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Long Island Rail Road to improve emissions standards, and the amount 2 of up to $1,000,000 for other diesel train engine retrofit uses 3 (17552041) (53104) ... 17,500,000 ................ (re. $14,080,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 5 For the construction and improvement of rail freight projects includ- 6 ing, but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, recon- 7 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of any railroad capital 8 facility and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 9 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 10 erty required or expected to be required therefor. Of this appropri- 11 ation, the amount of up to $3,000,000 will be provided to the metro- 12 politan transportation authority for costs associated with 13 implementing a program to upgrade diesel train engines owned by the 14 Long Island Rail Road to improve emissions standards, and the amount 15 of up to $1,000,000 for other diesel train engine retrofit uses 16 (17551941) (53104) ... 17,500,000 ................ (re. $15,447,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 18 For the construction and improvement of rail freight projects includ- 19 ing, but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, recon- 20 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of any railroad capital 21 facility and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 22 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 23 erty required or expected to be required therefor. 24 Of this appropriation, the amount of up to $3,000,000 will be provided 25 to the metropolitan transportation authority for costs associated 26 with implementing a program to upgrade diesel train engines owned by 27 the Long Island Rail Road to improve emissions standards, and the 28 amount of up to $1,000,000 for other diesel train engine retrofit 29 uses (17551841) (53104) ... 17,500,000 ........... (re. $11,183,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 31 For the construction and improvement of rail freight projects includ- 32 ing, but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, recon- 33 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of any railroad capital 34 facility and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 35 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 36 erty required or expected to be required therefor. 37 Of this appropriation, the amount of up to $3,000,000 will be provided 38 to the metropolitan transportation authority for costs associated 39 with implementing a program to upgrade diesel train engines owned by 40 the Long Island Rail Road to improve emissions standards, and the 41 amount of up to $1,000,000 for other diesel train engine retrofit 42 uses (17551741) (53104) ... 17,500,000 ........... (re. $12,244,000) 43 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 44 For the construction and improvement of rail freight projects includ- 45 ing, but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, recon- 46 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of any railroad capital 47 facility and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 48 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 1038 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 erty required or expected to be required therefor. Of this appropri- 2 ation, the amount of up to $3,000,000 will be provided to the metro- 3 politan transportation authority for costs associated with 4 implementing a program to upgrade diesel train engines owned by the 5 Long Island Rail Road to improve emissions standards, and the amount 6 of up to $1,000,000 for other diesel train engine retrofit uses 7 (17551641) (53104) ... 17,500,000 ................. (re. $7,188,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 9 For the construction and improvement of rail freight projects includ- 10 ing, but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, recon- 11 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of any railroad capital 12 facility and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 13 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 14 erty required or expected to be required therefor. Of this appropri- 15 ation, the amount of up to $3,000,000 will be provided to the metro- 16 politan transportation authority for costs associated with 17 implementing a program to upgrade diesel train engines owned by the 18 Long Island Rail Road to improve emissions standards, and the amount 19 of up to $1,000,000 for other diesel train engine retrofit uses 20 (17551541) (53104) ... 10,000,000 ................. (re. $8,932,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 22 For the construction and improvement of rail freight projects includ- 23 ing, but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, recon- 24 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of any railroad capital 25 facility and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 26 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 27 erty required or expected to be required therefor. Of this appropri- 28 ation, the amount of up to $3,000,000 will be provided to the metro- 29 politan transportation authority for costs associated with 30 implementing a program to upgrade diesel train engines owned by the 31 Long Island Rail Road to improve emissions standards, and the amount 32 of up to $1,000,000 for other diesel train engine retrofit uses 33 (17551441) (53104) ... 10,000,000 ................. (re. $2,970,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 35 For the construction and improvement of rail freight projects includ- 36 ing, but not limited to, the acquisition, construction, recon- 37 struction, improvement or rehabilitation of any railroad capital 38 facility and any capital improvement used in connection herewith, 39 and for the acquisition of real property or interests in real prop- 40 erty required or expected to be required therefor. Of this appropri- 41 ation, the amount of up to $3,000,000 will be provided to the metro- 42 politan transportation authority for costs associated with 43 implementing a one year pilot program to upgrade diesel train 44 engines owned by the Long Island Rail Road to improve emissions 45 standards (17551341) (53104) ... 10,000,000 ....... (re. $2,529,000) 46 Capital Projects Funds - Other 47 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 48 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 1039 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Non-Federal Aided Highway Purpose 2 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 3 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 4 incurred prior to April 1, 2012, of state and local highways, park- 5 ways, bridges, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, 6 and facilities for which the responsibility is vested with the state 7 department of transportation, including work appurtenant and ancil- 8 lary thereto. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 9 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 10 reconditioning and preservation, and the acquisition of property; 11 for personal services, fringe benefits, nonpersonal services, and 12 contract services provided by private firms for activities including 13 but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 14 and estimates; construction management and supervision; and 15 appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact statements 16 for transportation projects (17101222) (54255) ..................... 17 232,049,000 ...................................... (re. $13,248,000) 18 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 19 Federal Capital Projects Fund 20 Transportation Account - 31354 21 Federal Aid Highways Purpose 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 23 For the federal share, from any federal agency under any federal 24 program, of state transportation projects, including both state 25 system and local system projects, and including but not limited to 26 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 27 the acquisition of property; for personal services, fringe benefits, 28 nonpersonal services, and contract services provided by private 29 firms for activities including but not limited to the preparation of 30 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 31 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 32 mental impact statements for transportation projects; for the 33 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2012 and for any 34 other such purposes as specified in section 89-b of the state 35 finance law as amended (17041220) (54256) .......................... 36 916,751,000 ...................................... (re. $13,982,000) 37 NON-FEDERALLY AIDED HIGHWAY CAPITAL PROJECTS (CCP) 38 Capital Projects Funds - Other 39 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 40 Highway Maintenance Purpose 41 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 42 For the payment of the costs of diesel emissions reduction activities 43 and equipment, including but not limited to retrofit and acquisition 44 of low emission vehicles and equipment to achieve the maximum envi- 45 ronmental benefit in non-attainment areas as designated by the 1040 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 United States environmental protection agency in accordance with the 2 clean air act (170807HM) (53260) ... 3,000,000 ....... (re. $74,000) 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 5 Aviation Purpose Account - 30053 6 Aviation Purpose 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 8 For Aviation Bureau including personal services, nonpersonal services, 9 fringe benefits and the contract services provided by private firms. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 11 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 12 fer Authority as defined in the 2025-26 state fiscal year state 13 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 14 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 15 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (17012514) (54205). 16 Expense accounts (00000) ... 1,341,000 .............. (re. $605,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 18 For Aviation Bureau including personal services, nonpersonal services, 19 fringe benefits and the contract services provided by private firms. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 21 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 22 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 23 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 24 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (17012414) (54205). 26 Expense accounts (00000) ... 1,301,000 ................. (re. $43,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 28 For Aviation Bureau including personal services, nonpersonal services, 29 fringe benefits and the contract services provided by private firms. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 31 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 32 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 33 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 34 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 35 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (17012314) (54205). 36 Expense accounts (00000) ... 1,263,000 .................. (re. $1,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 38 For Aviation Bureau including personal services, nonpersonal services, 39 fringe benefits and the contract services provided by private firms. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 41 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 42 fer Authority as defined in the 2019-20 state fiscal year state 43 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 44 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 45 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (17011914) (54205). 46 Expense accounts (00000) ... 1,243,000 ................. (re. $61,000) 1041 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 3 For Aviation Bureau including personal services, nonpersonal services, 4 fringe benefits and the contract services provided by private firms. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 6 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 7 fer Authority as defined in the 2018-19 state fiscal year state 8 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 9 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 10 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (17011814) (54205). 11 Expense accounts (00000) ... 1,186,000 ................ (re. $177,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 13 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 14 For Aviation Bureau including personal services, nonpersonal services, 15 fringe benefits and the contract services provided by private firms. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 17 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 18 fer Authority as defined in the 2017-18 state fiscal year state 19 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 20 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (17011714) (54205). 22 Expense accounts (00000) ... 1,176,000 ................ (re. $547,000) 23 Capital Projects Funds - Other 24 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 25 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 26 Highway Maintenance Purpose 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 28 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 29 incurred prior to April 1, 2025, of preventive maintenance on state 30 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 31 section 10-d of the highway law, and snow and ice control on state 32 highways, including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe 33 benefits and contractual services provided by private firms and 34 municipalities, but not including the costs of heavy equipment 35 (53260). 36 Personal service (170125HM) (50000) .................................. 37 186,718,000 ..................................... (re. $186,718,000) 38 Nonpersonal service (170425HM) (57050) ............................... 39 163,767,000 ..................................... (re. $130,726,000) 40 Fringe benefits (170825HM) (60090) ................................... 41 122,880,000 ...................................... (re. $76,707,000) 42 Indirect costs (170925HM) (58850) ... 5,097,000 ..... (re. $2,702,000) 43 For the payment of the costs of heavy equipment, including the payment 44 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (54275). 45 Nonpersonal service (170525HM) (57050) ............................... 46 60,953,000 ....................................... (re. $60,953,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 1042 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 2 incurred prior to April 1, 2024, of preventive maintenance on state 3 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 4 section 10-d of the highway law, and snow and ice control on state 5 highways, including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe 6 benefits and contractual services provided by private firms and 7 municipalities, but not including the costs of heavy equipment 8 (53260). 9 Personal service (170124HM) (50000) .................................. 10 181,280,000 ..................................... (re. $104,145,000) 11 Nonpersonal service (170424HM) (57050) ............................... 12 163,767,000 ...................................... (re. $57,603,000) 13 Fringe benefits (170824HM) (60090) ................................... 14 119,301,000 ....................................... (re. $2,532,000) 15 Indirect costs (170924HM) (58850) ... 4,949,000 ........ (re. $68,000) 16 For the payment of the costs of heavy equipment, including the payment 17 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (54275). 18 Nonpersonal service (170524HM) (57050) ............................... 19 60,953,000 ....................................... (re. $53,654,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 21 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 22 incurred prior to April 1, 2023, of preventive maintenance on state 23 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 24 section 10-d of the highway law, and snow and ice control on state 25 highways, including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe 26 benefits and contractual services provided by private firms and 27 municipalities, but not including the costs of heavy equipment 28 (53260). 29 Personal service (170123HM) (50000) .................................. 30 176,000,000 ....................................... (re. $2,231,000) 31 Nonpersonal service (170423HM) (57050) ............................... 32 163,767,000 ..................................... (re. $142,324,000) 33 Fringe benefits (170823HM) (60090) ................................... 34 118,008,000 ....................................... (re. $3,770,000) 35 Indirect costs (170923HM) (58850) .................................... 36 5,474,000 ........................................... (re. $820,000) 37 For the payment of the costs of heavy equipment, including the payment 38 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 (54275). 39 Nonpersonal service (170523HM) (57050) ............................... 40 60,953,000 ....................................... (re. $17,039,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 42 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 43 incurred prior to April 1, 2022, of preventive maintenance on state 44 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 45 section 10-d of the highway law, and snow and ice control on state 46 highways, including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe 47 benefits and contractual services provided by private firms and 48 municipalities, but not including the costs of heavy equipment 49 (53260). 1043 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Personal service (170122HM) (50000) .................................. 2 150,000,000 ....................................... (re. $7,600,000) 3 Nonpersonal service (170422HM) (57050) ............................... 4 163,767,000 ...................................... (re. $66,820,000) 5 Fringe benefits (170822HM) (60090) ... 95,925,000 ... (re. $5,319,000) 6 Indirect costs (170922HM) (58850) ... 4,230,000 ....... (re. $112,000) 7 For the payment of the costs of heavy equipment, including the payment 8 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 (54275). 9 Nonpersonal service (170522HM) (57050) ............................... 10 60,953,000 .......................................... (re. $636,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 12 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 13 incurred prior to April 1, 2021, of preventive maintenance on state 14 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 15 section 10-d of the highway law, and snow and ice control on state 16 highways, including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe 17 benefits and contractual services provided by private firms and 18 municipalities, but not including the costs of heavy equipment 19 (53260). 20 Personal service (170121HM) (50000) .................................. 21 140,883,000 ...................................... (re. $15,578,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (170421HM) (57050) ............................... 23 104,419,000 ...................................... (re. $42,312,000) 24 Fringe benefits (170821HM) (60090) ... 88,334,000 .. (re. $10,443,000) 25 Indirect costs (170921HM) (58850) ... 3,973,000 ....... (re. $457,000) 26 For the payment of the costs of heavy equipment, including the payment 27 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 (54275). 28 Nonpersonal service (170521HM) (57050) ............................... 29 38,963,000 ........................................... (re. $21,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 31 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 32 incurred prior to April 1, 2020, of preventive maintenance on state 33 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 34 section 10-d of the highway law, and snow and ice control on state 35 highways, including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe 36 benefits and contractual services provided by private firms and 37 municipalities, but not including the costs of heavy equipment 38 (53260). 39 Personal service (170120HM) (50000) .................................. 40 140,883,000 ...................................... (re. $21,456,000) 41 Nonpersonal service (170420HM) (57050) ............................... 42 104,419,000 ...................................... (re. $31,991,000) 43 Fringe benefits (170820HM) (60090) ... 87,897,000 .. (re. $13,729,000) 44 Indirect costs (170920HM) (58850) ... 4,833,000 ..... (re. $1,250,000) 45 For the payment of the costs of heavy equipment, including the payment 46 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 (54275). 47 Nonpersonal service (170520HM) (57050) ............................... 48 38,963,000 .......................................... (re. $910,000) 49 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 1044 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 2 incurred prior to April 1, 2019, of preventive maintenance on state 3 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 4 section 10-d of the highway law, and snow and ice control on state 5 highways, including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe 6 benefits and contractual services provided by private firms and 7 municipalities, but not including the costs of heavy equipment 8 (53260). 9 Personal service (170119HM) (50000) .................................. 10 140,883,000 ...................................... (re. $16,154,000) 11 Nonpersonal service (170419HM) (57050) ............................... 12 104,419,000 ....................................... (re. $2,489,000) 13 Fringe benefits (170819HM) (60090) ... 89,968,000 .. (re. $10,876,000) 14 Indirect costs (170919HM) (58850) ... 4,833,000 ....... (re. $605,000) 15 For the payment of the costs of heavy equipment, including the payment 16 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 (54275). 17 Nonpersonal service (170519HM) (57050) ............................... 18 38,963,000 .......................................... (re. $262,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 20 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 21 incurred prior to April 1, 2018, of preventive maintenance on state 22 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 23 section 10-d of the highway law, and snow and ice control on state 24 highways, including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe 25 benefits and contractual services provided by private firms and 26 municipalities, but not including the costs of heavy equipment 27 (53260). 28 Personal service (170118HM) (50000) .................................. 29 124,903,000 ....................................... (re. $2,677,000) 30 Nonpersonal service (170418HM) (57050) ............................... 31 104,419,000 ....................................... (re. $3,357,000) 32 Fringe benefits (170818HM) (60090) ... 79,801,000 ... (re. $2,882,000) 33 Indirect costs (170918HM) (58850) ... 3,847,000 ......... (re. $2,000) 34 For the payment of the costs of heavy equipment, including the payment 35 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018 (54275). 36 Nonpersonal service (170518HM) (57050) ............................... 37 38,963,000 ........................................... (re. $32,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 39 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 40 incurred prior to April 1, 2017, of snow and ice control on state 41 highways and preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as 42 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the 43 highway law, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 44 fringe benefits and contractual services provided by private firms 45 and municipalities, but not including the costs of heavy equipment 46 (53260). 47 Nonpersonal service (170417HM) (57050) ............................... 48 241,000,000 ......................................... (re. $834,000) 49 Indirect costs (170917HM) (58850) ... 7,633,000 ....... (re. $358,000) 1045 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 2 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 3 incurred prior to April 1, 2016, of snow and ice control on state 4 highways and preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as 5 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the 6 highway law, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 7 fringe benefits and contractual services provided by private firms 8 and municipalities, but not including the costs of heavy equipment 9 (53260). 10 Personal service (170116HM) (50000) .................................. 11 255,443,000 ...................................... (re. $11,274,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (170416HM) (57050) ............................... 13 240,000,000 ...................................... (re. $18,648,000) 14 Fringe benefits (170816HM) (60090) ... 143,610,000 ..... (re. $25,000) 15 Indirect costs (170916HM) (58850) ... 6,846,000 ....... (re. $294,000) 16 For the payment of the costs of heavy equipment, including the payment 17 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016 (54275). 18 Nonpersonal service (170516HM) (57050) ............................... 19 36,727,000 ........................................... (re. $39,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 21 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 22 incurred prior to April 1, 2015, of snow and ice control on state 23 highways and preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as 24 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the 25 highway law, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 26 fringe benefits and contractual services provided by private firms 27 and municipalities, but not including the costs of heavy equipment 28 (53260). 29 Personal service (170115HM) (50000) ... 253,110,000 ..... (re. $2,000) 30 Nonpersonal service (170415HM) (57050) ............................... 31 235,648,000 ......................................... (re. $840,000) 32 Fringe benefits (170815HM) (60090) ... 141,438,000 .. (re. $2,081,000) 33 Indirect costs (170915HM) (58850) ... 6,404,000 ....... (re. $239,000) 34 For the payment of the costs of heavy equipment, including the payment 35 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2015 (54275). 36 Nonpersonal service (170515HM) (57050) ... 35,657,000 ... (re. $2,000) 37 For the operating and capital costs of the Wells Bridge highway rest 38 area/text stop located on Interstate 88 westbound between exits 11 39 and 12 in Delaware County (17WB15HM) (54240) ....................... 40 2,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,200,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 43 For the capital costs of the highway rest areas/text stops located on 44 Interstate 87 in Warren and Essex Counties (17GF15HM) (54239) ...... 45 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $528,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 47 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 48 incurred prior to April 1, 2014, of snow and ice control on state 49 highways and preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as 1046 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the 2 highway law, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 3 fringe benefits and contractual services provided by private firms 4 and municipalities, but not including the costs of heavy equipment 5 (53260). 6 Personal service (170114HM) (50000) ... 249,824,000 ... (re. $399,000) 7 Nonpersonal service (170414HM) (57050) ............................... 8 222,000,000 ......................................... (re. $858,000) 9 Fringe benefits (170814HM) (60090) ... 142,051,000 .. (re. $1,018,000) 10 Indirect costs (170914HM) (58850) ... 6,996,000 ........ (re. $50,000) 11 For the payment of the costs of heavy equipment, including the payment 12 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014 (54275). 13 Nonpersonal service (170514HM) (57050) ............................... 14 40,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,387,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 16 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 17 incurred prior to April 1, 2013, of snow and ice control on state 18 highways and preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as 19 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the 20 highway law, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 21 fringe benefits and contractual services provided by private firms 22 and municipalities, but not including the costs of heavy equipment 23 (53260). 24 Nonpersonal service (170413HM) (57050) ............................... 25 195,880,000 ......................................... (re. $175,000) 26 For the payment of the costs of heavy equipment, including the payment 27 of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2013 (54275). 28 Nonpersonal service (170513HM) (57050) ............................... 29 49,070,000 ....................................... (re. $20,670,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 31 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 32 incurred prior to April 1, 2012, of snow and ice control on state 33 highways and preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as 34 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the 35 highway law, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 36 fringe benefits and contractual services provided by private firms 37 and municipalities (53260). 38 Personal service (170112HM) (50000) ... 234,144,000 ... (re. $521,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (170412HM) (57050) ............................... 40 244,950,000 .......................................... (re. $93,000) 41 Fringe benefits (170812HM) (60090) ... 121,006,000 .. (re. $2,127,000) 42 Indirect costs (170912HM) (58850) ... 6,298,000 ....... (re. $110,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 44 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 45 incurred prior to April 1, 2011, of snow and ice control on state 46 highways and preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as 47 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the 48 highway law, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 1047 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 fringe benefits and contractual services provided by private firms 2 and municipalities. 3 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 4 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 5 the approval of the director of the budget (170411HM) (53260) ...... 6 614,652,000 ...................................... (re. $27,634,000) 7 PERSONAL SERVICE 8 Personal service--regular ...... 204,261,000 9 Temporary service ................ 2,700,000 10 Holiday/overtime compensation ... 22,500,000 11 -------------- 12 Amount available for 13 personal service ........... 229,461,000 14 -------------- 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Supplies and materials ......... 140,747,000 17 Travel ............................. 900,000 18 Contractual services ............ 81,000,000 19 Equipment ....................... 13,500,000 20 Fringe benefits ................ 123,475,000 21 Indirect costs ................... 7,929,000 22 -------------- 23 Amount available for nonper- 24 sonal service ................ 367,551,000 25 -------------- 26 For the purchase of transpor- 27 tation related equipment, 28 including the cost of all 29 vehicles under 8,500 pounds: 30 Contractual services ............... 180,000 31 Equipment ....................... 17,460,000 32 -------------- 33 Amount available for nonper- 34 sonal service ............... 17,640,000 35 -------------- 36 614,652,000 37 ============== 38 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 39 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 40 incurred prior to April 1, 2010, of snow and ice control on state 41 highways and preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as 42 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the 43 highway law, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 44 fringe benefits and contractual services provided by private firms 45 and municipalities. 46 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 47 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 1048 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the approval of the director of the budget (170410HM) (53260) ...... 2 668,346,000 ....................................... (re. $9,398,000) 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service--regular ...... 226,956,000 5 Temporary service ................ 3,000,000 6 Holiday/overtime compensation ... 25,000,000 7 -------------- 8 Amount available for 9 personal service ........... 254,956,000 10 -------------- 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Supplies and materials ......... 156,386,000 13 Travel ........................... 1,000,000 14 Contractual services ............ 90,000,000 15 Equipment ....................... 15,000,000 16 Fringe benefits ................ 123,475,000 17 Indirect costs ................... 7,929,000 18 -------------- 19 Amount available for nonper- 20 sonal service .............. 393,790,000 21 -------------- 22 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 23 For the purchase of transpor- 24 tation related equipment, 25 including the cost of all 26 vehicles under 8,500 pounds ... 19,600,000 27 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 28 Contractual services ............... 200,000 29 Equipment ....................... 19,400,000 30 -------------- 31 Amount available for nonper- 32 sonal service ............... 19,600,000 33 -------------- 34 668,346,000 35 ============== 36 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 54, 37 section 1, of the laws of 2011: 38 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 39 incurred prior to April 1, 2009, of snow and ice control on state 40 highways and preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as 41 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the 42 highway law, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 43 fringe benefits and contractual services provided by private firms 44 and municipalities. 1049 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 2 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 3 the approval of the director of the budget (170409HM) (53260) ...... 4 664,757,267 ...................................... (re. $36,903,000) 5 PERSONAL SERVICE 6 Personal service--regular ...... 215,326,267 7 Temporary service ................ 3,000,000 8 Holiday/overtime compensation ... 30,000,000 9 -------------- 10 Amount available for 11 personal service ........... 248,326,267 12 -------------- 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Supplies and materials ......... 161,375,000 15 Travel ........................... 1,500,000 16 Contractual services ............ 90,000,000 17 Equipment ....................... 15,000,000 18 Fringe benefits ................ 109,139,000 19 Indirect costs ................... 8,556,000 20 -------------- 21 Amount available for nonper- 22 sonal service .............. 385,570,000 23 -------------- 24 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 25 For the purchase of transpor- 26 tation related equipment, 27 including the cost of all 28 vehicles under 8,500 pounds ... 19,600,000 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Contractual services ............... 200,000 31 Equipment ....................... 19,400,000 32 -------------- 33 Amount available for nonper- 34 sonal service ............... 19,600,000 35 -------------- 36 For costs associated with the 37 contract maintenance and 38 operation of interstate 84, 39 the department of transpor- 40 tation and the thruway 41 authority are hereby author- 42 ized and empowered to enter 43 into an annual contract for 1050 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the thruway authority solely 2 to perform such maintenance 3 and operation on behalf of 4 the department, notwith- 5 standing any other provision 6 of law, provided such 7 contract shall include the 8 same indemnification and 9 hold harmless clauses for 10 the thruway authority that 11 are provided to munici- 12 palities pursuant to subdi- 13 vision 2-a of section 12 of 14 the highway law ............... 11,261,000 15 -------------- 16 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 17 Contractual services ............ 11,261,000 18 -------------- 19 Amount available for nonper- 20 sonal service ............... 11,261,000 21 -------------- 22 664,757,267 23 ============== 24 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 55, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2010: 26 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 27 incurred prior to April 1, 2008, of snow and ice control on state 28 highways and preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as 29 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the 30 highway law, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 31 fringe benefits and contractual services provided by private firms 32 and municipalities. 33 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 34 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 35 the approval of the director of the budget (170408HM) (53260) ...... 36 614,421,000 ....................................... (re. $1,132,000) 37 PERSONAL SERVICE 38 Personal service--regular ...... 231,213,000 39 Temporary service ................ 2,259,000 40 Holiday/overtime compensation ... 27,392,000 41 -------------- 42 Amount available for 43 personal service ........... 260,864,000 44 -------------- 1051 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ......... 118,595,000 3 Travel ........................... 1,435,000 4 Contractual services ............ 77,787,000 5 Equipment ....................... 13,747,000 6 Fringe benefits ................ 103,050,000 7 Indirect costs ................... 8,710,000 8 -------------- 9 Amount available for nonper- 10 sonal service .............. 323,324,000 11 -------------- 12 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 13 For the purchase of transpor- 14 tation related equipment, 15 including the cost of all 16 vehicles under 8,500 pounds ... 19,300,000 17 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 18 Contractual services ............... 193,000 19 Equipment ....................... 19,107,000 20 -------------- 21 Amount available for nonper- 22 sonal service ............... 19,300,000 23 -------------- 24 For costs associated with the 25 contract maintenance and 26 operation of interstate 84, 27 the department of transpor- 28 tation and the thruway 29 authority are hereby author- 30 ized and empowered to enter 31 into an annual contract for 32 the thruway authority solely 33 to perform such maintenance 34 and operation on behalf of 35 the department, notwith- 36 standing any other provision 37 of law, provided such 38 contract shall include the 39 same indemnification and 40 hold harmless clauses for 41 the thruway authority that 42 are provided to munici- 43 palities pursuant to subdi- 44 vision 2-a of section 12 of 45 the highway law ............... 10,933,000 46 -------------- 1052 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Contractual services ............ 10,933,000 3 -------------- 4 Amount available for nonper- 5 sonal service ............... 10,933,000 6 -------------- 7 614,421,000 8 ============== 9 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 55, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2010: 11 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 12 incurred prior to April 1, 2007, of snow and ice control on state 13 highways and preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as 14 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the 15 highway law, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 16 fringe benefits and contractual services provided by private firms 17 and municipalities. 18 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 19 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 20 the approval of the director of the budget (170407HM) (53260) ...... 21 573,779,500 ......................................... (re. $300,000) 22 PERSONAL SERVICE 23 Personal service--regular ...... 194,220,000 24 Temporary service ................ 2,215,000 25 Holiday/overtime compensation ... 26,861,000 26 -------------- 27 Amount available for 28 personal service ........... 223,296,000 29 -------------- 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Supplies and materials ......... 120,805,000 32 Travel ........................... 1,377,000 33 Contractual services ............ 73,203,000 34 Equipment ....................... 12,711,000 35 Indirect costs .................. 26,002,000 36 -------------- 37 Amount available for nonper- 38 sonal service .............. 319,819,000 39 -------------- 40 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 41 For the purchase of transpor- 42 tation related equipment, 43 including the cost of all 44 vehicles under 8,500 pounds ... 19,100,000 1053 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Contractual services ............... 191,000 3 Equipment ....................... 18,909,000 4 -------------- 5 Amount available for nonper- 6 sonal service ................. 19,100,000 7 -------------- 8 For costs associated with the 9 contract maintenance and 10 operation of interstate 84, 11 the department of transpor- 12 tation and the thruway 13 authority are hereby author- 14 ized and empowered to enter 15 into an annual contract for 16 the thruway authority solely 17 to perform such maintenance 18 and operation on behalf of 19 the department, notwith- 20 standing any other provision 21 of law, provided such 22 contract shall include the 23 same indemnification and 24 hold harmless clauses for 25 the thruway authority that 26 are provided to munici- 27 palities pursuant to subdi- 28 vision 2-a of section 12 of 29 the highway law ............... 11,565,000 30 -------------- 31 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 32 Contractual services ............ 11,565,000 33 -------------- 34 Amount available for nonper- 35 sonal service ................. 11,565,000 36 -------------- 37 573,779,500 38 ============== 39 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 55, 40 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 41 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 42 incurred prior to April 1, 2006, of snow and ice control on state 43 highways and preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as 44 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the 45 highway law, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 46 fringe benefits and contractual services provided by private firms 47 and municipalities. 1054 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 2 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 3 the approval of the director of the budget (170406HM) (53260) 4 ... ... 528,118,000 ............................. (re. $3,113,000) 5 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 55, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 7 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 8 incurred prior to April 1, 2005, of snow and ice control on state 9 highways and preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as 10 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the 11 highway law, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 12 fringe benefits and contractual services provided by private firms 13 and municipalities. Such costs shall not include the costs of vehi- 14 cles under 8,500 pounds without the prior approval of the director 15 of the budget. 16 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 17 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 18 the approval of the director of the budget (170405HM) (53260) 19 ... ... 479,947,000 ............................... (re. $714,000) 20 Capital Projects Funds - Other 21 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 22 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 23 Industrial Access Purpose 24 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 55, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2010: 26 For the construction or improvement of highway, bridge and rail 27 freight projects related to industrial access, including the acqui- 28 sition of property and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 29 April 1, 2004. For the cost of the contract services provided by 30 private firms, including but not limited to the preparation of 31 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 32 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 33 mental impact statements for transportation projects. No funds shall 34 be allocated for such purposes until the commissioner of transporta- 35 tion enters into an agreement subject to the approval of the direc- 36 tor of the budget with any public or private entity for the repay- 37 ment of 40 percent of each project's costs disbursed from such 38 funds. Such agreement shall require repayment within 5 years of the 39 date of acceptance of the project by the department of transporta- 40 tion except that the repayment may occur over a period of up to 10 41 years when total project costs exceed $1,000,000. All projects must 42 be approved by the director of the budget prior to the obligation of 43 the moneys so appropriated. 44 The moneys so appropriated shall be made available pursuant to rules 45 and regulations promulgated by the commissioner of transportation 46 establishing the maximum amount of assistance to be provided for 47 each project and the information that must be provided by the entity 48 requesting assistance, establishing criteria for providing assist- 49 ance from the moneys so appropriated and including standards for 1055 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 receiving of assistance including but not limited to the number of 2 jobs created or maintained by the transportation improvement. 3 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of 4 transportation may waive the requirement to repay 40 percent of the 5 cost of a project provided that private funds are dedicated to the 6 cost of such industrial access project and related economic develop- 7 ment for at least 40 percent of the total cost of the industrial 8 access project and related economic development and the industrial 9 access portion of such project's cost is greater than $2,000,000 10 (17060479) (53267) ... 5,400,000 .................. (re. $1,972,000) 11 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 12 For the construction or improvement of highway, bridge and rail 13 freight projects related to industrial access, including the acqui- 14 sition of property and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 15 April 1, 2003. For the cost of the contract services provided by 16 private firms, including but not limited to the preparation of 17 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 18 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 19 mental impact statements for transportation projects. No funds shall 20 be allocated for such purposes until the commissioner of transporta- 21 tion enters into an agreement subject to the approval of the direc- 22 tor of the budget with any public or private entity for the repay- 23 ment of 40 percent of each project's costs disbursed from such 24 funds. Such agreement shall require repayment within 5 years of the 25 date of acceptance of the project by the department of transporta- 26 tion except that the repayment may occur over a period of up to 10 27 years when total project costs exceed $1,000,000. All projects must 28 be approved by the director of the budget prior to the obligation of 29 the moneys so appropriated. 30 The moneys so appropriated shall be made available pursuant to rules 31 and regulations promulgated by the commissioner of transportation 32 establishing the maximum amount of assistance to be provided for 33 each project and the information that must be provided by the entity 34 requesting assistance, establishing criteria for providing assist- 35 ance from the moneys so appropriated and including standards for 36 receiving of assistance including but not limited to the number of 37 jobs created or maintained by the transportation improvement. 38 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of 39 transportation may waive the requirement to repay 40 percent of the 40 cost of a project provided that private funds are dedicated to the 41 cost of such industrial access project and related economic develop- 42 ment for at least 40 percent of the total cost of the industrial 43 access project and related economic development and the industrial 44 access portion of such project's cost is greater than $2,000,000 45 (17060379) (53267) ... 9,000,000 .................. (re. $3,140,000) 46 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 47 For the construction or improvement of highway, bridge and rail 48 freight projects related to industrial access, including the acqui- 49 sition of property and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 50 April 1, 2002. For the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 1056 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 services fund for the cost of the contract services provided by 2 private firms, including but not limited to the preparation of 3 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 4 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 5 mental impact statements for transportation projects. No funds shall 6 be allocated for such purposes until the commissioner of transporta- 7 tion enters into an agreement subject to the approval of the direc- 8 tor of the budget with any public or private entity for the repay- 9 ment of 40 percent of each project's costs disbursed from such 10 funds. Such agreement shall require repayment within 5 years of the 11 date of acceptance of the project by the department of transporta- 12 tion except that the repayment may occur over a period of up to 10 13 years when total project costs exceed $1,000,000. All projects must 14 be approved by the director of the budget prior to the obligation of 15 the moneys so appropriated. 16 The moneys so appropriated shall be made available pursuant to rules 17 and regulations promulgated by the commissioner of transportation 18 establishing the maximum amount of assistance to be provided for 19 each project and the information that must be provided by the entity 20 requesting assistance, establishing criteria for providing assist- 21 ance from the moneys so appropriated and including standards for 22 receiving of assistance including but not limited to the number of 23 jobs created or maintained by the transportation improvement. 24 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of 25 transportation may waive the requirement to repay 40 percent of the 26 cost of a project provided that private funds are dedicated to the 27 cost of such industrial access project and related economic develop- 28 ment for at least 40 percent of the total cost of the industrial 29 access project and related economic development and the industrial 30 access portion of such project's cost is greater than $2,000,000 31 (17060279) (53267) ... 9,000,000 .................... (re. $291,000) 32 For the construction or improvement of highway, bridge and rail 33 freight projects related to industrial access, including the acqui- 34 sition of property and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 35 April 1, 2002. For the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 36 services fund for the cost of the contract services provided by 37 private firms, including but not limited to the preparation of 38 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 39 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 40 mental impact statements for transportation projects. No funds shall 41 be allocated for such purposes until the commissioner of transporta- 42 tion enters into an agreement subject to the approval of the direc- 43 tor of the budget with any public or private entity for the repay- 44 ment of 40 percent of each project's costs disbursed from such 45 funds. Such agreement shall require repayment within 5 years of the 46 date of acceptance of the project by the department of transporta- 47 tion except that the repayment may occur over a period of up to 10 48 years when total project costs exceed $1,000,000. All projects must 49 be approved by the director of the budget prior to the obligation of 50 the moneys so appropriated. 51 The moneys so appropriated shall be made available pursuant to rules 52 and regulations promulgated by the commissioner of transportation 1057 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 establishing the maximum amount of assistance to be provided for 2 each project and the information that must be provided by the entity 3 requesting assistance, establishing criteria for providing assist- 4 ance from the moneys so appropriated and including standards for 5 receiving of assistance including but not limited to the number of 6 jobs created or maintained by the transportation improvement. 7 For the payment of the costs of projects from this appropriation as 8 set forth in a memorandum of understanding between the majority 9 leader of the senate and the speaker of the assembly or their desig- 10 nee. 11 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of 12 transportation may waive the requirement to repay 40 percent of the 13 cost of a project provided that private funds are dedicated to the 14 cost of such industrial access project and related economic develop- 15 ment for at least 40 percent of the total cost of the industrial 16 access project and related economic development and the industrial 17 access portion of such project's cost is greater than $2,000,000 18 (17070279) (54280) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $6,000,000) 19 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000: 20 For the construction or improvement of highway, bridge and rail 21 freight projects related to industrial access, including the acqui- 22 sition of property and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 23 April 1, 2000. For the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 24 services fund for the cost of the contract services provided by 25 private firms, including but not limited to the preparation of 26 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 27 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 28 mental impact statements for transportation projects. No funds shall 29 be allocated for such purposes until the commissioner of transporta- 30 tion enters into an agreement subject to the approval of the direc- 31 tor of the budget with any public or private entity for the repay- 32 ment of 40 percent of each project's costs disbursed from such 33 funds. Such agreement shall require repayment within 5 years of the 34 date of acceptance of the project by the department of transporta- 35 tion except that the repayment may occur over a period of up to 10 36 years when total project costs exceed $1,000,000. All projects must 37 be approved by the director of the budget prior to the obligation of 38 the moneys so appropriated. 39 The moneys so appropriated shall be made available pursuant to rules 40 and regulations promulgated by the commissioner of transportation 41 establishing the maximum amount of assistance to be provided for 42 each project and the information that must be provided by the entity 43 requesting assistance, establishing criteria for providing assist- 44 ance from the moneys so appropriated and including standards for 45 receiving of assistance including but not limited to the number of 46 jobs created or maintained by the transportation improvement. 47 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of 48 transportation may waive the requirement to repay 40 percent of the 49 cost of a project provided that private funds are dedicated to the 50 cost of such industrial access project and related economic develop- 51 ment for at least 40 percent of the total cost of the industrial 1058 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 access project and related economic development and the industrial 2 access portion of such project's cost is greater than $2,000,000 3 (17060079) (53267) ... 15,000,000 .................... (re. $82,000) 4 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 5 For the construction or improvement of highway, bridge and rail 6 freight projects related to industrial access, including the acqui- 7 sition of property and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 8 April 1, 1999. For the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 9 services fund for the cost of the contract services provided by 10 private firms, including but not limited to the preparation of 11 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 12 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 13 mental impact statements for transportation projects. No funds shall 14 be allocated for such purposes until the commissioner of transporta- 15 tion enters into an agreement subject to the approval of the direc- 16 tor of the budget with any public or private entity for the repay- 17 ment of 40 percent of each project's costs disbursed from such 18 funds. Such agreement shall require repayment within 5 years of the 19 date of acceptance of the project by the department of transporta- 20 tion except that the repayment may occur over a period of up to 10 21 years when total project costs exceed $1,000,000. All projects must 22 be approved by the director of the budget prior to the obligation of 23 the moneys so appropriated. 24 The moneys so appropriated shall be made available pursuant to rules 25 and regulations promulgated by the commissioner of transportation 26 establishing the maximum amount of assistance to be provided for 27 each project and the information that must be provided by the entity 28 requesting assistance, establishing criteria for providing assist- 29 ance from the moneys so appropriated and including standards for 30 receiving of assistance including but not limited to the number of 31 jobs created or maintained by the transportation improvement. 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of 33 transportation may waive the requirement to repay 40 percent of the 34 cost of a project provided that private funds are dedicated to the 35 cost of such industrial access project and related economic develop- 36 ment for at least 40 percent of the total cost of the industrial 37 access project and related economic development and the industrial 38 access portion of such project's cost is greater than $2,000,000 39 (17069979) (54280) ... 15,000,000 ................... (re. $301,000) 40 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999, as amended by chapter 55, 41 section 1, of the laws of 2000: 42 For the construction or improvement of highway, bridge and rail 43 freight projects related to industrial access, including the acqui- 44 sition of property and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 45 April 1, 1999. For the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 46 services fund for the cost of the contract services provided by 47 private firms, including but not limited to the preparation of 48 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 49 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 50 mental impact statements for transportation projects. No funds shall 1059 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 be allocated for such purposes until the commissioner of transporta- 2 tion enters into an agreement subject to the approval of the direc- 3 tor of the budget with any public or private entity for the repay- 4 ment of 40 percent of each project's costs disbursed from such 5 funds. Such agreement shall require repayment within 5 years of the 6 date of acceptance of the project by the department of transporta- 7 tion except that the repayment may occur over a period of up to 10 8 years when total project costs exceed $1,000,000. All projects must 9 be approved by the director of the budget prior to the obligation of 10 the moneys so appropriated. 11 The moneys so appropriated shall be made available pursuant to rules 12 and regulations promulgated by the commissioner of transportation 13 establishing the maximum amount of assistance to be provided for 14 each project and the information that must be provided by the entity 15 requesting assistance, establishing criteria for providing assist- 16 ance from the moneys so appropriated and including standards for 17 receiving of assistance including but not limited to the number of 18 jobs created or maintained by the transportation improvement. 19 For the payment of the costs of projects from this appropriation as 20 set forth in a memorandum of understanding between the majority 21 leader of the senate and the speaker of the assembly or their desig- 22 nees. 23 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of 24 transportation may waive the requirement to repay 40 percent of the 25 cost of a project provided that private funds are dedicated to the 26 cost of such industrial access project and related economic develop- 27 ment for at least 40 percent of the total cost of the industrial 28 access project and related economic development and the industrial 29 access portion of such project's cost is greater than $2,000,000 30 (17079979) (53267) ... 10,000,000 ................. (re. $1,574,000) 31 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998: 32 For the construction or improvement of highway, bridge and rail 33 freight projects related to industrial access, including the acqui- 34 sition of property and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 35 April 1, 1998. For the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 36 services fund for the cost of the contract services provided by 37 private firms, including but not limited to the preparation of 38 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 39 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 40 mental impact statements for transportation projects. No funds shall 41 be allocated for such purposes until the commissioner of transporta- 42 tion enters into an agreement subject to the approval of the direc- 43 tor of the budget with any public or private entity for the repay- 44 ment of 40 percent of each project's costs disbursed from such 45 funds. Such agreement shall require repayment within 5 years of the 46 date of acceptance of the project by the department of transporta- 47 tion except that the repayment may occur over a period of up to 10 48 years when total project costs exceed $1,000,000. All projects must 49 be approved by the director of the budget prior to the obligation of 50 the moneys so appropriated. 1060 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The moneys so appropriated shall be made available pursuant to rules 2 and regulations promulgated by the commissioner of transportation 3 establishing the maximum amount of assistance to be provided for 4 each project and the information that must be provided by the entity 5 requesting assistance, establishing criteria for providing assist- 6 ance from the moneys so appropriated and including standards for 7 receiving of assistance including but not limited to the number of 8 jobs created or maintained by the transportation improvement. 9 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of 10 transportation may waive the requirement to repay 40 percent of the 11 cost of a project provided that private funds are dedicated to the 12 cost of such industrial access project and related economic develop- 13 ment for at least 40 percent of the total cost of the industrial 14 access project and related economic development and the industrial 15 access portion of such project's cost is greater than $2,000,000 16 (17069879) (53267) ... 5,000,000 ..................... (re. $69,000) 17 Capital Projects Funds - Other 18 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 19 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 20 Multi-Modal Purpose 21 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as added by chapter 108, 22 section 5, of the laws of 2006: 23 For the cost of multi-modal projects designated as part of the multi- 24 modal program established by section 14-k of the transportation law 25 and in accordance with the 2005 memorandum of understanding among 26 the governor, the majority leader of the senate, and the speaker of 27 the assembly, or their designees. Notwithstanding any other incon- 28 sistent provision of law, funds allocated and made available from 29 this appropriation in state fiscal years 2006-07 through 2009-10 30 shall not exceed $50,000,000 annually pursuant to section viii of 31 the 2005 transportation memorandum of understanding (17MM06MR) 32 (53268) ... 200,000,000 ......................... (re. $115,676,000) 33 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 34 For the cost of multi-modal projects designated as part of the multi- 35 modal program established by section 14-k of the transportation law 36 and in accordance with a memorandum of understanding among the 37 governor, the majority leader of the senate, and the speaker of the 38 assembly, or their designees (17MM05MR) (53268) .................... 39 150,000,000 ....................................... (re. $8,774,000) 40 Capital Projects Funds - Other 41 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 42 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 43 Non-Federal Aided Highway Purpose 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 45 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 46 incurred prior to April 1, 2025, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 47 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 1061 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 2 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 3 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 4 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 5 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 6 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 7 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 8 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 9 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 10 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 11 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 12 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 13 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 14 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 15 reconditioning and preservation, and preventive maintenance. Up to 16 $5,000,000 of this appropriation may be used for traffic maintenance 17 and traffic protection services provided by the division of state 18 police. 19 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 20 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 21 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state non-federal- 22 ly aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal 23 aid funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective 24 and the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of 25 the use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 26 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The 27 total amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for 28 local bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed 29 $2,500,000 in state fiscal year 2025-26 (53164). 30 Personal service (17012522) (50000) .................................. 31 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (17042522) (57050) ............................... 33 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,181,000) 34 Capital projects (17082522) (60551) .................................. 35 449,150,000 ..................................... (re. $408,023,000) 36 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 37 incurred prior to April 1, 2025, of the acquisition of property 38 related to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 39 vation, and preventive maintenance of state highways, parkways, 40 bridges, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and 41 facilities for which the responsibility is vested with the state 42 department of transportation (17092522) (54276) .................... 43 22,000,000 ....................................... (re. $21,971,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 45 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 46 incurred prior to April 1, 2024, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 47 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 48 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 49 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 50 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 51 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 1062 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 2 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 3 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 4 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 5 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 6 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 7 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 8 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 9 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 10 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 11 reconditioning and preservation, and preventive maintenance. Up to 12 $5,000,000 of this appropriation may be used for traffic maintenance 13 and traffic protection services provided by the division of state 14 police. 15 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 16 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 17 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state non-federal- 18 ly aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal 19 aid funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective 20 and the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of 21 the use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 22 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 23 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 24 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 25 in state fiscal year 2024-25 (53164). 26 Personal service (17012422) (50000) ... 5,000,000 ... (re. $5,000,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (17042422) (57050) ............................... 28 20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,437,000) 29 Capital projects (17082422) (60551) .................................. 30 449,150,000 ..................................... (re. $218,221,000) 31 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 32 incurred prior to April 1, 2024, of the acquisition of property 33 related to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 34 vation, and preventive maintenance of state highways, parkways, 35 bridges, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and 36 facilities for which the responsibility is vested with the state 37 department of transportation (17092422) (54276) .................... 38 22,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,696,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 40 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 41 incurred prior to April 1, 2023, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 42 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 43 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 44 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 45 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 46 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 47 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 48 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 49 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 50 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 51 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 1063 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 2 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 3 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 4 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 5 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 6 reconditioning and preservation, and preventive maintenance. Up to 7 $5,000,000 of this appropriation may be used for traffic maintenance 8 and traffic protection services provided by the division of state 9 police. 10 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 11 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 12 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state non-federal- 13 ly aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal 14 aid funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective 15 and the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of 16 the use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 17 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 18 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 19 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 20 in state fiscal year 2023-24 (53164). 21 Capital projects (17082322) (60551) .................................... 22 449,150,000 ...................................... (re. $34,883,000) 23 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 24 incurred prior to April 1, 2023, of the acquisition of property 25 related to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 26 vation, and preventive maintenance of state highways, parkways, 27 bridges, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and 28 facilities for which the responsibility is vested with the state 29 department of transportation (17092322) (54276) .................... 30 22,000,000 ....................................... (re. $21,657,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 32 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 33 incurred prior to April 1, 2022, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 34 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 35 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 36 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 37 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 38 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 39 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 40 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 41 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 42 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 43 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 44 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 45 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 46 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 47 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 48 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 49 reconditioning and preservation, and preventive maintenance. Up to 50 $5,000,000 of this appropriation may be used for traffic maintenance 1064 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 and traffic protection services provided by the division of state 2 police. 3 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 4 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 5 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 6 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 7 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 8 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 9 use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 10 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 11 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 12 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 13 in state fiscal year 2022-23 (53164). 14 Personal service (17012222) (50000) ... 5,000,000 ..... (re. $110,000) 15 Capital projects (17082222) (60551) .................................. 16 449,150,000 ...................................... (re. $22,157,000) 17 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 18 incurred prior to April 1, 2022, of the acquisition of property 19 related to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 20 vation, and preventive maintenance of state highways, parkways, 21 bridges, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and 22 facilities for which the responsibility is vested with the state 23 department of transportation (17092222) (54276) .................... 24 22,000,000 ....................................... (re. $19,567,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 26 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 27 incurred prior to April 1, 2021, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 28 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 29 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 30 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 31 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 32 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 33 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 34 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 35 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 36 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 37 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 38 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 39 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 40 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 41 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 42 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 43 reconditioning and preservation, and preventive maintenance. Up to 44 $5,000,000 of this appropriation may be used for traffic maintenance 45 and traffic protection services provided by the division of state 46 police. 47 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 48 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 49 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state non-federal- 50 ly aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal 51 aid funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective 1065 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 and the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of 2 the use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 3 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 4 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 5 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 6 in state fiscal year 2021-22 (53164). 7 Personal service (17012122) (50000) ... 5,000,000 ..... (re. $406,000) 8 Capital projects (17082122) (60551) .................................. 9 449,150,000 ...................................... (re. $11,584,000) 10 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 11 incurred prior to April 1, 2021, of the acquisition of property 12 related to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 13 vation, and preventive maintenance of state highways, parkways, 14 bridges, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and 15 facilities for which the responsibility is vested with the state 16 department of transportation (17092122) (54276) .................... 17 22,000,000 ....................................... (re. $21,263,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 19 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 20 incurred prior to April 1, 2020, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 21 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 22 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 23 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 24 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 25 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 26 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 27 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 28 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 29 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 30 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 31 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 32 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 33 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 34 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 35 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 36 reconditioning and preservation, and preventive maintenance. Up to 37 $5,000,000 of this appropriation may be used for traffic maintenance 38 and traffic protection services provided by the division of state 39 police. 40 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 41 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 42 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 43 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 44 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 45 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 46 use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 47 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 48 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 49 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 50 in state fiscal year 2020-21. Provided, however, that no obligations 51 against, or spending from this appropriation shall be authorized 1066 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 unless the director of the division of the budget certifies that 2 such obligations or spending can be accommodated within the State's 3 multi-year financial plan without adversely affecting the funding 4 available for (a) capital projects currently authorized that are 5 deemed essential to the health and safety of the public, or (b) 6 essential governmental services. Provided, however, that during 7 state fiscal year 2020-21, the department of transportation shall, 8 ten calendar days prior to the start of each quarter or as soon as 9 practicable thereafter, provide to the director of the budget, the 10 secretary of the senate finance committee, and the secretary of the 11 assembly ways and means committee, a schedule of planned highway and 12 bridge capital project lettings to take place during such quarter; 13 and provided, further, that the projects to be let by the department 14 may differ from the schedules so provided due to emergencies, envi- 15 ronmental concerns, federal mandates, unforeseen conditions, design 16 changes or other factors (53164). 17 Personal service (17012022) (50000) ... 5,000,000 ...... (re. $46,000) 18 Capital projects (17082022) (60551) .................................. 19 449,150,000 ......................................... (re. $757,000) 20 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 21 incurred prior to April 1, 2020, of the acquisition of property 22 related to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 23 vation, and preventive maintenance of state highways, parkways, 24 bridges, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and 25 facilities for which the responsibility is vested with the state 26 department of transportation. Provided, however, that no obligations 27 against, or spending from this appropriation shall be authorized 28 unless the director of the division of the budget certifies that 29 such obligations or spending can be accommodated within the State's 30 multi-year financial plan without adversely affecting the funding 31 available for (a) capital projects currently authorized that are 32 deemed essential to the health and safety of the public, or (b) 33 essential governmental services (17092022) (54276) ................. 34 22,000,000 .......................................... (re. $453,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 36 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 37 incurred prior to April 1, 2019, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 38 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 39 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 40 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 41 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 42 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 43 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 44 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 45 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 46 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 47 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 48 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 49 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 50 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 51 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 1067 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 2 reconditioning and preservation, and preventive maintenance. Up to 3 $5,000,000 of this appropriation may be used for traffic maintenance 4 and traffic protection services provided by the division of state 5 police. 6 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 7 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 8 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state non-federal- 9 ly aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal 10 aid funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective 11 and the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of 12 the use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 13 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 14 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 15 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 16 in state fiscal year 2019-20 (53164). 17 Capital projects (17081922) (60551) .................................. 18 449,150,000 ....................................... (re. $1,367,000) 19 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 20 incurred prior to April 1, 2019, of the acquisition of property 21 related to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 22 vation, and preventive maintenance of state highways, parkways, 23 bridges, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and 24 facilities for which the responsibility is vested with the state 25 department of transportation (17091922) (54276) .................... 26 22,000,000 .......................................... (re. $307,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 28 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 29 incurred prior to April 1, 2018, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 30 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 31 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 32 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 33 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 34 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 35 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 36 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 37 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 38 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 39 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 40 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 41 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 42 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 43 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 44 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 45 reconditioning and preservation, and preventive maintenance. Up to 46 $5,000,000 of this appropriation may be used for traffic maintenance 47 and traffic protection services provided by the division of state 48 police. 49 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 50 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 51 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state non-federal- 1068 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ly aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal 2 aid funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective 3 and the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of 4 the use of non federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 5 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 6 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 7 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 8 in state fiscal year 2018-19 (53164). 9 Nonpersonal service (17041822) (57050) ... 20,000,000 .. (re. $35,000) 10 Capital projects (17081822) (60551) .................................. 11 449,150,000 ...................................... (re. $10,587,000) 12 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 13 incurred prior to April 1, 2018, of the acquisition of property 14 related to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 15 vation, and preventive maintenance of state highways, parkways, 16 bridges, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and 17 facilities for which the responsibility is vested with the state 18 department of transportation (17091822) (54276) .................... 19 22,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,527,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 21 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 22 incurred prior to April 1, 2017, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 23 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 24 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 25 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 26 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 27 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 28 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 29 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 30 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 31 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 32 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 33 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 34 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 35 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 36 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 37 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 38 reconditioning and preservation, and preventive maintenance. Up to 39 $5,000,000 of this appropriation may be used for traffic maintenance 40 and traffic protection services provided by the division of state 41 police. 42 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 43 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 44 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state non-federal- 45 ly aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal 46 aid funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective 47 and the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of 48 the use of non federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 49 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 50 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 1069 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 2 in state fiscal year 2017-18 (53164). 3 Nonpersonal service (17041722) (57050) ............................... 4 20,000,000 ........................................... (re. $51,000) 5 Capital projects (17081722) (60551) .................................. 6 408,443,000 ...................................... (re. $11,885,000) 7 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 8 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 9 incurred prior to April 1, 2016, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 10 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 11 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 12 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 13 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 14 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 15 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 16 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 17 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 18 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 19 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 20 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 21 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 22 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 23 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 24 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 25 reconditioning and preservation, and preventive maintenance. Up to 26 $5,000,000 of this appropriation may be used for traffic maintenance 27 and traffic protection services provided by the division of state 28 police. 29 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 30 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 31 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 32 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 33 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 34 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 35 use of non federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 36 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 37 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 38 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 39 in state fiscal year 2016-17 (53164). 40 Personal service (17011622) (50000) ... 5,000,000 ...... (re. $30,000) 41 Nonpersonal service (17041622) (57050) ............................... 42 20,000,000 .......................................... (re. $378,000) 43 Capital projects (17081622) (60551) .................................. 44 436,487,000 ....................................... (re. $8,600,000) 45 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 46 incurred prior to April 1, 2016, of the acquisition of property 47 related to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 48 vation, and preventive maintenance of state highways, parkways, 49 bridges, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and 50 facilities for which the responsibility is vested with the state 1070 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 department of transportation (17091622) (54276) .................... 2 24,562,000 ........................................ (re. $9,771,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 4 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 5 incurred prior to April 1, 2015, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 6 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 7 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 8 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 9 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 10 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 11 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 12 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 13 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 14 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 15 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 16 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 17 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 18 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 19 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 20 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 21 reconditioning and preservation, and preventive maintenance. Up to 22 $5,000,000 of this appropriation may be used for traffic maintenance 23 and traffic protection services provided by the division of state 24 police. 25 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 26 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 27 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 28 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 29 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 30 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 31 use of nonfederal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 32 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 33 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 34 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 35 in state fiscal year 2015-16 (53164). 36 Personal service (17011522) (50000) ... 5,000,000 ...... (re. $99,000) 37 Nonpersonal service (17041522) (57050) ............................... 38 20,000,000 ........................................... (re. $70,000) 39 Capital projects (17081522) (60551) .................................. 40 413,251,000 ....................................... (re. $2,452,000) 41 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 42 incurred prior to April 1, 2015, of the acquisition of property 43 related to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 44 vation, and preventive maintenance of state highways, parkways, 45 bridges, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and 46 facilities for which the responsibility is vested with the state 47 department of transportation (54276). 48 Capital projects (17091522) ... 23,431,000 .......... (re. $7,432,000) 49 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 1071 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 2 incurred prior to April 1, 2014, of the acquisition of property 3 related to construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preser- 4 vation, and preventive maintenance of state highways, parkways, 5 bridges, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and 6 facilities for which the responsibility is vested with the state 7 department of transportation (54276). 8 Capital projects (17091422) (60551) ... 27,690,000 .... (re. $140,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 55, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 11 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 12 incurred prior to April 1, 2014, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 13 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 14 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 15 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 16 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 17 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 18 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 19 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 20 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 21 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 22 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 23 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 24 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 25 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 26 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 27 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 28 reconditioning and preservation, and preventive maintenance. Up to 29 $5,000,000 of this appropriation may be used for traffic maintenance 30 and traffic protection services provided by the division of state 31 police. 32 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 33 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 34 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 35 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 36 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 37 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 38 use of nonfederal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 39 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 40 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 41 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 42 in state fiscal year 2014-15 (53164). 43 Personal service (17011422) (50000) ... 6,000,000 ..... (re. $185,000) 44 Capital projects (17081422) (60551) .................................. 45 474,079,000 ......................................... (re. $959,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 47 section 1, of the laws of 2015: 48 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 49 incurred prior to April 1, 2013, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 50 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 1072 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 2 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 3 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 4 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 5 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 6 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 7 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 8 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 9 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 10 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 11 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 12 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 13 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 14 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 15 reconditioning and preservation, and preventive maintenance. Up to 16 $3,000,000 of this appropriation may be used for traffic maintenance 17 and traffic protection services provided by the division of state 18 police. 19 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 20 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 21 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 22 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 23 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 24 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 25 use of nonfederal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 26 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 27 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 28 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 29 in state fiscal year 2013-14 (53164). 30 Nonpersonal service (17041322) (57050) ............................... 31 19,000,000 ............................................ (re. $1,000) 32 Capital projects (17081322) (60551) .................................. 33 553,121,000 ...................................... (re. $75,151,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 35 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 36 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 37 incurred prior to April 1, 2012, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 38 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 39 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 40 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 41 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 42 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 43 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 44 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 45 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 46 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 47 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 48 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 49 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 50 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 51 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 1073 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 2 reconditioning and preservation, preventive maintenance, and the 3 acquisition of property. 4 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 5 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 6 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 7 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 8 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 9 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 10 use of nonfederal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 11 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 12 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 13 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 14 in state fiscal year 2012-13 (53164). 15 Nonpersonal service (17041222) (57050) ............................... 16 15,100,000 ............................................ (re. $5,000) 17 Capital projects (17081222) (60551) .................................. 18 508,950,000 ......................................... (re. $572,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 20 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 21 incurred prior to April 1, 2011, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 22 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 23 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 24 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 25 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 26 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 27 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 28 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 29 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 30 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 31 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 32 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 33 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 34 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 35 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 36 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 37 reconditioning and preservation, preventive maintenance, and the 38 acquisition of property. With the approval of the director of the 39 budget, the commissioner of transportation is authorized to enter 40 into agreements with any municipality to finance local bridge 41 projects through state non-federally aided highway funds appropri- 42 ated herein when the use of federal aid funds for such local bridge 43 projects would not be cost effective and the federal aid and state 44 matching funds saved as a result of the use of non-federal aid funds 45 for local bridge projects are made available for bridge projects on 46 the state highway system. The total amount of non-federally aided 47 highway funds made available for local bridge projects from this 48 appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 in state fiscal year 49 2011-12. 50 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 51 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 1074 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the approval of the director of the budget (17021122) (53164) ...... 2 526,050,000 ...................................... (re. $17,551,000) 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service--regular ........ 1,500,000 5 Holiday/overtime compensation ...... 500,000 6 -------------- 7 Amount available for 8 personal service ............. 2,000,000 9 -------------- 10 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 11 Supplies and materials ........... 2,000,000 12 Travel .............................. 10,000 13 Contractual services ............. 7,000,000 14 Equipment ........................ 3,990,000 15 -------------- 16 Amount available for nonper- 17 sonal service ............... 13,000,000 18 -------------- 19 CAPITAL PROJECTS 20 Highway and Bridge 21 Construction and Preventive 22 Maintenance .................. 486,000,000 23 -------------- 24 Right of Way Acquisition ........ 25,050,000 25 -------------- 26 Amount available for capital 27 projects ................... 511,050,000 28 -------------- 29 526,050,000 30 ============== 31 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 32 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 33 incurred prior to April 1, 2010, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 34 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 35 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 36 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 37 thereto, for the state share of federally authorized high speed rail 38 improvement projects, and for the cost of administrative services of 39 the department of transportation and the cost of services provided 40 by private firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on 41 state roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 42 of section 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive main- 43 tenance services provided by private firms; and including but not 44 limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 45 estimates; construction management and supervision, and appraisals, 1075 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 2 tion projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may 3 include but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, 4 reconditioning and preservation, preventive maintenance, and the 5 acquisition of property. 6 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 7 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 8 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 9 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 10 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 11 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 12 use of nonfederal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 13 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 14 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 15 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 16 in state fiscal year 2010-11. 17 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 18 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 19 the approval of the director of the budget (17021022) (53164) ...... 20 526,050,000 .......................................... (re. $10,000) 21 SCHEDULE 22 PERSONAL SERVICE 23 Personal service--regular ........ 1,500,000 24 Holiday/overtime compensation ...... 500,000 25 -------------- 26 Amount available for 27 personal service ............. 2,000,000 28 -------------- 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Supplies and materials ........... 2,000,000 31 Travel .............................. 10,000 32 Contractual services ............. 7,000,000 33 Equipment ........................ 3,990,000 34 -------------- 35 Amount available for nonper- 36 sonal service ............... 13,000,000 37 -------------- 38 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 39 Highway and Bridge 40 Construction and Preventive 41 Maintenance .................. 486,000,000 42 -------------- 43 Right of Way Acquisition ........ 25,050,000 44 -------------- 1076 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Amount available for mainte- 2 nance undistributed ........ 511,050,000 3 -------------- 4 526,050,000 5 ============== 6 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 7 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 8 incurred prior to April 1, 2009, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 9 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 10 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 11 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 12 thereto, the cost of administrative services of the department of 13 transportation and the cost of services provided by private firms; 14 including the costs of preventive maintenance on state roads and 15 bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d 16 of the highway law for contractual preventive maintenance services 17 provided by private firms; and including but not limited to the 18 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 19 construction management and supervision, and appraisals, surveys, 20 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 21 projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may include 22 but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 23 tioning and preservation, preventive maintenance, and the acquisi- 24 tion of property. 25 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 26 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 27 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 28 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 29 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 30 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 31 use of nonfederal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 32 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 33 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 34 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 35 in state fiscal year 2009-10. 36 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 37 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 38 the approval of the director of the budget (17020922) (53164) ...... 39 516,550,000 ...................................... (re. $16,554,000) 40 SCHEDULE 41 PERSONAL SERVICE 42 Personal service--regular ........ 1,000,000 43 Holiday/overtime compensation .... 1,000,000 44 -------------- 45 Amount available for 46 personal service ............. 2,000,000 47 -------------- 1077 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ........... 1,000,000 3 Travel .............................. 10,000 4 Contractual services ............. 8,000,000 5 Equipment ........................ 3,990,000 6 -------------- 7 Amount available for nonper- 8 sonal service ............... 13,000,000 9 -------------- 10 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 11 Highway and Bridge Construcion 12 and Preventive Maintenance ... 476,000,000 13 -------------- 14 Right of Way Acquisition ........ 25,550,000 15 -------------- 16 Amount available for mainte- 17 nance undistributed ........ 501,550,000 18 -------------- 19 516,550,000 20 ============== 21 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 22 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 23 incurred prior to April 1, 2008, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 24 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 25 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 26 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 27 thereto, the cost of administrative services of the department of 28 transportation and the cost of services provided by private firms; 29 including the costs of preventive maintenance on state roads and 30 bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d 31 of the highway law for contractual preventive maintenance services 32 provided by private firms; and including but not limited to the 33 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 34 construction management and supervision, and appraisals, surveys, 35 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 36 projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may include 37 but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 38 tioning and preservation, preventive maintenance, and the acquisi- 39 tion of property. 40 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 41 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 42 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 43 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 44 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 45 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 46 use of nonfederal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 47 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 48 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 1078 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 2 in state fiscal year 2008-09. 3 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 4 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 5 the approval of the director of the budget (17020822) (53164) ...... 6 539,352,000 ...................................... (re. $12,137,000) 7 SCHEDULE 8 PERSONAL SERVICE 9 Personal service--regular .......... 926,000 10 Holiday/overtime compensation .... 1,074,000 11 -------------- 12 Amount available for 13 personal service ............. 2,000,000 14 -------------- 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Supplies and materials ........... 1,283,000 17 Travel ............................... 3,000 18 Contractual services ............. 7,833,000 19 Equipment ........................ 3,881,000 20 -------------- 21 Amount available for nonper- 22 sonal service ............... 13,000,000 23 -------------- 24 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 25 Highway and Bridge Construcion 26 and Preventive Maintenance ... 524,352,000 27 -------------- 28 Amount available for mainte- 29 nance undistributed ........ 524,352,000 30 -------------- 31 539,352,000 32 ============== 33 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 34 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 35 incurred prior to April 1, 2007, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 36 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 37 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 38 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 39 thereto, the cost of administrative services of the department of 40 transportation and the cost of services provided by private firms; 41 including the costs of preventive maintenance on state roads and 42 bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d 43 of the highway law for contractual preventive maintenance services 44 provided by private firms; and including but not limited to the 1079 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 2 construction management and supervision, and appraisals, surveys, 3 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 4 projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may include 5 but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 6 tioning and preservation, preventive maintenance, and the acquisi- 7 tion of property. 8 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 9 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 10 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 11 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 12 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 13 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 14 use of nonfederal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 15 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 16 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 17 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 18 in state fiscal year 2007-2008. 19 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 20 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 21 the approval of the director of the budget (17020722) (53164) ...... 22 520,505,000 .......................................... (re. $83,000) 23 SCHEDULE 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service--regular .......... 463,000 26 Holiday/overtime compensation ...... 537,000 27 -------------- 28 Amount available for 29 personal service ............. 1,000,000 30 -------------- 31 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 32 Supplies and materials ........... 1,184,000 33 Travel ............................... 3,000 34 Contractual services ............. 7,231,000 35 Equipment ........................ 3,582,000 36 -------------- 37 Amount available for nonper- 38 sonal service ............... 12,000,000 39 -------------- 40 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 41 Highway and Bridge 42 Construction and Preventive 43 Maintenance .................. 507,505,000 44 -------------- 1080 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Amount available for mainte- 2 nance undistributed .......... 507,505,000 3 -------------- 4 520,505,000 5 ============== 6 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 55, 7 section 1, of the laws of 2008: 8 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 9 incurred prior to April 1, 2006, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 10 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 11 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 12 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 13 thereto, the cost of administrative services of the department of 14 transportation and the cost of services provided by private firms; 15 including the costs of preventive maintenance on state roads and 16 bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d 17 of the highway law for contractual preventive maintenance services 18 provided by private firms; and including but not limited to the 19 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 20 construction management and supervision, and appraisals, surveys, 21 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 22 projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may include 23 but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 24 tioning and preservation, preventive maintenance, and the acquisi- 25 tion of property. 26 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 27 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 28 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 29 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 30 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 31 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 32 use of nonfederal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 33 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 34 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 35 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 36 in state fiscal year 2006-2007. 37 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 38 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 39 the approval of the director of the budget (17020622) (53164) ...... 40 667,502,000 .......................................... (re. $36,000) 41 SCHEDULE 42 Highway and Bridge 43 Construction ................. 457,502,000 44 -------------- 45 Preventive Maintenance ......... 210,000,000 46 -------------- 47 667,502,000 48 ============== 1081 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 55, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 3 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 4 incurred prior to April 1, 2005, of state high ways, parkways, 5 bridges, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and 6 facilities for which the responsibility is vested with the state 7 department of transportation including work appurtenant and ancil- 8 lary thereto, the cost of administrative services of the department 9 of transportation and the cost of services provided by private 10 firms; including the costs of preventive maintenance on state roads 11 and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 12 10-d of the highway law for contractual preventive maintenance 13 services provided by private firms; and including but not limited to 14 the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 15 construction management and supervision, and appraisals, surveys, 16 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 17 projects. Project costs funded from this appropriation may include 18 but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 19 tioning and preservation, preventive maintenance, and the acquisi- 20 tion of property. 21 The funds made available through this appropriation shall be utilized 22 for the payment of the costs of eligible projects in accordance with 23 a memorandum of understanding entered into between the governor, the 24 majority leader of the senate and the speaker of the assembly, or 25 their designees. 26 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 27 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 28 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 29 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 30 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 31 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 32 use of nonfederal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 33 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 34 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 35 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 36 in state fiscal year 2005-2006. 37 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 38 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 39 the approval of the director of the budget (17020522) (53164) 40 ... ... 604,125,000 ............................... (re. $180,000) 41 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 55, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2006: 43 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 44 incurred prior to April 1, 2004, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 45 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 46 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 47 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 48 thereto, the cost of administrative services of the department of 49 transportation and the cost of services provided by private firms, 50 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 51 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 1082 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 2 statements for transportation projects. Project costs funded from 3 this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 4 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 5 the acquisition of property. 6 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 7 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 8 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 9 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 10 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 11 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 12 use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 13 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 14 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 15 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 16 in state fiscal year 2004-2005 (17020422) (53164) .................. 17 380,000,000 ...................................... (re. $14,870,000) 18 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 55, 19 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 20 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 21 incurred prior to April 1, 2004, of preventive maintenance on state 22 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 23 section 10-d of the highway law including personal services, nonper- 24 sonal services, fringe benefits and the contractual services 25 provided by private firms. Such costs shall not include the costs of 26 vehicles under 8,500 pounds without the prior approval of the direc- 27 tor of the budget. 28 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 29 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 30 the approval of the director of the budget (17040422) (53261) 31 ... ... 331,260,000 ............................. (re. $1,093,000) 32 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 55, 33 section 1, of the laws of 2005: 34 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 35 incurred prior to April 1, 2003, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 36 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 37 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 38 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 39 thereto, the cost of administrative services of the department of 40 transportation and the cost of services provided by private firms, 41 including but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, 42 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 43 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact 44 statements for transportation projects. Project costs funded from 45 this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 46 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 47 the acquisition of property. 48 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 49 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 50 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 1083 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 2 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 3 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 4 use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 5 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 6 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 7 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 8 in state fiscal year 2003-2004 (17020322) (53164) .................. 9 370,000,000 .......................................... (re. $59,000) 10 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 55, 11 section 1, of the laws of 2005: 12 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 13 incurred prior to April 1, 2003, of preventive maintenance on state 14 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 15 section 10-d of the highway law including personal services, nonper- 16 sonal services, fringe benefits and the contractual services 17 provided by private firms. Such costs shall not include the costs of 18 vehicles under 8,500 pounds without the prior approval of the direc- 19 tor of the budget. 20 The items shown in the schedule below shall be for projects with a 21 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 22 the approval of the director of the budget (17040322) (53261) 23 ... ... 317,684,000 ............................. (re. $2,106,000) 24 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2002, as amended by chapter 55, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2009: 26 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 27 incurred prior to April 1, 2002, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 28 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 29 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 30 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 31 thereto and the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 32 services fund for the cost of administrative services of the depart- 33 ment of transportation and the cost of services provided by private 34 firms, including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 35 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 36 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 37 impact statements for transportation projects. Project costs funded 38 from this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 39 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 40 the acquisition of property. 41 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 42 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 43 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 44 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 45 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 46 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 47 use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 48 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 49 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 50 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 1084 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 in state fiscal year 2002-2003 (17020222) (53164) .................. 2 1,042,107,000 ....................................... (re. $137,000) 3 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 4 incurred prior to April 1, 2002, of preventive maintenance on state 5 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 6 section 10-d of the highway law including personal services, nonper- 7 sonal services, fringe benefits and the contractual services 8 provided by private firms. Such costs shall not include the costs of 9 vehicles under 8,500 pounds without the prior approval of the direc- 10 tor of the budget (17040222) (53260) ............................... 11 330,132,036 ...................................... (re. $20,511,000) 12 SCHEDULE 13 Personal service .............................. 47,600,000 14 Nonpersonal service ........................... 41,391,000 15 Maintenance undistributed 16 For expenses of highway maintenance ........... 87,193,000 17 For the costs of the contract services 18 provided by private firms performing 19 preventive maintenance ..................... 153,948,036 20 -------------- 21 Available for maintenance undistributed ...... 245,153,036 22 -------------- 23 330,132,036 24 ============== 25 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2001, as amended by chapter 55, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2003: 27 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 28 incurred prior to April 1, 2001, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 29 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 30 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 31 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 32 thereto and the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 33 services fund for the cost of administrative services of the depart- 34 ment of transportation and the cost of services provided by private 35 firms, including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 36 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 37 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 38 impact statements for transportation projects. Project costs funded 39 from this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 40 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 41 the acquisition of property. 42 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 43 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 44 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 45 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 46 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 47 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 48 use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 49 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 1085 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 2 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 3 in state fiscal year 2001-2002 (17020122) (53164) .................. 4 1,069,754,000 ................................... (re. $126,683,000) 5 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 6 incurred prior to April 1, 2001, of preventive maintenance on state 7 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 8 section 10-d of the highway law including personal services, nonper- 9 sonal services, fringe benefits and the contractual services 10 provided by private firms. Such costs shall not include the costs of 11 vehicles under 8,500 pounds without the prior approval of the direc- 12 tor of the budget (17040122) (53261) ............................... 13 330,864,000 ...................................... (re. $14,693,000) 14 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000, as amended by chapter 55, 15 section 1, of the laws of 2003: 16 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 17 incurred prior to April 1, 2000, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 18 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 19 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 20 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 21 thereto and the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 22 services fund for the cost of administrative services of the depart- 23 ment of transportation and the cost of services provided by private 24 firms, including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 25 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 26 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 27 impact statements for transportation projects. Project costs funded 28 from this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 29 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 30 the acquisition of property. 31 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 32 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 33 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 34 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 35 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 36 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 37 use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 38 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 39 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 40 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 41 in state fiscal year 2000-2001 (17020022) (53164) .................. 42 943,841,000 ....................................... (re. $3,018,000) 43 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 44 incurred prior to April 1, 2000, of preventive maintenance on state 45 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 46 section 10-d of the highway law including personal services, nonper- 47 sonal services, fringe benefits and the contractual services 48 provided by private firms (17040022) (53261) ....................... 49 328,297,000 ......................................... (re. $139,000) 50 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 1086 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 2 incurred prior to April 1, 1999, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 3 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 4 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 5 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 6 thereto and the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 7 services fund for the cost of administrative services of the depart- 8 ment of transportation and the cost of services provided by private 9 firms, including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 10 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 11 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 12 impact statements for transportation projects. Project costs funded 13 from this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 14 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 15 the acquisition of property. 16 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 17 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 18 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 19 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 20 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 21 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 22 use of nonfederal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 23 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 24 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 25 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 26 in state fiscal year 1999-2000 (17029922) (53164) .................. 27 845,000,000 ....................................... (re. $4,605,000) 28 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999, as amended by chapter 55, 29 section 1, of the laws of 2003: 30 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 31 incurred prior to April 1, 1999, of preventive maintenance on state 32 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 33 section 10-d of the highway law including personal services, nonper- 34 sonal services, fringe benefits and the contractual services 35 provided by private firms (17049922) (53261) ....................... 36 346,818,000 ......................................... (re. $596,000) 37 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1998, as amended by chapter 55, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2003: 39 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 40 incurred prior to April 1, 1998, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 41 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 42 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 43 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 44 thereto and the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 45 services fund for the cost of administrative services of the depart- 46 ment of transportation and the cost of services provided by private 47 firms, including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 48 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 49 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 1087 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 impact statements for transportation projects (17029822) (53164) ... 2 1,165,139,000 ..................................... (re. $5,160,000) 3 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 4 incurred prior to April 1, 1998, of preventive maintenance on state 5 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 6 section 10-d of the highway law including personal services, nonper- 7 sonal services, fringe benefits and the contractual services 8 provided by private firms (17049822) (53261) ....................... 9 345,011,000 ....................................... (re. $2,153,000) 10 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1997, as amended by chapter 55, 11 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 12 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 13 incurred prior to April 1, 1997, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 14 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 15 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 16 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 17 thereto and the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 18 services fund for the cost of administrative services of the depart- 19 ment of transportation and the cost of services provided by private 20 firms, including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 21 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 22 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 23 impact statements for transportation projects. Project costs funded 24 from this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 25 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 26 the acquisition of property. 27 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 28 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 29 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 30 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 31 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 32 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 33 use of nonfederal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 34 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 35 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 36 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 37 in state fiscal year 1997-98 (17029722) (53164) .................... 38 915,748,000 ....................................... (re. $2,614,000) 39 For the payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities 40 incurred prior to April 1, 1997, of preventive maintenance on state 41 roads and bridges as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 42 section 10-d of the highway law including personal services, nonper- 43 sonal services, fringe benefits and the contractual services 44 provided by private firms. 45 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 46 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 47 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (17049722) 48 (53261) ... ... 278,668,000 ..................... (re. $1,872,000) 49 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1996, as amended by chapter 50 295, part A, section 1, of the laws of 2001: 1088 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 2 incurred prior to April 1, 1996, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 3 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 4 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 5 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 6 thereto and the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 7 services fund for the cost of administrative services of the depart- 8 ment of transportation and the cost of services provided by private 9 firms, including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 10 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 11 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 12 impact statements for transportation projects (17029622) (53164) ... 13 779,430,000 .......................................... (re. $25,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1995, as amended by chapter 55, 15 section 1, of the laws of 2003: 16 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 17 incurred prior to April 1, 1995, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 18 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 19 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 20 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 21 thereto and the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 22 services fund for the cost of administrative services of the depart- 23 ment of transportation and the cost of services provided by private 24 firms, including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 25 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 26 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 27 impact statements for transportation projects. Project costs funded 28 from this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 29 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 30 the acquisition of property. 31 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 32 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 33 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 34 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 35 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 36 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 37 use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 38 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 39 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 40 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 41 in state fiscal year 1995-96 (17029522) (53164) .................... 42 880,323,000 ...................................... (re. $21,732,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1994, as amended by chapter 55, 44 section 1, of the laws of 1996: 45 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 46 incurred prior to April 1, 1994, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 47 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 48 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 49 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 50 thereto and the payment of reimbursements to the engineering 1089 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 services fund for the cost of administrative services of the depart- 2 ment of transportation and the cost of services provided by private 3 firms, including but not limited to the preparation of designs, 4 plans, specifications and estimates; construction management and 5 supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental 6 impact statements for transportation projects. Project costs funded 7 from this appropriation may include but shall not be limited to 8 construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and 9 the acquisition of property. 10 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 11 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 12 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 13 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 14 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective and 15 the federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the 16 use of non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects are made 17 available for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 18 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available for local 19 bridge projects from this appropriation shall not exceed $2,500,000 20 in state fiscal year 1994-95 (17029422) (53164) ... ............... 21 1,095,524,000 ..................................... (re. $9,571,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1993, as amended by chapter 23 295, part A, section 1, of the laws of 2001: 24 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 25 incurred prior to April 1, 1993, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 26 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 27 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 28 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 29 thereto. Project costs funded from this appropriation may include 30 but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 31 tioning and preservation, and the acquisition of property. 32 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 33 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 34 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 35 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 36 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective. 37 Federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the use of 38 non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects shall be made avail- 39 able for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 40 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available to local 41 bridge projects shall not exceed $2,500,000 in state fiscal year 42 1993-94. 43 For the payment of reimbursements to the engineering services fund for 44 the cost of administrative services of the department of transporta- 45 tion and the cost of services provided by private firms, including 46 but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications 47 and estimates; construction management and supervision; and 48 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 49 transportation projects (17029322) (53164) ... ................... 50 1,042,787,000 ..................................... (re. $3,657,000) 1090 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1992: 2 For the payment of the costs, including the payment of liabilities 3 incurred prior to April 1, 1992, of state highways, parkways, bridg- 4 es, the New York State Thruway, Indian reservation roads, and facil- 5 ities for which the responsibility is vested with the state depart- 6 ment of transportation including work appurtenant and ancillary 7 thereto. Project costs funded from this appropriation may include 8 but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 9 tioning and preservation, and the acquisition of property. 10 With the approval of the director of the budget, the commissioner of 11 transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with any muni- 12 cipality to finance local bridge projects through state nonfederally 13 aided highway funds appropriated herein when the use of federal aid 14 funds for such local bridge projects would not be cost effective. 15 Federal aid and state matching funds saved as a result of the use of 16 non-federal aid funds for local bridge projects shall be made avail- 17 able for bridge projects on the state highway system. The total 18 amount of non-federally aided highway funds made available to local 19 bridge projects shall not exceed $2,500,000 in state fiscal year 20 1992-93. 21 For the payment of reimbursements to the engineering services fund for 22 the cost of the contract services provided by private firms, includ- 23 ing but not limited to the preparation of designs, plans, specifica- 24 tions and estimates; construction management and supervision; and 25 appraisals, surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for 26 transportation projects (17029222) (53164) ... ................... 27 208,855,000 ....................................... (re. $8,613,000) 28 Capital Projects Funds - Other 29 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 30 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 31 Preparation of Plans Purpose 32 Capital Project Management and Traffic and Safety 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 34 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 35 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 36 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 37 Personal service (17P12530) (50000) .................................. 38 48,261,000 ....................................... (re. $48,261,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (17P42530) (57050) ............................... 40 9,597,000 ......................................... (re. $9,541,000) 41 Fringe benefits (17P82530) (60090) ................................... 42 29,083,000 ....................................... (re. $14,659,000) 43 Indirect costs (17P92530) (58850) ... 1,308,000 ....... (re. $554,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 45 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 46 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 47 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 1091 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Personal service (17P12430) (50000) .................................. 2 48,261,000 ....................................... (re. $22,192,000) 3 Nonpersonal service (17P42430) (57050) ............................... 4 9,597,000 ......................................... (re. $5,155,000) 5 Fringe benefits (17P82430) (60090) ................................... 6 31,761,000 ........................................ (re. $1,943,000) 7 Indirect costs (17P92430) (58850) ... 1,318,000 ........ (re. $76,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 9 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 10 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 11 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 12 Personal service (17P12330) (50000) .................................. 13 48,261,000 ........................................ (re. $2,473,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (17P42330) (57050) ............................... 15 9,597,000 ......................................... (re. $9,547,000) 16 Fringe benefits (17P82330) (60090) ................................... 17 32,360,000 ........................................ (re. $3,779,000) 18 Indirect costs (17P92330) (58850) ... 1,501,000 ....... (re. $337,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 20 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 21 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 22 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 23 Personal service (17P12230) (50000) .................................. 24 48,261,000 ........................................ (re. $8,150,000) 25 Nonpersonal service (17P42230) (57050) ............................... 26 9,597,000 ......................................... (re. $7,732,000) 27 Fringe benefits (17P82230) (60090) ... 30,834,000 ... (re. $5,446,000) 28 Indirect costs (17P92230) (58850) ... 1,472,000 ....... (re. $261,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 30 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 31 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 32 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 33 Personal service (17P12130) (50000) .................................. 34 45,510,000 ....................................... (re. $16,387,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (17P42130) (57050) ... 122,000 ...... (re. $1,000) 36 Fringe benefits (17P82130) (60090) ... 27,771,000 ... (re. $5,218,000) 37 Indirect costs (17P92130) (58850) ... 1,470,000 ....... (re. $486,000) 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 39 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 40 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 41 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 42 Personal service (17P12030) (50000) .................................. 43 45,510,000 ........................................ (re. $2,695,000) 44 Nonpersonal service (17P42030) (57050) ... 122,000 ..... (re. $12,000) 45 Fringe benefits (17P82030) (60090) ... 27,771,000 ... (re. $1,634,000) 46 Indirect costs (17P92030) (58850) ... 1,757,000 ....... (re. $375,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 1092 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 2 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 3 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 4 Personal service (17P11930) (50000) .................................. 5 45,510,000 ........................................ (re. $2,288,000) 6 Fringe benefits (17P81930) (60090) ... 28,654,000 ... (re. $1,680,000) 7 Indirect costs (17P91930) (58850) ... 1,766,000 ....... (re. $111,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 9 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 10 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 11 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 12 Personal service (17P11830) (50000) .................................. 13 44,171,000 ........................................ (re. $1,267,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (17P41830) (57050) ... 122,000 ...... (re. $3,000) 15 Fringe benefits (17P81830) (60090) ... 28,053,000 ..... (re. $192,000) 16 Indirect costs (17P91830) (58850) ... 1,754,000 ......... (re. $8,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 18 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 19 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 20 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 21 Personal service (17P11730) (50000) .................................. 22 43,426,000 ........................................ (re. $1,951,000) 23 Nonpersonal service (17P41730) (57050) ... 122,000 ..... (re. $11,000) 24 Fringe benefits (17P81730) (60090) ... 26,393,000 ... (re. $1,428,000) 25 Indirect costs (17P91730) (58850) ... 1,462,000 ........ (re. $35,000) 26 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 27 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 28 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 29 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 30 Personal service (17P11630) (50000) ... 41,359,000 .. (re. $4,105,000) 31 Nonpersonal service (17P41630) (57050) ... 122,000 ..... (re. $23,000) 32 Indirect costs (17P91630) (58850) ... 1,303,000 ........ (re. $34,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 34 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 35 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 36 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 37 Nonpersonal service (17P41530) (57050) ... 120,000 ..... (re. $12,000) 38 Fringe benefits (17P81530) (60090) ... 22,597,000 ..... (re. $656,000) 39 Indirect costs (17P91530) (58850) ... 1,293,000 ........ (re. $37,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 41 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 42 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 43 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 44 Personal service (17P11430) (50000) ... 40,295,000 .... (re. $203,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (17P41430) (57050) ... 117,000 ..... (re. $34,000) 46 Fringe benefits (17P81430) (60090) ... 22,569,000 ... (re. $1,202,000) 47 Indirect costs (17P91430) (58850) ... 1,253,000 ........ (re. $67,000) 1093 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 2 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 3 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 4 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 5 Nonpersonal service (17P41330) (57050) ... 114,000 ..... (re. $16,000) 6 Fringe benefits (17P81330) (60090) ... 22,042,000 ..... (re. $905,000) 7 Indirect costs (17P91330) (58850) ... 1,296,000 ........ (re. $53,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 9 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 10 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits, and the 11 contract services provided by private firms (53263). 12 Nonpersonal service (17P41230) (57050) ... 111,000 ..... (re. $25,000) 13 Fringe benefits (17P81230) (60090) ... 19,320,000 ...... (re. $96,000) 14 Indirect costs (17P91230) (58850) ... 1,207,000 ....... (re. $195,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 16 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 17 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the 18 contract services provided by private firms (17H21130) (53263) 19 58,657,000 .......................................... (re. $259,000) 20 PERSONAL SERVICE 21 Personal service--regular ....... 38,037,000 22 Holiday/overtime compensation ...... 919,000 23 -------------- 24 Amount available for 25 personal service ............ 38,956,000 26 -------------- 27 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 28 Supplies and materials .............. 61,000 29 Travel ............................. 121,000 30 Contractual services ................ 57,000 31 Equipment ........................... 15,000 32 Fringe benefits ................. 18,068,000 33 Indirect costs ................... 1,379,000 34 -------------- 35 Amount available for nonper- 36 sonal service ................. 19,701,000 37 -------------- 38 58,657,000 39 ============== 40 Department Management and Administration 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 42 For department management and administration including personal 43 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 44 services provided by private firms. 1094 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 2 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 3 fer Authority as defined in the 2025-26 state fiscal year state 4 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 5 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53262). 7 Personal service (17A12530) (50000) .................................. 8 37,183,000 ....................................... (re. $37,183,000) 9 Nonpersonal service (17A42530) (57050) ............................... 10 33,354,000 ....................................... (re. $26,239,000) 11 Fringe benefits (17A82530) (60090) ................................... 12 22,407,000 ....................................... (re. $10,521,000) 13 Indirect costs (17A92530) (58850) ... 1,008,000 ....... (re. $454,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 15 For department management and administration including personal 16 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 17 services provided by private firms. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 19 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 20 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 21 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 22 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53262). 24 Personal service (17A12430) (50000) .................................. 25 36,100,000 ....................................... (re. $19,471,000) 26 Nonpersonal service (17A42430) (57050) ............................... 27 33,354,000 ........................................ (re. $9,887,000) 28 Fringe benefits (17A82430) (60090) ................................... 29 23,758,000 ........................................ (re. $1,336,000) 30 Indirect costs (17A92430) (58850) ... 986,000 .......... (re. $65,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 32 For department management and administration including personal 33 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 34 services provided by private firms. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 36 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 37 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 38 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 39 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 40 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53262). 41 Personal service (17A12330) (50000) .................................. 42 36,100,000 .......................................... (re. $351,000) 43 Nonpersonal service (17A42330) (57050) ............................... 44 33,354,000 ....................................... (re. $12,612,000) 45 Fringe benefits (17A82330) (60090) ................................... 46 24,206,000 .......................................... (re. $889,000) 47 Indirect costs (17A92330) (58850) .................................... 48 1,123,000 ........................................... (re. $111,000) 49 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 1095 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For department management and administration including personal 2 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 3 services provided by private firms. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 5 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 6 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 7 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 8 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53262). 10 Personal service (17A12230) (50000) .................................. 11 34,415,000 ........................................ (re. $3,186,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (17A42230) (57050) ............................... 13 33,354,000 ........................................ (re. $9,669,000) 14 Fringe benefits (17A82230) (60090) ... 22,009,000 ... (re. $2,151,000) 15 Indirect costs (17A92230) (58850) ... 971,000 .......... (re. $12,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 17 For department management and administration including personal 18 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 19 services provided by private firms. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 21 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 22 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 23 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 24 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53262). 26 Personal service (17A12130) (50000) .................................. 27 31,415,000 ........................................ (re. $3,065,000) 28 Nonpersonal service (17A42130) (57050) ............................... 29 33,354,000 ....................................... (re. $20,336,000) 30 Fringe benefits (17A82130) (60090) ... 19,698,000 ... (re. $2,721,000) 31 Indirect costs (17A92130) (58850) ... 886,000 ......... (re. $132,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 33 For department management and administration including personal 34 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 35 services provided by private firms. 36 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 37 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 38 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 39 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 40 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 41 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53262). 42 Personal service (17A12030) (50000) ... 31,415,000 .. (re. $3,235,000) 43 Nonpersonal service (17A42030) (57050) ............................... 44 33,354,000 ........................................ (re. $9,866,000) 45 Fringe benefits (17A82030) (60090) ... 19,600,000 ... (re. $2,121,000) 46 Indirect costs (17A92030) (58850) ... 1,078,000 ....... (re. $288,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 1096 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For department management and administration including personal 2 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 3 services provided by private firms. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 5 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 6 fer Authority as defined in the 2019-20 state fiscal year state 7 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 8 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53262). 10 Personal service (17A11930) (50000) ... 31,415,000 .... (re. $320,000) 11 Nonpersonal service (17A41930) (57050) ............................... 12 33,354,000 ........................................ (re. $4,376,000) 13 Fringe benefits (17A81930) (60090) ... 20,062,000 ..... (re. $342,000) 14 Indirect costs (17A91930) (58850) ... 1,078,000 ........ (re. $28,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 16 For department management and administration including personal 17 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 18 services provided by private firms. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 20 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 21 fer Authority as defined in the 2018-19 state fiscal year state 22 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 23 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53262). 25 Personal service (17A11830) (50000) ... 31,604,000 .... (re. $788,000) 26 Nonpersonal service (17A41830) (57050) ............................... 27 33,363,000 .......................................... (re. $882,000) 28 Fringe benefits (17A81830) (60090) ... 20,192,000 ..... (re. $161,000) 29 Indirect costs (17A91830) (58850) ... 974,000 ........... (re. $8,000) 30 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 31 For department management and administration including personal 32 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 33 services provided by private firms. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 35 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 36 fer Authority as defined in the 2017-18 state fiscal year state 37 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 38 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53262). 40 Nonpersonal service (17A41730) (57050) ............................... 41 33,363,000 .......................................... (re. $414,000) 42 Fringe benefits (17A81730) (60090) ... 18,807,000 ..... (re. $158,000) 43 Indirect costs (17A91730) (58850) ... 902,000 .......... (re. $27,000) 44 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 45 For department management and administration including personal 46 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 47 services provided by private firms. 48 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 49 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 1097 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 fer Authority as defined in the 2016-17 state fiscal year state 2 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 3 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 4 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53262). 5 Nonpersonal service (17A41630) (57050) ............................... 6 31,919,000 ........................................ (re. $9,401,000) 7 Indirect costs (17A91630) (58850) ... 837,000 .......... (re. $14,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 9 For department management and administration including personal 10 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 11 services provided by private firms. 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 13 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 14 fer Authority as defined in the 2015-16 state fiscal year state 15 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 16 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 17 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53262). 18 Nonpersonal service (17A41530) (57050) ............................... 19 31,919,000 ........................................ (re. $6,217,000) 20 Fringe benefits (17A81530) (60090) ... 17,442,000 ...... (re. $55,000) 21 Indirect costs (17A91530) (58850) ... 790,000 .......... (re. $11,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 23 For department management and administration including personal 24 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 25 services provided by private firms. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 27 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 28 fer Authority as defined in the 2014-15 state fiscal year state 29 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 30 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 31 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53262). 32 Nonpersonal service (17A41430) (57050) ............................... 33 27,982,000 .......................................... (re. $213,000) 34 Indirect costs (17A91430) (58850) ... 844,000 .......... (re. $15,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 36 For department management and administration including personal 37 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 38 services provided by private firms. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 40 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 41 fer Authority as defined in the 2013-14 state fiscal year state 42 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 43 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53262). 45 Nonpersonal service (17A41330) (57050) ............................... 46 33,102,000 .......................................... (re. $360,000) 47 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 1098 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For department management and administration including personal 2 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 3 services provided by private firms. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 5 Interchange and Transfer Authority, the IT Interchange and Transfer 6 Authority, and the Call Center Interchange and Transfer Authority as 7 defined in the 2012-13 state fiscal year state operations appropri- 8 ation for the budget division program of the division of the budget, 9 are deemed fully incorporated herein and a part of this appropri- 10 ation as if fully stated (53262). 11 Nonpersonal service (17A41230) (57050) ............................... 12 40,300,000 .......................................... (re. $386,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 14 For department management and administration including personal 15 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 16 services provided by private firms (17H51130) (53262) .............. 17 112,348,000 ...................................... (re. $12,209,000) 18 PERSONAL SERVICE 19 Personal service--regular ....... 42,593,000 20 Temporary service .................. 824,000 21 Holiday/overtime compensation .... 1,261,000 22 -------------- 23 Amount available for 24 personal service ............ 44,678,000 25 -------------- 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Supplies and materials ........... 1,845,000 28 Travel ........................... 4,570,000 29 Contractual services ............ 35,957,000 30 Equipment .......................... 180,000 31 Fringe benefits ................. 23,332,000 32 Indirect costs ................... 1,786,000 33 -------------- 34 Amount available for nonper- 35 sonal service ............... 67,670,000 36 -------------- 37 112,348,000 38 ============== 39 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 40 For department management and administration including personal 41 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 42 services provided by private firms (17H51030) (53262) .............. 43 122,040,000 ....................................... (re. $9,106,000) 1099 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service--regular ....... 47,325,000 3 Temporary service .................. 916,000 4 Holiday/overtime compensation .... 1,401,000 5 -------------- 6 Amount available for 7 personal service ............ 49,642,000 8 -------------- 9 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 10 Supplies and materials ........... 2,050,000 11 Travel ........................... 5,078,000 12 Contractual services ............ 39,952,000 13 Equipment .......................... 200,000 14 Fringe benefits ................. 23,332,000 15 Indirect costs ................... 1,786,000 16 -------------- 17 Amount available for nonper- 18 sonal service ............... 72,398,000 19 -------------- 20 122,040,000 21 ============== 22 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 55, 23 section 1, of the laws of 2010: 24 For department management and administration including personal 25 services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the contract 26 services provided by private firms (17H50930) (53262) .............. 27 122,554,000 ....................................... (re. $3,037,000) 28 PERSONAL SERVICE 29 Personal service--regular ....... 47,005,000 30 Temporary service .................. 911,000 31 Holiday/overtime compensation .... 1,394,000 32 -------------- 33 Amount available for 34 personal service ............ 49,310,000 35 -------------- 36 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 37 Supplies and materials ........... 2,506,000 38 Travel ........................... 5,622,000 39 Contractual services ............ 40,222,000 40 Equipment .......................... 427,000 41 Fringe benefits ................. 22,538,000 42 Indirect costs ................... 1,929,000 43 -------------- 1100 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Amount available for nonper- 2 sonal service ............... 73,244,000 3 -------------- 4 122,554,000 5 ============== 6 Design and Construction 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 8 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 9 services, and fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the 10 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 11 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 12 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 13 projects, and for suballocation of $575,000 to the office of the 14 inspector general. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 16 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 17 fer Authority as defined in the 2025-26 state fiscal year state 18 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 19 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 20 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53166). 21 Personal service (17E12530) (50000) .................................. 22 244,387,000 ..................................... (re. $244,387,000) 23 Nonpersonal service (17E42530) (57050) ............................... 24 10,741,000 ........................................ (re. $8,926,000) 25 Fringe benefits (17E82530) (60090) ................................... 26 147,268,000 ...................................... (re. $77,464,000) 27 Indirect costs (17E92530) (58850) .................................... 28 6,623,000 ......................................... (re. $2,003,000) 29 For the costs of the contract services provided by private firms 30 including, but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 31 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 32 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 33 statements for transportation projects (53105). 34 Nonpersonal service (17EP2530) (57050) ............................... 35 232,965,000 ..................................... (re. $232,826,000) 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 37 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 38 services, and fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the 39 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 40 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 41 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 42 projects, and for suballocation of $575,000 to the office of the 43 inspector general. 44 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 45 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 46 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 47 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 48 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 49 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53166). 1101 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Personal service (17E12430) (50000) .................................. 2 277,832,000 ..................................... (re. $205,242,000) 3 Nonpersonal service (17E42430) (57050) ............................... 4 10,741,000 ........................................ (re. $5,399,000) 5 Fringe benefits (17E82430) (60090) ................................... 6 160,832,000 ...................................... (re. $17,650,000) 7 Indirect costs (17E92430) (58850) ... 6,672,000 ....... (re. $276,000) 8 For the costs of the contract services provided by private firms 9 including, but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 10 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 11 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 12 statements for transportation projects (53105). 13 Nonpersonal service (17EP2430) (57050) ............................... 14 199,520,000 ..................................... (re. $198,845,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 16 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 17 services, and fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the 18 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 19 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 20 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 21 projects, and for suballocation of $575,000 to the office of the 22 inspector general. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 24 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 25 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 26 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 27 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53166). 29 Personal service (17E12330) (50000) .................................. 30 277,832,000 ..................................... (re. $112,339,000) 31 Nonpersonal service (17E42330) (57050) ............................... 32 10,741,000 ........................................ (re. $1,928,000) 33 Fringe benefits (17E82330) (60090) ................................... 34 163,862,000 ...................................... (re. $23,217,000) 35 Indirect costs (17E92330) (58850) .................................... 36 7,601,000 ........................................... (re. $430,000) 37 For the costs of the contract services provided by private firms 38 including, but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 39 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 40 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 41 statements for transportation projects (53105). 42 Nonpersonal service (17EP2330) (57050) ............................... 43 199,520,000 ..................................... (re. $190,510,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 45 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 46 services, and fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the 47 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 48 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 49 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 1102 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 projects, and for suballocation of $575,000 to the office of the 2 inspector general. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 4 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 5 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 6 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 7 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 8 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53166). 9 Personal service (17E12230) (50000) .................................. 10 244,387,000 ...................................... (re. $89,407,000) 11 Nonpersonal service (17E42230) (57050) ............................... 12 10,741,000 ........................................ (re. $5,091,000) 13 Fringe benefits (17E82230) (60090) ................................... 14 156,139,000 ...................................... (re. $24,097,000) 15 Indirect costs (17E92230) (58850) ... 7,454,000 ........ (re. $87,000) 16 For the costs of the contract services provided by private firms 17 including, but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 18 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 19 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 20 statements for transportation projects (53105). 21 Nonpersonal service (17EP2230) (57050) ............................... 22 232,965,000 ..................................... (re. $164,594,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 24 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 25 services, and fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the 26 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 27 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 28 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 29 projects, and for suballocation of $575,000 to the office of the 30 inspector general. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 32 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 33 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 34 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 35 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 36 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53166). 37 Personal service (17E12130) (50000) .................................. 38 277,832,000 ...................................... (re. $85,868,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (17E42130) (57050) ............................... 40 10,741,000 ........................................ (re. $4,595,000) 41 Fringe benefits (17E82130) (60090) ................................... 42 149,125,000 ...................................... (re. $15,266,000) 43 Indirect costs (17E92130) (58850) ... 9,434,000 ..... (re. $2,227,000) 44 For the costs of the contract services provided by private firms 45 including, but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 46 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 47 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 48 statements for transportation projects (53105). 49 Nonpersonal service (17EP2130) (57050) ............................... 50 199,520,000 ..................................... (re. $116,898,000) 1103 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 2 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 3 services, and fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the 4 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 5 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 6 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 7 projects, and for suballocation of $575,000 to the office of the 8 inspector general. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 10 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 11 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 12 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 13 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 14 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53166). 15 Personal service (17E12030) (50000) .................................. 16 277,832,000 ...................................... (re. $53,131,000) 17 Nonpersonal service (17E42030) (57050) ............................... 18 10,741,000 ........................................ (re. $1,797,000) 19 Fringe benefits (17E82030) (60090) ................................... 20 149,125,000 ...................................... (re. $33,216,000) 21 Indirect costs (17E92030) (58850) ... 9,434,000 ..... (re. $2,945,000) 22 For the costs of the contract services provided by private firms 23 including, but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 24 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 25 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 26 statements for transportation projects (53105). 27 Nonpersonal service (17EP2030) (57050) ............................... 28 199,520,000 ...................................... (re. $65,937,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 30 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 31 services, and fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the 32 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 33 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 34 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 35 projects, and for suballocation of $575,000 to the office of the 36 inspector general. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 38 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 39 fer Authority as defined in the 2019-20 state fiscal year state 40 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 41 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53166). 43 Personal service (17E11930) (50000) .................................. 44 277,832,000 ...................................... (re. $82,205,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (17E41930) (57050) ............................... 46 10,741,000 ........................................ (re. $1,031,000) 47 Fringe benefits (17E81930) (60090) ................................... 48 144,369,000 ...................................... (re. $22,456,000) 49 Indirect costs (17E91930) (58850) ... 8,897,000 ..... (re. $1,417,000) 50 For the costs of the contract services provided by private firms 51 including, but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 1104 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 2 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 3 statements for transportation projects (53105). 4 Nonpersonal service (17EP1930) (57050) ............................... 5 199,520,000 ...................................... (re. $65,888,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 8 services, and fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the 9 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 10 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 11 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 12 projects, and for suballocation of $575,000 to the office of the 13 inspector general. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 15 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 16 fer Authority as defined in the 2018-19 state fiscal year state 17 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 18 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 19 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53166). 20 Personal service (17E11830) (50000) .................................. 21 257,419,000 ...................................... (re. $70,356,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (17E41830) (57050) ............................... 23 10,741,000 .......................................... (re. $155,000) 24 Fringe benefits (17E81830) (60090) ................................... 25 142,816,000 ....................................... (re. $2,005,000) 26 Indirect costs (17E91830) (58850) ... 8,927,000 ....... (re. $177,000) 27 For the costs of the contract services provided by private firms 28 including, but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 29 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 30 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 31 statements for transportation projects (53105). 32 Nonpersonal service (17EP1830) (57050) ............................... 33 199,520,000 ...................................... (re. $33,631,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 35 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 36 services, and fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the 37 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 38 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 39 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 40 projects, and for suballocation of $575,000 to the office of the 41 inspector general. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 43 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 44 fer Authority as defined in the 2017-18 state fiscal year state 45 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 46 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 47 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53166). 48 Personal service (17E11730) (50000) .................................. 49 248,470,000 ...................................... (re. $43,246,000) 1105 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Nonpersonal service (17E41730) (57050) ............................... 2 10,741,000 .......................................... (re. $312,000) 3 Fringe benefits (17E81730) (60090) ................................... 4 123,448,000 ...................................... (re. $17,675,000) 5 Indirect costs (17E91730) (58850) ... 6,838,000 ....... (re. $864,000) 6 For the costs of the contract services provided by private firms 7 including, but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 8 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 9 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 10 statements for transportation projects (53105). 11 Nonpersonal service (17EP1730) (57050) ............................... 12 199,520,000 ...................................... (re. $25,298,000) 13 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 14 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 15 services, and fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the 16 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 17 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 18 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 19 projects, and for suballocation of $575,000 to the office of the 20 inspector general. 21 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 22 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 23 fer Authority as defined in the 2016-17 state fiscal year state 24 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 25 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 26 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53166). 27 Personal service (17E11630) (50000) .................................. 28 244,387,000 ...................................... (re. $68,282,000) 29 Nonpersonal service (17E41630) (57050) ............................... 30 10,565,000 .......................................... (re. $171,000) 31 Fringe benefits (17E81630) (60090) ... 111,895,000 .... (re. $209,000) 32 Indirect costs (17E91630) (58850) ... 6,320,000 ....... (re. $204,000) 33 For the costs of the contract services provided by private firms 34 including, but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 35 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 36 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 37 statements for transportation projects (53105). 38 Nonpersonal service (17EP1630) (57050) ............................... 39 198,564,000 ...................................... (re. $23,417,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 41 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 42 services, and fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the 43 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 44 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 45 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 46 projects, and for suballocation of $175,000 to the office of the 47 inspector general (53166). 48 Nonpersonal service (17E41530) (57050) ............................... 49 10,413,000 .......................................... (re. $184,000) 50 Fringe benefits (17E81530) (60090) ... 109,621,000 .. (re. $5,646,000) 1106 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Indirect costs (17E91530) (58850) ... 6,269,000 ....... (re. $344,000) 2 For the costs of the contract services provided by private firms 3 including, but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 4 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 5 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 6 statements for transportation projects (53105). 7 Nonpersonal service (17EP1530) (57050) ............................... 8 137,778,000 ...................................... (re. $10,332,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 10 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 11 services, and fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the 12 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 13 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 14 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 15 projects, and for suballocation of $175,000 to the office of the 16 inspector general (53166). 17 Nonpersonal service (17E41430) (57050) ............................... 18 10,159,000 .......................................... (re. $177,000) 19 Fringe benefits (17E81430) (60090) ... 111,819,000 .. (re. $6,992,000) 20 Indirect costs (17E91430) (58850) ... 6,209,000 ....... (re. $388,000) 21 For the costs of the contract services provided by private firms 22 including, but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 23 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 24 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 25 statements for transportation projects (53105). 26 Nonpersonal service (17EP1430) (57050) ............................... 27 118,015,000 ....................................... (re. $7,236,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 29 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 30 services, and fringe benefits, including, but not limited to, the 31 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 32 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 33 testing, and environmental impact statements for transportation 34 projects, and for suballocation of $175,000 to the office of the 35 inspector general (53166). 36 Nonpersonal service (17E41330) (57050) ... 9,911,000 .. (re. $276,000) 37 Fringe benefits (17E81330) (60090) ... 108,498,000 .. (re. $3,054,000) 38 Indirect costs (17E91330) (58850) ... 6,380,000 ........ (re. $67,000) 39 For the costs of the contract services provided by private firms 40 including, but not limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, 41 specifications and estimates; construction management and super- 42 vision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact 43 statements for transportation projects (53105). 44 Nonpersonal service (17EP1330) (57050) ............................... 45 119,003,000 ...................................... (re. $11,158,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 47 section 1, of the laws of 2015: 48 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 49 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 1107 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 2 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 3 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 4 mental impact statements for transportation projects, and for subal- 5 location of $175,000 to the office of the inspector general (53166). 6 Nonpersonal service (17E41230) (57050) ............................... 7 172,203,000 ...................................... (re. $11,281,000) 8 Indirect costs (17E91230) (58850) ... 5,941,000 ....... (re. $279,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 10 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 11 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 12 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 13 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 14 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 15 mental impact statements for transportation projects, and for subal- 16 location of $175,000 to the office of the inspector general 17 (17H11130) (53166) ... 469,901,000 ............... (re. $11,818,000) 18 PERSONAL SERVICE 19 Personal service--regular ...... 185,850,000 20 Temporary service ................ 5,280,000 21 Holiday/overtime compensation .... 3,985,000 22 -------------- 23 Amount available for 24 personal for service ....... 195,115,000 25 -------------- 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Supplies and materials ............. 802,000 28 Travel ........................... 5,959,000 29 Contractual services ............. 1,577,000 30 Equipment ........................... 80,000 31 Fringe benefits ................. 90,493,000 32 Indirect costs ................... 6,907,000 33 -------------- 34 Amount available for nonper- 35 sonal service .............. 105,818,000 36 -------------- 37 CAPITAL PROJECTS 38 For the costs of the contract 39 services provided by private 40 firms including, but not 41 limited to, the preparation 42 of designs, plans, specifi- 43 cations and estimates; 44 construction management and 45 supervision; and appraisals, 46 surveys, testing, and envi- 1108 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ronmental impact statements 2 for transportation projects: 3 Preliminary Design .............. 53,827,000 4 Construction Inspection ......... 65,280,000 5 Bridge Inspection ............... 15,958,000 6 Other Consultant Services ....... 33,903,000 7 -------------- 8 168,968,000 9 -------------- 10 Amount available for capital 11 projects ................... 168,968,000 12 -------------- 13 469,901,000 14 ============== 15 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2012: 17 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 18 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 19 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 20 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 21 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 22 mental impact statements for transportation projects (17H11030) 23 (53166) ... 487,035,000 ........................... (re. $6,740,000) 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service--regular ...... 190,168,000 26 Temporary service ................ 4,737,000 27 Holiday/overtime compensation .... 6,711,000 28 -------------- 29 Amount available for 30 personal service ........... 201,616,000 31 -------------- 32 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 33 Supplies and materials ............. 876,000 34 Travel ........................... 6,657,000 35 Contractual services ............. 1,554,000 36 Equipment .......................... 310,000 37 Fringe benefits ................. 94,760,000 38 Indirect costs ................... 7,256,000 39 -------------- 40 Amount available for nonper- 41 sonal service .............. 111,413,000 42 -------------- 43 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 44 For suballocation of $175,000 45 to the office of the inspec- 1109 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 tor general for services and 2 expenses in accordance with 3 the following: 4 Supplies and materials .............. 44,000 5 Travel .............................. 44,000 6 Contractual services ................ 44,000 7 Equipment ........................... 43,000 8 -------------- 9 175,000 10 -------------- 11 For the costs of the contract 12 services provided by private 13 firms including, but not 14 limited to, the preparation 15 of designs, plans, specifi- 16 cations and estimates; 17 construction management and 18 supervision; and appraisals, 19 surveys, testing, and envi- 20 ronmental impact statements 21 for transportation projects: 22 Preliminary Design .............. 55,260,000 23 Construction Inpsection ......... 67,018,000 24 Bridge Inspection ............... 16,383,000 25 Other Consultant Services ....... 34,805,000 26 -------------- 27 173,466,000 28 -------------- 29 Amount available for mainte- 30 nance undistributed .......... 173,641,000 31 -------------- 32 486,670,000 33 ============== 34 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 55, 35 section 1, of the laws of 2010: 36 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 37 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 38 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 39 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 40 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 41 mental impact statements for transportation projects (17H10930) 42 (53166) ... 497,742,000 ........................... (re. $9,337,000) 43 PERSONAL SERVICE 44 Personal service--regular ...... 194,006,000 45 Temporary service ................ 4,024,000 46 Holiday/overtime compensation .... 6,208,000 47 -------------- 1110 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Amount available for 2 personal service ........... 204,238,000 3 -------------- 4 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 5 Supplies and materials ............. 412,000 6 Travel ............................. 928,000 7 Contractual services ............. 6,367,000 8 Equipment ........................ 1,995,000 9 Fringe benefits ................. 85,064,000 10 Indirect costs ................... 7,992,000 11 -------------- 12 Amount available for nonper- 13 sonal service .............. 102,758,000 14 -------------- 15 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 16 For suballocation of $175,000 17 to the office of the inspec- 18 tor general for services and 19 expenses in accordance with 20 the following: 21 Supplies and materials .............. 44,000 22 Travel .............................. 44,000 23 Contractual services ................ 44,000 24 Equipment ........................... 43,000 25 -------------- 26 175,000 27 -------------- 28 For the costs of the contract 29 services provided by private 30 firms including, but not 31 limited to, the preparation 32 of designs, plans, specifi- 33 cations and estimates; 34 construction management and 35 supervision; and appraisals, 36 surveys, testing, and envi- 37 ronmental impact statements 38 for transportation projects: 39 Preliminary Design .............. 60,709,000 40 Construction Inspection ......... 73,627,000 41 Bridge Inspection ............... 17,998,000 42 Other Consultant Services ....... 38,237,000 43 -------------- 44 190,571,000 45 -------------- 46 Amount available for mainte- 47 nance undistributed ........ 190,746,000 1111 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 -------------- 2 497,742,000 3 ============== 4 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 55, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2010: 6 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 7 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 8 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 9 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 10 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 11 mental impact statements for transportation projects (17H10830) 12 (53166) ... 677,702,000 .......................... (re. $31,228,000) 13 PERSONAL SERVICE 14 Personal service--regular ...... 244,058,000 15 Temporary service ................ 3,100,000 16 Holiday/overtime compensation .... 8,077,000 17 -------------- 18 Amount available for personal 19 service ...................... 255,235,000 20 -------------- 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Supplies and materials ........... 2,976,000 23 Travel .......................... 10,370,000 24 Contractual services ............ 44,067,000 25 Equipment ........................ 3,976,000 26 Fringe benefits ................ 110,019,000 27 Indirect costs .................. 10,608,000 28 -------------- 29 Amount available for nonper- 30 sonal service .............. 182,016,000 31 -------------- 32 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 33 For suballocation of $192,000 34 to the office of the inspec- 35 tor general for services and 36 expenses in accordance with 37 the following: 38 Supplies and materials .............. 48,000 39 Travel .............................. 48,000 40 Contractual services ................ 48,000 41 Equipment ........................... 48,000 42 -------------- 43 192,000 44 -------------- 45 For the costs of the contract 1112 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 services provided by private 2 firms including, but not 3 limited to, the preparation 4 of designs, plans, specifi- 5 cations and estimates; 6 construction management and 7 supervision; and appraisals, 8 surveys, testing, and envi- 9 ronmental impact statements 10 for transportation projects: 11 Preliminary Design .............. 76,538,000 12 Construction Inspection ......... 92,824,000 13 Bridge Inspection ............... 22,691,000 14 Other Consultant Services ....... 48,206,000 15 -------------- 16 240,259,000 17 -------------- 18 Amount available for mainte- 19 nance undistributed ........ 240,451,000 20 -------------- 21 677,702,000 22 ============== 23 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 55, 24 section 1, of the laws of 2008: 25 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 26 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 27 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 28 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 29 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 30 mental impact statements for transportation projects (17H10730) 31 (53166) ... 672,105,000 .......................... (re. $15,664,000) 32 PERSONAL SERVICE 33 Personal service--regular ...... 227,962,000 34 Temporary service ................ 5,156,000 35 Holiday/overtime compensation .... 8,234,000 36 -------------- 37 Amount available for 38 personal service ........... 241,352,000 39 -------------- 40 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 41 Supplies and materials ........... 2,475,000 42 Travel ........................... 6,638,000 43 Contractual services ............ 49,926,000 44 Equipment ........................ 7,869,000 45 Fringe benefits ................ 116,111,000 46 Indirect costs ................... 9,305,000 47 -------------- 1113 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Amount available for nonper- 2 sonal service .............. 192,324,000 3 -------------- 4 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 5 For suballocation of $192,000 6 to the office of the inspec- 7 tor general for services and 8 expenses in accordance with 9 the following: 10 Supplies and materials .............. 48,000 11 Travel .............................. 48,000 12 Contractual services ................ 48,000 13 Equipment ........................... 48,000 14 -------------- 15 192,000 16 -------------- 17 For the costs of the contract 18 services provided by private 19 firms including, but not 20 limited to, the preparation 21 of designs, plans, specifi- 22 cations and estimates; 23 construction management and 24 supervision; and appraisals, 25 surveys, testing, and envi- 26 ronmental impact statements 27 for transportation projects: 28 Preliminary Design .............. 75,894,000 29 Construction Inspection ......... 92,043,000 30 Bridge Inspection ............... 22,500,000 31 Other Consultant Services ....... 47,800,000 32 -------------- 33 238,237,000 34 -------------- 35 Amount available for mainte- 36 nance undistributed ........ 238,429,000 37 -------------- 38 672,105,000 39 ============== 40 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 55, 41 section 1, of the laws of 2008: 42 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 43 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 44 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 45 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 46 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 47 mental impact statements for transportation projects. 1114 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For suballocation of $192,000 to the office of inspector general for 2 services and expenses including fringe benefits (17H10630) (53166) 3 ... 650,996,000 ................................... (re. $8,834,000) 4 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 55, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2010: 6 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 7 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 8 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 9 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 10 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 11 mental impact statements for transportation projects. 12 For suballocation of $192,000 to the office of inspector general for 13 services and expenses including fringe benefits (17H10530) (53166) 14 ... 544,571,000 ................................... (re. $7,307,000) 15 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as amended by chapter 55, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2006: 17 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 18 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 19 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 20 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 21 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 22 mental impact statements for transportation projects. 23 For suballocation of $192,000 to the office of inspector general for 24 services and expenses including fringe benefits (17H10430) (53166) 25 ... 514,002,000 ................................... (re. $4,652,000) 26 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2003, as amended by chapter 55, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2006: 28 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 29 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 30 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 31 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 32 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing, and environ- 33 mental impact statements for transportation projects. 34 For suballocation of $192,000 to the office of inspector general for 35 services and expenses including fringe benefits (17H10330) (53166) 36 ... 512,475,000 .................................. (re. $14,877,000) 37 Information Technology Projects 38 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 55, 39 section 1, of the laws of 2010: 40 For federally eligible costs of information technology projects, 41 including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits 42 and contract services provided by private firms (17H40830) (53265) 43 ... 15,000,000 ................................... (re. $15,000,000) 1115 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service--regular ........ 1,000,000 3 -------------- 4 Amount available for 5 personal service ............. 1,000,000 6 -------------- 7 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 8 Contractual services ............ 13,488,000 9 Fringe benefits .................... 477,000 10 Indirect costs ...................... 35,000 11 -------------- 12 Amount available for nonper- 13 sonal service ............... 14,000,000 14 -------------- 15 15,000,000 16 ============== 17 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 18 For federally eligible costs of information technology projects, 19 including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits 20 and contract services provided by private firms (17H40730) (53265) 21 ... 15,000,000 ................................... (re. $15,000,000) 22 PERSONAL SERVICE 23 Personal service--regular ........ 1,000,000 24 -------------- 25 Amount available for 26 personal service ............. 1,000,000 27 -------------- 28 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 29 Contractual services ............ 13,488,000 30 Fringe benefits .................... 477,000 31 Indirect costs ...................... 35,000 32 -------------- 33 Amount available for nonper- 34 sonal service ............... 14,000,000 35 -------------- 36 15,000,000 37 ============== 38 Real Estate 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 40 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 41 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 42 private firms. 1116 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 2 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 3 fer Authority as defined in the 2025-26 state fiscal year state 4 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 5 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53264). 7 Personal service (17R12530) (50000) .................................. 8 15,165,000 ....................................... (re. $15,165,000) 9 Nonpersonal service (17R42530) (57050) ... 302,000 .... (re. $266,000) 10 Fringe benefits (17R82530) (60090) ... 9,139,000 .... (re. $5,534,000) 11 Indirect costs (17R92530) (58850) ... 411,000 ......... (re. $223,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 14 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 15 private firms. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 17 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 18 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 19 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 20 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53264). 22 Personal service (17R12430) (50000) .................................. 23 15,165,000 ....................................... (re. $11,396,000) 24 Nonpersonal service (17R42430) (57050) ... 302,000 .... (re. $205,000) 25 Fringe benefits (17R82430) (60090) ... 9,981,000 .... (re. $1,829,000) 26 Indirect costs (17R92430) (58850) ... 415,000 .......... (re. $76,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 28 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 29 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 30 private firms. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 32 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 33 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 34 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 35 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 36 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53264). 37 Personal service (17R12330) (50000) .................................. 38 15,165,000 ........................................ (re. $3,423,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (17R42330) (57050) ............................... 40 302,000 ............................................. (re. $196,000) 41 Fringe benefits (17R82330) (60090) ................................... 42 10,169,000 ........................................ (re. $2,200,000) 43 Indirect costs (17R92330) (58850) .................................... 44 472,000 ............................................. (re. $148,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 46 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 47 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 48 private firms. 1117 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 2 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 3 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 4 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 5 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53264). 7 Personal service (17R12230) (50000) .................................. 8 15,165,000 ........................................ (re. $4,533,000) 9 Nonpersonal service (17R42230) (57050) ... 302,000 .... (re. $195,000) 10 Fringe benefits (17R82230) (60090) ... 9,689,000 .... (re. $2,927,000) 11 Indirect costs (17R92230) (58850) ... 463,000 ......... (re. $140,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 13 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 14 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 15 private firms. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 17 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 18 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 19 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 20 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53264). 22 Personal service (17R12130) (50000) .................................. 23 12,665,000 ........................................ (re. $2,006,000) 24 Nonpersonal service (17R42130) (57050) ... 302,000 .... (re. $219,000) 25 Fringe benefits (17R82130) (60090) ... 7,729,000 .... (re. $1,093,000) 26 Indirect costs (17R92130) (58850) ... 409,000 ......... (re. $106,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 28 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 29 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 30 private firms. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 32 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 33 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 34 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 35 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 36 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53264). 37 Personal service (17R12030) (50000) .................................. 38 12,665,000 ........................................ (re. $2,113,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (17R42030) (57050) ... 302,000 .... (re. $245,000) 40 Fringe benefits (17R82030) (60090) ... 7,729,000 .... (re. $1,343,000) 41 Indirect costs (17R92030) (58850) ... 489,000 ......... (re. $152,000) 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 43 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 44 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 45 private firms. 46 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 47 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 48 fer Authority as defined in the 2019-20 state fiscal year state 49 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 1118 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 2 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53264). 3 Personal service (17R11930) (50000) .................................. 4 12,665,000 ........................................ (re. $1,897,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (17R41930) (57050) ... 302,000 .... (re. $176,000) 6 Fringe benefits (17R81930) (60090) ... 7,974,000 .... (re. $1,249,000) 7 Indirect costs (17R91930) (58850) ... 491,000 .......... (re. $79,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 9 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 10 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 11 private firms. 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 13 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 14 fer Authority as defined in the 2018-19 state fiscal year state 15 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 16 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 17 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53264). 18 Personal service (17R11830) (50000) .................................. 19 12,296,000 ........................................ (re. $1,411,000) 20 Nonpersonal service (17R41830) (57050) ... 302,000 .... (re. $129,000) 21 Fringe benefits (17R81830) (60090) ... 7,809,000 ...... (re. $781,000) 22 Indirect costs (17R91830) (58850) ... 488,000 .......... (re. $49,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 24 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 25 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 26 private firms. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 28 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 29 fer Authority as defined in the 2017-18 state fiscal year state 30 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 31 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 32 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53264). 33 Personal service (17R11730) (50000) ... 12,055,000 .. (re. $1,087,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (17R41730) (57050) ... 302,000 .... (re. $113,000) 35 Fringe benefits (17R81730) (60090) ... 7,357,000 ...... (re. $743,000) 36 Indirect costs (17R91730) (58850) ... 407,000 .......... (re. $27,000) 37 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 38 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 39 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 40 private firms. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 42 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 43 fer Authority as defined in the 2016-17 state fiscal year state 44 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 45 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 46 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53264). 47 Personal service (17R11630) (50000) ... 11,604,000 .. (re. $1,842,000) 48 Nonpersonal service (17R41630) (57050) ... 177,000 ..... (re. $26,000) 49 Fringe benefits (17R81630) (60090) ... 6,471,000 ...... (re. $225,000) 1119 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Indirect costs (17R91630) (58850) ... 366,000 .......... (re. $24,000) 2 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 3 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 4 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 5 private firms (53264). 6 Nonpersonal service (17R41530) (57050) ... 174,000 ...... (re. $4,000) 7 Fringe benefits (17R81530) (60090) ... 6,340,000 ...... (re. $306,000) 8 Indirect costs (17R91530) (58850) ... 363,000 .......... (re. $19,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 10 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 11 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 12 private firms (53264). 13 Personal service (17R11430) (50000) ... 11,337,000 .... (re. $133,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (17R41430) (57050) ... 170,000 ...... (re. $5,000) 15 Fringe benefits (17R81430) (60090) ... 6,350,000 ...... (re. $568,000) 16 Indirect costs (17R91430) (58850) ... 353,000 .......... (re. $32,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 18 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 19 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 20 private firms (53264). 21 Nonpersonal service (17R41330) (57050) ... 166,000 ...... (re. $5,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 23 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 24 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 25 private firms (17H31130) (53264) ... 16,956,000 ..... (re. $505,000) 26 PERSONAL SERVICE 27 Personal service--regular ....... 11,074,000 28 Holiday/overtime compensation ....... 10,000 29 -------------- 30 Amount available for 31 personal service ............ 11,084,000 32 -------------- 33 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 34 Supplies and materials .............. 85,000 35 Travel ............................. 162,000 36 Contractual services ................ 91,000 37 Equipment ............................ 1,000 38 Fringe benefits .................. 5,141,000 39 Indirect costs ..................... 392,000 40 -------------- 41 Amount available for nonper- 42 sonal service ................ 5,872,000 43 -------------- 44 16,956,000 1120 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ============== 2 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 3 section 1, of the laws of 2012: 4 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 5 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 6 private firms (17H31030) (53264) ... 20,183,000 ... (re. $2,045,000) 7 PERSONAL SERVICE 8 Personal service--regular ....... 13,355,000 9 Holiday/overtime compensation ....... 20,000 10 -------------- 11 Amount available for 12 personal service ............ 13,375,000 13 -------------- 14 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 15 Supplies and materials .............. 90,000 16 Travel ............................. 172,000 17 Contractual services ................ 96,000 18 Equipment ........................... 48,000 19 Fringe benefits .................. 6,286,000 20 Indirect costs ..................... 481,000 21 -------------- 22 Amount available for nonper- 23 sonal service ................ 7,173,000 24 -------------- 25 20,548,000 26 ============== 27 Capital Projects Funds - Other 28 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 29 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 30 Preventive Maintenance Purpose 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1994, as amended by chapter 55, 32 section 1, of the laws of 1996: 33 For preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as defined in 34 paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the highway law 35 including personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits 36 and the contractual services provided by private firms (170594PM) 37 (53261) ... ... 278,439,000 ..................... (re. $8,688,000) 38 Capital Projects Funds - Other 39 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 40 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 41 Southern Tier Expressway Purpose 42 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1985: 1121 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the cost of construction including land acquisition, surveys, 2 design and contract engineering for the Southern Tier Expressway as 3 defined in section 340-c of the Highway Law (17348590) (53270) ..... 4 ................................................... (re. $2,149,000) 5 OTHER HIGHWAY AID (CCP) 6 Capital Projects Funds - Other 7 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 8 Highway and Bridge Capital Account - 30051 9 Highway Aid Purpose 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1993: 11 For construction of sound abatement barriers on a section of the 12 northbound side of the New England Thruway (Interstate 95) from the 13 Bronx line through the Town of Pelham, Westchester County (17369321) 14 (53286) ... 1,150,000 ............................. (re. $1,150,000) 15 OTHER TRANSPORTATION AID (CCP) 16 Capital Projects Funds - Other 17 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 18 Highway Aid Purpose 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 20 For capital grants to municipalities under the municipal streets and 21 highways program for repayment of eligible costs of federal aid 22 municipal street and highway projects pursuant to section 15 of 23 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 24 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. The department of transporta- 25 tion shall provide such information to the municipalities as may be 26 necessary to maintain the federal tax exempt status of any bonds, 27 notes, or other obligations issued by such municipalities to provide 28 for the non-federal share of the cost of projects pursuant to chap- 29 ter 330 of the laws of 1991 or section 80-b of the highway law 30 (17MA2521) (54265) ... 39,700,000 ................ (re. $39,700,000) 31 For capital grants to municipalities under the consolidated local 32 street and highway improvement program: 33 The sum of $589,300,000 to counties, cities, towns and villages for 34 reimbursement of eligible costs of local highway and bridge projects 35 pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, 36 as added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 37 amended. For the purposes of computing allocations to munici- 38 palities, the amount distributed pursuant to section 16 of chapter 39 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $131,845,000. The 40 amount distributed pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of the 41 laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $457,455,000. Notwithstanding 42 the provisions of any general or special law, the amounts deemed 43 distributed in accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 44 of 1991 shall be adjusted so that such amounts will not be less than 45 90.928 percent of the "funding level" as defined in subdivision 5 of 46 section 10-c of the highway law for each such municipality. In order 1122 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 to achieve the objectives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 2 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 90.928 3 percent of the funding level to be deemed distributed to each muni- 4 cipality under this subdivision shall be reduced in equal propor- 5 tion. 6 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 7 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to sections 16 8 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of 10 computing allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed 11 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 12 deemed to be $13,155,000. The amount distributed pursuant to section 13 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 14 $45,642,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 15 special law, the amounts deemed distributed in accordance with 16 section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 17 that such amounts will not be less than 9.072 percent of the "fund- 18 ing level" as defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the high- 19 way law for each such municipality. In order to achieve the objec- 20 tives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to the 21 extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 9.072 percent of the 22 funding level to be deemed distributed to each municipality under 23 this paragraph shall be reduced in equal proportion. To the extent 24 that the total of remaining payment allocations calculated herein 25 varies from $58,797,000, the payment amounts to each locality shall 26 be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the total payments equal 27 $58,797,000. 28 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 29 ber and March (17CH2521) (54267) ................................... 30 648,097,000 ..................................... (re. $566,792,000) 31 For capital grants to municipalities for extreme winter recovery: The 32 sum of $100,000,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 33 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to section 16-a 34 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 35 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of computing 36 allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed pursuant to 37 section 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to 38 be $100,000,000. To the extent that the total of payment allocations 39 calculated herein varies from $100,000,000, the payment amounts to 40 each locality shall be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the 41 total payments equal $100,000,000. Payments shall be made on the 42 fifteenth day of June, September, December and March (17EW2521) 43 (53160) ... 100,000,000 .......................... (re. $74,207,000) 44 For capital grants to cities, towns and villages for the reimbursement 45 of eligible capital costs of local highway and bridge projects with- 46 in such municipality. 47 Funds shall be allocated to cities, towns and villages based on the 48 total number of New York or United States or interstate signed tour- 49 ing route miles for which such municipality has capital maintenance 50 responsibility, as determined pursuant to the most recent local 51 highway inventory conducted by the highway data services bureau of 52 the department of transportation. 1123 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Eligible capital costs include the costs of construction and repair of 2 highways, bridges, highway-railroad crossings, and other transporta- 3 tion facilities for projects with a service life of ten years or 4 more (17TR2521) (54229) ............................................ 5 140,000,000 ..................................... (re. $132,663,000) 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 7 For capital grants to municipalities under the municipal streets and 8 highways program for repayment of eligible costs of federal aid 9 municipal street and highway projects pursuant to section 15 of 10 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 11 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. The department of transporta- 12 tion shall provide such information to the municipalities as may be 13 necessary to maintain the federal tax exempt status of any bonds, 14 notes, or other obligations issued by such municipalities to provide 15 for the non-federal share of the cost of projects pursuant to chap- 16 ter 330 of the laws of 1991 or section 80-b of the highway law 17 (17MA2421) (54265) ... 39,700,000 ................ (re. $38,875,000) 18 For capital grants to municipalities under the consolidated local 19 street and highway improvement program: 20 The sum of $539,300,000 to counties, cities, towns and villages for 21 reimbursement of eligible costs of local highway and bridge projects 22 pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, 23 as added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 24 amended. For the purposes of computing allocations to munici- 25 palities, the amount distributed pursuant to section 16 of chapter 26 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $130,746,000. The 27 amount distributed pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of the 28 laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $408,554,000. Notwithstanding the 29 provisions of any general or special law, the amounts deemed 30 distributed in accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 31 of 1991 shall be adjusted so that such amounts will not be less than 32 90.169 percent of the "funding level" as defined in subdivision 5 of 33 section 10-c of the highway law for each such municipality. In order 34 to achieve the objectives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 35 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 90.169 36 percent of the funding level to be deemed distributed to each muni- 37 cipality under this subdivision shall be reduced in equal propor- 38 tion. 39 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 40 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to sections 16 41 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 42 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of 43 computing allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed 44 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 45 deemed to be $14,254,000. The amount distributed pursuant to section 46 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 47 $44,543,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 48 special law, the amounts deemed distributed in accordance with 49 section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 50 that such amounts will not be less than 9.831 percent of the "fund- 51 ing level" as defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the high- 1124 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 way law for each such municipality. In order to achieve the objec- 2 tives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to the 3 extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 9.831 percent of the 4 funding level to be deemed distributed to each municipality under 5 this paragraph shall be reduced in equal proportion. To the extent 6 that the total of remaining payment allocations calculated herein 7 varies from $58,797,000, the payment amounts to each locality shall 8 be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the total payments equal 9 $58,797,000. 10 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 11 ber and March (17CH2421) (54267) ................................... 12 598,097,000 ..................................... (re. $235,717,000) 13 For capital grants to municipalities for extreme winter recovery: The 14 sum of $100,000,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 15 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to section 16-a 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 17 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of computing 18 allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed pursuant to 19 section 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to 20 be $100,000,000. To the extent that the total of payment allocations 21 calculated herein varies from $100,000,000, the payment amounts to 22 each locality shall be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the 23 total payments equal $100,000,000. Payments shall be made on the 24 fifteenth day of June, September, December and March (17EW2421) 25 (53160) ... 100,000,000 .......................... (re. $16,003,000) 26 For capital grants to cities, towns and villages for the reimbursement 27 of eligible capital costs of local highway and bridge projects with- 28 in such municipality. 29 Funds shall be allocated to cities, towns and villages based on the 30 total number of New York or United States or interstate signed tour- 31 ing route miles for which such municipality has capital maintenance 32 responsibility, as determined pursuant to the most recent local 33 highway inventory conducted by the highway data services bureau of 34 the department of transportation. 35 Eligible capital costs include the costs of construction and repair of 36 highways, bridges, highway-railroad crossings, and other transporta- 37 tion facilities for projects with a service life of ten years or 38 more (17TR2421) (54229) ............................................ 39 140,000,000 ...................................... (re. $97,187,000) 40 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 41 For capital grants to municipalities under the municipal streets and 42 highways program for repayment of eligible costs of federal aid 43 municipal street and highway projects pursuant to section 15 of 44 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 45 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. The department of transporta- 46 tion shall provide such information to the municipalities as may be 47 necessary to maintain the federal tax exempt status of any bonds, 48 notes, or other obligations issued by such municipalities to provide 49 for the non-federal share of the cost of projects pursuant to chap- 50 ter 330 of the laws of 1991 or section 80-b of the highway law 51 (17MA2321) (54265) ... 39,700,000 ................ (re. $34,043,000) 1125 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For capital grants to municipalities under the consolidated local 2 street and highway improvement program: 3 The sum of $539,300,000 to counties, cities, towns and villages for 4 reimbursement of eligible costs of local highway and bridge projects 5 pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, 6 as added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 7 amended. For the purposes of computing allocations to munici- 8 palities, the amount distributed pursuant to section 16 of chapter 9 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $130,746,000. The 10 amount distributed pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of the 11 laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $408,554,000. Notwithstanding the 12 provisions of any general or special law, the amounts deemed 13 distributed in accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 14 of 1991 shall be adjusted so that such amounts will not be less than 15 90.169 percent of the "funding level" as defined in subdivision 5 of 16 section 10-c of the highway law for each such municipality. In order 17 to achieve the objectives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 18 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 90.169 19 percent of the funding level to be deemed distributed to each muni- 20 cipality under this subdivision shall be reduced in equal propor- 21 tion. 22 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 23 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to sections 16 24 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 25 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of 26 computing allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed 27 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 28 deemed to be $14,254,000. The amount distributed pursuant to section 29 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 30 $44,543,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 31 special law, the amounts deemed distributed in accordance with 32 section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 33 that such amounts will not be less than 9.831 percent of the "fund- 34 ing level" as defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the high- 35 way law for each such municipality. In order to achieve the objec- 36 tives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to the 37 extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 9.831 percent of the 38 funding level to be deemed distributed to each municipality under 39 this paragraph shall be reduced in equal proportion. To the extent 40 that the total of remaining payment allocations calculated herein 41 varies from $58,797,000, the payment amounts to each locality shall 42 be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the total payments equal 43 $58,797,000. 44 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 45 ber and March (17CH2321) (54267) ................................... 46 598,097,000 ..................................... (re. $103,739,000) 47 For capital grants to municipalities for extreme winter recovery: The 48 sum of $100,000,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 49 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to section 16-a 50 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 51 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of computing 52 allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed pursuant to 1126 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 section 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to 2 be $100,000,000. To the extent that the total of payment allocations 3 calculated herein varies from $100,000,000, the payment amounts to 4 each locality shall be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the 5 total payments equal $100,000,000. Payments shall be made on the 6 fifteenth day of June, September, December and March (17EW2321) 7 (53160) ... 100,000,000 ........................... (re. $6,458,000) 8 For capital grants to cities, towns and villages for the reimbursement 9 of eligible capital costs of local highway and bridge projects with- 10 in such municipality. 11 Funds shall be allocated to cities, towns and villages based on the 12 total number of New York or United States or interstate signed tour- 13 ing route miles for which such municipality has capital maintenance 14 responsibility, as determined pursuant to the most recent local 15 highway inventory conducted by the highway data services bureau of 16 the department of transportation. 17 Eligible capital costs include the costs of construction and repair of 18 highways, bridges, highway-railroad crossings, and other transporta- 19 tion facilities for projects with a service life of ten years or 20 more (17TR2321) (54229) ............................................ 21 140,000,000 ...................................... (re. $75,961,000) 22 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 23 For capital grants to municipalities under the municipal streets and 24 highways program for repayment of eligible costs of federal aid 25 municipal street and highway projects pursuant to section 15 of 26 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 27 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. The department of transporta- 28 tion shall provide such information to the municipalities as may be 29 necessary to maintain the federal tax exempt status of any bonds, 30 notes, or other obligations issued by such municipalities to provide 31 for the non-federal share of the cost of projects pursuant to chap- 32 ter 330 of the laws of 1991 or section 80-b of the highway law 33 (17MA2221) (54265) ... 39,700,000 ................ (re. $31,361,000) 34 For capital grants to municipalities under the consolidated local 35 street and highway improvement program: 36 The sum of $479,300,000 to counties, cities, towns and villages for 37 reimbursement of eligible costs of local highway and bridge projects 38 pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, 39 as added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 40 amended. For the purposes of computing allocations to munici- 41 palities, the amount distributed pursuant to section 16 of chapter 42 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $129,156,000. The 43 amount distributed pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of the 44 laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $350,144,000. Notwithstanding the 45 provisions of any general or special law, the amounts deemed 46 distributed in accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 47 of 1991 shall be adjusted so that such amounts will not be less than 48 89.073 percent of the "funding level" as defined in subdivision 5 of 49 section 10-c of the highway law for each such municipality. In order 50 to achieve the objectives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 51 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 89.073 1127 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 percent of the funding level to be deemed distributed to each muni- 2 cipality under this subdivision shall be reduced in equal propor- 3 tion. 4 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 5 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to sections 16 6 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 7 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of 8 computing allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed 9 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 10 deemed to be $15,844,000. The amount distributed pursuant to section 11 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 12 $42,953,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 13 special law, the amounts deemed distributed in accordance with 14 section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 15 that such amounts will not be less than 10.927 percent of the "fund- 16 ing level" as defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the high- 17 way law for each such municipality. In order to achieve the objec- 18 tives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to the 19 extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 10.927 percent of the 20 funding level to be deemed distributed to each municipality under 21 this paragraph shall be reduced in equal proportion. To the extent 22 that the total of remaining payment allocations calculated herein 23 varies from $58,797,000, the payment amounts to each locality shall 24 be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the total payments equal 25 $58,797,000. 26 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 27 ber and March (17CH2221) (54267) ................................... 28 538,097,000 ....................................... (re. $2,740,000) 29 For capital grants to municipalities for extreme winter recovery: The 30 sum of $100,000,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 31 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to section 16-a 32 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 33 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of computing 34 allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed pursuant to 35 section 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to 36 be $100,000,000. To the extent that the total of payment allocations 37 calculated herein varies from $100,000,000, the payment amounts to 38 each locality shall be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the 39 total payments equal $100,000,000. Payments shall be made on the 40 fifteenth day of June, September, December and March (17EW2221) 41 (53160) ... 100,000,000 ........................... (re. $3,664,000) 42 For capital grants to cities, towns and villages for the reimbursement 43 of eligible capital costs of local highway and bridge projects with- 44 in such municipality. 45 Funds shall be allocated to cities, towns and villages based on the 46 total number of New York or United States or interstate signed tour- 47 ing route miles for which such municipality has capital maintenance 48 responsibility, as determined pursuant to the most recent local 49 highway inventory conducted by the highway data services bureau of 50 the department of transportation. 51 Eligible capital costs include the costs of construction and repair of 52 highways, bridges, highway-railroad crossings, and other transporta- 1128 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 tion facilities for projects with a service life of ten years or 2 more (17TR2221) (54229) ............................................ 3 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $30,718,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 5 For capital grants to municipalities under the municipal streets and 6 highways program for repayment of eligible costs of federal aid 7 municipal street and highway projects pursuant to section 15 of 8 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 9 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. The department of transporta- 10 tion shall provide such information to the municipalities as may be 11 necessary to maintain the federal tax exempt status of any bonds, 12 notes, or other obligations issued by such municipalities to provide 13 for the non-federal share of the cost of projects pursuant to chap- 14 ter 330 of the laws of 1991 or section 80-b of the highway law 15 (17MA2121) (54265) ... 39,700,000 ................. (re. $4,047,000) 16 For capital grants to municipalities under the consolidated local 17 street and highway improvement program: 18 The sum of $479,300,000 to counties, cities, towns and villages for 19 reimbursement of eligible costs of local highway and bridge projects 20 pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, 21 as added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 22 amended. For the purposes of computing allocations to munici- 23 palities, the amount distributed pursuant to section 16 of chapter 24 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $129,156,000. The 25 amount distributed pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of the 26 laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $350,144,000. Notwithstanding the 27 provisions of any general or special law, the amounts deemed 28 distributed in accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 29 of 1991 shall be adjusted so that such amounts will not be less than 30 89.073 percent of the "funding level" as defined in subdivision 5 of 31 section 10-c of the highway law for each such municipality. In order 32 to achieve the objectives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 33 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 89.073 34 percent of the funding level to be deemed distributed to each muni- 35 cipality under this subdivision shall be reduced in equal propor- 36 tion. 37 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 38 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to sections 16 39 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 40 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of 41 computing allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed 42 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 43 deemed to be $15,844,000. The amount distributed pursuant to section 44 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 45 $42,953,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 46 special law, the amounts deemed distributed in accordance with 47 section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 48 that such amounts will not be less than 10.927 percent of the "fund- 49 ing level" as defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the high- 50 way law for each such municipality. In order to achieve the objec- 51 tives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to the 1129 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 10.927 percent of the 2 funding level to be deemed distributed to each municipality under 3 this paragraph shall be reduced in equal proportion. To the extent 4 that the total of remaining payment allocations calculated herein 5 varies from $58,797,000, the payment amounts to each locality shall 6 be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the total payments equal 7 $58,797,000. 8 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 9 ber and March (17CH2121) (54267) ................................... 10 538,097,000 .......................................... (re. $38,000) 11 For capital grants to municipalities for extreme winter recovery: The 12 sum of $100,000,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 13 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to section 16-a 14 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 15 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of computing 16 allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed pursuant to 17 section 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to 18 be $100,000,000. To the extent that the total of payment allocations 19 calculated herein varies from $100,000,000, the payment amounts to 20 each locality shall be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the 21 total payments equal $100,000,000. Payments shall be made on the 22 fifteenth day of June, September, December and March (17EW2121) 23 (53160) ... 100,000,000 ........................... (re. $3,023,000) 24 For capital grants to cities, towns and villages for the reimbursement 25 of eligible capital costs of local highway and bridge projects with- 26 in such municipality. 27 Funds shall be allocated to cities, towns and villages based on the 28 total number of New York or United States or interstate signed tour- 29 ing route miles for which such municipality has capital maintenance 30 responsibility, as determined pursuant to the most recent local 31 highway inventory conducted by the highway data services bureau of 32 the department of transportation. 33 Eligible capital costs include the costs of construction and repair of 34 highways, bridges, highway-railroad crossings, and other transporta- 35 tion facilities for projects with a service life of ten years or 36 more (17TR2121) (54229) ... 100,000,000 .......... (re. $22,927,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 38 For capital grants to municipalities under the municipal streets and 39 highways program for repayment of eligible costs of federal aid 40 municipal street and highway projects pursuant to section 15 of 41 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 42 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. The department of transporta- 43 tion shall provide such information to the municipalities as may be 44 necessary to maintain the federal tax exempt status of any bonds, 45 notes, or other obligations issued by such municipalities to provide 46 for the non-federal share of the cost of projects pursuant to chap- 47 ter 330 of the laws of 1991 or section 80-b of the highway law. 48 Provided, however, that no obligations against, or spending from 49 this appropriation shall be authorized unless the director of the 50 division of the budget certifies that such obligations or spending 51 can be accommodated within the State's multi-year financial plan 1130 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 without adversely affecting the funding available for (a) capital 2 projects currently authorized that are deemed essential to the 3 health and safety of the public, or (b) essential governmental 4 services (17MA2021) (54265) ... 39,700,000 ........ (re. $2,030,000) 5 For capital grants to municipalities under the consolidated local 6 street and highway improvement program: 7 The sum of $379,300,000 to counties, cities, towns and villages for 8 reimbursement of eligible costs of local highway and bridge projects 9 pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, 10 as added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 11 amended. For the purposes of computing allocations to munici- 12 palities, the amount distributed pursuant to section 16 of chapter 13 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $125,540,000. The 14 amount distributed pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of the 15 laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $253,760,000. Notwithstanding the 16 provisions of any general or special law, the amounts deemed 17 distributed in accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 18 of 1991 shall be adjusted so that such amounts will not be less than 19 86.579 percent of the "funding level" as defined in subdivision 5 of 20 section 10-c of the highway law for each such municipality. In order 21 to achieve the objectives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 22 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 86.579 23 percent of the funding level to be deemed distributed to each muni- 24 cipality under this subdivision shall be reduced in equal propor- 25 tion. 26 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 27 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to sections 16 28 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 29 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of 30 computing allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed 31 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 32 deemed to be $19,460,000. The amount distributed pursuant to section 33 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 34 $39,337,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 35 special law, the amounts deemed distributed in accordance with 36 section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 37 that such amounts will not be less than 13.421 percent of the "fund- 38 ing level" as defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the high- 39 way law for each such municipality. In order to achieve the objec- 40 tives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to the 41 extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 13.421 percent of the 42 funding level to be deemed distributed to each municipality under 43 this paragraph shall be reduced in equal proportion. To the extent 44 that the total of remaining payment allocations calculated herein 45 varies from $58,797,000, the payment amounts to each locality shall 46 be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the total payments equal 47 $58,797,000. 48 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 49 ber and March. Provided, however, that no obligations against, or 50 spending from this appropriation shall be authorized unless the 51 director of the division of the budget certifies that such obli- 52 gations or spending can be accommodated within the State's multiyear 1131 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 financial plan without adversely affecting the funding available for 2 (a) capital projects currently authorized that are deemed essential 3 to the health and safety of the public, or (b) essential govern- 4 mental services (17CH2021) (54267) ................................. 5 438,097,000 ...................................... (re. $11,646,000) 6 For capital grants to municipalities for extreme winter recovery: 7 The sum of $65,000,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 8 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to section 16-a 9 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 10 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of computing 11 allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed pursuant to 12 section 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to 13 be $65,000,000. To the extent that the total of payment allocations 14 calculated herein varies from $65,000,000, the payment amounts to 15 each locality shall be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the 16 total payments equal $65,000,000. 17 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 18 ber and March.Provided, however, that no obligations against, or 19 spending from this appropriation shall be authorized unless the 20 director of the division of the budget certifies that such obli- 21 gations or spending can be accommodated within the State's multiyear 22 financial plan without adversely affecting the funding available for 23 (a) capital projects currently authorized that are deemed essential 24 to the health and safety of the public, or (b) essential govern- 25 mental services (17EW2021) (53160) ................................. 26 65,000,000 .......................................... (re. $113,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 28 For capital grants to municipalities under the municipal streets and 29 highways program for repayment of eligible costs of federal aid 30 municipal street and highway projects pursuant to section 15 of 31 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 32 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. The department of transporta- 33 tion shall provide such information to the municipalities as may be 34 necessary to maintain the federal tax exempt status of any bonds, 35 notes, or other obligations issued by such municipalities to provide 36 for the non-federal share of the cost of projects pursuant to chap- 37 ter 330 of the laws of 1991 or section 80-b of the highway law 38 (17MA1921) (54265) ... 39,700,000 ................. (re. $4,153,000) 39 For capital grants to municipalities under the consolidated local 40 street and highway improvement program: 41 The sum of $379,300,000 to counties, cities, towns and villages for 42 reimbursement of eligible costs of local highway and bridge projects 43 pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, 44 as added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 45 amended. For the purposes of computing allocations to munici- 46 palities, the amount distributed pursuant to section 16 of chapter 47 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $125,540,000. The 48 amount distributed pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of the 49 laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $253,760,000. Notwithstanding the 50 provisions of any general or special law, the amounts deemed 51 distributed in accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 1132 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of 1991 shall be adjusted so that such amounts will not be less than 2 86.579 percent of the "funding level" as defined in subdivision 5 of 3 section 10-c of the highway law for each such municipality. In order 4 to achieve the objectives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 5 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 86.579 6 percent of the funding level to be deemed distributed to each muni- 7 cipality under this subdivision shall be reduced in equal propor- 8 tion. 9 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 10 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to sections 16 11 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 12 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of 13 computing allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed 14 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 15 deemed to be $19,460,000. The amount distributed pursuant to section 16 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 17 $39,337,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 18 special law, the amounts deemed distributed in accordance with 19 section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 20 that such amounts will not be less than 13.421 percent of the "fund- 21 ing level" as defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the high- 22 way law for each such municipality. In order to achieve the objec- 23 tives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to the 24 extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 13.421 percent of the 25 funding level to be deemed distributed to each municipality under 26 this paragraph shall be reduced in equal proportion. To the extent 27 that the total of remaining payment allocations calculated herein 28 varies from $58,797,000, the payment amounts to each locality shall 29 be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the total payments equal 30 $58,797,000. 31 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 32 ber and March (17CH1921) (54267) ................................... 33 438,097,000 ....................................... (re. $4,896,000) 34 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as added by chapter 314, 35 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 36 For capital grants to municipalities for extreme winter recovery: 37 The sum of $65,000,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 38 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to section 16-a 39 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 40 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of computing 41 allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed pursuant to 42 section 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to 43 be $65,000,000. To the extent that the total of payment allocations 44 calculated herein varies from $65,000,000, the payment amounts to 45 each locality shall be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the 46 total payments equal $65,000,000. 47 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 48 ber and March (17EW1921) (53160) ................................... 49 65,000,000 .......................................... (re. $491,000) 50 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 1133 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For capital grants to municipalities under the municipal streets and 2 highways program for repayment of eligible costs of federal aid 3 municipal street and highway projects pursuant to section 15 of 4 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 5 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. The department of transporta- 6 tion shall provide such information to the municipalities as may be 7 necessary to maintain the federal tax exempt status of any bonds, 8 notes, or other obligations issued by such municipalities to provide 9 for the non-federal share of the cost of projects pursuant to chap- 10 ter 330 of the laws of 1991 or section 80-b of the highway law 11 (17MA1821) (54265) ... 39,700,000 ................ (re. $39,700,000) 12 For capital grants to municipalities under the consolidated local 13 street and highway improvement program: 14 The sum of $379,300,000 to counties, cities, towns and villages for 15 reimbursement of eligible costs of local highway and bridge projects 16 pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, 17 as added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 18 amended. For the purposes of computing allocations to munici- 19 palities, the amount distributed pursuant to section 16 of chapter 20 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $125,540,000. The 21 amount distributed pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of the 22 laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $253,760,000. Notwithstanding the 23 provisions of any general or special law, the amounts deemed 24 distributed in accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 25 of 1991 shall be adjusted so that such amounts will not be less than 26 86.579 percent of the "funding level" as defined in subdivision 5 of 27 section 10-c of the highway law for each such municipality. In order 28 to achieve the objectives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 29 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 86.579 30 percent of the funding level to be deemed distributed to each muni- 31 cipality under this subdivision shall be reduced in equal propor- 32 tion. 33 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 34 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to sections 16 35 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 36 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of 37 computing allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed 38 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 39 deemed to be $19,460,000. The amount distributed pursuant to section 40 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 41 $39,337,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 42 special law, the amounts deemed distributed in accordance with 43 section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 44 that such amounts will not be less than 13.421 percent of the "fund- 45 ing level" as defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the high- 46 way law for each such municipality. In order to achieve the objec- 47 tives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to the 48 extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 13.421 percent of the 49 funding level to be deemed distributed to each municipality under 50 this paragraph shall be reduced in equal proportion. To the extent 51 that the total of remaining payment allocations calculated herein 52 varies from $58,797,000, the payment amounts to each locality shall 1134 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the total payments equal 2 $58,797,000. 3 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 4 ber and March (17CH1821) (54267) ................................... 5 438,097,000 ....................................... (re. $1,245,000) 6 For capital grants to municipalities for extreme winter recovery: 7 The sum of $65,000,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 8 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to section 16-a 9 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 10 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of computing 11 allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed pursuant to 12 section 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to 13 be $65,000,000. To the extent that the total of payment allocations 14 calculated herein varies from $65,000,000, the payment amounts to 15 each locality shall be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the 16 total payments equal $65,000,000. Payments shall be made on the 17 fifteenth day of June, September, December and March (17EW1821) 18 (53160) ... 65,000,000 .............................. (re. $376,000) 19 For municipalities eligible to receive aid under section 10-c of the 20 highway law, for the reimbursement of eligible costs to replace 21 guiderail end-cap terminals removed from the department of transpor- 22 tation's approved list during state fiscal year 2017-18, provided 23 such costs do not exceed $10,000 per unit (17GR1821) (54219) ....... 24 375,000 ............................................. (re. $375,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 26 For capital grants to municipalities under the municipal streets and 27 highways program for repayment of eligible costs of federal aid 28 municipal street and highway projects pursuant to section 15 of 29 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 30 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. The department of transporta- 31 tion shall provide such information to the municipalities as may be 32 necessary to maintain the federal tax exempt status of any bonds, 33 notes, or other obligations issued by such municipalities to provide 34 for the non-federal share of the cost of projects pursuant to chap- 35 ter 330 of the laws of 1991 or section 80-b of the highway law 36 (17MA1721) (54265) ... 39,700,000 ................ (re. $37,089,000) 37 For capital grants to municipalities under the consolidated local 38 street and highway improvement program: 39 The sum of $379,300,000 to counties, cities, towns and villages for 40 reimbursement of eligible costs of local highway and bridge projects 41 pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, 42 as added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 43 amended. For the purposes of computing allocations to munici- 44 palities, the amount distributed pursuant to section 16 of chapter 45 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $125,540,000. 46 The amount distributed pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of the 47 laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $253,760,000. Notwithstanding the 48 provisions of any general or special law, the amounts deemed 49 distributed in accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 50 of 1991 shall be adjusted so that such amounts will not be less than 51 86.579 percent of the "funding level" as defined in subdivision 5 of 1135 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 section 10-c of the highway law for each such municipality. In order 2 to achieve the objectives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 3 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 86.579 4 percent of the funding level to be deemed distributed to each muni- 5 cipality under this subdivision shall be reduced in equal propor- 6 tion. 7 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 8 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to sections 16 9 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 10 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of 11 computing allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed 12 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 13 deemed to be $19,460,000. The amount distributed pursuant to section 14 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 15 $39,337,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 16 special law, the amounts deemed distributed in accordance with 17 section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 18 that such amounts will not be less than 13.421 percent of the "fund- 19 ing level" as defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the high- 20 way law for each such municipality. In order to achieve the objec- 21 tives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to the 22 extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 13.421 percent of the 23 funding level to be deemed distributed to each municipality under 24 this paragraph shall be reduced in equal proportion. To the extent 25 that the total of remaining payment allocations calculated herein 26 varies from $58,797,000, the payment amounts to each locality shall 27 be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the total payments equal 28 $58,797,000. 29 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 30 ber and March (17CH1721) (54267) ................................... 31 438,097,000 ......................................... (re. $281,000) 32 For capital capital grants to municipalities for extreme winter recov- 33 ery: 34 The sum of $65,000,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 35 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to section 16-a 36 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 37 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of computing 38 allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed pursuant to 39 section 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to 40 be $65,000,000. To the extent that the total of payment allocations 41 calculated herein varies from $65,000,000, the payment amounts to 42 each locality shall be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the 43 total payments equal $65,000,000. 44 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 45 ber and March (17EW1721) (53160) ... 65,000,000 ..... (re. $270,000) 46 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 47 For capital grants to municipalities under the municipal streets and 48 highways program for repayment of eligible costs of federal aid 49 municipal street and highway projects pursuant to section 15 of 50 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 51 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. The department of transporta- 1136 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 tion shall provide such information to the municipalities as may be 2 necessary to maintain the federal tax exempt status of any bonds, 3 notes, or other obligations issued by such municipalities to provide 4 for the non-federal share of the cost of projects pursuant to chap- 5 ter 330 of the laws of 1991 or section 80-b of the highway law 6 (17MA1621) (54265) ... 39,700,000 ................ (re. $39,700,000) 7 For capital grants to municipalities under the consolidated local 8 street and highway improvement program: 9 The sum of $379,300,000 to counties, cities, towns and villages for 10 reimbursement of eligible costs of local highway and bridge projects 11 pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, 12 as added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 13 amended. For the purposes of computing allocations to munici- 14 palities, the amount distributed pursuant to section 16 of chapter 15 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $125,540,000. The 16 amount distributed pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of the 17 laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $253,760,000. Notwithstanding the 18 provisions of any general or special law, the amounts deemed 19 distributed in accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 20 of 1991 shall be adjusted so that such amounts will not be less than 21 86.579 percent of the "funding level" as defined in subdivision 5 of 22 section 10-c of the highway law for each such municipality. In order 23 to achieve the objectives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 24 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 86.579 25 percent of the funding level to be deemed distributed to each muni- 26 cipality under this subdivision shall be reduced in equal propor- 27 tion. 28 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 29 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to sections 16 30 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 31 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of 32 computing allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed 33 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 34 deemed to be $19,460,000. The amount distributed pursuant to section 35 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 36 $39,337,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 37 special law, the amounts deemed distributed in accordance with 38 section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 39 that such amounts will not be less than 13.421 percent of the "fund- 40 ing level" as defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the high- 41 way law for each such municipality. In order to achieve the objec- 42 tives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to the 43 extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 13.421 percent of the 44 funding level to be deemed distributed to each municipality under 45 this paragraph shall be reduced in equal proportion. To the extent 46 that the total of remaining payment allocations calculated herein 47 varies from $58,797,000, the payment amounts to each locality shall 48 be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the total payments equal 49 $58,797,000. 50 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 51 ber and March (17CH1621) (54267) ................................... 52 438,097,000 ......................................... (re. $281,000) 1137 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 2 For capital grants to municipalities under the municipal streets and 3 highways program for repayment of eligible costs of federal aid 4 municipal street and highway projects pursuant to section 15 of 5 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 6 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. The department of transporta- 7 tion shall provide such information to the municipalities as may be 8 necessary to maintain the federal tax exempt status of any bonds, 9 notes, or other obligations issued by such municipalities to provide 10 for the non-federal share of the cost of projects pursuant to chap- 11 ter 330 of the laws of 1991 or section 80-b of the highway law 12 (17MA1521) (54265) ... 39,700,000 ................. (re. $1,254,000) 13 For capital grants to municipalities under the consolidated local 14 street and highway improvement program: 15 The sum of $379,300,000 to counties, cities, towns and villages for 16 reimbursement of eligible costs of local highway and bridge projects 17 pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, 18 as added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 19 amended. For the purposes of computing allocations to munici- 20 palities, the amount distributed pursuant to section 16 of chapter 21 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $125,540,000. The 22 amount distributed pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of the 23 laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $253,760,000. Notwithstanding the 24 provisions of any general or special law, the amounts deemed 25 distributed in accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 26 of 1991 shall be adjusted so that such amounts will not be less than 27 86.579 percent of the "funding level" as defined in subdivision 5 of 28 section 10-c of the highway law for each such municipality. In order 29 to achieve the objectives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 30 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 86.579 31 percent of the funding level to be deemed distributed to each muni- 32 cipality under this subdivision shall be reduced in equal propor- 33 tion. 34 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 35 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to sections 16 36 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 37 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of 38 computing allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed 39 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 40 deemed to be $19,460,000. The amount distributed pursuant to section 41 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 42 $39,337,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 43 special law, the amounts deemed distributed in accordance with 44 section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 45 that such amounts will not be less than 13.421 percent of the "fund- 46 ing level" as defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the high- 47 way law for each such municipality. In order to achieve the objec- 48 tives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to the 49 extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 13.421 percent of the 50 funding level to be deemed distributed to each municipality under 51 this paragraph shall be reduced in equal proportion. To the extent 52 that the total of remaining payment allocations calculated herein 1138 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 varies from $58,797,000, the payment amounts to each locality shall 2 be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the total payments equal 3 $58,797,000. 4 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 5 ber and March (17CH1521) (54267) ................................... 6 438,097,000 .......................................... (re. $58,000) 7 For capital grants to municipalities for extreme winter recovery: 8 The sum of $50,000,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 9 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to section 16-a 10 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 11 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of computing 12 allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed pursuant to 13 section 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to 14 be $50,000,000. To the extent that the total of payment allocations 15 calculated herein varies from $50,000,000, the payment amounts to 16 each locality shall be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the 17 total payments equal $50,000,000. 18 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 19 ber and March (17EW1521) (53160) ... 50,000,000 ..... (re. $125,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 21 For capital grants to municipalities under the municipal streets and 22 highways program for repayment of eligible costs of federal aid 23 municipal street and highway projects pursuant to section 15 of 24 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 25 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. The department of transporta- 26 tion shall provide such information to the municipalities as may be 27 necessary to maintain the federal tax exempt status of any bonds, 28 notes, or other obligations issued by such municipalities to provide 29 for the non-federal share of the cost of projects pursuant to chap- 30 ter 330 of the laws of 1991 or section 80-b of the highway law 31 (17MA1421) (54265) ... 39,700,000 ................. (re. $2,177,000) 32 For capital grants to municipalities under the consolidated local 33 street and highway improvement program: 34 The sum of $379,300,000 to counties, cities, towns and villages for 35 reimbursement of eligible costs of local highway and bridge projects 36 pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, 37 as added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 38 amended. For the purposes of computing allocations to munici- 39 palities, the amount distributed pursuant to section 16 of chapter 40 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $125,540,000. The 41 amount distributed pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of the 42 laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be $253,760,000. Notwithstanding the 43 provisions of any general or special law, the amounts deemed 44 distributed in accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 45 of 1991 shall be adjusted so that such amounts will not be less than 46 86.579 percent of the "funding level" as defined in subdivision 5 of 47 section 10-c of the highway law for each such municipality. In order 48 to achieve the objectives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 49 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 86.579 50 percent of the funding level to be deemed distributed to each muni- 1139 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 cipality under this subdivision shall be reduced in equal propor- 2 tion. 3 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 4 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to sections 16 5 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 6 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of 7 computing allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed 8 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 9 deemed to be $19,460,000. The amount distributed pursuant to section 10 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 11 $39,337,000. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or 12 special law, the amounts deemed distributed in accordance with 13 section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 14 that such amounts will not be less than 13.421 percent of the "fund- 15 ing level" as defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the high- 16 way law for each such municipality. In order to achieve the objec- 17 tives of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to the 18 extent necessary, the amounts in excess of 13.421 percent of the 19 funding level to be deemed distributed to each municipality under 20 this paragraph shall be reduced in equal proportion. To the extent 21 that the total of remaining payment allocations calculated herein 22 varies from $58,797,000, the payment amounts to each locality shall 23 be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the total payments equal 24 $58,797,000. 25 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 26 ber and March (17CH1421) (54267) ................................... 27 438,097,000 .......................................... (re. $59,000) 28 For capital grants to municipalities pursuant to annual program 29 authorizations enacted and effective prior to April 1, 2014, in 30 relation to the suburban highway improvement program in sections 31 10-f and 10-g of the highway law. Notwithstanding any contrary 32 provision of law contained in such annual program authorization, 33 payments pursuant to this appropriation shall be made from the state 34 capital projects fund (17SH1421) (54269) ........................... 35 1,700,000 ......................................... (re. $1,700,000) 36 For capital grants to municipalities for extreme winter recovery: 37 The sum of $40,000,000 to municipalities for reimbursement of eligible 38 costs of local highway and bridge projects pursuant to section 16-a 39 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of chapter 40 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes of computing 41 allocations to municipalities, the amount distributed pursuant to 42 section 16-a of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to 43 be $40,000,000. To the extent that the total of payment allocations 44 calculated herein varies from $40,000,000, the payment amounts to 45 each locality shall be adjusted by a uniform percentage so that the 46 total payments equal $40,000,000. 47 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 48 ber and March (17EW1421) (53160) ... 40,000,000 ...... (re. $74,000) 49 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 50 section 1, of the laws of 2015: 1140 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For capital grants to municipalities pursuant to annual program 2 authorizations enacted and effective prior to April 1, 2014 under 3 the municipal streets and highways program for repayment of eligible 4 costs of federal aid municipal street and highway projects pursuant 5 to section 15 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as added by 6 section 9 of chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as amended. The 7 department of transportation shall provide such information to the 8 municipalities as may be necessary to maintain the federal tax 9 exempt status of any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by 10 such municipalities to provide for the non-federal share of the cost 11 of projects pursuant to chapter 330 of the laws of 1991 or section 12 80-b of the highway law (17MR1421) (54266) ......................... 13 217,097,000 ...................................... (re. $21,210,000) 14 For capital grants to municipalities pursuant to annual program 15 authorizations enacted and effective prior to April 1, 2014, in 16 relation to the consolidated local street and highway improvement 17 program in section 10-c of the highway law and sections 16 and 16a 18 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991. Notwithstanding any contrary 19 provision of law contained in such annual program authorization, 20 payments pursuant to this appropriation shall be made from the state 21 capital projects fund. 22 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day of June, September, Decem- 23 ber and March (17CR1421) (54268) ................................... 24 110,803,000 ....................................... (re. $1,051,000) 25 For capital grants to municipalities pursuant to annual program 26 authorizations enacted and effective prior to April 1, 2014, in 27 relation to the multi-modal program in section 14-k of the transpor- 28 tation law. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law contained 29 in such annual program authorization, payments pursuant to this 30 appropriation shall be made from the state capital projects fund 31 (17MM1421) (54270) ... 47,123,000 ................ (re. $37,676,000) 32 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 33 Federal Capital Projects Fund 34 Transportation Account - 31354 35 Mass Transportation and Rail Freight Purpose 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 37 For payment of eligible costs for the federal share of capital assist- 38 ance for intercity passenger rail corridors, congestion relief, and 39 high-speed rail corridor development funded by the infrastructure 40 investment and jobs act (IIJA) or bipartisan infrastructure law 41 (BIL) and any successor legislation (17012212) (54288) ............. 42 500,000,000 ..................................... (re. $499,997,000) 43 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 54, 44 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 45 For payment of eligible costs for the federal share of capital assist- 46 ance for intercity passenger rail corridors, congestion relief, and 47 high-speed rail corridor development funded by the Passenger Rail 48 Investment and Improvement Act of 2008 and any successor legislation 49 (17011012) (54288) ... 100,000,000 ............... (re. $16,984,000) 1141 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 PORT DEVELOPMENT BONDABLE (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - Infrastructure Renewal Bondable - 30000 4 Port Development Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1988, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 3, of the laws of 1990: 7 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 8 for the contract engineering services provided by private firms, for 9 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and for the acquisi- 10 tion of real property, for port facilities under the jurisdiction of 11 the Niagara Frontier Transportation Authority and the Port of Oswego 12 Authority, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 13 April 1, 1988, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild New York 14 through transportation infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983 15 (17278815) (53112) ... ... 1,495,000 ............... (re. $47,000) 16 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1986: 17 For the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates, 18 for the contract engineering services provided by private firms, for 19 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and for the acquisi- 20 tion of real property, for port facilities under the jurisdiction of 21 the Albany Port District Commission, the Ogdensburg Bridge and Port 22 Authority, the Port of Oswego Authority, including the payment of 23 liabilities incurred prior to April one, nineteen hundred eightysix, 24 pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild New York through transpor- 25 tation infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983, and in accordance 26 with the schedule shown below. The items in the project schedule 27 below shall be for projects with a common purpose and may be inter- 28 changed without limitation subject to the approval of the director 29 of the division of the budget (17278615) (53112) ................... 30 3,840,000 ............................................. (re. $5,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1985: 32 For construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and for the acquisi- 33 tion of real property, for port facilities under the jurisdiction of 34 the Albany Port District Commission, the Ogdensburg Bridge and Port 35 Authority, the Port of Oswego Authority, the Niagara Frontier Trans- 36 portation Authority, including the payment of liabilities incurred 37 prior to April one, nineteen hundred eighty-five, pursuant to the 38 provisions of the rebuild New York through transportation infras- 39 tructure renewal bond act of 1983, notwithstanding any inconsistent 40 provisions of law, and in accordance with the schedule shown below. 41 The items in the project schedule below shall be for projects with a 42 common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation subject to 43 the approval of the director of the division of the budget 44 (17198515) (53112) .................................... (re. $3,000) 45 PRIORITY BOND ACT PROJECTS (CCP) 46 Capital Projects Funds - Other 1142 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Fund - Infrastructure Renewal (Bondable) - 30000 2 Priority Bond Act Purpose 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1984, as amended by chapter 4 259, section 6, of the laws of 1993: 5 For the costs pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild New York 6 through transportation infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983, of 7 the cost of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 8 proceeds for the improvement of highways, parkways, commuter parking 9 facilities, and other highway facilities including bridges, other 10 structures, and appurtenances. Project costs funded from this appro- 11 priation may include, but shall not necessarily be limited to, 12 preliminary planning and feasibility studies; survey and design; 13 acquisition of property, construction, reconstruction, recondition- 14 ing and preservation; the contract engineering services provided by 15 private firms. No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation 16 for personal services and expenses other than consulting services. 17 The items in the schedule below are projects with a common purpose and 18 as such, may be interchanged without limitation. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, the commissioner of 20 transportation is authorized to acquire all necessary land not on 21 the state highway system for the purpose of highway projects at the 22 request of the locality under whose jurisdiction the project is 23 constructed or reconstructed. 24 Funds from this appropriation may be made available for the payment of 25 liabilities incurred prior to April one, nineteen hundred eightyfour 26 but not for the payment of liabilities incurred prior to November 27 eight, nineteen hundred eighty-three (17288424) (53287) ... ...... 28 ................................................... (re. $7,056,000) 29 RAIL FREIGHT (CCP) 30 Capital Projects Funds - Other 31 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 32 Mass Transportation and Rail Freight Purpose 33 By chapter 54, section 2, of the laws of 1992: 34 For advance payment of the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey's 35 share of the cost of acquisition and construction of the South Bronx 36 oak point link subject to a written repayment agreement entered into 37 by the Authority and the commissioner of transportation and approved 38 by the director of the budget, such repayment agreement to include a 39 repayment schedule which states the date or dates on which the 40 authority will be notified of advance payments made and the date or 41 dates on which the advance shall be repaid to the state and such 42 other terms and conditions as determined by the director of the 43 budget. The authority shall reimburse the State of New York in full 44 for all moneys advanced by the state from this appropriation within 45 30 days of the date of such notification (17779212) (53113) ........ 46 64,050,000 ....................................... (re. $17,433,000) 47 For advance payment of the city of New York's share of the cost of 48 acquisition and construction of the South Bronx oak point link 1143 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 subject to a written repayment agreement entered into by the city of 2 New York and the commissioner of transportation and approved by the 3 director of the budget, such repayment agreement to include a repay- 4 ment schedule which states the date or dates on which the city will 5 be notified of advance payments made and the date or dates on which 6 the advance shall be repaid to the state and such other terms and 7 conditions as determined by the director of the budget. The commis- 8 sioner of transportation, or such other person as the commissioner 9 shall designate, shall notify the city of New York in accordance 10 with a schedule to be determined in the repayment agreement of 11 payments made from this appropriation for the construction of the 12 South Bronx oak point link. The city of New York shall reimburse the 13 state of New York in full for all moneys advanced by the state from 14 this appropriation within 30 days of the date of such notification. 15 In the event that the city shall fail to make payment to the state for 16 any payment due and owing in accordance with the repayment agreement 17 entered into by the commissioner and the city of New York, the 18 commissioner or such other person as the commissioner shall desig- 19 nate shall certify to the state comptroller the amount due and owing 20 the state at the end of each period as specified in the repayment 21 agreement for which such amounts have been advanced by the state 22 from this appropriation and the state comptroller shall withhold an 23 equivalent amount from the next succeeding state aid allocated to 24 the city from highway aid, the motor fuel tax and the motor vehicle 25 registration fee distributed pursuant to section 10-c of the highway 26 law, or per capita local assistance pursuant to section 54 of the 27 state finance law subject to the following limitations: prior to 28 withholding amounts due the state from the city, the comptroller 29 shall pay in full any amount due the state of New York municipal 30 bond bank agency, on account of the city's obligation to such agen- 31 cy; the city university construction fund, pursuant to the 32 provisions of the city university construction fund act, the New 33 York city housing development corporation, pursuant to the 34 provisions of the New York city housing development corporation act 35 (article 12 of the private housing finance law); the transit 36 construction fund, pursuant to the provisions of title 9-a of arti- 37 cle 5 of the public authorities law; and, pursuant to section 92-e 38 of the state finance law, any amounts necessary for payments to 39 holders of bonds or notes as certified by the municipal assistance 40 corporation for the city of New York created under article 10 of the 41 public authorities law. The comptroller shall give the director of 42 the budget notification of any such payment. Such amount or amounts 43 so withheld by the state comptroller shall be used for the repayment 44 of the state advances hereby authorized. When such amount or amounts 45 are received by the state, it shall credit such amounts against any 46 amounts due and owing by the city on whose account such was withheld 47 and paid (17789212) (53172) ... 18,210,000 ........ (re. $3,927,000) 48 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1992, as amended by chapter 54, 49 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 50 For payment of the state share of the cost of acquisition and 51 construction of the South Bronx oak point link subject to agreements 1144 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 entered into by the commissioner of transportation with the Port 2 Authority of New York and New Jersey and the city of New York and 3 approved by the director of the budget, and to remove clearance 4 restrictions north of Highbridge yard (17OP9212) (54294) ........... 5 1,291,890 ......................................... (re. $1,291,000) 6 Capital Projects Funds - Other 7 Capital Projects Fund - Infrastructure Renewal (Bondable) - 30000 8 Rail Service Preservation Purpose 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1985, as amended by chapter 54, 10 section 3, of the laws of 1992: 11 For payment of the state share of the costs of the acquisition, 12 construction, reconstruction, improvement or rehabilitation of any 13 railroad capital facility and any capital improvement used in 14 connection therewith, for the acquisition of real property or inter- 15 ests in real property required or expected to be required therefor, 16 pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild New York through the 17 transportation infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983, notwith- 18 standing any inconsistent provisions of law, and pursuant to the 19 provisions of section fourteen-d of the transportation law, as the 20 commissioner may elect for the purpose of improving freight service, 21 and including all costs incidental thereto in accordance with the 22 following schedule. 23 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 24 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 25 subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg- 26 et (17148541) (53288) ... ... 21,000,000 .......... (re. $120,000) 27 RAIL PRESERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT FUND (CCP) 28 Capital Projects Funds - Other 29 Energy Conservation Thru Improved Transportation Bond Fund 30 Energy Conservation Thru Improved Transportation Bond Fund Account 31 30600 32 Bond Proceeds Purpose 33 By chapter 54, section 8, of the laws of 1980, as amended by chapter 55, 34 section 1, of the laws of 1996: 35 The sum of four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) or so much 36 thereof as may be necessary is hereby appropriated from the rail 37 preservation and development fund pursuant to the energy conserva- 38 tion through improved transportation bond act of nineteen hundred 39 seventy-nine for payment to the capital projects fund for disburse- 40 ments from such fund pursuant to an appropriation for acquisition, 41 construction, reconstruction, establishment, improvement and reha- 42 bilitation of urban, commuter and intercity rail passenger and rapid 43 transit systems and rail freight capital facilities, for the acqui- 44 sition of real property and interests in real property required or 45 expected to be required therefor and for any capital equipment to be 46 used in connection therewith, including all costs incidental there- 47 to. 1145 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, no 2 moneys shall be available from the rail preservation and development 3 fund until a certificate of approval of availability shall have been 4 issued by the director of the budget, and a copy of such certificate 5 filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance 6 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee. 7 Such certificate may be amended from time to time by the director of 8 the budget, and a copy of each such amendment shall be filed with 9 the state comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance committee 10 and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee. The 11 director of the budget is hereby authorized to designate to the 12 state comptroller specific appropriations made from the projects 13 fund for purposes for which rail preservation and development fund 14 expenditures are authorized. The state comptroller shall at the 15 commencement of each month certify to the director of the budget, 16 the chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 17 assembly ways and means committee, the amounts disbursed from the 18 appropriations designated by the director of the budget from the 19 capital projects fund for these disbursements pursuant to appropri- 20 ations from such fund for such purposes for the month preceding such 21 certification and such certifications shall not exceed in the aggre- 22 gate the moneys hereby appropriated (01371310) (80915) ............. 23 ..................................................... (re. $149,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 1980, as amended by chapter 55, 25 section 1, of the laws of 1996: 26 The sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) or so much ther- 27 eof as may be necessary is hereby appropriated from the rail preser- 28 vation and development fund pursuant to the energy conservation 29 through improved transportation bond act of nineteen hundred seven- 30 ty-nine for payment to the local assistance account for disburse- 31 ments from such fund pursuant to an appropriation for the recon- 32 struction, improvement, reconditioning and preservation of highways 33 and bridges of the state highway system, for the acquisition of real 34 property and interest in real property required or expected to be 35 required therefor by any county, city, town or village, or two or 36 more of the foregoing acting jointly. 37 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, no 38 moneys shall be available from the rail preservation and development 39 fund until a certificate of approval of availability shall have been 40 issued by the director of the budget, and a copy of such certificate 41 filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance 42 committee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means commit- 43 tee. Such certificate may be amended from time to time by the direc- 44 tor of the budget, and a copy of each such amendment shall be filed 45 with the state comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance 46 committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee. 47 The director of the budget is hereby authorized to designate to the 48 state comptroller specific appropriations made from the local 49 assistance fund for purposes for which rail preservation and devel- 50 opment fund expenditures are authorized. The state comptroller shall 51 at the commencement of each month certify to the director of the 1146 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 budget, the chairman of the senate finance committee and the chair- 2 man of the assembly ways and means committee, the amounts disbursed 3 from the appropriations designated by the director of the budget 4 from the local assistance account for these disbursements pursuant 5 to appropriations from such fund for such purposes for the month 6 preceding such certification and such certification shall not exceed 7 in the aggregate the moneys hereby appropriated (01371210) ......... 8 (80925) .............................................. (re. $15,000) 9 REBUILD AND RENEW NEW YORK TRANSPORTATION (CCP) 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 Rebuild and Renew New York Transportation Bond Fund 12 Rebuild and Renew New York Transportation Bond Fund Account - 30650 13 Bond Proceeds Purpose 14 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 15 The sum of $2,900,000,000, or so much thereof as may be necessary and 16 available, is hereby appropriated from the rebuild and renew New 17 York transportation fund as established by section 97-eeee of the 18 state finance law in accordance with the provisions of such section, 19 for payment to the capital projects fund in order to reimburse such 20 fund for disbursements certified by the state comptroller as bonda- 21 ble under the provisions of the rebuild and renew New York transpor- 22 tation bond act of 2005. 23 The director of the budget is hereby authorized to designate to the 24 state comptroller specific appropriations made from the capital 25 projects fund for purposes for which rebuild and renew New York 26 transportation fund expenditures are authorized. The state comp- 27 troller shall at the commencement of each month certify to the 28 director of the budget, the chairman of the senate finance commit- 29 tee, and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee, the 30 amounts disbursed from the appropriations so designated by the 31 director of the budget from the capital projects fund for such 32 purposes for the month preceding such certification and such certif- 33 ications shall not exceed in the aggregate the moneys hereby appro- 34 priated. A copy of each such certificate shall also be delivered to 35 state departments and agencies to which such capital projects fund 36 appropriations are made available. 37 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, no 38 moneys shall be available from the rebuild and renew New York trans- 39 portation fund until a certificate of approval of availability shall 40 have been issued by the director of the budget, and a copy of such 41 certificate of approval filed with the state comptroller, the chair- 42 man of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 43 ways and means committee. Such certificate may be amended from time 44 to time by the director of the budget, and a copy of each such 45 amendment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of 46 the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways 47 and means committee (17010510) (80921) ............................. 48 2,900,000,000 ................................... (re. $162,465,000) 1147 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ROAD AND BRIDGE IMPROVEMENTS (BONDABLE) (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Federal Aid Highways Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1990: 6 For the state share of highway projects to be reimbursed from the 7 accelerated capacity and transportation improvements fund pursuant 8 to the provisions of the accelerated capacity and transportation 9 improvements of the nineties bond act (17E19020) (53290) ........... 10 10,300,000 .......................................... (re. $188,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1989: 12 For the state share of highway projects to be reimbursed from the 13 accelerated capacity and transportation improvements fund pursuant 14 to the provisions of that bond act (17E18920) (53290) .............. 15 10,300,000 ........................................... (re. $29,000) 16 Capital Projects Funds - Other 17 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 18 Highway Facilities Purpose 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1992: 20 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the accelerated capacity 21 and transportation improvements of the nineties bond act, of capital 22 projects, advanced with or without federal aid, to be reimbursed 23 from bond fund proceeds for the improvement of state highways, thru- 24 ways and other highway facilities including bridges, other struc- 25 tures, and appurtenances. 26 For 80 percent of the costs of capital local bridge projects advanced 27 pursuant to the provisions of the accelerated capacity and transpor- 28 tation improvements of the nineties bond act. The remaining 20 29 percent share of project costs shall be paid by the municipality 30 under whose jurisdiction the project is constructed, reconstructed 31 or rehabilitated. 32 Project costs funded from this appropriation may include, but shall 33 not be limited to, construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 34 preservation, and the acquisition of property. 35 For the payment of reimbursements to the engineering services fund for 36 the cost of the engineering services of the department of transpor- 37 tation, including fringe benefits, and the contract services 38 provided by private firms, for activities including but not limited 39 to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 40 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 41 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 42 projects. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 44 portation is authorized to acquire any necessary land not on the 45 state highway system for the purpose of local bridge projects 46 financed through this appropriation at the request of the locality 47 under whose jurisdiction the project is constructed, reconstructed 1148 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 or rehabilitated. The items shown in the project schedule below 2 shall be for projects with a common purpose and may be interchanged 3 without limitation subject to the approval of the director of the 4 budget. 5 Funds from this appropriation may be made available for the payment of 6 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1992 (17F19222) (53291) ..... 7 514,165,000 ....................................... (re. $9,164,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1991: 9 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the accelerated capacity 10 and transportation improvements of the nineties bond act, of capital 11 projects, advanced with or without federal aid, to be reimbursed 12 from bond fund proceeds for the improvement of state highways, thru- 13 ways and other highway facilities including bridges, other struc- 14 tures, and appurtenances. 15 For 80 percent of the costs of capital local bridge projects advanced 16 pursuant to the provisions of the accelerated capacity and transpor- 17 tation improvements of the nineties bond act. The remaining 20 18 percent share of project costs shall be paid by the municipality 19 under whose jurisdiction the project is constructed, reconstructed 20 or rehabilitated. 21 Project costs funded from this appropriation may include, but shall 22 not be limited to, construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 23 preservation, and the acquisition of property. 24 For the payment of reimbursements to the engineering services fund for 25 the cost of the engineering services of the department of transpor- 26 tation, including fringe benefits, and the contract services 27 provided by private firms, for activities including but not limited 28 to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 29 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 30 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 31 projects. 32 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 33 portation is authorized to acquire any necessary land not on the 34 state highway system for the purpose of local bridge projects 35 financed through this appropriation at the request of the locality 36 under whose jurisdiction the project is constructed, reconstructed 37 or rehabilitated. 38 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 39 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 40 subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg- 41 et. 42 Funds from this appropriation may be made available for the payment of 43 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1991 (17F19122) (53291) 44 ... ... 660,400,000 ............................. (re. $7,119,000) 45 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the accelerated capacity 46 and transportation improvements of the nineties bond act, of capital 47 projects, advanced with or without federal aid, to be reimbursed 48 from bond fund proceeds for the improvement of state highways, thru- 49 ways and other highway facilities including bridges, other struc- 50 tures, and appurtenances. Project costs funded from this appropri- 51 ation may include, but shall not be limited to, construction, 1149 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 reconstruction, reconditioning and preservation, and the acquisition 2 of property. 3 For the payment of reimbursements to the engineering services fund for 4 the cost of the engineering services of the department of transpor- 5 tation, including fringe benefits, and the contract services 6 provided by private firms, for activities including but not limited 7 to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 8 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 9 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 10 projects. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 12 portation is authorized to acquire any necessary land not on the 13 state highway system for the purpose of local bridge projects 14 financed through this appropriation at the request of the locality 15 under whose jurisdiction the project is constructed, reconstructed 16 or rehabilitated. 17 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 18 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 19 subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg- 20 et. 21 Funds from this appropriation may be made available for the payment of 22 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1991 (17F19122) (53291) 23 ... ... 1,716,000 ............................... (re. $1,716,000) 24 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1990, as amended by chapter 25 947, section 6, of the laws of 1990: 26 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the accelerated capacity 27 and transportation improvements of the nineties bond act, of capital 28 projects to be reimbursed from bond fund proceeds for the improve- 29 ment of state highways, thruways and other highway facilities 30 including bridges, other structures, and appurtenances. 31 Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the New York State Thru- 32 way shall be considered a state highway for the purposes of this 33 appropriation. Prior to the approval of a certificate of approval of 34 availability for projects advanced by the New York State Thruway 35 Authority, the director of the budget shall approve a repayment 36 agreement between the department of transportation and the New York 37 State Thruway Authority. The state comptroller is hereby authorized 38 and directed to deposit repayments from the Thruway Authority pursu- 39 ant to such agreement to the credit of the capital projects fund. 40 For 80 percent of the costs of capital local bridge projects advanced 41 pursuant to the provisions of the accelerated capacity and transpor- 42 tation improvements of the nineties bond act. The remaining 20 43 percent share of project costs shall be paid by the municipality 44 under whose jurisdiction the project is constructed, reconstructed 45 or rehabilitated. 46 Project costs funded from this appropriation may include, but shall 47 not be limited to, construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 48 preservation, and the acquisition of property. 49 For the payment of reimbursements to the engineering services fund for 50 the cost of the engineering services of the department of transpor- 51 tation, including fringe benefits, and the contract services 1150 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 provided by private firms, for activities including but not limited 2 to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 3 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 4 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 5 projects. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 7 portation is authorized to acquire any necessary land not on the 8 state highway system for the purpose of local bridge projects 9 financed through this appropriation at the request of the locality 10 under whose jurisdiction the project is constructed, reconstructed 11 or rehabilitated. 12 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 13 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 14 subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg- 15 et. 16 Funds from this appropriation may be made available for the payment of 17 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1990 (17F19022) (53291) 18 ... ... 617,900,000 ............................. (re. $2,586,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1989: 20 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the accelerated capacity 21 and transportation improvements of the nineties bond act of 1988, of 22 capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund proceeds for the 23 improvement of state highways, and other highway facilities includ- 24 ing bridges, other structures, and appurtenances. 25 For 80 percent of the costs of capital local bridge projects advanced 26 pursuant to the provisions of the accelerated capacity and transpor- 27 tation improvements of the nineties bond act of 1988. The remaining 28 20 percent share of project costs shall be paid by the municipality 29 under whose jurisdiction the project is constructed, reconstructed 30 or rehabilitated. 31 Project costs funded from this appropriation may include, but shall 32 not be limited to, construction, reconstruction, reconditioning and 33 preservation, and the acquisition of property. 34 For the payment of reimbursements to the engineering services fund for 35 the cost of the engineering services of the department of transpor- 36 tation, including fringe benefits, and the contract services 37 provided by private firms, for activities including but not limited 38 to the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 39 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 40 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 41 projects. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of trans- 43 portation is authorized to acquire any necessary land not on the 44 state highway system for the purpose of local bridge projects 45 financed through this appropriation at the request of the locality 46 under whose jurisdiction the project is constructed, reconstructed 47 or rehabilitated. 48 The items shown in the project schedule below shall be for projects 49 with a common purpose and may be interchanged without limitation 50 subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg- 51 et. 1151 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Funds from this appropriation may be made available for the payment of 2 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 1989 (17F18911) (53291) 3 ... ... 715,219,000 ............................... (re. $838,000) 4 By chapter 261, section 57, of the laws of 1988, as amended by chapter 5 54, section 3, of the laws of 1989: 6 The sum of four hundred seventy million dollars ($470,000,000), is 7 hereby appropriated from the capital projects fund to the department 8 of transportation for the cost of state highway capital projects 9 advanced with or without federal aid including bridges, other struc- 10 tures and appurtenances and municipal bridge improvements advanced 11 pursuant to the accelerated capacity and transportation improvements 12 of the nineties bond act. This appropriation shall be reimbursed 13 from proceeds from the issuance of bonds pursuant to section fifty 14 of chapter 261, of the laws of nineteen hundred eighty-eight. 15 Project costs funded from this appropriation may include, but shall 16 not be limited to, preliminary planning and feasibility studies; 17 survey and design; acquisition of property; construction, recon- 18 struction, capacity improvement, replacement, reconditioning and 19 preservation; the supervision and inspection thereof; and the cost 20 of engineering services provided by private firms. No expenditure 21 shall be made from this appropriation for personal services and 22 expenses other than consulting services. 23 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, no 24 moneys shall be available from the accelerated capacity and trans- 25 portation improvements fund until a certificate of approval of 26 availability shall have been issued by the director of the budget, 27 and a copy of such certificate filed with the state comptroller, the 28 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 29 assembly ways and means committee. Such certificate may be amended 30 from time to time by the director of the budget, and a copy of each 31 such amendment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chair- 32 man of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 33 ways and means committee (17658811) (53291) ........................ 34 470,000,000 ....................................... (re. $1,369,000) 35 SMALL AND MINORITY AND WOMEN OWNED SMALL BUSINESS ASSISTANCE (CCP) 36 Capital Projects Funds - Other 37 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 38 Mass Transit Purpose 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1993, as amended by chapter 55, 40 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 41 For services and expenses of a bonding guarantee assistance program 42 for transportation-related purposes pursuant to section 1838 of the 43 public authorities law enacted pursuant to chapter 56 of the laws of 44 1993. The director of the budget may apportion all or a portion of 45 these funds to the job development authority (17BG93MT) (53293) .... 46 3,500,000 ......................................... (re. $3,500,000) 47 For services and expenses of a revolving fund for working capital 48 loans to small and minority and women-owned firms engaged in trans- 1152 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 portation construction and reconstruction projects. The director of 2 the budget may apportion all or a portion of these funds to the 3 urban development corporation (17WC93MT) (53294) ................... 4 1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000) 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other 6 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Fund 7 Dedicated Highway and Bridge Trust Account - 30050 8 Non-Federal Aided Highway Purpose 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1993, as amended by chapter 10 259, section 4, of the laws of 1993: 11 For services and expenses of a bonding guarantee assistance program 12 for transportation related purposes pursuant to section 1838 of the 13 public authorities law enacted pursuant to chapter 56 of the laws of 14 1993. The director of the budget may apportion all or a portion of 15 such funds to the job development authority (17309322) (53292) ..... 16 3,500,000 ......................................... (re. $3,500,000) 17 SPECIAL RAIL AND AVIATION PROGRAM (CCP) 18 Capital Projects Funds - Other 19 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 20 Rail Service Preservation Purpose 21 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1996, as amended by chapter 54, 22 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 23 For the payment of the costs of construction, reconstruction, improve- 24 ment, reconditioning and preservation of rail freight and rail 25 passenger facilities, pursuant to the provisions of section 14-j of 26 the transportation law, including, but not limited to, preparation 27 of designs, plans and specifications, and acquisition of real prop- 28 erty pursuant to a memorandum of understanding entered into pursuant 29 to chapter 56 of the laws of 1993 (17SR9641) (53115) ............... 30 4,137,720 ......................................... (re. $4,137,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1995, as amended by chapter 54, 32 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 33 For the payment of the costs of construction, reconstruction, improve- 34 ment, reconditioning and preservation of rail freight and rail 35 passenger facilities, pursuant to the provisions of section 14-j of 36 the transportation law, including, but not limited to, preparation 37 of designs, plans and specifications, and acquisition of real prop- 38 erty notwithstanding any general or special law (17SR9541) (53115) 39 ... 114,275 .......................................... (re. $39,000) 40 For the payment of the costs of construction, reconstruction, improve- 41 ment, reconditioning and preservation of rail freight and rail 42 passenger facilities, pursuant to the provisions of section 14-j of 43 the transportation law and in accordance with the schedule below, 44 including but not limited to, preparation of designs, plans and 45 specifications, and acquisition of real property (17SP9541) (54281) 46 ... 474,243 ......................................... (re. $474,000) 1153 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 project schedule 2 For services and expenses of the Amsterdam 3 Local Waterfront Revitalization Project 4 including but not limited to the 5 construction of an access route traversing 6 Conrail tracks ............................... 1,000,000 7 For payment to Alcibiades Ltd. for services 8 and expenses of the Livonia, Avon, and 9 Lakeville Railroad, Rochester Cluster 10 South project including but not limited to 11 the rehabilitation of track and structures ..... 817,000 12 For payment to the City of Rochester for 13 services and expenses of the Rochester 14 Alternate Transportation Systems Study for 15 the study of feasible alternative modes of 16 transportation in the Rochester area 17 including but not limited to light rail ........ 300,000 18 For payment to the City of Rochester for 19 services and expenses of the Buffalo 20 Road/West Avenue and Chili Avenue projects 21 including but not limited to the partial 22 removal of a bridge, lighting, bridge 23 abutments and safety improvements to the 24 railroad under pass ............................ 600,000 25 For payment to the City of Rochester for 26 services and expenses of the state/St. 27 Paul Railroad Underpass Improvement 28 project including but not limited to safe- 29 ty enhancements ................................. 83,000 30 For payment to the Onondaga County Indus- 31 trial Development Agency for design and 32 installation of new trackage and station 33 platforms, track realignment, track reha- 34 bilitation, track removal, and other 35 related work, including bridgework and 36 right-of-way purchases for the Syracuse 37 Intermodal Center ............................ 1,500,000 38 For payment to the Onondaga County Indus- 39 trial Development Agency for services and 40 expenses of the Syracuse Intermodal Center 41 including but not limited to construction ...... 400,000 42 For payment to the Central New York Regional 43 Transportation Authority for services and 44 expenses of the Syracuse Intermodal Center 45 including but not limited to rail improve- 46 ments .......................................... 300,000 47 TRANSPORTATION BONDABLE (CCP) 48 Capital Projects Funds - Other 49 Capital Projects Fund - Rebuild and Renew (Bondable) - 30000 1154 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Aviation Purpose 2 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 3 For the costs, pursuant to the rebuild and renew New York transporta- 4 tion bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transportation law, of 5 capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund proceeds for the 6 planning and design, construction, reconstruction, replacement, 7 improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preservation, 8 including the acquisition of real property and interests therein 9 required or expected to be required in connection therewith, of 10 airports and aviation facilities, equipment and related projects 11 exclusive of those airports and facilities under the jurisdiction of 12 the port authority of New York and New Jersey or operated by the 13 state of New York. 14 Costs may include highways and bridges either on or off the state 15 highway system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a 16 project component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized 17 herein and by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act 18 of 2005. 19 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 20 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 21 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 22 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 23 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 24 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 25 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 26 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation. 27 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2009 28 (17030914) (53297) ... 16,400,000 ................. (re. $2,307,000) 29 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 30 For the costs, pursuant to the rebuild and renew New York transporta- 31 tion bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transportation law, of 32 capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund proceeds for the 33 planning and design, construction, reconstruction, replacement, 34 improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preservation, 35 including the acquisition of real property and interests therein 36 required or expected to be required in connection therewith, of 37 airports and aviation facilities, equipment and related projects 38 exclusive of those airports and facilities under the jurisdiction of 39 the port authority of New York and New Jersey or operated by the 40 state of New York. 41 Costs may include highways and bridges either on or off the state 42 highway system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a 43 project component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized 44 herein and by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act 45 of 2005. 46 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 47 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 48 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 49 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 50 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 1155 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 2 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 3 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation. 4 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2008 5 (17030814) (53297) ... 15,000,000 ................. (re. $3,551,000) 6 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 7 For the costs, pursuant to the rebuild and renew New York transporta- 8 tion bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transportation law, of 9 capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund proceeds for the 10 planning and design, construction, reconstruction, replacement, 11 improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preservation, 12 including the acquisition of real property and interests therein 13 required or expected to be required in connection therewith, of 14 airports and aviation facilities, equipment and related projects 15 exclusive of those airports and facilities under the jurisdiction of 16 the port authority of New York and New Jersey or operated by the 17 state of New York. Costs may include highways and bridges either on 18 or off the state highway system necessary or reasonably expected to 19 be necessary as a project component or incidental to projects other- 20 wise authorized herein and by the rebuild and renew New York trans- 21 portation bond act of 2005. 22 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 23 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 24 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 25 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 26 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 27 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 28 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 29 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation. 30 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2007 31 (17030714) (53297) ... 15,000,000 ................. (re. $1,164,000) 32 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 33 For the costs, pursuant to the rebuild and renew New York transporta- 34 tion bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transportation law, of 35 capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund proceeds for the 36 planning and design, construction, reconstruction, replacement, 37 improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preservation, 38 including the acquisition of real property and interests therein 39 required or expected to be required in connection therewith, of 40 airports and aviation facilities, equipment and related projects 41 exclusive of those airports and facilities under the jurisdiction of 42 the port authority of New York and New Jersey or operated by the 43 state of New York. 44 Costs may include highways and bridges either on or off the state 45 highway system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a 46 project component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized 47 herein and by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act 48 of 2005. 49 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 50 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 1156 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 2 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 3 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 4 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 5 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 6 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation. 7 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2006 8 (17030614) (53297) ... 15,000,000 ................... (re. $436,000) 9 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 10 For the costs, pursuant to the rebuild and renew New York transporta- 11 tion bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transportation law, of 12 capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund proceeds for the 13 planning and design, construction, reconstruction, replacement, 14 improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preservation, 15 including the acquisition of real property and interests therein 16 required or expected to be required in connection therewith, of 17 airports and aviation facilities, equipment and related projects 18 exclusive of those airports and facilities under the jurisdiction of 19 the port authority of New York and New Jersey or operated by the 20 state of New York. 21 The funds made available through this appropriation shall be utilized 22 for the payment of the costs of eligible projects in accordance with 23 a memorandum of understanding entered into between the governor, the 24 majority leader of the senate and the speaker of the assembly, or 25 their designees, pursuant to article 22 of the transportation law. 26 Costs may include highways and bridges either on or off the state 27 highway system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a 28 project component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized 29 herein and by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act 30 of 2005. 31 For engineering services of the department of transportation, includ- 32 ing personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the 33 contract services provided by private firms, including, but not 34 limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 35 estimates; construction management and supervision; and appraisals, 36 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 37 tion. 38 No part of this appropriation shall be made available for the payment 39 of liabilities incurred prior to the approval of the rebuild and 40 renew New York transportation bond act of 2005 by the voters at the 41 general election to be held in November of 2005 (17030514) (53297) 42 ... 15,000,000 ...................................... (re. $753,000) 43 Capital Projects Funds - Other 44 Capital Projects Fund - Rebuild and Renew (Bondable) - 30000 45 Highway Facilities Purpose 46 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 47 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 48 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 49 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 1157 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 proceeds for the planning and design, construction, reconstruction, 2 replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preser- 3 vation, including the acquisition of real property and interests 4 therein required or expected to be required in connection therewith, 5 of: state highways, bridges and parkways; border crossing enhance- 6 ments either on or off the state highway system; and the improvement 7 and/or elimination of highway-railroad grade crossings either on or 8 off the state highway system. 9 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 10 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 11 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 12 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 13 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 14 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 15 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 16 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 17 projects. 18 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2009 19 (17010911) (53295) ... 168,600,000 ................ (re. $3,279,000) 20 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 21 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 22 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 23 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 24 proceeds for the planning and design, construction, reconstruction, 25 replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preser- 26 vation, including the acquisition of real property and interests 27 therein required or expected to be required in connection therewith, 28 of: state highways, bridges and parkways; border crossing enhance- 29 ments either on or off the state highway system; and the improvement 30 and/or elimination of highway-railroad grade crossings either on or 31 off the state highway system. 32 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 33 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 34 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 35 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 36 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 37 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 38 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 39 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 40 projects. 41 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2008 42 (17010811) (53295) ... 275,000,000 ................ (re. $1,774,000) 43 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 44 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 45 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 46 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 47 proceeds for the planning and design, construction, reconstruction, 48 replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preser- 49 vation, including the acquisition of real property and interests 50 therein required or expected to be required in connection therewith, 1158 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of: state highways, bridges and parkways; border crossing enhance- 2 ments either on or off the state highway system; and the improvement 3 and/or elimination of highway-railroad grade crossings either on or 4 off the state highway system. 5 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 6 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 7 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 8 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 9 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 10 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 11 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 12 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 13 projects. 14 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2007 15 (17010711) (53295) ... 290,000,000 ................ (re. $4,944,000) 16 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 17 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 18 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 19 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 20 proceeds for the planning and design, construction, reconstruction, 21 replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preser- 22 vation, including the acquisition of real property and interests 23 therein required or expected to be required in connection therewith, 24 of: state highways, bridges and parkways; border crossing enhance- 25 ments either on or off the state highway system; and the improvement 26 and/or elimination of highway-railroad grade crossings either on or 27 off the state highway system. 28 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 29 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 30 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 31 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 32 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 33 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 34 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 35 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 36 projects. 37 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2006 38 (17010611) (53295) ... 235,000,000 ................ (re. $1,030,000) 39 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 55, 40 section 1, of the laws of 2006: 41 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 42 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 43 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 44 proceeds for the planning and design, construction, reconstruction, 45 replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preser- 46 vation, including the acquisition of real property and interests 47 therein required or expected to be required in connection therewith, 48 of: state highways, bridges and parkways; border crossing enhance- 49 ments either on or off the state highway system; and the improvement 1159 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 and/or elimination of highway-railroad grade crossings either on or 2 off the state highway system. 3 For engineering services, including personal services, nonpersonal 4 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 5 private firms, including, but not limited to, the preparation of 6 designs, plans, specifications and estimates; construction manage- 7 ment and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, testing and environ- 8 mental impact statements for transportation projects. 9 For capital project management and traffic and safety, including 10 personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the 11 contract services provided by private firms. 12 For real estate services, including personal services, nonpersonal 13 services, fringe benefits and the contract services provided by 14 private firms. No part of this appropriation shall be made avail- 15 able for the payment of liabilities incurred prior to the approval 16 of the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act of 2005 by 17 the voters at the general election to be held in November of 2005 18 (17010511) (53295) ... 170,000,000 ................ (re. $2,512,000) 19 Capital Projects Funds - Other 20 Capital Projects Fund - Rebuild and Renew (Bondable) - 30000 21 Mass Transit Purpose 22 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 23 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 24 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 25 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 26 proceeds for the planning and design, acquisition, construction, 27 reconstruction, replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabili- 28 tation and preservation, including the acquisition of real property 29 and interests therein required or expected to be required in 30 connection therewith, of: omnibus, mass transit and rapid transit 31 systems, facilities and equipment, including facilities used jointly 32 by commuter railroad companies and freight railroad companies, but 33 otherwise exclusive of those operated by or under the jurisdiction 34 of the metropolitan transportation authority and its subsidiaries, 35 the New York City transit authority and its subsidiaries and the 36 Triborough bridge and tunnel authority; intermodal passenger facili- 37 ties and equipment; and marine terminals and marine transportation 38 facilities exclusive of those under the jurisdiction of the port 39 authority of New York and New Jersey or the canal corporation. 40 Costs may include highways and bridges either on or off the state 41 highway system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a 42 project component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized 43 herein and by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act 44 of 2005. 45 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 46 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 47 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 48 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 49 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 50 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 1160 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 2 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation. 3 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2009 4 (170509MT) (53299) ... 10,000,000 ................. (re. $2,424,000) 5 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 6 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 7 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 8 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 9 proceeds for the planning and design, acquisition, construction, 10 reconstruction, replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabili- 11 tation and preservation, including the acquisition of real property 12 and interests therein required or expected to be required in 13 connection therewith, of: omnibus, mass transit and rapid transit 14 systems, facilities and equipment, including facilities used jointly 15 by commuter railroad companies and freight railroad companies, but 16 otherwise exclusive of those operated by or under the jurisdiction 17 of the metropolitan transportation authority and its subsidiaries, 18 the New York City transit authority and its subsidiaries and the 19 Triborough bridge and tunnel authority; intermodal passenger facili- 20 ties and equipment; and marine terminals and marine transportation 21 facilities exclusive of those under the jurisdiction of the port 22 authority of New York and New Jersey or the canal corporation. 23 Costs may include highways and bridges either on or off the state 24 highway system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a 25 project component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized 26 herein and by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act 27 of 2005. 28 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 29 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 30 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 31 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 32 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 33 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 34 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 35 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation. 36 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2008 37 (170508MT) (53299) ... 10,000,000 ................. (re. $4,661,000) 38 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 39 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 40 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 41 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 42 proceeds for the planning and design, acquisition, construction, 43 reconstruction, replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabili- 44 tation and preservation, including the acquisition of real property 45 and interests therein required or expected to be required in 46 connection therewith, of: omnibus, mass transit and rapid transit 47 systems, facilities and equipment, including facilities used jointly 48 by commuter railroad companies and freight railroad companies, but 49 otherwise exclusive of those operated by or under the jurisdiction 50 of the metropolitan transportation authority and its subsidiaries, 1161 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the New York City transit authority and its subsidiaries and the 2 Triborough bridge and tunnel authority; intermodal passenger facili- 3 ties and equipment; and marine terminals and marine transportation 4 facilities exclusive of those under the jurisdiction of the port 5 authority of New York and New Jersey or the canal corporation. 6 Costs may include highways and bridges either on or off the state 7 highway system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a 8 project component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized 9 herein and by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act 10 of 2005. 11 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 12 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 13 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 14 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 15 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 16 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 17 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 18 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation. 19 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2007 20 (170507MT) (53299) ... 10,000,000 ................... (re. $975,000) 21 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 22 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 23 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 24 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 25 proceeds for the planning and design, acquisition, construction, 26 reconstruction, replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabili- 27 tation and preservation, including the acquisition of real property 28 and interests therein required or expected to be required in 29 connection therewith, of: omnibus, mass transit and rapid transit 30 systems, facilities and equipment, including facilities used jointly 31 by commuter railroad companies and freight railroad companies, but 32 otherwise exclusive of those operated by or under the jurisdiction 33 of the metropolitan transportation authority and its subsidiaries, 34 the New York City transit authority and its subsidiaries and the 35 Triborough bridge and tunnel authority; intermodal passenger facili- 36 ties and equipment; and marine terminals and marine transportation 37 facilities exclusive of those under the jurisdiction of the port 38 authority of New York and New Jersey or the canal corporation. 39 Costs may include highways and bridges either on or off the state 40 highway system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a 41 project component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized 42 herein and by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act 43 of 2005. 44 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 45 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 46 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 47 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 48 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 49 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 50 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 51 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation. 1162 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2006 2 (170506MT) (53299) ... 10,000,000 ................. (re. $2,751,000) 3 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 4 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 5 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 6 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 7 proceeds for the planning and design, acquisition, construction, 8 reconstruction, replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabili- 9 tation and preservation, including the acquisition of real property 10 and interests therein required or expected to be required in 11 connection therewith, of: omnibus, mass transit and rapid transit 12 systems, facilities and equipment, including facilities used jointly 13 by commuter railroad companies and freight railroad companies, but 14 otherwise exclusive of those operated by or under the jurisdiction 15 of the metropolitan transportation authority and its subsidiaries, 16 the New York City transit authority and its subsidiaries and the 17 Triborough bridge and tunnel authority; intermodal passenger facili- 18 ties and equipment; and marine terminals and marine transportation 19 facilities exclusive of those under the jurisdiction of the port 20 authority of New York and New Jersey or the canal corporation. Costs 21 may include highways and bridges either on or off the state highway 22 system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a project 23 component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized herein and 24 by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act of 2005. 25 For engineering services of the department of transportation, includ- 26 ing personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the 27 contract services provided by private firms, including, but not 28 limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 29 estimates; construction management and supervision; and appraisals, 30 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 31 tion. 32 No part of this appropriation shall be made available for the payment 33 of liabilities incurred prior to the approval of the rebuild and 34 renew New York transportation bond act of 2005 by the voters at the 35 general election to be held in November of 2005 (170505MT) (53299) 36 ... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $2,751,000) 37 Capital Projects Funds - Other 38 Capital Projects Fund - Rebuild and Renew (Bondable) - 30000 39 Rail and Port Purpose 40 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 41 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 42 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 43 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 44 proceeds for the planning and design, construction, reconstruction, 45 replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preser- 46 vation, including the acquisition of real property and interests 47 therein required or expected to be required in connection therewith, 48 of: intercity passenger rail and freight rail facilities and equip- 49 ment; ports, marine terminals and marine transportation facilities 1163 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 exclusive of those under the jurisdiction of the port authority of 2 New York and New Jersey or the canal corporation; and intermodal 3 passenger and freight facilities and equipment. 4 Costs may include highways and bridges either on or off the state 5 highway system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a 6 project component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized 7 herein and by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act 8 of 2005. 9 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 10 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 11 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 12 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 13 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 14 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 15 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 16 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation. 17 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2009 18 (17040915) (53298) ... 27,000,000 ................. (re. $1,890,000) 19 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 20 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 21 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 22 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 23 proceeds for the planning and design, construction, reconstruction, 24 replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preser- 25 vation, including the acquisition of real property and interests 26 therein required or expected to be required in connection therewith, 27 of: intercity passenger rail and freight rail facilities and equip- 28 ment; ports, marine terminals and marine transportation facilities 29 exclusive of those under the jurisdiction of the port authority of 30 New York and New Jersey or the canal corporation; and intermodal 31 passenger and freight facilities and equipment. 32 Costs may include highways and bridges either on or off the state 33 highway system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a 34 project component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized 35 herein and by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act 36 of 2005. 37 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 38 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 39 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 40 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 41 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 42 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 43 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 44 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation. 45 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2008 46 (17040815) (53298) ... 27,000,000 ................... (re. $965,000) 47 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 48 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 49 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 50 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 1164 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 proceeds for the planning and design, construction, reconstruction, 2 replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preser- 3 vation, including the acquisition of real property and interests 4 therein required or expected to be required in connection therewith, 5 of: intercity passenger rail and freight rail facilities and equip- 6 ment; ports, marine terminals and marine transportation facilities 7 exclusive of those under the jurisdiction of the port authority of 8 New York and New Jersey or the canal corporation; and intermodal 9 passenger and freight facilities and equipment. 10 Costs may include highways and bridges either on or off the state 11 highway system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a 12 project component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized 13 herein and by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act 14 of 2005. 15 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 16 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 17 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 18 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 19 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 20 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 21 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 22 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation. 23 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2007 24 (17040715) (53298) ... 27,000,000 ................... (re. $993,000) 25 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 26 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 27 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 28 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 29 proceeds for the planning and design, construction, reconstruction, 30 replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preser- 31 vation, including the acquisition of real property and interests 32 therein required or expected to be required in connection therewith, 33 of: intercity passenger rail and freight rail facilities and equip- 34 ment; ports, marine terminals and marine transportation facilities 35 exclusive of those under the jurisdiction of the port authority of 36 New York and New Jersey or the canal corporation; and intermodal 37 passenger and freight facilities and equipment. 38 Costs may include highways and bridges either on or off the state 39 highway system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a 40 project component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized 41 herein and by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act 42 of 2005. 43 For payment of engineering services, including reimbursements to the 44 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund of the department of trans- 45 portation, including but not limited to personal services, nonper- 46 sonal services, fringe benefits, and the contract services provided 47 by private firms, for activities including but not limited to the 48 preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 49 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 50 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation. 1165 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2006 2 (17040615) (53298) ... 27,000,000 ................... (re. $420,000) 3 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 4 For the costs, pursuant to the provisions of the rebuild and renew New 5 York transportation bond act of 2005 and article 22 of the transpor- 6 tation law, of capital projects to be reimbursed from bond fund 7 proceeds for the planning and design, construction, reconstruction, 8 replacement, improvement, reconditioning, rehabilitation and preser- 9 vation, including the acquisition of real property and interests 10 therein required or expected to be required in connection therewith, 11 of: intercity passenger rail and freight rail facilities and equip- 12 ment; ports, marine terminals and marine transportation facilities 13 exclusive of those under the jurisdiction of the port authority of 14 New York and New Jersey or the canal corporation; and intermodal 15 passenger and freight facilities and equipment. 16 Costs may include highways and bridges either on or off the state 17 highway system necessary or reasonably expected to be necessary as a 18 project component or incidental to projects otherwise authorized 19 herein and by the rebuild and renew New York transportation bond act 20 of 2005. 21 For engineering services of the department of transportation, includ- 22 ing personal services, nonpersonal services, fringe benefits and the 23 contract services provided by private firms, including, but not 24 limited to, the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and 25 estimates; construction management and supervision; and appraisals, 26 surveys, testing and environmental impact statements for transporta- 27 tion. 28 The funds made available through this appropriation shall be utilized 29 for the payment of the costs of eligible projects in accordance with 30 a memorandum of understanding entered into between the governor, the 31 majority leader of the senate and the speaker of the assembly, or 32 their designees, pursuant to article 22 of the transportation law. 33 No part of this appropriation shall be made available for the payment 34 of liabilities incurred prior to the approval of the rebuild and 35 renew New York transportation bond act of 2005 by the voters at the 36 general election to be held in November of 2005 (17040515) (53298) 37 ... 27,000,000 ...................................... (re. $579,000) 38 TRANSPORTATION INFRASTRUCTURE RENEWAL BOND FUND (CCP) 39 Capital Projects Funds - Other 40 Transportation Infrastructure Renewal Bond Fund 41 Transportation Infrastructure Renewal Bond Fund Account - 30660 42 Bond Proceeds Purpose 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1993, as amended by chapter 55, 44 section 1, of the laws of 1996: 45 The sum of $810,000, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby 46 appropriated from the transportation infrastructure renewal fund as 47 established by section 74 of the state finance law in accordance 48 with the provisions of section 7 of chapter 836 of the laws of 1983 1166 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 for payment, notwithstanding the provisions of any law, to the capi- 2 tal projects fund, in order to reimburse such fund for disbursements 3 certified by the state comptroller as bondable under the provisions 4 of the rebuild New York through transportation infrastructure 5 renewal bond act of 1983 for payment from the port, marine terminal, 6 canal and waterway account. 7 The director of the budget is hereby authorized to designate to the 8 state comptroller specific appropriations made from the capital 9 projects fund for purposes for which transportation infrastructure 10 renewal fund expenditures are authorized. The state comptroller 11 shall at the commencement of each month certify to the director of 12 the budget, the chairman of the senate finance committee, and the 13 chairman of the assembly ways and means committee, the amounts 14 disbursed from the appropriations so designated by the director of 15 the budget from the capital projects fund for such purposes for the 16 month preceding such certification and such certification shall not 17 exceed in the aggregate the moneys hereby appropriated. A copy of 18 each such certificate shall also be delivered to state departments 19 and agencies to which such capital projects fund appropriations are 20 made available. 21 Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, no 22 moneys shall be available from the transportation infrastructure 23 renewal fund until a certificate of approval of availability shall 24 have been issued by the director of the budget, and a copy of such 25 certificate of approval filed with the state comptroller, the chair- 26 man of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 27 ways and means committee. Such certificate may be amended from time 28 to time by the director of the budget, and a copy of each such 29 amendment shall be filed with the state comptroller, the chairman of 30 the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways 31 and means committee (71119310) (80922) ............................. 32 810,000 ............................................. (re. $637,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1989, as amended by chapter 55, 34 section 1, of the laws of 1996: 35 The sum of $2,800,000, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is 36 hereby appropriated from the transportation infrastructure renewal 37 fund as established by section 74 of the state finance law in 38 accordance with the provisions of section 7 of chapter 836 of the 39 laws of 1983 for payment, notwithstanding the provisions of any law, 40 to the capital projects fund, in order to reimburse such funds for 41 disbursements certified by the state comptroller as bondable under 42 the provisions of the rebuild New York through transportation 43 infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983 (71A58910) (80922) ......... 44 2,800,000 ......................................... (re. $2,800,000) 45 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 1988, as amended by chapter 55, 46 section 1, of the laws of 1996: 47 The sum of $116,580,000, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is 48 hereby appropriated from the transportation infrastructure renewal 49 bond fund as established by section 74 of the state finance law in 50 accordance with the provisions of section 7 of chapter 836 of the 1167 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 laws of 1983 for payment, notwithstanding the provisions of any law, 2 to the capital projects fund, in order to reimburse such funds for 3 disbursements certified by the state comptroller as bondable under 4 the provisions of the rebuild New York through transportation 5 infrastructure renewal bond act of 1983 (71A58810) (80922) ......... 6 116,580,000 ...................................... (re. $21,458,000) 1168 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 1,999,500,000 9,856,802,000 6 Capital Projects Funds - Federal ... 0 1,125,531,000 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 1,999,500,000 10,982,333,000 9 ================ ================ 10 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT (CCP) ............................... 1,999,500,000 11 -------------- 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 14 Economic Development Purpose 15 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 16 of law, for services and expenses, loans, 17 grants, and costs associated with program 18 administration, of projects and purposes 19 authorized below, including the payment of 20 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 21 2026. All or a portion of the funds appro- 22 priated hereby may be suballocated or 23 transferred to any department, agency, or 24 public authority, according to the follow- 25 ing: 26 The sum of $100,000,000 is hereby appropri- 27 ated for services and expenses, loans and 28 grants related to the promote opportunity 29 with electric readiness for underdeveloped 30 properties program. Funds appropriated 31 herein shall be for, including but not 32 limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 33 erty, preparation of plans, design, 34 construction, renovation, administration 35 and other, costs incidental thereto 36 (91402609) (64205) ......................... 100,000,000 37 The sum of $6,000,000 is hereby appropriated 38 for services and expenses related to the 39 retention of professional football in 40 Western New York (91032609) (47322) .......... 6,000,000 41 The sum of $8,000,000 is hereby appropriated 42 for services and expenses, loans, and 43 grants, related to the market New York 44 program, including but not limited to, 45 projects that enhance or promote regional 46 attractions in the state of New York. The 47 receipt of funding from this appropriation 1169 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 to a municipality may be conditional upon 2 a certification by the Division of Housing 3 and Community Renewal that such munici- 4 pality is a pro-housing community. 5 (91362609) (47007) ........................... 8,000,000 6 The sum of $575,000,000 is hereby appropri- 7 ated for the New York Works Economic 8 Development Fund. A portion of the funds 9 appropriated herein shall be made avail- 10 able for required infrastructure on sites 11 within the New York state Urban Develop- 12 ment Corporation's Atlantic Yards Land Use 13 Improvement and Civic Projects in Kings 14 County. Funds appropriated herein shall be 15 for services and expenses, loans, and 16 grants, related to the New York Works 17 Economic Development Fund (91102609) 18 (47006) .................................... 575,000,000 19 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropri- 20 ated for the regional economic development 21 council initiative. Funding will be pursu- 22 ant to a plan developed by the chief exec- 23 utive officer of the New York state urban 24 development corporation and based in part 25 on a competitive selection process among 26 the regional economic development councils 27 and will support initiatives based on 28 anticipated economic development benefits. 29 Such moneys will be awarded by the New 30 York state urban development corporation 31 at its discretion. The receipt of funding 32 from this appropriation to a municipality 33 may be conditional upon a certification by 34 the Division of Housing and Community 35 Renewal that such municipality is a pro- 36 housing community. (91142609) (47009) ...... 150,000,000 37 The sum of $5,000,000 is hereby appropriated 38 for services and expenses for the Pace 39 University Performing Arts Center. Funds 40 appropriated herein shall be for, includ- 41 ing but not limited to, the acquisition of 42 real property, preparation of plans, 43 design, construction, renovation, adminis- 44 tration, and other costs incidental there- 45 to (91982609) (58012) ........................ 5,000,000 46 The sum of $50,000,000 is hereby appropri- 47 ated for the County Partnership Grants 48 Program for services and expenses of a 49 county infrastructure grant program. 50 Eligible expenses of such grant program 51 may include but shall not be limited to, 52 construction, reconstruction, renovation, 1170 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 site preparation, demolition, acquisition 2 of real property, preparation of plans, 3 design and other costs incidental thereto. 4 Grants may not exceed $1,500,000 per grant 5 and shall be available to any county 6 except a county wholly contained within a 7 city (91812609) (58046) ..................... 50,000,000 8 The sum of $5,000,000 is hereby appropriated 9 for services and expenses, loans, and 10 grants associated with building youth 11 soccer infrastructure in disadvantaged 12 communities across the state (91182609) ...... 5,000,000 13 The sum of $100,000,000 is hereby appropri- 14 ated for services and expenses associated 15 with the SUNY Stony Brook Quantum Research 16 and Innovation Hub (91SN2609) .............. 100,000,000 17 The sum of $60,000,000 is hereby appropri- 18 ated for services and expenses related to 19 Quantum Technology Commercialization Hubs. 20 Eligible costs of such initiative may 21 include but not be limited to, the acqui- 22 sition of real property, preparation of 23 plans, design, construction, renovation, 24 administration, and other costs incidental 25 thereto. Funding will be made available 26 pursuant to a plan developed by the chief 27 executive officer of the urban development 28 corporation based on a competitive 29 selection process which takes into consid- 30 eration regional balance (91552609) ......... 60,000,000 31 The sum of $25,000,000 is hereby appropri- 32 ated for services and expenses associated 33 with the downstate semiconductor manufac- 34 turing and chip design center. Funds 35 appropriated herein shall be for, includ- 36 ing but not limited to, the acquisition of 37 real property, preparation of plans, 38 design, construction, renovation, adminis- 39 tration, and other costs incidental there- 40 to (91342609) ............................... 25,000,000 41 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropri- 42 ated for services and expenses related to 43 the saving performance arts and cultural 44 experiences program. Funds appropriated 45 herein shall be for, including but not 46 limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 47 erty, preparation of plans, design, 48 construction, renovation, administration, 49 and other costs incidental thereto 50 (91802609) .................................. 10,000,000 51 The sum of $2,000,000 is hereby appropriated 1171 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 for services and expenses related to the 2 Industrial Hemp Initiative (91542609) ........ 2,000,000 3 The sum of $38,500,000 is hereby appropri- 4 ated for services and expenses, loans and 5 grants in support of job retention and 6 investment for institutions headquartered 7 in Nassau county with facilities in New 8 York state that provide technology inno- 9 vation and financial services to busi- 10 nesses. Funds appropriated herein shall be 11 for, including but not limited to, the 12 acquisition of real property, preparation 13 of plans, design, construction, reno- 14 vation, administration, and other costs 15 incidental thereto; provided, however, 16 that up to $15,000,000 from this appropri- 17 ation may be made available for working 18 capital expenses, including but not limit- 19 ed to partnerships with local institutions 20 (91612609) .................................. 38,500,000 21 The sum of $225,000,000 is hereby appropri- 22 ated for economic development initiatives 23 in the City of Rochester and Monroe Coun- 24 ty. Funding shall be pursuant to a plan 25 reviewed by the president and the chief 26 executive officer of the New York state 27 urban development corporation and approved 28 by the director of the budget. Funds shall 29 be available for, but not limited to, the 30 acquisition of real property, preparation 31 of plans, design, construction, reno- 32 vation, purchase and installation of 33 equipment, costs associated with program 34 implementation, public safety and other 35 costs incidental thereto, including but 36 not limited to equipment and security 37 cameras for law enforcement, fire depart- 38 ments and other first responder agencies 39 (91822609) ................................. 225,000,000 40 The sum of $100,000,000 is hereby appropri- 41 ated for services and expenses, loans and 42 grants related to the FAST NY program. 43 Funds appropriated herein shall be for, 44 including but not limited to, the acquisi- 45 tion of real property, preparation of 46 plans, design, construction, renovation, 47 administration, and other costs incidental 48 thereto (91162609) (58042) ................. 100,000,000 49 The sum of $50,000,000 is hereby appropri- 50 ated for services and expenses of the 51 restore New York's communities initiative 52 pursuant to section 16-n of the New York 1172 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 state urban development corporation act; 2 provided however, notwithstanding any law 3 to the contrary, that such allocation and 4 distribution is subject to the approval by 5 the director of the budget of a plan for 6 such program submitted by the administer- 7 ing department, agency, or public authori- 8 ty (91412609) (85513) ....................... 50,000,000 9 The sum of $115,000,000 is hereby appropri- 10 ated for services, expenses, loans and 11 grants related to the improvements and 12 upgrades to the Oak Orchard Wastewater 13 facility and supporting system in Onondaga 14 County. Funds appropriated herein shall 15 be for, but not limited to, the acquisi- 16 tion of real property, preparation of 17 plans, design, construction, renovation, 18 administration, and other costs incidental 19 thereto (91742609) (64235) ................. 115,000,000 20 The sum of $2,000,000 is hereby appropriated 21 for services and expenses for Baden Street 22 Settlement of Rochester, Inc. Funds appro- 23 priated herein shall be for, but not 24 limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 25 erty, preparation of plans, design, 26 construction, renovation, administration, 27 and other costs incidental thereto 28 (91012609) ................................... 2,000,000 29 The sum of $6,000,000 is hereby appropriated 30 for infrastructure improvements to a minor 31 league baseball stadium located in Bing- 32 hamton. Funds appropriated herein shall 33 be for, but not limited to, the acquisi- 34 tion of real property, preparation of 35 plans, design, construction, renovation, 36 administration, and other costs incidental 37 thereto (91022609) ........................... 6,000,000 38 The sum of $4,000,000 is hereby appropriated 39 for services and expenses for the Boys and 40 Girls Club of Northern Westchester, Inc. 41 Funds appropriated herein shall be for, 42 but not limited to, the acquisition of 43 real property, preparation of plans, 44 design, construction, renovation, adminis- 45 tration, and other costs incidental there- 46 to (91042609) ................................ 4,000,000 47 The sum of $2,000,000 is hereby appropriated 48 for services and expenses for the Brooklyn 49 Children's Museum Corp. Funds appropriated 50 herein shall be for, but not limited to, 51 the acquisition of real property, prepara- 52 tion of plans, design, construction, reno- 1173 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 vation, administration, and other costs 2 incidental thereto (91052609) ................ 2,000,000 3 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropri- 4 ated for services and expenses for the 5 Center for Discovery, Inc. Funds appropri- 6 ated herein shall be for, but not limited 7 to, the acquisition of real property, 8 preparation of plans, design, 9 construction, renovation, administration, 10 and other costs incidental thereto 11 (91062609) .................................. 10,000,000 12 The sum of $18,000,000 is hereby appropri- 13 ated for services and expenses for the 14 Central New York Regional Market. Funds 15 appropriated herein shall be for, but not 16 limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 17 erty, preparation of plans, design, 18 construction, renovation, administration, 19 and other costs incidental thereto 20 (91072609) .................................. 18,000,000 21 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropri- 22 ated for services, expenses, acquisition 23 and rehabilitation for the Friends of 24 Evergreen Meadow Academy. Funds appropri- 25 ated herein shall be for, but not limited 26 to, the acquisition of real property, 27 preparation of plans, design, 28 construction, renovation, administration, 29 and other costs incidental thereto 30 (91082609) .................................. 10,000,000 31 The sum of $24,000,000 is hereby appropri- 32 ated for services and expenses for Feed- 33 More Western New York, Inc. Funds appro- 34 priated herein shall be for, but not 35 limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 36 erty, preparation of plans, design, 37 construction, renovation, administration, 38 and other costs incidental thereto 39 (91092609) .................................. 24,000,000 40 The sum of $4,000,000 is hereby appropriated 41 for services and expenses for Garth Fagan 42 Dance Inc. Funds appropriated herein shall 43 be for, but not limited to, the acquisi- 44 tion of real property, preparation of 45 plans, design, construction, renovation, 46 administration, and other costs incidental 47 thereto (91112609) ........................... 4,000,000 48 The sum of $6,000,000 is hereby appropriated 49 for services and expenses for the Hamilton 50 Hill Drop in Arts and Crafts Center Inc. 51 Funds appropriated herein shall be for, 52 but not limited to, the acquisition of 1174 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 real property, preparation of plans, 2 design, construction, renovation, adminis- 3 tration, and other costs incidental there- 4 to (91122609) ................................ 6,000,000 5 The sum of $6,000,000 is hereby appropriated 6 for services and expenses for the 7 Universal Hip Hop Museum. Funds appropri- 8 ated herein shall be for, but not limited 9 to, the acquisition of real property, 10 preparation of plans, design, 11 construction, renovation, administration, 12 and other costs incidental thereto 13 (91962609) (58014) ........................... 6,000,000 14 The sum of $4,000,000 is hereby appropriated 15 for services and expenses for the Museum 16 of Korean American Heritage. Funds appro- 17 priated herein shall be for, but not 18 limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 19 erty, preparation of plans, design, 20 construction, renovation, administration, 21 and other costs incidental thereto 22 (91132609) ................................... 4,000,000 23 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropri- 24 ated for services, expenses, loans and 25 grants associated with the redevelopment 26 of the 13th Regiment Armory located in 27 Bedford-Stuyvesant (Marcus Garvey Armory). 28 Funds appropriated herein shall be for, 29 but not limited to, the acquisition of 30 real property, preparation of plans, 31 design, construction, renovation, adminis- 32 tration, and other costs incidental there- 33 to (91152609) ............................... 10,000,000 34 The sum of $7,500,000 is hereby appropriated 35 for services and expenses for the American 36 Museum of the Moving Image. Funds appro- 37 priated herein shall be for, but not 38 limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 39 erty, preparation of plans, design, 40 construction, renovation, administration, 41 and other costs incidental thereto 42 (91172609) ................................... 7,500,000 43 The sum of $2,000,000 is hereby appropriated 44 for services and expenses for the Ohel 45 Children's Home and Family Services Inc. 46 Funds appropriated herein shall be for, 47 but not limited to, the acquisition of 48 real property, preparation of plans, 49 design, construction, renovation, adminis- 50 tration, and other costs incidental there- 51 to (91192609) ................................ 2,000,000 1175 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 The sum of $3,000,000 is hereby appropriated 2 for services and expenses for the Public 3 Theater. Funds appropriated herein shall 4 be for, but not limited to, the acquisi- 5 tion of real property, preparation of 6 plans, design, construction, renovation, 7 administration, and other costs incidental 8 thereto (91202609) ........................... 3,000,000 9 The sum of $12,000,000 is hereby appropri- 10 ated for services, expenses, and costs 11 associated with construction of a regional 12 interceptor sewer in Southern Oswego Coun- 13 ty. Funds appropriated herein shall be 14 for, but not limited to, the acquisition 15 of real property, preparation of plans, 16 design, construction, renovation, adminis- 17 tration, and other costs incidental there- 18 to (91212609) ............................... 12,000,000 19 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropri- 20 ated for services, expenses, and costs 21 associated with resiliency projects 22 located in Suffolk County. Funds appro- 23 priated herein shall be for, but not 24 limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 25 erty, preparation of plans, design, 26 construction, renovation, administration, 27 and other costs incidental thereto 28 (91222609) .................................. 20,000,000 29 The sum of $5,000,000 is hereby appropriated 30 for services and expenses for infrastruc- 31 ture improvement to the SUNY College of 32 Environmental Science and Forestry campus. 33 Funds appropriated herein shall be for, 34 but not limited to, the acquisition of 35 real property, preparation of plans, 36 design, construction, renovation, adminis- 37 tration, and other costs incidental there- 38 to (91232609) ................................ 5,000,000 39 The sum of $5,000,000 is hereby appropriated 40 for services, expenses, and costs associ- 41 ated with a cryogenics facility located in 42 Amherst. Funds appropriated herein shall 43 be for, but not limited to, the acquisi- 44 tion of real property, preparation of 45 plans, design, construction, renovation, 46 administration, and other costs incidental 47 thereto (91242609) ........................... 5,000,000 48 The sum of $4,000,000 is hereby appropriated 49 for services and expenses associated with 50 the acquisition and redevelopment of a 51 church in the town of Woodbury. Funds 52 appropriated herein shall be for, but not 1176 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 2 erty, preparation of plans, design, 3 construction, renovation, administration, 4 and other costs incidental thereto 5 (91252609) ................................... 4,000,000 6 The sum of $3,500,000 is hereby appropriated 7 for services and expenses for the village 8 of Freeport. Funds appropriated herein 9 shall be for, but not limited to, the 10 acquisition of real property, preparation 11 of plans, design, construction, reno- 12 vation, administration, and other costs 13 incidental thereto (91262609) ................ 3,500,000 14 The sum of $5,000,000 is hereby appropriated 15 for services and expenses for Artswest- 16 chester Inc. Funds appropriated herein 17 shall be for, but not limited to, the 18 acquisition of real property, preparation 19 of plans, design, construction, reno- 20 vation, administration, and other costs 21 incidental thereto (91272609) ................ 5,000,000 22 The sum of $4,000,000 is hereby appropriated 23 for services and expenses for We Act Envi- 24 ronmental Justice Center Inc. Funds appro- 25 priated herein shall be for, but not 26 limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 27 erty, preparation of plans, design, 28 construction, renovation, administration, 29 and other costs incidental thereto 30 (91282609) ................................... 4,000,000 31 The sum of $3,000,000 is hereby appropriated 32 for services and expenses for the CenterS- 33 tate CEO Inspyre Innovation Hub. Funds 34 appropriated herein shall be for, but not 35 limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 36 erty, preparation of plans, design, 37 construction, renovation, administration, 38 and other costs incidental thereto 39 (91292609) ................................... 3,000,000 40 The sum of $175,000,000 is hereby appropri- 41 ated for services and expenses for the 42 District Galleria project in White Plains. 43 Funds appropriated herein shall be for, 44 but not limited to, the acquisition of 45 real property, preparation of plans, 46 design, construction, renovation, adminis- 47 tration, and other costs incidental there- 48 to (91302609) .............................. 175,000,000 49 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropri- 50 ated for services and expenses for the 51 redevelopment of the Hunts Point Meat 52 Market in the Bronx. Funds appropriated 1177 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 herein shall be for, but not limited to, 2 the acquisition of real property, prepara- 3 tion of plans, design, construction, reno- 4 vation, administration, and other costs 5 incidental thereto (91952609) ............... 20,000,000 1178 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Economic Development Purpose 5 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is 6 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 7 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for services and 8 expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with program adminis- 9 tration, of projects and purposes authorized below, including the 10 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025. All or a 11 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 12 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority, accord- 13 ing to the following: 14 The sum of $250,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 15 expenses, loans and grants related to the redevelopment of underuti- 16 lized sites for housing initiative. Funds appropriated herein shall 17 be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 18 erty, preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, admin- 19 istration, and other costs incidental thereto (91792509) (58040) ... 20 250,000,000 ..................................... (re. $250,000,000) 21 The sum of $335,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 22 expenses related to the Championing Albany's Potential Initiative 23 which will promote business development, bolster public safety, 24 build out community anchors, encourage housing, enhance affordabili- 25 ty and enhance cultural experiences through improvements to capital 26 infrastructure, including but not limited to, the New York state 27 museum, library and archives in consultation with the state educa- 28 tion department. Funds appropriated herein shall be for, including 29 but not limited to, the acquisition of real property, preparation of 30 plans, design, construction, renovation, administration and other 31 costs incidental thereto (912425090) (64204) ....................... 32 335,000,000 ..................................... (re. $335,000,000) 33 The sum of $100,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 34 expenses, loans and grants related to the Promote Opportunity with 35 Electric Readiness for Underdeveloped Properties program. Funds 36 appropriated herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the 37 acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, design, 38 construction, renovation, administration and other, costs incidental 39 thereto (91402509) (64205) ......................................... 40 100,000,000 ..................................... (re. $100,000,000) 41 The sum of $100,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 42 expenses, loans and grants related to the FAST NY program. Funds 43 appropriated herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the 44 acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, design, 45 construction, renovation, administration, and other costs incidental 46 thereto (91162509) (58042) ... 100,000,000 ...... (re. $100,000,000) 47 The sum of $2,395,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 48 related to the retention of professional football in Western New 49 York (91032509) (47322) ... 2,395,000 ............. (re. $2,395,000) 1179 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The sum of $8,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 2 expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market New York program, 3 including but not limited to, projects that enhance or promote 4 regional attractions in the state of New York. The receipt of fund- 5 ing from this appropriation to a municipality may be conditional 6 upon a certification by the Division of Housing and Community 7 Renewal that such municipality is a pro-housing community. 8 (91362509) (47007) ... 8,000,000 .................. (re. $8,000,000) 9 The sum of $400,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York Works 10 Economic Development Fund. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 11 services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the New York 12 Works Economic Development Fund (91102509) (47006) ................. 13 400,000,000 ..................................... (re. $400,000,000) 14 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 15 economic development council initiative. Funding will be pursuant to 16 a plan developed by the chief executive officer of the New York 17 state urban development corporation and based in part on a compet- 18 itive selection process among the regional economic development 19 councils and will support initiatives based on anticipated economic 20 development benefits. Such moneys will be awarded by the New York 21 state urban development corporation at its discretion. The receipt 22 of funding from this appropriation to a municipality may be condi- 23 tional upon a certification by the Division of Housing and Community 24 Renewal that such municipality is a pro-housing community. 25 (91142509) (47009) ................................................. 26 150,000,000 ..................................... (re. $150,000,000) 27 The sum of $5,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 28 for the Pace University Performing Arts Center. Funds appropriated 29 herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition 30 of real property, preparation of plans, design, construction, reno- 31 vation, administration, and other costs incidental thereto 32 (91982509) (58012) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000) 33 The sum of $90,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 34 expenses, loans and grants related to the Launch NY AI Consortium 35 program. Funds appropriated herein shall be for, including but not 36 limited to, the acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, 37 design, construction, renovation, administration, and other costs 38 incidental thereto (91442509) (58044) .............................. 39 90,000,000 ....................................... (re. $90,000,000) 40 The sum of $50,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 41 expenses, loans and grants related to infrastructure projects in 42 Suffolk County, including but not limited to, Suffolk county inter- 43 modal transportation projects (91772509) (64206) ................... 44 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,000,000) 45 The sum of $50,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the County Partner- 46 ship Grants Program for services and expenses of a county infras- 47 tructure grant program. Eligible expenses of such grant program may 48 include but shall not be limited to, construction, reconstruction, 49 renovation, site preparation, demolition, acquisition of real prop- 50 erty, preparation of plans, design and other costs incidental there- 51 to. Grants may not exceed [$1,000,000] $1,500,000 per grant and 52 shall be available to any county except a county wholly contained 1180 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 within a city (91812509) (58046) ................................... 2 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,000,000) 3 The sum of $55,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 4 expenses of Fordham Landing South. Funds appropriated herein shall 5 be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 6 erty, preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, admin- 7 istration, and other costs incidental thereto (91682509) (64226) ... 8 55,000,000 ....................................... (re. $55,000,000) 9 The sum of $5,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 10 for the Mount Vernon Armory. Funds appropriated herein shall be for, 11 including but not limited to, the acquisition of real property, 12 preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, adminis- 13 tration, and other costs incidental thereto (91272509) (64227) ..... 14 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000) 15 The sum of $59,600,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 16 expenses for the Rochester Riverside Convention Center. Funds appro- 17 priated herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the 18 acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, design, 19 construction, renovation, administration, and other costs incidental 20 thereto (91192509) (64228) ... 59,600,000 ........ (re. $59,600,000) 21 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 22 expenses for raw water infrastructure in the town of Tonawanda. 23 Funds appropriated herein shall be for, including but not limited 24 to, the acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, design, 25 construction, renovation, administration, and other costs incidental 26 thereto (91332509) (64229) ... 20,000,000 ........ (re. $20,000,000) 27 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 28 expenses for the American Museum of Natural History. Funds appropri- 29 ated herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisi- 30 tion of real property, preparation of plans, design, construction, 31 renovation, administration, and other costs incidental thereto 32 (91232509) (64202) ... 10,000,000 ................ (re. $10,000,000) 33 The sum of $13,200,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 34 expenses for the Brooklyn Public Library. Funds appropriated herein 35 shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition of real 36 property, preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, 37 administration, and other costs incidental thereto (91382509) 38 (64230) ... 13,200,000 ........................... (re. $13,200,000) 39 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 40 expenses for the Children's Museum of Manhattan. Funds appropriated 41 herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition 42 of real property, preparation of plans, design, construction, reno- 43 vation, administration, and other costs incidental thereto 44 (91832509) (64231) ... 10,000,000 ................ (re. $10,000,000) 45 The sum of $3,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 46 for the Empire State Youth Orchestra. Funds appropriated herein 47 shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition of real 48 property, preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, 49 administration, and other costs incidental thereto (91132509) 50 (64232) ... 3,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,000,000) 51 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 52 expenses for the Universal Hip Hop Museum. Funds appropriated herein 1181 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition of real 2 property, preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, 3 administration, and other costs incidental thereto (91962509) 4 (58014) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000) 5 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 6 expenses for the Metropolitan Museum of Art. Funds appropriated 7 herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition 8 of real property, preparation of plans, design, construction, reno- 9 vation, administration, and other costs incidental thereto 10 (91282509) (64233) ... 10,000,000 ................ (re. $10,000,000) 11 The sum of $8,500,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 12 for the Queens Museum. Funds appropriated herein shall be for, 13 including but not limited to, the acquisition of real property, 14 preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, adminis- 15 tration, and other costs incidental thereto (91392509) (64234) ..... 16 8,500,000 ......................................... (re. $8,500,000) 17 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 18 expenses, loans and grants of a non-profit cultural institution 19 grant program. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 20 contrary, the funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only 21 pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budget. Funds 22 appropriated herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the 23 acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, design, 24 construction, renovation, administration and other costs incidental 25 thereto (91742509) (64235) ... 20,000,000 ........ (re. $20,000,000) 26 The sum of $116,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 27 expenses for the Onondaga County Water Authority water infrastruc- 28 ture projects. Funds appropriated herein shall be for, including but 29 not limited to, the acquisition of real property, preparation of 30 plans, design, construction, renovation, administration, and other 31 costs incidental thereto (91312509) (64236) ........................ 32 116,000,000 ..................................... (re. $116,000,000) 33 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 34 expenses related to the FIFA World Cup (91422509) (64237) .......... 35 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,000,000) 36 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is 37 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 38 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for services and 39 expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with program adminis- 40 tration, of projects and purposes authorized below, including the 41 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024. All or a 42 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 43 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority, accord- 44 ing to the following: 45 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Grown and Certi- 46 fied program. Funds appropriated herein shall be for services and 47 expenses, loans, and grants, related to the grown and certified 48 program (91882409) (58039) ... 20,000,000 ........ (re. $18,550,000) 49 The sum of $250,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 50 expenses, loans and grants related to the redevelopment of underuti- 51 lized sites for housing initiative. Funds appropriated herein shall 1182 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition of real prop- 2 erty, preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, admin- 3 istration, and other costs incidental thereto (91782409) (58040) ... 4 250,000,000 ..................................... (re. $249,751,000) 5 The sum of $80,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 6 expenses, loans and grants related to one network for regional 7 advanced manufacturing partnership initiative. Funds appropriated 8 herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition 9 of real property, preparation of plans, design, construction, reno- 10 vation, administration, and other costs incidental thereto 11 (91172409) (58041) ... 80,000,000 ................ (re. $80,000,000) 12 The sum of $100,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 13 expenses, loans and grants related to the FAST NY program. Funds 14 appropriated herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the 15 acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, design, 16 construction, renovation, administration, and other costs incidental 17 thereto (91162409) (58042) ... 100,000,000 ...... (re. $100,000,000) 18 The sum of $500,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 19 expenses for the Albany Nanotech Ultraviolet Lithography Center. 20 Funds appropriated herein shall be for, including but not limited to, 21 design, construction, renovation, administration, and other costs 22 incidental thereto (91112409) (50843) .............................. 23 500,000,000 ...................................... (re. $39,000,000) 24 The sum of $8,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 25 expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market New York program, 26 including but not limited to, projects that enhance or promote 27 regional attractions in the state of New York. The receipt of fund- 28 ing from this appropriation to a municipality may be conditional 29 upon a certification by the Division of Housing and Community 30 Renewal that such municipality is a pro-housing community. 31 (91362409) (47007) ... 8,000,000 .................. (re. $8,000,000) 32 The sum of $250,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 33 expenses, loans and grants related to the Launch NY AI Consortium 34 program. Funds appropriated herein shall be for, including but not 35 limited to, the acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, 36 design, construction, renovation, administration, and other costs 37 incidental thereto (91442409) (58044) .............................. 38 250,000,000 ..................................... (re. $210,000,000) 39 The sum of $400,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York Works 40 Economic Development Fund. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 41 services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the New York 42 Works Economic Development Fund (91102409) (47006) ................. 43 400,000,000 ..................................... (re. $305,250,000) 44 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 45 economic development council initiative. Funding will be pursuant to 46 a plan developed by the chief executive officer of the New York 47 state urban development corporation and based in part on a compet- 48 itive selection process among the regional economic development 49 councils and will support initiatives based on anticipated economic 50 development benefits. Such moneys will be awarded by the New York 51 state urban development corporation at its discretion. The receipt 52 of funding from this appropriation to a municipality may be condi- 1183 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 tional upon a certification by the Division of Housing and Community 2 Renewal that such municipality is a pro-housing community. 3 (91192409) (47009) ................................................. 4 150,000,000 ..................................... (re. $150,000,000) 5 The sum of $5,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 6 for the Pace University Performing Arts Center. Funds appropriated 7 herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition 8 of real property, preparation of plans, design, construction, reno- 9 vation, administration, and other costs incidental thereto 10 (91982409) (58012) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $2,252,000) 11 The sum of $50,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 12 expenses of the restore New York's communities initiative pursuant 13 to section 16-n of the New York state urban development corporation 14 act; provided however, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, that 15 such allocation and distribution is subject to the approval by the 16 director of the budget of a plan for such program submitted by the 17 administering department, agency, or public authority (91412409) 18 (85513) ... 50,000,000 ........................... (re. $50,000,000) 19 The sum of $85,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the County Partner- 20 ship Grants Program for the provision of grants to counties for the 21 development, construction, installation, consolidation or operation 22 of public safety communications systems or networks designed to 23 support public safety answering point centers including but not 24 limited to the creation and operation of fiberoptic cable based 25 networks. Grants shall be available to any county except a county 26 wholly contained within a city. No funds shall be expended from this 27 appropriation until the director of the budget has approved a plan 28 submitted by the division of homeland security and emergency 29 services in such detail as required by the director of the budget. 30 (91812409) (58045) ... 85,000,000 ................ (re. $85,000,000) 31 The sum of $50,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the County Partner- 32 ship Grants Program for services and expenses of a county infras- 33 tructure grant program. Eligible expenses of such grant program may 34 include but shall not be limited to, construction, reconstruction, 35 renovation, site preparation, demolition, acquisition of real prop- 36 erty, preparation of plans, design and other costs incidental there- 37 to. Grants may not exceed [$1,000,000] $1,500,000 per grant and 38 shall be available to any county except a county wholly contained 39 within a city. (91812409) (58046) .................................. 40 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,000,000) 41 The sum of $6,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Kingston Bulkhead 42 Improvements on Rondout Creek. Funds appropriated herein shall be 43 for, including, but not limited to, the acquisition of real proper- 44 ty, preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, adminis- 45 tration, and other costs incidental thereto (91212409) (58047) ..... 46 6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $6,000,000) 47 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 48 expenses for the Universal Hip Hop Museum. Funds appropriated herein 49 shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition of real 50 property, preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, 51 administration, and other costs incidental thereto (91962409) 52 (58014) ... 10,000,000 ........................... (re. $10,000,000) 1184 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 2 expenses for the redevelopment of the Hunts Point Meat Market in the 3 Bronx. Funds appropriated herein shall be for, including but not 4 limited to, the acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, 5 design, construction, renovation, administration, and other costs 6 incidental thereto (91952409) (58048) .............................. 7 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 8 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 9 expenses for MiSci Museum of Innovation and Science. Funds appropri- 10 ated herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisi- 11 tion of real property, preparation of plans, design, construction, 12 renovation, administration, and other costs incidental thereto 13 (91222409) (58049) ... 10,000,000 ................ (re. $10,000,000) 14 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 15 expenses of bioscience research labs and academic medical centers 16 (91242409) (64200) ... 10,000,000 ................ (re. $10,000,000) 17 The sum of $3,500,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 18 for the Hispanic Federation. Funds appropriated herein shall be for, 19 including but not limited to, the acquisition of real property, 20 preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, adminis- 21 tration, and other costs incidental thereto (91302409) (64201) ..... 22 3,500,000 ......................................... (re. $3,500,000) 23 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 24 expenses for the American Museum of Natural History. Funds appropri- 25 ated herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisi- 26 tion of real property, preparation of plans, design, construction, 27 renovation, administration, and other costs incidental thereto 28 (91232409) (64202) ... 10,000,000 ................ (re. $10,000,000) 29 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 30 expenses for The Brooklyn Museum. Funds appropriated herein shall be 31 for, including but not limited to, the acquisition of real property, 32 preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, adminis- 33 tration, and other costs incidental thereto (91202409) (64203) ..... 34 10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 37 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for services and 38 expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with program adminis- 39 tration, of projects and purposes authorized below, including the 40 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023. All or a 41 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 42 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority, accord- 43 ing to the following: 44 The sum of $2,270,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 45 related to the retention of professional football in Western New 46 York (91032309) (47322) ... 2,270,000 ................. (re. $4,000) 47 The sum of $8,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 48 expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market New York program, 49 including but not limited to, projects that enhance or promote 50 regional attractions in the state of New York (91362309) (47007) ... 51 8,000,000 ......................................... (re. $8,000,000) 1185 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The sum of $400,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York Works 2 Economic Development Fund. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 3 services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the New York 4 Works Economic Development Fund (91102309) (47006) ................. 5 400,000,000 ...................................... (re. $44,392,000) 6 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 7 economic development council initiative. Funding will be pursuant to 8 a plan developed by the chief executive officer of the New York 9 state urban development corporation and based in part on a compet- 10 itive selection process among the regional economic development 11 councils and will support initiatives based on anticipated economic 12 development benefits. Such moneys will be awarded by the New York 13 state urban development corporation at its discretion (91142309) 14 (47009) ... 150,000,000 ......................... (re. $149,711,000) 15 The sum of $50,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 16 expenses of the restore New York's communities initiative pursuant 17 to section 16-n of the New York state urban development corporation 18 act; provided however, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, that 19 such allocation and distribution is subject to the approval by the 20 director of the budget of a plan for such program submitted by the 21 administering department, agency, or public authority (91412309) 22 (85513) ... 50,000,000 ........................... (re. $48,841,000) 23 The sum of $130,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 24 expenses for the redevelopment of the Hunts Point Produce Market in 25 the Bronx. Funds appropriated herein shall be for, including but not 26 limited to, the acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, 27 design, construction, renovation, administration, and other costs 28 incidental thereto (91952309) (58021) .............................. 29 130,000,000 ..................................... (re. $130,000,000) 30 The sum of $19,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 31 expenses for the redevelopment of Monument Square in the City of 32 Troy and for projects that expand the availability of housing within 33 3,000 feet north, east, and south of Monument Square. Funds appro- 34 priated herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the 35 acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, design, 36 construction, renovation, administration, and other costs incidental 37 thereto (91972309) (58023) ... 19,000,000 ........ (re. $19,000,000) 38 The sum of $7,500,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 39 for the American Museum of Lesbian Gay Bisexual Transgender History 40 and Culture. Funds appropriated herein shall be for, including but 41 not limited to, the acquisition of real property, preparation of 42 plans, design, construction, renovation, administration, and other 43 costs incidental thereto (91992309) (58024) ........................ 44 7,500,000 ......................................... (re. $7,500,000) 45 The sum of $7,500,000 is hereby appropriated for the Dominican Ameri- 46 can Cultural Center redevelopment project in the County of New York. 47 Funds appropriated herein shall be for, including but not limited 48 to, the acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, design, 49 construction, renovation, administration, and other costs incidental 50 thereto (91942309) (58025) ... 7,500,000 .......... (re. $7,500,000) 51 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 52 expenses for the redevelopment of Victory Mills in Saratoga County. 1186 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Funds appropriated herein shall be for, including but not limited 2 to, the acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, design, 3 construction, renovation, administration, and other costs incidental 4 thereto (91932309) (58026) ... 10,000,000 ......... (re. $9,806,000) 5 The sum of $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 6 expenses related to the replacement of absorption chillers in the 7 central chiller plant of the state university of New York at Albany. 8 Funds appropriated herein shall be for, including but not limited 9 to, the preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, 10 acquisition of equipment, administration, and other costs incidental 11 thereto (91922309) (58027) ... 30,000,000 ........ (re. $29,553,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 13 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for services and 15 expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with program adminis- 16 tration, of projects and purposes authorized below, including the 17 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022. All or a 18 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 19 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority, accord- 20 ing to the following: 21 The sum of $8,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 22 expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market New York program, 23 including but not limited to, projects that enhance or promote 24 regional attractions in the state of New York (91362209) (47007) ... 25 8,000,000 ......................................... (re. $8,000,000) 26 The sum of $320,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York Works 27 Economic Development Fund. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 28 services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the New York 29 Works Economic Development Fund (91102209) (47006) ................. 30 320,000,000 ..................................... (re. $241,466,000) 31 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 32 economic development council initiative. Funding will be pursuant to 33 a plan developed by the chief executive officer of the New York 34 state urban development corporation and based in part on a compet- 35 itive selection process among the regional economic development 36 councils and will support initiatives based on anticipated economic 37 development benefits. Such moneys will be awarded by the New York 38 state urban development corporation at its discretion (91142209) 39 (47009) ... 150,000,000 ......................... (re. $139,769,000) 40 The sum of $250,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 41 expenses of the restore New York's communities initiative pursuant 42 to section 16-n of the New York state urban development corporation 43 act; provided however, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, that 44 such allocation and distribution is subject to the approval by the 45 director of the budget of a plan for such program submitted by the 46 administering department, agency, or public authority (91412209) 47 (85513) ... 250,000,000 ......................... (re. $238,796,000) 48 The sum of $300,000,000 is hereby appropriated for investment in 49 broadband infrastructure, access, and affordability under the 50 ConnectAll Initiative. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 51 services and expenses, grants, costs of program administration and 1187 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 other contractual obligations, including but not limited to invest- 2 ment in infrastructure to provide high-speed internet access to 3 municipalities, rural broadband deployment, right-of-way access, 4 last-mile and middle-mile support, cellular siting, digital equity, 5 connectivity innovation, local connectivity planning, costs of the 6 office of connectivity, and other costs incidental thereto, includ- 7 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022. 8 Funds appropriated herein shall also be available to meet match 9 requirements under the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Amer- 10 ican Rescue Plan Act, or any other required match to access federal 11 funds. Funding will be pursuant to a program and spending plan 12 developed by the New York state urban development corporation and 13 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (91472209) 14 (58004) ... 300,000,000 ......................... (re. $286,365,000) 15 The sum of $800,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York State 16 Regional Economic and Community Assistance Program. Funds appropri- 17 ated herein shall be for services and expenses, grants, and costs of 18 program administration, including but not limited to projects, 19 purposes, and other initiatives that foster regional workforce and 20 commercial development, tourism and infrastructure improvement, 21 community and urban revitalization, small business support, local 22 community priority projects, and other economic development 23 purposes. Funds shall be available for, but not limited to the 24 acquisition of real property, preparation of plans, design, 25 construction, renovation, purchase and installation of equipment, 26 costs associated with program implementation and other costs inci- 27 dental thereto. The receipt of funding from this appropriation by a 28 municipality, for the Mid-Hudson Momentum Fund program, may be 29 conditioned upon a certification by the Division of Housing and 30 Community Renewal that such municipality is pro-housing community 31 (91482209) (58005) ... 800,000,000 .............. (re. $709,556,000) 32 The sum of $350,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Long Island 33 Investment Fund for projects located within Nassau and Suffolk coun- 34 ties. Funds appropriated herein shall be available for services and 35 expenses, loans, grants, and costs of program administrations 36 related to purposes that may include, but not be limited to, support 37 of manufacturing, agriculture, business parks, community anchor 38 facilities, advanced technology, biotechnology and biomedical facil- 39 ities, and main street revitalization. All or a portion of the funds 40 may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or 41 public authority. The receipt of funding from this appropriation to 42 a municipality may be conditioned upon a certification by the Divi- 43 sion of Housing and Community Renewal that such municipality is a 44 pro-housing community (91632209) (58010) ........................... 45 350,000,000 ..................................... (re. $346,200,000) 46 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 47 expenses for the Mohawk Harbor Events Center. Funds appropriated 48 herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition 49 of real property, preparation of plans, design, construction, reno- 50 vation, administration, and other costs incidental thereto 51 (91992209) (58011) ... 10,000,000 ................. (re. $1,000,000) 1188 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 2 expenses for the Syracuse University Carrier Dome. Funds appropri- 3 ated herein shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisi- 4 tion of real property, preparation of plans, design, construction, 5 renovation, administration, and other costs incidental thereto 6 (91972209) (58013) ... 20,000,000 ................ (re. $20,000,000) 7 The sum of $11,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 8 expenses for the Universal Hip Hop Museum. Funds appropriated herein 9 shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition of real 10 property, preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, 11 administration, and other costs incidental thereto (91962209) 12 (58014) ... 11,000,000 ............................ (re. $7,085,000) 13 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 14 expenses for the New York Hall of Science. Funds appropriated herein 15 shall be for, including but not limited to, the acquisition of real 16 property, preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, 17 administration, and other costs incidental thereto (91952209) 18 (58015) ... 10,000,000 ............................ (re. $5,453,000) 19 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, is 20 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 21 The sum of $500,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 22 expenses, loans, grants, and other costs related to the development 23 of offshore wind ports, manufacturing, supply chain infrastructure, 24 and other related improvements and expenses needed to advance the 25 offshore wind industry and other clean or renewable energy technolo- 26 gies, industries, or projects (91162209) (58006) ................... 27 500,000,000 ..................................... (re. $500,000,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 29 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for services and 30 expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with program adminis- 31 tration, of projects and purposes authorized below, including the 32 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021. All or a 33 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 34 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority, accord- 35 ing to the following: 36 The sum of $2,431,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 37 related to the retention of professional football in Western New 38 York (91032109) (47322) ... 2,431,000 ............... (re. $287,000) 39 The sum of $8,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 40 expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market New York program, 41 including but not limited to, projects that enhance or promote 42 regional attractions in the state of New York (91362109) (47007) ... 43 8,000,000 ......................................... (re. $8,000,000) 44 The sum of $220,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York Works 45 Economic Development Fund. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 46 services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the New York 47 Works Economic Development Fund (91102109) (47006) ................. 48 220,000,000 ..................................... (re. $192,477,000) 49 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 50 economic development council initiative. Funding will be pursuant to 1189 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 a plan developed by the chief executive officer of the New York 2 state urban development corporation and based in part on a compet- 3 itive selection process among the regional economic development 4 councils and will support initiatives based on anticipated economic 5 development benefits. Such moneys will be awarded by the New York 6 state urban development corporation at its discretion (91142109) 7 (47009) ... 150,000,000 ......................... (re. $129,200,000) 8 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 9 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for services and 10 expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with program adminis- 11 tration, of projects and purposes authorized below, including the 12 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020. All or a 13 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 14 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority, accord- 15 ing to the following: 16 The sum of $2,357,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 17 related to the retention of professional football in Western New 18 York (91032009) (47322) ... 2,357,000 ............... (re. $272,000) 19 The sum of $8,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 20 expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market New York program, 21 including but not limited to, projects that enhance or promote 22 regional attractions in the state of New York (91362009) (47007) ... 23 8,000,000 ......................................... (re. $8,000,000) 24 The sum of $220,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York Works 25 Economic Development Fund. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 26 services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the New York 27 Works Economic Development Fund (91102009) (47006) ................. 28 220,000,000 ..................................... (re. $113,251,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 30 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for services and 31 expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with program adminis- 32 tration, of projects and purposes authorized below, including the 33 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019. All or a 34 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 35 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority, accord- 36 ing to the following: 37 The sum of $2,331,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 38 related to the retention of professional football in Western New 39 York (91031909) (47322) ... 2,331,000 ............... (re. $206,000) 40 The sum of $8,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 41 expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market New York program, 42 including but not limited to, projects that enhance or promote 43 regional attractions in the state of New York (91361909) (47007) ... 44 8,000,000 ......................................... (re. $6,196,000) 45 The sum of $220,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York Works 46 Economic Development Fund. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 47 services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the New York 48 Works Economic Development Fund (91101909) (47006) ................. 49 220,000,000 ..................................... (re. $183,916,000) 1190 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 2 economic development council initiative. Funding will be pursuant to 3 a plan developed by the chief executive officer of the New York 4 state urban development corporation and based in part on a compet- 5 itive selection process among the regional economic development 6 councils and will support initiatives based on anticipated economic 7 development benefits. Such moneys will be awarded by the New York 8 state urban development corporation at its discretion (91141909) 9 (47009) ... 150,000,000 .......................... (re. $98,025,000) 10 The sum of $325,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the High Technology 11 Innovation and Economic Development Infrastructure Program. Funds 12 appropriated herein shall be for services and expenses, loans, 13 grants and costs of program administration, including but not limit- 14 ed to projects, purposes and other initiatives that foster research 15 and development of innovative technologies, leverage private invest- 16 ment in advanced science and technology economic development initi- 17 atives, infrastructure, manufacturing, and other economic develop- 18 ment initiatives that leverage private investment in regional 19 projects that create or retain jobs. Funds shall be available for, 20 but not limited to the acquisition of real property, preparation of 21 plans, design, construction, renovation, purchase and installation 22 of equipment, costs associated with program implementation and other 23 costs incidental thereto, including the payment of liabilities 24 incurred prior to April 1, 2019. All or a portion of this appropri- 25 ation may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, 26 or public authority (91191909) (47022) ............................. 27 325,000,000 ...................................... (re. $10,001,000) 28 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as added by chapter 314, 29 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 30 The sum of $500,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York Works 31 Economic Development Fund. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 32 services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the New York 33 Works Economic Development Fund, provided that up to $425,000,000 34 shall be available from this appropriation for the construction of 35 an entrance to Pennsylvania Station at the southwest corner of the 36 intersection of West 33rd Street and 7th Avenue and other related 37 improvements and expenses (91161909) (85528) ....................... 38 500,000,000 ....................................... (re. $1,000,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 40 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for services and 41 expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with program adminis- 42 tration, of projects and purposes authorized below, including the 43 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018. All or a 44 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 45 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority, accord- 46 ing to the following: 47 The sum of $2,305,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 48 related to the retention of professional football in Western New 49 York (91031809) (47322) ... 2,305,000 ............... (re. $177,000) 1191 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The sum of $8,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 2 expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market New York program, 3 including but not limited to, projects that enhance or promote 4 regional attractions in the state of New York (91361809) (47007) ... 5 8,000,000 ......................................... (re. $6,787,000) 6 The sum of $200,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York Works 7 Economic Development Fund. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 8 services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the New York 9 Works Economic Development Fund (91131809) (47006) ................. 10 200,000,000 ..................................... (re. $185,775,000) 11 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 12 economic development council initiative. Funding will be pursuant to 13 a plan developed by the chief executive officer of the New York 14 state urban development corporation and based in part on a compet- 15 itive selection process among the regional economic development 16 councils and will support initiatives based on anticipated economic 17 development benefits. Such moneys will be awarded by the New York 18 state urban development corporation at its discretion (91151809) 19 (47009) ... 150,000,000 ......................... (re. $103,195,000) 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 21 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 22 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for services and 23 expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with program adminis- 24 tration, of projects and purposes authorized below, including the 25 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017. All or a 26 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 27 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority, accord- 28 ing to the following: 29 The sum of $2,278,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 30 related to the retention of professional football in Western New 31 York (91031709) (47322) ... 2,278,000 ............... (re. $168,000) 32 The sum of $8,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 33 expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market New York program, 34 including but not limited to, projects that enhance or promote 35 regional attractions in the state of New York (91361709) (47007) ... 36 8,000,000 ......................................... (re. $6,218,000) 37 The sum of $200,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York Works 38 Economic Development Fund. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 39 services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the New York 40 Works Economic Development Fund (91401709) (47006) ................. 41 200,000,000 ...................................... (re. $18,441,000) 42 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 43 economic development council initiative. Funding will be pursuant to 44 a plan developed by the chief executive officer of the New York 45 state urban development corporation and based in part on a compet- 46 itive selection process among the regional economic development 47 councils and will support initiatives based on anticipated economic 48 development benefits. Such moneys will be awarded by the New York 49 state urban development corporation at its discretion (91191709) 50 (47009) ... 150,000,000 .......................... (re. $99,908,000) 1192 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 2 expenses related to the cultural, arts and public spaces fund, 3 including, but not limited to, projects that enhance or promote 4 business development and increase tourism. All or a portion of the 5 funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to the 6 New York state council on the arts (91351709) (85502) .............. 7 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,654,000) 8 The sum of $108,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 9 expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with the redevelopment 10 of the Kingsbridge armory in Bronx County (91231709) (85503) ....... 11 108,000,000 ..................................... (re. $100,500,000) 12 The sum of $70,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 13 expenses of the restore New York's communities initiative pursuant 14 to section 16-n of the New York state urban development corporation 15 act; provided however, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, that 16 such allocation and distribution is subject to the approval by the 17 director of the budget of a plan for such program submitted by the 18 administering department, agency, or public authority (91411709) 19 (85513) ... 70,000,000 ........................... (re. $12,686,000) 20 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the acquisition of 21 municipal use vehicles, and costs related to the preparation of 22 plans, design, construction, reconstruction, and preventive mainte- 23 nance on state and locally-owned roads, bridges, railways, and other 24 public use or transportation-related infrastructure, including but 25 not limited to the acquisition and installation of equipment inci- 26 dental thereto. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby 27 may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or 28 public authority (91451709) (85514) ................................ 29 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,000,000) 30 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 31 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for services and 33 expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with program adminis- 34 tration, of projects and purposes authorized below, including the 35 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2016. All or a 36 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 37 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority, accord- 38 ing to the following: 39 The sum of $685,500,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 40 expenses of high technology manufacturing projects in Chautauqua and 41 Erie County including, notwithstanding anything in law to the 42 contrary, the reimbursement of expenditures for high technology 43 manufacturing projects in Chautauqua County appropriated herein made 44 from an appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 45 2016 for state and municipal facilities (91061609) (47020) ......... 46 685,500,000 ...................................... (re. $46,402,000) 47 The sum of $638,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 48 expenses of economic development projects at Nano Utica and at other 49 locations in Oneida County (91041609) (47008) ...................... 50 638,000,000 ....................................... (re. $1,470,000) 1193 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The sum of $125,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 2 expenses of an industrial scale research and development facility 3 operated by SUNY Polytechnic Institute Colleges of Nanoscale Science 4 and Engineering in Clinton County (91141609) (47012) ............... 5 125,000,000 ......................................... (re. $128,000) 6 The sum of $15,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the NY SUNY 2020 7 challenge grant program, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 8 of law, shall be available to all colleges, universities and commu- 9 nity colleges as defined by section 350 of the education law. NY 10 SUNY 2020 plans shall be developed in consultation with the regional 11 economic development councils and funding will be subject to the 12 approval of a NY SUNY 2020 plan or plans by the governor and the 13 chancellor of the state university of New York. The determination of 14 grant awards shall take into consideration the extent to which 15 plans: (1) use technology, including but not limited to the expan- 16 sion of on-line learning, to improve academic success and job oppor- 17 tunities for students; (2) leverage economic and academic opportu- 18 nities through the START-UP NY program; and (3) provide experiential 19 learning opportunities that connect students to the workforce; 20 provided further, a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be 21 utilized to complete existing NY SUNY 2020 projects at the universi- 22 ty at Buffalo and Stony Brook university (91111609) (47329) ........ 23 15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,633,000) 24 The sum of $25,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the NY CUNY 2020 25 challenge grant program, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 26 of law, shall be available to all colleges, universities and commu- 27 nity colleges as defined by section 6202 of the education law. NY 28 CUNY 2020 plans shall be developed in consultation with the regional 29 economic development councils and funding will be subject to the 30 approval of a NY CUNY 2020 plan or plans by the governor and the 31 chancellor of the city university of New York. The determination of 32 grant awards shall take into consideration the extent to which 33 plans: (1) use technology, including but not limited to the expan- 34 sion of on-line learning, to improve academic success and job oppor- 35 tunities for students; (2) leverage economic and academic opportu- 36 nities through the START-UP NY program; and (3) provide experiential 37 learning opportunities that connect students to the workforce 38 (91121609) (47320) ... 25,000,000 ................ (re. $25,000,000) 39 The sum of $2,251,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 40 related to the retention of professional football in Western New 41 York (91031609) (47322) ... 2,251,000 ............... (re. $141,000) 42 The sum of $8,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 43 expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market New York program, 44 including but not limited to, projects that enhance or promote 45 regional attractions in the state of New York (91201609) (47007) ... 46 8,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,890,000) 47 The sum of $199,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York Works 48 Economic Development Fund. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 49 services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the New York 50 Works Economic Development Fund (91011609) (47006) ................. 51 199,000,000 ...................................... (re. $14,880,000) 1194 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 2 economic development council initiative. Funding will be pursuant to 3 a plan developed by the chief executive officer of the New York 4 state urban development corporation and based in part on a compet- 5 itive selection process among the regional economic development 6 councils and will support initiatives based on anticipated economic 7 development benefits. Such moneys will be awarded by the New York 8 state urban development corporation at its discretion (91191609) 9 (47009) ... 150,000,000 .......................... (re. $66,483,000) 10 The sum of $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated for additional upstate 11 revitalization initiative projects. Funds appropriated herein shall 12 be for services and expenses, loans, grants, workforce development, 13 business and tourism plan development, costs associated with program 14 administration, and the payment of personal services, nonpersonal 15 services and contract services provided by private firms to support 16 economic development projects. Funding will be pursuant to a plan 17 developed by the chief executive officer of the New York state urban 18 development corporation and will support initiatives based on antic- 19 ipated job creation and economic development benefits. Funds shall 20 not be available from this appropriation for projects within regions 21 that were Upstate Revitalization Initiative 2015 Best Plan Awardees 22 or eligible to receive funding from the Buffalo Regional Innovation 23 Cluster Program. Such moneys will be awarded by the New York state 24 urban development corporation at its discretion (91161609) (47013) 25 ... 30,000,000 ................................... (re. $13,806,000) 26 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 27 expenses of Oakdale merge on Sunrise Highway (NYS Rte. 27 and NYS 28 Rte. 27-A over the Connetquot River) to conduct a multi-year study 29 and complete the process of widening bridges and roads to accommo- 30 date traffic flow. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby 31 may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or 32 public authority (91211609) (47021) ................................ 33 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,000,000) 34 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 35 For services and expenses of redevelopment initiatives at the Harriman 36 Research and Technology Park (91030709) (47371) .................... 37 7,500,000 ......................................... (re. $5,562,000) 38 Cornell University College of Veterinary Medicine 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 40 The sum of $19,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 41 expenses of the cornell university college of veterinary medicine, 42 including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 43 2015. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 44 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 45 authority (91051509) (42040) ... 19,000,000 ........... (re. $4,000) 46 Downstate Regional Projects 1195 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as added by chapter 53, 2 section 5, of the laws of 2008: 3 The sum of $35,000,000 is hereby appropriated for downstate regional 4 projects including but not limited to those listed in the schedule 5 below, subject to a plan submitted by the chairman of the New York 6 state urban development corporation and approved by the director of 7 the budget. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 8 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 9 authority (91090809) (47365) ... 35,000,000 ....... (re. $5,126,000) 10 Project Schedule 11 PROJECT AMOUNT 12 -------------------------------------------- 13 SUNY Stony Brook Energy 14 Research Center ............... 10,000,000 15 Lower Hudson Valley Infras- 16 tructure and Waterfront 17 Development ................... 10,000,000 18 Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory .... 5,000,000 19 Hudson Valley Solar Energy 20 Consortium ..................... 5,000,000 21 Hudson Valley Semiconductor 22 Manufacturing .................. 5,000,000 23 -------------- 24 Total ....................... 35,000,000 25 ============== 26 Downstate Revitalization Fund 27 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as added by chapter 53, 28 section 5, of the laws of 2008: 29 The sum of $35,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the downstate revi- 30 talization fund, as authorized pursuant to a chapter of the laws of 31 2008, and subject to a plan submitted by the chairman of the New 32 York state urban development corporation and approved by the direc- 33 tor of the budget. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby 34 may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or 35 public authority (91010809) (47363) ................................ 36 35,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,480,000) 37 Economic and Community Development Projects 38 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 39 section 1, of the laws of 2011: 40 The sum of $32,148,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York state 41 economic and community development program, as authorized pursuant 42 to a chapter of the laws of 2008, subject to a plan approved by the 43 director of the budget. All or a portion of the funds appropriated 44 hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, 45 or public authority (91070809) (47366) ............................. 46 32,148,000 .......................................... (re. $899,000) 1196 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Economic Development Fund 2 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as transferred by chapter 3 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 4 For services and expenses of the empire state economic development 5 fund (91021209) (47003) ... 20,000,000 ........... (re. $14,195,000) 6 Economic Transformation Program 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 8 The sum of $32,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the economic trans- 9 formation program. Funds appropriated herein shall be available for 10 services and expenses, loans, and grants. Funding will be used to 11 support initiatives, services and expenses of communities impacted 12 by the closure of New York state correctional and juvenile justice 13 facilities. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 14 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 15 authority (91041409) (47340) ... 32,000,000 ...... (re. $21,000,000) 16 Empire State Economic Development Fund 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 18 The sum of $12,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 19 expenses of the empire state economic development fund, including 20 the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2013. All or a 21 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 22 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 23 (91171309) (47373) ... 12,000,000 ................ (re. $12,000,000) 24 NY 2020 Challenge Grant Program 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 27 The sum of $25,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the NY SUNY 2020 28 challenge grant program, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 29 of law, shall be available to all colleges, universities and commu- 30 nity colleges as defined by section 350 of the education law. NY 31 SUNY 2020 plans shall be developed in consultation with the regional 32 economic development councils and funding will be subject to the 33 approval of a NY SUNY 2020 plan or plans by the governor and the 34 chancellor of the state university of New York. The determination of 35 grant awards shall take into consideration the extent to which 36 plans: (1) use technology, including but not limited to the expan- 37 sion of on-line learning, to improve academic success and job oppor- 38 tunities for students; (2) leverage economic and academic opportu- 39 nities through the START-UP NY program; and (3) provide experiential 40 learning opportunities that connect students to the workforce. All 41 or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 42 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 43 (91111509) (47329) ... 25,000,000 ................ (re. $10,783,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 1197 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The sum of $55,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the NY SUNY 2020 2 challenge grant program, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 3 of law, shall be available to all colleges, universities and commu- 4 nity colleges as defined by section 350 of the education law. NY 5 SUNY 2020 plans shall be developed in consultation with the regional 6 economic development councils and funding will be subject to the 7 approval of a NY SUNY 2020 plan or plans by the governor and the 8 chancellor of the state university of New York. The determination of 9 grant awards shall take into consideration the extent to which 10 plans: (1) use technology, including but not limited to the expan- 11 sion of on-line learning, to improve academic success and job oppor- 12 tunities for students; (2) leverage economic and academic opportu- 13 nities through the START-UP NY program; and (3) provide experiential 14 learning opportunities that connect students to the workforce. All 15 or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 16 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 17 (91111409) (47329) ... 55,000,000 ................. (re. $6,680,000) 18 NY-SUNY 2020 Challenge Grant Program 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 20 The sum of $55,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the NY SUNY 2020 21 challenge grant program, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 22 of law, shall be available to all colleges, universities and commu- 23 nity colleges as defined by section 350 of the Education Law, except 24 that no funds shall be made available from this appropriation for 25 university centers as defined by subdivision 7 of section 350 of the 26 education law. NY SUNY 2020 plans shall be developed in consultation 27 with the regional economic development councils and funding will be 28 subject to the approval of a NY SUNY 2020 plan or plans by the 29 governor and the chancellor of the state university of New York. 30 All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo- 31 cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 32 (91121309) (47329) ... 55,000,000 ................ (re. $20,508,000) 33 The sum of $55,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the NY CUNY 2020 34 challenge grant program, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 35 of law, shall be available to all colleges, universities and commu- 36 nity colleges as defined by section 6202 of the Education Law. NY 37 CUNY 2020 plans shall be developed in consultation with the regional 38 economic development councils and funding will be subject to the 39 approval of a NY CUNY 2020 plan or plans by the governor and the 40 chancellor of the city university of New York. All or a portion of 41 the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to 42 any department, agency, or public authority (91131309) (47320) ..... 43 55,000,000 ....................................... (re. $16,626,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 45 The sum of $80,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the NY-SUNY 2020 46 challenge grant program, as authorized pursuant to chapter 260 of 47 the laws of 2011. Funding will be subject to the approval of a 48 NY-SUNY 2020 plan or plans by the governor and the chancellor of the 49 state university of New York. All or a portion of the funds appro- 1198 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 priated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, 2 agency, or public authority (91121209) (47328) ..................... 3 80,000,000 .......................................... (re. $717,000) 4 Nano Utica Project 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 7 The sum of $180,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 8 expenses related to a nano Utica project, including the payment of 9 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014, and for other economic 10 development projects in Oneida County. All or a portion of the funds 11 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 12 department, agency, or public authority (91071409) (42041) ......... 13 180,000,000 ..................................... (re. $117,500,000) 14 Onondaga County Revitalization Projects 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 16 The sum of $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 17 expenses related to economic development and infrastructure improve- 18 ments that encourage the revitalization of Onondaga lake and its 19 surrounding communities, including the payment of liabilities 20 incurred prior to April 1, 2014. All or a portion of the funds 21 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 22 department, agency, or public authority (91021409) (44409) ......... 23 30,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,749,000) 24 Transformative Investment Program 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 26 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 27 The sum of $400,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the payment, over a 28 multi-year period, of capital costs of regionally significant 29 economic development initiatives that create or retain private 30 sector jobs, including but not limited to those listed in the sched- 31 ule below. Funds shall not be available from this appropriation for 32 projects within regions that are eligible to receive funding from 33 the Upstate Revitalization Initiative or the Buffalo Regional Inno- 34 vation Cluster Program. Funds appropriated herein shall be available 35 for project costs, services, expenses, loans and grants that cata- 36 lyze private investment, grow commercial and residential tax bases 37 and enhance the environment and quality of life for New York State 38 residents. Investment purposes may include, but shall not be limited 39 to, support of manufacturing, agriculture, business parks, community 40 anchor facilities, county and local fairgrounds, advanced technolo- 41 gy, biotechnology and biomedical facilities, and main street revi- 42 talization. The portion of any such project funded by this appropri- 43 ation shall be no less than $5,000,000. The items shown in the 44 schedule below shall be for projects with a common purpose and may 45 be interchanged without limitation subject to the approval of the 46 director of the budget. All or a portion of the funds may be subal- 1199 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 located or transferred to any department, agency, or public authori- 2 ty (91161509) (45618) ... 400,000,000 ........... (re. $255,556,000) 3 Project Schedule 4 PROJECT AMOUNT 5 -------------------------------------------- 6 NSLIJ, Feinstein Institute of 7 Medical Research: Center for 8 Bioelectronic Medicine 9 (CBEM) - Manhasset ............ 30,000,000 10 Hofstra University: School of 11 Engineering and Applied 12 Sciences (SEAS) ............... 25,000,000 13 Cold Spring Harbor Lab: Center 14 for Therapeutics Research 15 (CTR) ......................... 25,000,000 16 Commercialization and research 17 and development projects at 18 Stony Brook University 19 pursuant to a plan developed 20 by Stony Brook University 21 and submitted to the chief 22 executive officer of the New 23 York state urban development 24 corporation for approval ...... 75,000,000 25 Renovation and expansion of 26 MacArthur airport ............. 20,000,000 27 Smithtown Business District 28 Sewer Improvement Area ........ 20,000,000 29 Kings Park Waste Water Treat- 30 ment Facility ................. 20,000,000 31 Cryo-electron Microscopy 32 (CryoEM) facility at the 33 Brookhaven National Labora- 34 tory .......................... 15,000,000 35 Great Neck Water Pollution 36 Control District .............. 12,290,000 37 All other projects ............. 157,710,000 38 -------------- 39 Total ...................... 400,000,000 40 ============== 41 Upstate Agricultural Economic Development Fund 42 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 43 section 1, of the laws of 2011: 44 The sum of $25,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the upstate agricul- 45 tural economic development fund, as authorized pursuant to a chapter 46 of the laws of 2008, subject to a plan submitted by the chairman of 47 the upstate empire state development corporation in consultation 48 with the commissioner of the department of agriculture and markets 49 and approved by the director of the budget. All or a portion of the 1200 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 2 department, agency, or public authority (91030809) (47361) ......... 3 25,000,000 .......................................... (re. $291,000) 4 Upstate City-by-City Projects 5 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2011: 7 The sum of $22,037,000 is hereby appropriated for upstate city-by-city 8 projects subject to a plan submitted by the chairman of the upstate 9 empire state development corporation and approved by the director of 10 the budget. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 11 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 12 authority (91110809) (47351) ... 22,037,000 .......... (re. $77,000) 13 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as added by chapter 53, 14 section 5, of the laws of 2008: 15 The sum of $115,000,000 is hereby appropriated for upstate city-by- 16 city projects including but not limited to those listed in the sche- 17 dule below, subject to a plan submitted by the chairman of the 18 upstate empire state development corporation and approved by the 19 director of the budget. All or a portion of the funds appropriated 20 hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, 21 or public authority (91100809) (47364) ............................. 22 115,000,000 ....................................... (re. $3,740,000) 23 Project Schedule 24 PROJECT AMOUNT 25 -------------------------------------------- 26 Midtown Plaza/Paetec ............ 55,000,000 27 University of Rochester -- 28 Translational Research ........ 25,000,000 29 Syracuse Connective Corridor .... 10,000,000 30 Fort Drum -- Infrastructure 31 Improvements .................. 10,000,000 32 City of Buffalo -- Revitaliza- 33 tion Efforts .................. 15,000,000 34 -------------- 35 Total ...................... 115,000,000 36 ============== 37 Upstate Regional Blueprint Fund 38 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 54, 39 section 1, of the laws of 2011: 40 The sum of $117,265,000 is hereby appropriated for the upstate 41 regional blueprint fund, as authorized pursuant to a chapter of the 42 laws of 2008, subject to a plan submitted by the chairman of the 43 upstate empire state development corporation and approved by the 44 director of the budget. All or a portion of the funds appropriated 45 hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, 1201 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 or public authority (91020809) (47362) ............................. 2 117,265,000 ....................................... (re. $8,705,000) 3 Western New York Economic Development Projects 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 5 The sum of $2,223,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 6 related to the retention of professional football in Western New 7 York, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 8 1, 2015. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 9 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 10 authority (91031509) (47322) ... 2,223,000 ........... (re. $95,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 12 The sum of $680,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Buffalo 13 regional innovation cluster. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 14 services and expenses, loans, grants, workforce development, busi- 15 ness and tourism plan development, and the payment of personal 16 services, nonpersonal services and contract services provided by 17 private firms to support economic development projects within the 18 city of Buffalo or surrounding environs, including the payment of 19 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014. Provided however, that 20 up to $33,000,000 is provided to Western NY STAMP. No monies for 21 Western NY STAMP shall be disbursed prior to approval by the chief 22 executive officer of the New York state urban development corpo- 23 ration of a business plan that identifies regionally significant 24 projects, as defined in economic development law, article 17, 25 section 352, subdivision 14, at Western NY STAMP. All or a portion 26 of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred 27 to any department, agency, or public authority (91131409) (47321) .. 28 680,000,000 ...................................... (re. $84,103,000) 29 The sum of $2,195,000 is hereby appropriated for services and expenses 30 related to the retention of professional football in Western New 31 York, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 32 1, 2014. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 33 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 34 authority (91151409) (47322) ... 2,195,000 ........... (re. $28,000) 35 Capital Projects Funds - Other 36 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 37 Regional Development Purpose 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 39 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 40 The sum of $130,550,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 41 economic development council initiative. Funds appropriated herein 42 shall be available for services and expenses, loans, and grants. 43 Funding will be pursuant to a plan developed by the chair of the New 44 York state urban development corporation and based in part on a 45 competitive selection process among the regional economic develop- 46 ment councils and will support initiatives based on anticipated 47 economic development benefits. Such moneys will be awarded by the 1202 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 New York state urban development corporation at its discretion. All 2 or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 3 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 4 (910211A3) (47341) ... 130,550,000 ............... (re. $21,489,000) 5 Economic Transformation Program 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 54, 7 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 8 The sum of $50,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the economic trans- 9 formation program. Funds appropriated herein shall be available for 10 services and expenses, loans, and grants. Funding will be used to 11 support initiatives, services and expenses of communities impacted 12 by the closure of New York state prison, correctional and juvenile 13 justice facilities, pursuant to a plan developed by the chair of the 14 New York state urban development corporation. The regional economic 15 development council representing the impacted community shall make 16 non-binding recommendations to the chair consistent with the execu- 17 tive order establishing such council. All or a portion of the funds 18 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 19 department, agency, or public authority (910311A3) (47340) ......... 20 50,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,040,000) 21 Capital Projects Funds - Other 22 Dedicated Infrastructure Investment Fund 23 Infrastructure Investment Account - 33050 24 Economic Development Purpose 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 26 The sum of $400,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the second phase of 27 the Buffalo regional innovation cluster initiative. Funds appropri- 28 ated herein shall be for services, expenses, loans, grants, and 29 costs associated with program administration to support economic 30 development projects within the city of Buffalo or surrounding envi- 31 rons, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 32 1, 2017. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 33 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 34 authority (91311709) (85516) ... 400,000,000 ..... (re. $82,604,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 37 The sum of $320,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 38 expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with program adminis- 39 tration of a life sciences initiative which shall include but not be 40 limited to investments in agricultural biotechnology, biogenerics, 41 bioinformatics, biomedical engineering, biopharmaceuticals, academic 42 medical centers, biotechnology, chemical synthesis, chemistry tech- 43 nology, medical diagnostics, genomics, medical image analysis, 44 marine biology, medical devices, medical nanotechnology, natural 45 product pharmaceuticals, proteomics, regenerative medicine, RNA 46 interference, stem cell research, medical and neurological clinical 47 trials, health robotics and veterinary science. Eligible costs of 1203 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 such initiative may include but not be limited to laboratory space, 2 equipment, technology, research and development, venture capital 3 investments and other costs in support of a comprehensive life 4 sciences cluster strategy, including the payment of liabilities 5 incurred prior to April 1, 2017, provided, however, that the total 6 annual amount in venture capital investments made from this appro- 7 priation shall not exceed $10,000,000 annually. In addition, the sum 8 of $20,000,000 shall be available from this appropriation for bios- 9 cience research labs and academic medical centers. Funding will be 10 pursuant to a plan developed by the chief executive officer of the 11 New York state urban development corporation which shall take into 12 consideration regional balance and anticipated job retention, job 13 creation and regional economic development benefits. All or a 14 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 15 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 16 (91321709) (85508) ... 320,000,000 .............. (re. $203,506,000) 17 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 18 Federal Capital Projects Fund 19 Economic Development Purpose 20 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 The sum of $800,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the federal share, 22 from any federal agency under any federal program, of State broad- 23 band projects and programs, including but not limited to services 24 and expenses, grants, costs of program administration, and other 25 contractual obligations related to investment in broadband infras- 26 tructure, access, and affordability as provided for in the Infras- 27 tructure Investment and Jobs Act and related prior and successive 28 federal legislation, and the payment of liabilities incurred prior 29 to April 1, 2022, provided that up to $10,000,000 or the amount of 30 federal funds awarded to New York State for digital equity or 31 digital inclusion programs shall be available for use as prescribed 32 under the program requirements of the Infrastructure Investment and 33 Jobs Act (91512209) (58007) ........................................ 34 800,000,000 ..................................... (re. $790,907,000) 35 The sum of $345,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the federal share 36 from any federal agency under any federal program, of State broad- 37 band projects and programs, including but not limited to services 38 and expenses, grants, costs of program administration, and other 39 contractual obligations related to investment in broadband infras- 40 tructure, access, and affordability as provided for in the American 41 Rescue Plan Act and related prior and successive federal legis- 42 lation, and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 43 2022. Funds appropriated herein shall also be available to meet 44 match requirements under the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, 45 or any other required match to access federal funds. (91522209) 46 (58008) ... 345,000,000 ......................... (re. $334,624,000) 47 Capital Projects Funds - Other 48 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 49 New York Racing Capital Improvement Fund 1204 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Economic Development Purpose 2 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 3 The sum of $455,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 4 expenses, loans, grants and costs related to the renovation of 5 Belmont park racetrack. Funds appropriated herein shall be for, 6 including but not limited to, the acquisition of real property, 7 preparation of plans, design, construction, renovation, demolition 8 of existing facilities, and other improvements and costs incidental 9 thereto, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 10 April 1, 2023; provided however, notwithstanding any provision of 11 law to the contrary, no portion of the funds appropriated herein 12 shall be made available for expenditure until the franchised corpo- 13 ration, pursuant to section 206 of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering 14 and breeding law, has entered into a repayment agreement with the 15 director of the budget providing for repayment of state funds 16 expended from this appropriation in accordance with the terms of 17 such repayment agreement. All or a portion of the funds appropriated 18 hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, 19 or public authority (91BM2309) (58020) ............................. 20 455,000,000 ..................................... (re. $225,000,000) 21 NEW YORK STATE CAPITAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM (CCP) 22 Capital Projects Funds - Other 23 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 24 Economic Development Purpose 25 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as added by chapter 53, 26 section 5, of the laws of 2008: 27 The sum of $350,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York State 28 Capital Assistance Program, as authorized pursuant to a chapter of 29 the laws of 2008. All or a portion of the funds may be suballocated 30 or transferred to any department, agency or public authority 31 (91150809) (47385) ................................................. 32 350,000,000 ...................................... (re. $91,424,000) 33 Capital Projects Funds - Other 34 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 35 Regional Development Purpose 36 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000, as amended by chapter 37 684, section 2, of the laws of 2003: 38 For economic development projects which will facilitate the creation 39 and retention of jobs or increase business activity within downtown 40 Buffalo, the Buffalo inner harbor area, or surrounding environs. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, such 42 projects shall be determined pursuant to a memorandum of understand- 43 ing to be executed by the governor, the temporary president of the 44 senate and the speaker of the assembly. The funds appropriated here- 45 by may be suballocated to any department, agency or public authori- 46 ty. Eligible project(s) shall include, but not be limited to Haupt- 1205 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 man-Woodward Medical Research Institute; Buffalo Medical Campus; 2 University of Buffalo - Center of Excellence in Bioinformatics; 3 Roswell Park Cancer Institute Corporation; and other projects relat- 4 ing to historic preservation, cultural facilities and transportation 5 projects (91AD00A3) (47384) ... 50,000,000 ........... (re. $50,000) 6 NEW YORK STATE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ASSISTANCE PROGRAM (CCP) 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 9 Economic Development Purpose 10 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as added by chapter 53, 11 section 5, of the laws of 2008: 12 The sum of $350,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York State 13 Economic Development Assistance Program, as authorized pursuant to a 14 chapter of the laws of 2008. All or a portion of the funds appropri- 15 ated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, 16 agency, or public authority (91140809) (47386) ..................... 17 350,000,000 ...................................... (re. $43,951,000) 18 NEW YORK WORKS (CCP) 19 Capital Projects Funds - Other 20 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 21 Economic Development Purpose 22 Buffalo Regional Innovation Cluster 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 24 The sum of $75,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Buffalo Regional 25 Innovation Cluster. Funds appropriated herein shall be for services 26 and expenses, loans, and grants, to support economic development 27 projects within the city of Buffalo or surrounding environs. All or 28 a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 29 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 30 (91211209) (47325) ... 75,000,000 ................... (re. $674,000) 31 New York Works Economic Development Fund 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 33 The sum of $45,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York Works 34 Economic Development Fund. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 35 services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the New York 36 Works Economic Development Fund, including the payment of liabil- 37 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2015. All or a portion of the funds 38 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 39 department, agency, or public authority (91101509) (47104) ......... 40 45,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000) 41 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 42 The sum of $75,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the New York Works 43 Economic Development Fund. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 1206 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the New York 2 Works Economic Development Fund. All or a portion of the funds 3 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 4 department, agency, or public authority (91151209) (47324) ......... 5 75,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,847,000) 6 Capital Projects Funds - Other 7 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 8 Regional Development Purpose 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 11 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 12 economic development council initiative. Funds appropriated herein 13 shall be available for services and expenses, loans, and grants. 14 Funding will be pursuant to a plan developed by the chief executive 15 officer of the New York state urban development corporation and 16 based in part on a competitive selection process among the regional 17 economic development councils and will support initiatives based on 18 anticipated economic development benefits. Such moneys will be 19 awarded by the New York state urban development corporation at its 20 discretion. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 21 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 22 authority (911415A3) (47326) ... 150,000,000 ..... (re. $42,577,000) 23 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 24 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 25 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 26 economic development council initiative. Funds appropriated herein 27 shall be available for services and expenses, loans, and grants. 28 Funding will be pursuant to a plan developed by the chief executive 29 officer of the New York state urban development corporation and 30 based in part on a competitive selection process among the regional 31 economic development councils and will support initiatives based on 32 anticipated economic development benefits. Such moneys will be 33 awarded by the New York state urban development corporation at its 34 discretion. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 35 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 36 authority (911414A3) (47326) ... 150,000,000 ..... (re. $29,544,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 39 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 40 economic development council initiative. Funds appropriated herein 41 shall be available for services and expenses, loans, and grants. 42 Funding will be pursuant to a plan developed by the chief executive 43 officer of the New York state urban development corporation and 44 based in part on a competitive selection process among the regional 45 economic development councils and will support initiatives based on 46 anticipated economic development benefits. Such moneys will be 47 awarded by the New York state urban development corporation at its 48 discretion. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 1207 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 2 authority (911413A3) (47326) ....................................... 3 150,000,000 ...................................... (re. $32,322,000) 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 54, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 6 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the regional 7 economic development council initiative. Funds appropriated herein 8 shall be for services and expenses, loans, and grants. Funding will 9 be pursuant to a plan developed by the chief executive officer of 10 the New York state urban development corporation and based in part 11 on a competitive selection process among the regional economic 12 development councils and will support initiatives based on antic- 13 ipated economic development benefits. Such moneys will be awarded by 14 the New York state urban development corporation at its discretion. 15 All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo- 16 cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 17 (911412A3) (47326) ... 150,000,000 ............... (re. $30,804,000) 18 REGIONAL DEVELOPMENT (CCP) 19 Capital Projects Funds - Other 20 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 21 Regional Development Purpose 22 Community Revitalization Projects 23 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 54, 24 section 1, of the laws of 2011: 25 The sum of $292,385,000 is hereby appropriated for the Restore New 26 York Communities Initiative, however, that of such amount, no more 27 than $50,000,000 shall be disbursed prior to April 1, 2007 and no 28 more than $150,000,000 shall be disbursed prior to April 1, 2008 29 (911106A3) (47376) ... 292,385,000 ............... (re. $27,741,000) 30 Cultural Facilities Projects 31 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 32 108, section 5, of the laws of 2006: 33 The sum of $143,000,000 is hereby appropriated for projects that 34 improve arts or cultural facilities including but not limited to 35 those listed in the schedule below, subject to a plan submitted by 36 the chairman of the New York state urban development corporation and 37 approved by the director of the budget. All or a portion of the 38 funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 39 department, agency, or public authority (910306A3) (47380) ......... 40 143,000,000 ......................................... (re. $105,000) 41 Project Schedule 42 PROJECT AMOUNT 43 -------------------------------------------- 44 Museum of Natural History ....... 18,000,000 45 World Trade Center Visitor 1208 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Orientation and Education 2 Center ........................ 57,000,000 3 Adirondack Natural History 4 Museum ......................... 6,500,000 5 New York City Public Library .... 12,000,000 6 New York Historical Society ...... 5,500,000 7 Old Fort Niagara ................. 1,000,000 8 Lincoln Center .................. 15,000,000 9 Stanley Theater .................. 1,000,000 10 Museum of Jewish Heritage ....... 10,000,000 11 Albany Institute of History 12 and Art ........................ 1,000,000 13 Thirteen/WNET New York ........... 1,000,000 14 Whitney Museum of America Art ... 15,000,000 15 -------------- 16 Total ...................... 143,000,000 17 ============== 18 Economic Development/Other Projects 19 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 20 108, section 5, of the laws of 2006: 21 The sum of $269,500,000 is hereby appropriated for economic develop- 22 ment projects including but not limited to those listed in the sche- 23 dule below, subject to a plan submitted by the chairman of the New 24 York state urban development corporation and approved by the direc- 25 tor of the budget. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby 26 may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or 27 public authority (910106A3) (47382) ................................ 28 269,500,000 ......................................... (re. $875,000) 29 Project Schedule 30 PROJECT AMOUNT 31 -------------------------------------------- 32 Albany Convention Center ........ 75,000,000 33 Canal Corporation - new initi- 34 atives ........................ 10,000,000 35 Hudson River Park ............... 11,000,000 36 Rivers and Estuaries Center ..... 25,000,000 37 Historic Hudson Valley ........... 5,000,000 38 Plattsburgh International 39 Airport ........................ 5,000,000 40 Plattsburgh Aeronautical 41 Institute ...................... 1,200,000 42 Governor's Island ............... 22,500,000 43 Department of Environmental 44 Conservation Fish Hatcheries ... 3,000,000 45 Roswell Park Cancer Institute ... 18,000,000 46 Lower Manhattan Energy Inde- 47 pendence Initiative ........... 25,000,000 48 Atlantic Yards Railway Rede- 1209 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 velopment ..................... 34,000,000 2 Delphi Harrison ................. 25,000,000 3 Other ............................ 9,800,000 4 -------------- 5 Total ...................... 269,500,000 6 ============== 7 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 54, 8 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 9 The sum of $603,050,000 is hereby appropriated for economic develop- 10 ment projects, university development projects, homeland security 11 projects, environmental projects, public recreation projects and 12 arts and cultural facility improvement projects, including but not 13 limited to those listed in the schedule below. All or a portion of 14 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any department, 15 agency or public authority. All or a portion of the funds appropri- 16 ated herein may be transferred to any department, agency or public 17 authority (910606A3) (47349) ....................................... 18 603,050,000 ...................................... (re. $53,249,000) 19 Project Schedule 20 PROJECT AMOUNT 21 -------------------------------------------- 22 City of Yonkers Saw Mill River 23 Redevelopment .................. 8,000,000 24 NYS Applied Science Center of 25 Innovation and Excellence in 26 Homeland Security ............. 25,000,000 27 Renaissance Square Project 28 and/or other economic devel- 29 opment projects ............... 18,000,000 30 Renaissance Square Project 31 which may include the reha- 32 bilitation of the Eastman 33 Theatre and/or other 34 performance venues ............ 18,000,000 35 Schenectady Superconductivity 36 Partnership .................... 2,000,000 37 Kingston Business Park ........... 1,000,000 38 Public Safety Training Center .... 2,500,000 39 Chemung County IDA/Academic 40 and Career Advancement 41 Center ......................... 5,000,000 42 Comprehensive Emergency Shel- 43 tering Program on Long 44 Island ......................... 2,500,000 45 Clarkson University - Walker 46 Center ......................... 1,000,000 47 Atlantic Yards Railway Rede- 48 velopment ..................... 33,000,000 49 Atlantic Yards Railway - Nets 1210 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Project ....................... 33,000,000 2 Buffalo Building Demolition ...... 5,000,000 3 Buffalo Lakeside Commerce Park ... 5,000,000 4 East River Bioscience Park ...... 12,000,000 5 Albany College of 6 Pharmacy/Pharmaceutical 7 Center ......................... 2,000,000 8 Science and Technology Center 9 at Utica College ................. 675,000 10 City of Utica/East Government 11 Parking District or for 12 other projects of the Upper 13 Mohawk Valley Memorial Audi- 14 torium Authority ............... 1,500,000 15 Upper Mohawk Valley Memorial 16 Auditorium Authority ........... 2,000,000 17 State University of New York 18 at Stony Brook Brookhaven 19 National Laboratory Super- 20 computer ...................... 26,000,000 21 Brooklyn Museum - Third Floor 22 Beaux Arts Court ............... 7,500,000 23 Foothills Performing Arts 24 Center ......................... 4,000,000 25 Syracuse University Restore 26 Center for Environmental 27 Biotechnology .................. 5,000,000 28 Fredonia Agricultural Exper- 29 imental Station - Cornell 30 University ..................... 3,359,000 31 Rochester Rhinos Soccer Stadi- 32 um ............................. 5,000,000 33 Canisius College - Interdisci- 34 plinary Science Center ......... 3,000,000 35 Buffalo Niagara Medical Campus ... 5,200,000 36 Lower Manhattan 21st Century 37 Communications ................ 13,600,000 38 Lincoln Center ................... 7,500,000 39 Buffalo State College - New 40 Technology Building ........... 40,330,000 41 Rochester and Buffalo Educa- 42 tional Opportunity Center 43 Facilities .................... 28,000,000 44 Advanced Energy Research and 45 Technology Center on Long 46 Island ........................ 35,000,000 47 Of the amounts appropriated 48 herein $14,000,000 shall be 49 made available to the Luther 50 Forest Technology Campus 51 infrastructure and 52 $10,000,000 shall be made 1211 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 available to Uptown and 2 Downtown Campus, University 3 at Albany ..................... 24,000,000 4 SUNY Fredonia - Science Center .. 10,000,000 5 The Putnam Community Founda- 6 tion ........................... 2,000,000 7 Hudson Valley Domestic 8 Preparedness, Response and 9 Recovery Initiative ............ 4,000,000 10 Center for Lithography Devel- 11 opment ........................ 12,000,000 12 State University of New York 13 at Fredonia-Science Center .... 12,000,000 14 Westchester Community College 15 Master Plan Projects ........... 6,000,000 16 Bethel Woods Performing Arts 17 Center ......................... 1,000,000 18 To Long Island Bus for the 19 purchase of hybrid buses ....... 3,000,000 20 Suffolk Community College ........ 3,000,000 21 Queensborough Public Library ..... 6,000,000 22 State University of New York 23 at New Paltz-Old Main Reno- 24 vation ......................... 3,000,000 25 East River Bioscience Park ...... 11,000,000 26 Art Park and Company ............. 2,500,000 27 Landmark Theatre ................. 8,500,000 28 Rochester Parking Garage ......... 8,000,000 29 Hunts Point Cooperative Market ... 2,000,000 30 Office of Court Administra- 31 tion-Court Officers Academy .... 1,000,000 32 Buffalo Mainstreet ............... 8,000,000 33 Hispanic Federation .............. 2,000,000 34 Manhattan Youth Building ......... 3,100,000 35 Brooklyn Museum .................. 4,500,000 36 Boricua College .................. 2,000,000 37 Schenectady Metroplex Redevel- 38 opment ......................... 2,000,000 39 Channel 13 ....................... 1,250,000 40 Educational Alliance ............. 3,150,000 41 Brooklyn Public Library .......... 3,000,000 42 Osborne Association - Reno- 43 vation of the former Fulton 44 Correctional Facility .......... 3,000,000 45 New York City Department of 46 Parks and Recreation - Van 47 Cortlandt Park pedestrian 48 bridge ......................... 3,000,000 49 For services and expenses of 50 Nassau County .................. 2,000,000 51 Humane Society of Roches- 52 ter and Monroe County for the 1212 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Prevention of Cruelty to Ani- 2 mals, Inc. .................... 5,000,000 3 NYC Health and Hospitals Lin- 4 coln Medical Center ........... 4,000,000 5 The Joyce Theater Foundation, 6 Inc. .......................... 2,000,000 7 Baden Street Settlement of 8 Rochester, Inc. ............... 1,736,000 9 Other projects to be deter- 10 mined pursuant to a plan to 11 be developed by the director 12 of the budget in consulta- 13 tion with the temporary 14 president of the senate ....... 73,650,000 15 -------------- 16 Total ...................... 603,050,000 17 ============== 18 Energy/Environmental Projects 19 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 55, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2007: 21 The sum of $15,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 22 expenses of the New York investment in conservation and efficiency 23 pilot program. Such funds appropriated shall be suballocated or 24 transferred to New York energy research and development authority 25 (911006A3) (47378) ... 15,000,000 ................ (re. $15,000,000) 26 The sum of $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated for projects including, 27 but not limited to, renewable fuels, flexible fuel vehicles, hybrid 28 electric vehicles, plug-in hybrid electric vehicles, and other 29 research and development regarding fuel diversification and energy 30 efficiency in the transportation sector. All or a portion of the 31 funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any 32 department, agency, or public authority (910406A3) (47377) ......... 33 30,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,581,000) 34 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as added by chapter 53, 35 section 3, of the laws of 2006: 36 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropriated for a competitive solic- 37 itation for construction of a pilot cellulosic ethanol refinery. 38 All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo- 39 cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 40 (910506A3) (47350) ... 20,000,000 ................. (re. $6,867,000) 41 University Development Projects 42 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 43 108, section 5, of the laws of 2006: 44 The sum of $201,500,000 is hereby appropriated for university develop- 45 ment projects including but not limited to those listed in the sche- 46 dule below, subject to a plan submitted by the chairman of the New 47 York state urban development corporation and approved by the direc- 1213 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 tor of the budget. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby 2 may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or 3 public authority (910206A3) (47381) ................................ 4 201,500,000 ......................................... (re. $938,000) 5 Project Schedule 6 PROJECT AMOUNT 7 -------------------------------------------- 8 University at Buffalo -- 9 Krabbe Disease Research ........ 6,000,000 10 Columbia University - Nano 11 Facility ...................... 10,000,000 12 Columbia University - Cancer 13 Center ........................ 12,000,000 14 Fordham University .............. 10,000,000 15 Syracuse Center of Excellence ... 10,000,000 16 Energy Recovery Linac Project 17 at Cornell University ......... 12,000,000 18 Clarkson University .............. 5,000,000 19 Paul Smith's College ............. 1,500,000 20 University at Albany -- Insti- 21 tute for Nanoelectronics 22 Discovery and Exploration 23 (INDEX) ....................... 75,000,000 24 New York State Veterinary 25 Diagnostic Laboratory ......... 50,000,000 26 Brooklyn Army Terminal ........... 6,000,000 27 East River Bioscience Park ....... 4,000,000 28 -------------- 29 Total ........................ 201,500,000 30 ============== 31 UPSTATE REVITALIZATION (CCP) 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Dedicated Infrastructure Investment Fund 34 Infrastructure Investment Account - 33050 35 Upstate Revitalization Purpose 36 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 37 The sum of $1,500,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the upstate revi- 38 talization initiative. Funds appropriated herein shall be for 39 services and expenses, loans, grants, workforce development, busi- 40 ness and tourism plan development, costs associated with program 41 administration, and the payment of personal services, nonpersonal 42 services and contract services provided by private firms to support 43 economic development projects, including the payment of liabilities 44 incurred prior to April 1, 2015. Funding will be pursuant to a plan 45 developed by the chief executive officer of the New York state urban 46 development corporation and based on a competitive selection process 47 among the regional economic development councils (R.E.D.C's) and 48 will support initiatives based on anticipated job creation and 1214 12654-09-6 NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 economic development benefits. Such moneys will be awarded by the 2 New York state urban development corporation at its discretion. All 3 or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 4 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 5 (910115UR) (43502) ... 1,500,000,000 ............ (re. $559,021,000) 1215 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes, and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 2,000,000 6,981,000 6 Capital Projects Funds - Federal ... 2,000,000 8,000,000 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 4,000,000 14,981,000 9 ================ ================ 10 VETERANS' CEMETERY (CCP) ..................................... 4,000,000 11 -------------- 12 Capital Projects Funds - Other 13 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 14 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 15 For costs associated with design and 16 construction, and maintenance and oper- 17 ations of the state's veterans' cemetery 18 (VEVC2603) (54814) ........................... 2,000,000 19 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 20 Federal Capital Projects Fund - 31381 21 Veterans' Cemetery Federal Account 22 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 23 For costs associated with design and 24 construction, and maintenance and oper- 25 ations of the state's veterans' cemetery 26 (VEFC2603) (54814) ........................... 2,000,000 1216 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 VETERANS' CEMETERY (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For costs associated with design and construction, and maintenance and 7 operations of the state's veterans' cemetery (VEVC2503) (54814) .... 8 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,999,000) 9 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 10 For costs associated with design and construction, and maintenance and 11 operations of the state's veterans' cemetery (VEVC2403) (54814) .... 12 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,985,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 14 For costs associated with design and construction, and maintenance and 15 operations of the state's veterans' cemetery (VEVC2303) (54814) .... 16 2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $432,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 18 For costs associated with design and construction, and maintenance and 19 operations of the state's veterans' cemetery (VEVC2203) (54814) .... 20 2,000,000 ............................................ (re. $94,000) 21 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 22 Federal Capital Projects Fund - 31381 23 Veterans' Cemetery Federal Account 24 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 26 For costs associated with design and construction, and maintenance and 27 operations of the state's veterans' cemetery (VEFC2503) (54814) .... 28 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 30 For costs associated with design and construction, and maintenance and 31 operations of the state's veterans' cemetery (VEFC2403) (54814) .... 32 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 33 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 34 For costs associated with design and construction, and maintenance and 35 operations of the state's veterans' cemetery (VEFC2303) (54814) .... 36 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 38 For costs associated with design and construction, and maintenance and 39 operations of the state's veterans' cemetery (VEFC2203) (54814) .... 40 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 41 VETERANS NONPROFIT CAPITAL PROGRAM 1217 12654-09-6 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Capital Projects Funds - Other 2 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 3 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 4 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 6 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and projects as 7 herein specified in accordance with the following: 8 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, funds appropriated 9 herein shall be for grants administered by the dormitory authority 10 of the state of New York for payment of capital costs of design, 11 construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and equipment for 12 facilities owned or controlled by veterans' nonprofit organizations; 13 provided that in cases involving the acquisition of non-fixed equip- 14 ment and capital assets such assets shall solely be used by the 15 grant recipient. Individual grants are to be awarded on a compet- 16 itive basis to nonprofit veterans' organizations through a request 17 for proposals and application determined by the department of veter- 18 ans services and the dormitory authority of the state of New York. 19 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all or a portion of the 20 amounts hereby appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to 21 the dormitory authority of the state of New York for such purpose 22 (VENP2208) (54812) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $2,471,000) 1218 12654-09-6 OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 2,920,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 0 2,920,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SOECK STORAGE FACILITY (CCP) 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 12 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 For services and expenses related to a storage facility for sexual 15 offense evidence collection kits, including the costs of demolition, 16 alterations, and improvements to existing facilities, departmental 17 administrative costs, preparation of plans and for services provided 18 by the design and construction account of the centralized services 19 fund of the New York state office of general services (VSSF2403) 20 (19920) ... 4,100,000 ............................. (re. $2,600,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 22 For services and expenses related to a storage facility for sexual 23 offense evidence collection kits, including the costs of demolition, 24 alterations, and improvements to existing facilities, departmental 25 administrative costs, preparation of plans and for services provided 26 by the design and construction account of the centralized services 27 fund of the New York state office of general services (VSSF2303) 28 (19920) ... 1,500,000 ............................... (re. $265,000) 29 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 30 For services and expenses related to a storage facility for sexual 31 offense evidence collection kits, including the costs of demolition, 32 alterations, and improvements to existing facilities, departmental 33 administrative costs, preparation of plans and for services provided 34 by the design and construction account of the centralized services 35 fund of the New York state office of general services (VSSF2203) 36 (19920) ... 1,200,000 ................................ (re. $55,000) 1219 12654-09-6 WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Fund - Other .... 30,000,000 29,887,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 30,000,000 29,887,000 8 ================ ================ 9 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM (CCP) ........................ 30,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 13 WCB IT Business Process Design Account - 32218 14 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 acquisition and development of technology, 17 including but not limited to equipment, 18 software and services (35012608) (55209) .... 30,000,000 1220 12654-09-6 WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 4 WCB IT Business Process Design Account - 32218 5 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 8 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 9 services (35011808) (55209) ... 20,000,000 ....... (re. $18,053,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 11 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 12 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 13 services (35011508) (55209) ... 60,000,000 ....... (re. $11,834,000) 1221 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ARTS AND CULTURAL FACILITIES IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 80,000,000 217,766,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 80,000,000 217,766,000 5 ================ ================ 6 ARTS AND CULTURAL FACILITIES IMPROVEMENT (CCP) .............. 80,000,000 7 -------------- 8 Capital Projects Funds - Other 9 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 10 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 11 The sum of $40,000,000 is hereby appropri- 12 ated for payments and grants, including up 13 to $400,000 in costs associated with 14 program administration to eligible nonpro- 15 fit arts and cultural organizations for 16 the arts and cultural facilities improve- 17 ment program. Such program shall provide 18 for targeted investment for capital 19 projects in such eligible arts or cultural 20 facilities to improve the quality, effi- 21 ciency, and accessibility of arts and 22 cultural organizations that benefit New 23 Yorkers. Provided that such investments 24 may include, but are not limited to: 25 renovations and retrofitting to comply 26 with COVID-19 health regulations, includ- 27 ing outdoor performance space projects, 28 HVAC upgrades, renovations or expansions 29 of space that is open to the public; 30 modifications to provide for sustainable, 31 energy efficient spaces that would result 32 in overall energy and cost savings; tech- 33 nology and other equipment that will bene- 34 fit the public; and accessibility reno- 35 vations. Up to $20,000,000 shall be made 36 available exclusively for small to midsize 37 eligible nonprofit arts and cultural 38 organizations. Funding from this appropri- 39 ation shall be made available through a 40 competitive process to be determined 41 exclusively by the New York state council 42 on the arts. The determination of this 43 competitive process and guidelines shall 44 be limited to the New York state council 45 on the arts in consultation with the 46 dormitory authority of the state of New 1222 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ARTS AND CULTURAL FACILITIES IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 York. The guidelines for the program and 2 competitive process shall ensure that such 3 funding is made available for uses 4 throughout the state and takes into 5 account regional distribution, supports a 6 range of grant awards including a minimum 7 grant of $10,000, and no match require- 8 ments for organizations as deemed appro- 9 priate by the New York state council on 10 the arts. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 11 provision of law, the dormitory authority 12 shall be authorized to administer this 13 program and designated state agencies 14 shall provide all necessary assistance. 15 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 16 of law, all or a portion of the funds 17 appropriated herein may be suballocated or 18 transferred to any department, agency, or 19 public authority (ACNP2608) (85021) ......... 40,000,000 20 The sum of $40,000,000 is hereby appropri- 21 ated for additional payments and grants, 22 including up to $400,000 in costs associ- 23 ated with program administration to eligi- 24 ble nonprofit arts and cultural organiza- 25 tions for the arts and cultural facilities 26 improvement program. Such program shall 27 provide for targeted investment for capi- 28 tal projects in such eligible arts or 29 cultural facilities to improve the quali- 30 ty, efficiency, and accessibility of arts 31 and cultural organizations that benefit 32 New Yorkers. Provided that such invest- 33 ments may include, but are not limited to: 34 renovations and retrofitting to comply 35 with COVID-19 health regulations, includ- 36 ing outdoor performance space projects, 37 HVAC upgrades, renovations or expansions 38 of space that is open to the public; 39 modifications to provide for sustainable, 40 energy efficient spaces that would result 41 in overall energy and cost savings; tech- 42 nology and other equipment that will bene- 43 fit the public; and accessibility reno- 44 vations. Up to $20,000,000 shall be made 45 available exclusively for small to midsize 46 eligible nonprofit arts and cultural 47 organizations. Funding from this appropri- 48 ation shall be made available through a 49 competitive process to be determined 50 exclusively by the New York state council 1223 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ARTS AND CULTURAL FACILITIES IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 on the arts. The determination of this 2 competitive process and guidelines shall 3 be limited to the New York state council 4 on the arts in consultation with the 5 dormitory authority of the state of New 6 York. The guidelines for the program and 7 competitive process shall ensure that such 8 funding is made available for uses 9 throughout the state and takes into 10 account regional distribution, supports a 11 range of grant awards including a minimum 12 grant of $10,000, and no match require- 13 ments for organizations as deemed appro- 14 priate by the New York state council on 15 the arts. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 16 provision of law, the dormitory authority 17 shall be authorized to administer this 18 program and designated state agencies 19 shall provide all necessary assistance. 20 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 21 of law, all or a portion of the funds 22 appropriated herein may be suballocated or 23 transferred to any department, agency, or 24 public authority ............................ 40,000,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal .................. 80,000,000 27 -------------- 1224 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ARTS AND CULTURAL FACILITIES IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ARTS AND CULTURAL FACILITIES IMPROVEMENT (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Fund - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 5 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, as 6 supplemented by a transfer in accordance with state finance law, is 7 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 8 The sum of [$40,000,000] $80,000,000 is hereby appropriated for 9 payments and grants, including up to [$400,000] $800,000 in costs 10 associated with program administration to eligible nonprofit arts 11 and cultural organizations for the arts and cultural facilities 12 improvement program. Such program shall provide for targeted invest- 13 ment for capital projects in such eligible arts or cultural facili- 14 ties to improve the quality, efficiency, and accessibility of arts 15 and cultural organizations that benefit New Yorkers. Provided that 16 such investments may include, but are not limited to: renovations 17 and retrofitting to comply with COVID-19 health regulations, includ- 18 ing outdoor performance space projects, HVAC upgrades, renovations 19 or expansions of space that is open to the public; modifications to 20 provide for sustainable, energy efficient spaces that would result 21 in overall energy and cost savings; technology and other equipment 22 that will benefit the public; and accessibility renovations. Up to 23 [$20,000,000] $40,000,000 shall be made available exclusively for 24 small to midsize eligible nonprofit arts and cultural organizations. 25 Funding from this appropriation shall be made available through a 26 competitive process to be determined exclusively by the New York 27 state council on the arts. The determination of this competitive 28 process and guidelines shall be limited to the New York state coun- 29 cil on the arts in consultation with the dormitory authority of the 30 state of New York. The guidelines for the program and competitive 31 process shall ensure that such funding is made available for uses 32 throughout the state and takes into account regional distribution, 33 supports a range of grant awards including a minimum grant of 34 $10,000, and no match requirements for organizations as deemed 35 appropriate by the New York state council on the arts. Notwithstand- 36 ing any inconsistent provision of law, the dormitory authority shall 37 be authorized to administer this program and designated state agen- 38 cies shall provide all necessary assistance. Notwithstanding any 39 inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of the funds appro- 40 priated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any department, 41 agency, or public authority (ACNP2508) (85021) ..................... 42 [40,000,000] 80,000,000 .......................... (re. $80,000,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 54, 44 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 45 The sum of $80,000,000 is hereby appropriated for payments and grants, 46 including up to $800,000 in costs associated with program adminis- 47 tration to eligible nonprofit arts and cultural organizations for 1225 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ARTS AND CULTURAL FACILITIES IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the arts and cultural facilities improvement program. Such program 2 shall provide for targeted investment for capital projects in such 3 eligible arts or cultural facilities to improve the quality, effi- 4 ciency, and accessibility of arts and cultural organizations that 5 benefit New Yorkers. Provided that such investments may include, but 6 are not limited to: renovations and retrofitting to comply with 7 COVID-19 health regulations, including outdoor performance space 8 projects, HVAC upgrades, renovations or expansions of space that is 9 open to the public; modifications to provide for sustainable, energy 10 efficient spaces that would result in overall energy and cost 11 savings; technology and other equipment that will benefit the 12 public; and accessibility renovations. Up to $35,000,000 shall be 13 made available exclusively for small to midsize eligible nonprofit 14 arts and cultural organizations. Funding from this appropriation 15 shall be made available through a competitive process to be deter- 16 mined exclusively by the New York state council on the arts. The 17 determination of this competitive process and guidelines shall be 18 limited to the New York state council on the arts in consultation 19 with the dormitory authority of the state of New York. The guide- 20 lines for the program and competitive process shall ensure that such 21 funding is made available for uses throughout the state and takes 22 into account regional distribution, supports a range of grant awards 23 including a minimum grant of $50,000, and no match requirements for 24 organizations as deemed appropriate by the New York state council on 25 the arts. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the 26 dormitory authority shall be authorized to administer this program 27 and designated state agencies shall provide all necessary assist- 28 ance. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, all or a 29 portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or 30 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 31 (ACNP2408) (85021) ... 80,000,000 ................ (re. $79,079,000) 32 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 33 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropriated for payments and grants, 34 including up to $400,000 in costs associated with program adminis- 35 tration to eligible nonprofit arts and cultural organizations for 36 the arts and cultural facilities improvement program. Such program 37 shall provide for targeted investment for capital projects in such 38 eligible arts or cultural facilities to improve the quality, effi- 39 ciency, and accessibility of arts and cultural organizations that 40 benefit New Yorkers. Provided that such investments may include, but 41 are not limited to: renovations and retrofitting to comply with 42 COVID-19 health regulations, including outdoor performance space 43 projects, HVAC upgrades, renovations or expansions of space that is 44 open to the public; modifications to provide for sustainable, energy 45 efficient spaces that would result in overall energy and cost 46 savings; technology and other equipment that will benefit the 47 public; and accessibility renovations. Up to $10,000,000 shall be 48 made available exclusively for small to midsize eligible nonprofit 49 arts and cultural organizations. Funding from this appropriation 1226 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ARTS AND CULTURAL FACILITIES IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 shall be made available through a competitive process to be deter- 2 mined exclusively by the New York state council on the arts. The 3 determination of this competitive process and guidelines shall be 4 limited to the New York state council on the arts in consultation 5 with the dormitory authority of the state of New York. The guide- 6 lines for the program and competitive process shall ensure that such 7 funding is made available for uses throughout the state and takes 8 into account regional distribution, supports a range of grant awards 9 including a minimum grant of $50,000, and no match requirements for 10 organizations as deemed appropriate by the New York state council on 11 the arts. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the 12 dormitory authority shall be authorized to administer this program 13 and designated state agencies shall provide all necessary assist- 14 ance. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, all or a 15 portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or 16 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 17 (ACNP2308) (85021) ... 20,000,000 ................ (re. $18,249,000) 18 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 19 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 The sum of $40,000,000 is hereby appropriated for payments and grants, 21 including up to $800,000 in costs associated with program adminis- 22 tration to eligible nonprofit arts and cultural organizations for 23 the arts and cultural facilities improvement program. Such program 24 shall provide for targeted investment for capital projects in such 25 eligible arts or cultural facilities to improve the quality, effi- 26 ciency, and accessibility of arts and cultural organizations that 27 benefit New Yorkers. Provided that such investments may include, but 28 are not limited to: renovations and retrofitting to comply with 29 COVID-19 health regulations, including outdoor performance space 30 projects, HVAC upgrades, renovations or expansions of space that is 31 open to the public; modifications to provide for sustainable, energy 32 efficient spaces that would result in overall energy and cost 33 savings; technology and other equipment that will benefit the 34 public; and accessibility renovations. Up to $20,000,000 shall be 35 made available exclusively for small to midsize eligible nonprofit 36 arts and cultural organizations. Funding from this appropriation 37 shall be made available through a competitive process to be deter- 38 mined exclusively by the New York state council on the arts. The 39 determination of this competitive process and guidelines shall be 40 limited to the New York state council on the arts in consultation 41 with the dormitory authority of the state of New York. The guide- 42 lines for the program and competitive process shall ensure that such 43 funding is made available for uses throughout the state and takes 44 into account regional distribution, supports a range of grant awards 45 including a minimum grant of $50,000, and no match requirements for 46 organizations as deemed appropriate by the New York state council on 47 the arts. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the 48 dormitory authority shall be authorized to administer this program 1227 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ARTS AND CULTURAL FACILITIES IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 and designated state agencies shall provide all necessary assist- 2 ance. 3 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of 4 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 5 any department, agency, or public authority (ACNP2208) (85021) ..... 6 40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $26,296,000) 7 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 8 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropriated for payments and grants, 9 including up to $400,000 in costs associated with program adminis- 10 tration to eligible nonprofit arts and cultural organizations for 11 the arts and cultural facilities improvement program. Such program 12 shall provide for targeted investment for capital projects in such 13 eligible arts or cultural facilities to improve the quality, effi- 14 ciency, and accessibility of arts and cultural organizations that 15 benefit New Yorkers. Provided that such investments may include, but 16 are not limited to: renovations and retrofitting to comply with 17 COVID-19 health regulations, including outdoor performance space 18 projects, flexible seating, HVAC and filtration upgrades, reno- 19 vations or expansions of space that is open to the public; modifica- 20 tions to provide for sustainable, energy efficient spaces that would 21 result in overall energy and cost savings; technology and other 22 equipment that will benefit the public; and accessibility reno- 23 vations. Up to $10,000,000 shall be made available exclusively for 24 small to midsize eligible nonprofit arts and cultural organizations. 25 Funding from this appropriation shall be made available through a 26 competitive process to be determined exclusively by the New York 27 state council on the arts. The determination of this competitive 28 process and guidelines shall be limited to the New York state coun- 29 cil on the arts in consultation with the dormitory authority of the 30 state of New York. The guidelines for the program and competitive 31 process shall ensure that such funding is made available for uses 32 throughout the state and takes into account regional distribution, 33 supports a range of grant awards including a minimum grant of 34 $50,000, and no match requirements for organizations as deemed 35 appropriate by the New York state council on the arts. Notwith- 36 standing any inconsistent provision of law, the dormitory authority 37 shall be authorized to administer this program and designated state 38 agencies shall provide all necessary assistance. 39 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of 40 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 41 any department, agency, or public authority (ACNP2108) (85021) ..... 42 20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $11,852,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 44 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for payments and grants, 45 including up to $200,000 in costs associated with program adminis- 46 tration to eligible nonprofit arts and cultural organizations for 47 the arts and cultural facilities improvement program. Such program 48 shall provide for targeted investment for capital projects in such 1228 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ARTS AND CULTURAL FACILITIES IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 eligible arts or cultural facilities to improve the quality, effi- 2 ciency, and accessibility of arts and cultural organizations that 3 benefit New Yorkers. Provided that such investments may include, but 4 are not limited to: renovations or expansions of space that is open 5 to the public; modifications to provide for sustainable, energy 6 efficient spaces that would result in overall energy and cost 7 savings; technology and other equipment that will benefit the 8 public; and accessibility renovations. 9 Up to $5,000,000 in funding from this appropriation shall be made 10 available through a competitive process to be determined exclusively 11 by the New York state council on the arts. The determination of this 12 competitive process and guidelines shall be limited to the New York 13 state council on the arts in consultation with the dormitory author- 14 ity of the state of New York. The guidelines for the program and 15 competitive process shall ensure that such funding is made available 16 for uses throughout the state and takes into account regional 17 distribution, supports a range of grant awards including a minimum 18 grant of $50,000, consideration of a waiver of match requirements 19 for organizations as deemed appropriate by the New York state coun- 20 cil on the arts, and shall be subject to the approval of the direc- 21 tor of the budget. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of 22 law, the dormitory authority shall be authorized to administer this 23 program and designated state agencies shall provide all necessary 24 assistance. 25 Up to $5,000,000 in funding from this appropriation shall be made 26 available through a competitive process that shall include represen- 27 tatives from state agencies to be determined by the director of the 28 budget and the guidelines for the program and competitive process 29 shall also ensure that such funding is made available for uses 30 throughout the state and takes into account regional distribution, 31 and shall be subject to the approval of the director of the budget. 32 Such representatives from state agencies shall include, but not be 33 limited to, the New York state council on the arts, and for purposes 34 of this appropriation shall also include the dormitory authority of 35 the state of New York. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of 36 law, the dormitory authority shall be authorized to administer this 37 program and designated state agencies shall provide all necessary 38 assistance. 39 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of 40 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 41 any department, agency, or public authority (ACNP1808) (85021) ..... 42 10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,580,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 44 The sum of $10,000,000 is hereby appropriated for payments and grants 45 to eligible nonprofit arts and cultural organizations for the arts 46 and cultural facilities improvement program. Such program shall 47 provide for targeted investment for capital projects in such eligi- 48 ble arts or cultural facilities to improve the quality, efficiency, 49 and accessibility of arts and cultural organizations that benefit 1229 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ARTS AND CULTURAL FACILITIES IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 New Yorkers. Provided that such investments may include, but are not 2 limited to: renovations or expansions of space that is open to the 3 public; modifications to provide for sustainable, energy efficient 4 spaces that would result in overall energy and cost savings; tech- 5 nology and other equipment that will benefit the public; and acces- 6 sibility renovations. 7 Funding from this appropriation shall be made available through a 8 competitive process that shall include representatives from state 9 agencies to be determined by the director of the budget and the 10 guidelines for the program and competitive process shall also ensure 11 that such funding is made available for uses throughout the state 12 and takes into account regional distribution, and shall be subject 13 to the approval of the director of the budget. Such representatives 14 from state agencies shall include, but not be limited to, the New 15 York state council on the arts, and for purposes of this appropri- 16 ation shall also include the dormitory authority of the state of New 17 York. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the dormi- 18 tory authority shall be authorized to administer this program and 19 designated state agencies shall provide all necessary assistance. 20 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of 21 the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to 22 any department, agency, or public authority (ACNP1708) (85021) ..... 23 10,000,000 .......................................... (re. $710,000) 1230 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES COMMUNITY ENHANCEMENT FACILITIES ASSISTANCE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 1,000,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 0 1,000,000 5 ================ ================ 6 COMMUNITY ENHANCEMENT FACILITIES ASSISTANCE (CCP) 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 9 Community Enhancement Purpose 10 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 2, of the laws of 1997, as 11 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is hereby 12 amended and reappropriated to read: 13 The sum of $423,500,000 is hereby appropriated, in accordance with 14 chapter 432 of the laws of 1997 establishing the community enhance- 15 ment facilities assistance program, for community enhancement facil- 16 ities assistance projects. Eligible community enhancement facilities 17 assistance project(s) shall include, but not be limited to economic 18 development projects to be located within the county of Nassau 19 ($15,000,000), provided that the allocation made available to the 20 Governor, as authorized by paragraph one of the memorandum of under- 21 standing governing administration of the community enhancement 22 facilities assistance program, shall be reduced by $1,500,000 to 23 $140,166,666. 24 Funding for community enhancement facilities assistance projects may 25 be provided from the proceeds of bonds or notes issued in accordance 26 with chapter 432 of the laws of 1997 authorizing the issuance of 27 bonds and notes for community enhancement facilities projects. All 28 or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated to 29 any department, agency, or public authority. All or a portion of the 30 funds appropriated hereby may be transferred to any department, 31 agency, or public authority. Notwithstanding any provision of law to 32 the contrary, funds appropriated herein shall only be available for 33 commitments made on or before September 15, 2026. For purposes of 34 this reappropriation, commitments shall mean any new project nomi- 35 nation submitted to any department, agency, or public authority 36 pursuant to the appropriation herein (91CF97A3) (80551) ............ 37 423,500,000 ....................................... (re. $1,000,000) 1231 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES COMMUNITY RESILIENCY, ECONOMIC SUSTAINABILITY, AND TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 COMMUNITY RESILIENCY, ECONOMIC SUSTAINABILITY, AND TECH- 2 NOLOGY PROGRAM (CCP) ..................................... 385,000,000 3 -------------- 4 Capital Projects Funds - Other 5 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 6 Community Resiliency Purpose 7 The sum of $385,000,000 is hereby appropri- 8 ated for the Community Resiliency, Econom- 9 ic Sustainability, and Technology program. 10 Funds appropriated herein shall be for: 11 (i) grants for the payment of the capital 12 costs of acquisition, design, 13 construction, reconstruction, demolition, 14 rehabilitation, preservation, development, 15 improvement, or modernization of an exist- 16 ing or proposed facility or other property 17 real and personal, and other appurtenances 18 thereto; (ii) grants for the acquisition 19 of bond eligible equipment and other bond 20 eligible capital assets purchased for 21 installation onto infrastructure that is 22 owned or controlled by the grant recipient 23 or appurtenant thereto, provided that in 24 cases involving the acquisition of non- 25 fixed equipment and capital assets, 26 including vehicles, such assets shall 27 solely be used by the grant recipient; and 28 (iii) grants for the acquisition of bond 29 eligible equipment and other bond eligible 30 capital assets, provided that such equip- 31 ment and other capital assets are 32 purchased for installation onto infras- 33 tructure that is owned or controlled by 34 the grant recipient or appurtenant there- 35 to, provided that in cases involving the 36 acquisition of non-fixed equipment and 37 capital assets, including vehicles, such 38 assets shall solely be used by the grant 39 recipient. Eligible purposes shall include 40 but not be limited to projects intended to 41 improve the quality of life of the resi- 42 dents of the State of New York through 43 investment in facilities which support 44 arts, cultural, athletic, housing, child 45 care, educational, parks and recreational, 46 transportation, port development, economic 47 development, workforce training, employ- 1232 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES COMMUNITY RESILIENCY, ECONOMIC SUSTAINABILITY, AND TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 ment development, tourism, community rede- 2 velopment, climate change mitigation, 3 resiliency, environmental sustainability, 4 and other civic activities. Any projects 5 in support of port development, economic 6 development, workforce training, or 7 employment development shall create or 8 retain jobs or catalyze economic activity 9 in New York State as certified by the 10 commissioner of the department of economic 11 development. Individual grants issued 12 pursuant to this appropriation shall be in 13 an amount no less than $50,000. Funding 14 under this appropriation shall be pursuant 15 to a plan agreed to by the director of the 16 budget, speaker of the assembly, and pres- 17 ident pro temp of the senate. Notwith- 18 standing any provision of law to the 19 contrary, funds appropriated herein may be 20 (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred from 21 this appropriation to any other appropri- 22 ation of any state department, agency, 23 public benefit corporation, or public 24 authority, or (iii) suballocated to any 25 other state department, agency or public 26 benefit corporation, to achieve this 27 purpose (CR002609) (85106) ................. 385,000,000 28 -------------- 1233 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES COMMUNITY RESILIENCY, ECONOMIC SUSTAINABILITY, AND TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 COMMUNITY RESILIENCY, ECONOMIC SUSTAINABILITY, AND TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM 2 (CCP) 3 Capital Projects Funds - Other 4 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 5 Community Resiliency Purpose 6 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 7 The sum of $385,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Community Resi- 8 liency, Economic Sustainability, and Technology program. Funds 9 appropriated herein shall be for: (i) grants for the payment of the 10 capital costs of acquisition, design, construction, reconstruction, 11 demolition, rehabilitation, preservation, development, improvement, 12 or modernization of an existing or proposed facility or other prop- 13 erty real and personal, and other appurtenances thereto; (ii) grants 14 for the acquisition of bond eligible equipment and other bond eligi- 15 ble capital assets purchased for installation onto infrastructure 16 that is owned or controlled by the grant recipient or appurtenant 17 thereto, provided that in cases involving the acquisition of non- 18 fixed equipment and capital assets, including vehicles, such assets 19 shall solely be used by the grant recipient; and (iii) grants for 20 the acquisition of bond eligible equipment and other bond eligible 21 capital assets, provided that such equipment and other capital 22 assets are purchased for installation onto infrastructure that is 23 owned or controlled by the grant recipient or appurtenant thereto, 24 provided that in cases involving the acquisition of non-fixed equip- 25 ment and capital assets, including vehicles, such assets shall sole- 26 ly be used by the grant recipient. Eligible purposes shall include 27 but not be limited to projects intended to improve the quality of 28 life of the residents of the State of New York through investment in 29 facilities which support arts, cultural, athletic, housing, child 30 care, educational, parks and recreational, transportation, port 31 development, economic development, workforce training, employment 32 development, tourism, community redevelopment, climate change miti- 33 gation, resiliency, environmental sustainability, and other civic 34 activities. Any projects in support of port development, economic 35 development, workforce training, or employment development shall 36 create or retain jobs or catalyze economic activity in New York 37 State as certified by the commissioner of the department of economic 38 development. Individual grants issued pursuant to this appropri- 39 ation shall be in an amount no less than $50,000. Funding under this 40 appropriation shall be pursuant to a plan agreed to by the director 41 of the budget, speaker of the assembly, and president pro temp of 42 the senate. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 43 funds appropriated herein may be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred 44 from this appropriation to any other appropriation of any state 45 department, agency, public benefit corporation, or public authority, 46 or (iii) suballocated to any other state department, agency or 1234 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES COMMUNITY RESILIENCY, ECONOMIC SUSTAINABILITY, AND TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 public benefit corporation, to achieve this purpose (CR002509) 2 (85106) ... 385,000,000 ......................... (re. $385,000,000) 3 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 4 The sum of $385,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Community Resi- 5 liency, Economic Sustainability, and Technology program. Funds 6 appropriated herein shall be for: (i) grants for the payment of the 7 capital costs of acquisition, design, construction, reconstruction, 8 demolition, rehabilitation, preservation, development, improvement, 9 or modernization of an existing or proposed facility or other prop- 10 erty real and personal, and other appurtenances thereto; (ii) grants 11 for the acquisition of bond eligible equipment and other bond eligi- 12 ble capital assets purchased for installation onto infrastructure 13 that is owned or controlled by the grant recipient or appurtenant 14 thereto, provided that in cases involving the acquisition of non- 15 fixed equipment and capital assets, including vehicles, such assets 16 shall solely be used by the grant recipient; and (iii) grants for 17 the acquisition of bond eligible equipment and other bond eligible 18 capital assets, provided that such equipment and other capital 19 assets are purchased for installation onto infrastructure that is 20 owned or controlled by the grant recipient or appurtenant thereto, 21 provided that in cases involving the acquisition of non-fixed equip- 22 ment and capital assets, including vehicles, such assets shall sole- 23 ly be used by the grant recipient. Eligible purposes shall include 24 but not be limited to projects intended to improve the quality of 25 life of the residents of the State of New York through investment in 26 facilities which support arts, cultural, athletic, housing, child 27 care, educational, parks and recreational, transportation, port 28 development, economic development, workforce training, employment 29 development, tourism, community redevelopment, climate change miti- 30 gation, resiliency, environmental sustainability, and other civic 31 activities. Any projects in support of port development, economic 32 development, workforce training, or employment development shall 33 create or retain jobs or catalyze economic activity in New York 34 State as certified by the commissioner of the department of economic 35 development. Individual grants issued pursuant to this appropriation 36 shall be in an amount no less than $50,000. Funding under this 37 appropriation shall be pursuant to a plan agreed to by the director 38 of the budget, speaker of the assembly, and president pro temp of 39 the senate. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 40 funds appropriated herein may be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred 41 from this appropriation to any other appropriation of any state 42 department, agency, public benefit corporation, or public authority, 43 or (iii) suballocated to any other state department, agency or 44 public benefit corporation, to achieve this purpose (CR002409) 45 (85106) ... 385,000,000 ......................... (re. $385,000,000) 46 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 54, 47 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 1235 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES COMMUNITY RESILIENCY, ECONOMIC SUSTAINABILITY, AND TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 The sum of $385,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Community Resi- 2 liency, Economic Sustainability, and Technology program. Funds 3 appropriated herein shall be for: (i) grants for the payment of the 4 capital costs of acquisition, design, construction, reconstruction, 5 demolition, rehabilitation, preservation, development, improvement, 6 or modernization of an existing or proposed facility or other prop- 7 erty real and personal, and other appurtenances thereto; (ii) grants 8 for the acquisition of bond eligible equipment and other bond eligi- 9 ble capital assets purchased for installation onto infrastructure 10 that is owned or controlled by the grant recipient or appurtenant 11 thereto, provided that in cases involving the acquisition of non- 12 fixed equipment and capital assets, including vehicles, such assets 13 shall solely be used by the grant recipient; and (iii) grants for 14 the acquisition of bond eligible equipment and other bond eligible 15 capital assets, provided that such equipment and other capital 16 assets are purchased for installation onto infrastructure that is 17 owned or controlled by the grant recipient or appurtenant thereto, 18 provided that in cases involving the acquisition of non-fixed equip- 19 ment and capital assets, including vehicles, such assets shall sole- 20 ly be used by the grant recipient. Eligible purposes shall include 21 but not be limited to projects intended to improve the quality of 22 life of the residents of the State of New York through investment in 23 facilities which support arts, cultural, athletic, housing, child 24 care, educational, parks and recreational, transportation, port 25 development, economic development, workforce training, employment 26 development, tourism, community redevelopment, climate change miti- 27 gation, resiliency, environmental sustainability, and other civic 28 activities. Any projects in support of port development, economic 29 development, workforce training, or employment development shall 30 create or retain jobs or catalyze economic activity in New York 31 State as certified by the commissioner of the department of economic 32 development. Individual grants issued pursuant to this appropriation 33 shall be in an amount no less than $50,000. Funding under this 34 appropriation shall be pursuant to a plan agreed to by the director 35 of the budget, speaker of the assembly, and president pro temp of 36 the senate. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 37 funds appropriated herein may be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred 38 from this appropriation to any other appropriation of any state 39 department, agency, public benefit corporation, or public authority, 40 or (iii) suballocated to any other state department, agency or 41 public benefit corporation, to achieve this purpose (CR002309) 42 (85106) ... 385,000,000 ......................... (re. $385,000,000) 43 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 44 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 45 The sum of $385,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Community Resi- 46 liency, Economic Sustainability, and Technology program. Funds 47 appropriated herein shall be for: (i) grants for the payment of the 48 capital costs of acquisition, design, construction, reconstruction, 1236 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES COMMUNITY RESILIENCY, ECONOMIC SUSTAINABILITY, AND TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 demolition, rehabilitation, preservation, development, improvement, 2 or modernization of an existing or proposed facility or other prop- 3 erty real and personal, and other appurtenances thereto; (ii) grants 4 for the acquisition of bond eligible equipment and other bond eligi- 5 ble capital assets purchased for installation onto infrastructure 6 that is owned or controlled by the grant recipient or appurtenant 7 thereto, provided that in cases involving the acquisition of non- 8 fixed equipment and capital assets, including vehicles, such assets 9 shall solely be used by the grant recipient; and (iii) grants for 10 the acquisition of bond eligible equipment and other bond eligible 11 capital assets, provided that such equipment and other capital 12 assets are purchased for installation onto infrastructure that is 13 owned or controlled by the grant recipient or appurtenant thereto, 14 provided that in cases involving the acquisition of non-fixed equip- 15 ment and capital assets, including vehicles, such assets shall sole- 16 ly be used by the grant recipient. Eligible purposes shall include 17 but not be limited to projects intended to improve the quality of 18 life of the residents of the State of New York through investment in 19 facilities which support arts, cultural, athletic, housing, child 20 care, educational, parks and recreational, transportation, port 21 development, economic development, workforce training, employment 22 development, tourism, community redevelopment, climate change miti- 23 gation, resiliency, environmental sustainability, and other civic 24 activities. Any projects in support of port development, economic 25 development, workforce training, or employment development shall 26 create or retain jobs or catalyze economic activity in New York 27 State as certified by the commissioner of the department of economic 28 development. Individual grants issued pursuant to this appropriation 29 shall be in an amount no less than $50,000. Funding under this 30 appropriation shall be pursuant to a plan agreed to by the director 31 of the budget, speaker of the assembly, and president pro temp of 32 the senate. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 33 funds appropriated herein may be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred 34 from this appropriation to any other appropriation of any state 35 department, agency, public benefit corporation, or public authority, 36 or (iii) suballocated to any other state department, agency or 37 public benefit corporation, to achieve this purpose (CR002209) 38 (85106) ... 385,000,000 ......................... (re. $309,132,000) 1237 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT - CAPITAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other...... 0 104,269,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 0 104,269,000 5 ================ ================ 6 REGIONAL DEVELOPMENT (CCP) 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 9 Regional Development Purpose 10 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as 11 transferred by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2012, is hereby 12 amended and reappropriated to read: 13 For services and expenses of the following purposes, pursuant to a 14 memorandum of understanding to be executed by the governor, the 15 temporary president of the senate and the speaker of the assembly: 16 the Empire Opportunity Fund, as established pursuant to Part T of 17 chapter 84 of the laws of 2002; Rebuilding the Empire State Through 18 Opportunities in Regional Economies (RESTORE) New York, as estab- 19 lished pursuant to Part T of chapter 84 of the laws of 2002; and the 20 Community Capital Assistance Program, as established pursuant to 21 Part T of chapter 84 of the laws of 2002, provided that the allo- 22 cation made available to the governor, as authorized by paragraph 23 one of the memorandum of understanding governing administration of 24 the above named programs, shall be reduced by $6,675,000 to 25 $118,325,000. 26 Notwithstanding any other inconsistent provision of law, none of the 27 funds appropriated hereto, as delineated in the below project sched- 28 ule, may be interchanged among project purposes. All or a portion of 29 the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to 30 any department, agency, or public authority. Notwithstanding any 31 other inconsistent provision of law, this appropriation may not be 32 disbursed prior to the enactment of an appropriation for the expend- 33 iture from the community projects fund and the execution of a memo- 34 randum of understanding for the allocation and transfer of funds 35 into various accounts pursuant to section 99-d of the state finance 36 law. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds 37 appropriated herein shall only be available for commitments made on 38 or before September 15, 2026. For purposes of this reappropriation, 39 commitments shall mean any new project nomination submitted to any 40 department, agency, or public authority pursuant to the appropri- 41 ation herein (71E404A3) (80594) .................................... 42 243,325,000 ...................................... (re. $45,218,000) 43 Project Schedule 44 PROJECT AMOUNT 45 Empire Opportunity Fund ...................... 118,325,000 1238 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT - CAPITAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Community Capital Assistance Program .......... 62,500,000 2 Rebuilding the Empire State Through Opportu- 3 nities in Regional Economies (RESTORE) New 4 York, and the Community Capital Assistance 5 Program ..................................... 62,500,000 6 -------------- 7 243,325,000 8 ============== 9 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 2, of the laws of 2002, as 10 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, is hereby 11 amended and reappropriated to read: 12 For services and expenses of the following purposes, pursuant to a 13 memorandum of understanding to be executed by the governor, the 14 temporary president of the senate and the speaker of the assembly: 15 Centers of Excellence, as established pursuant to chapter 84 of the 16 laws of 2002; the Empire Opportunity Fund, as established pursuant 17 to chapter 84 of the laws of 2002; Gen*NY*sis, as established pursu- 18 ant to chapter 84 of the laws of 2002; Rebuilding the Empire State 19 Through Opportunities in Regional Economies (RESTORE) New York, as 20 established pursuant to chapter 84 of the laws of 2002; for trans- 21 portation capital projects in accordance with the provisions of 22 subdivisions 3 and 4 of section 14-k of the transportation law, and 23 sections 89-b and 89-c of the state finance law; and the Community 24 Capital Assistance Program, as established pursuant to chapter 84 of 25 the laws of 2002, provided that the allocation made available to the 26 governor, as authorized by paragraph seven of the memorandum of 27 understanding governing administration of the above named programs, 28 shall be reduced by $10,300,000 to $289,700,000. 29 No moneys of the state in the state treasury or any of its funds shall 30 be available for payments pursuant to this appropriation. Funding 31 for the purposes delineated in this appropriation shall be provided 32 from the proceeds of bonds or notes issued pursuant to chapter 84 of 33 the laws of 2002. Notwithstanding any other inconsistent provision 34 of law, none of the funds appropriated hereto, as delineated in the 35 below project schedule, may be inter changed among project purposes. 36 All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo- 37 cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority. 38 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds appro- 39 priated herein shall only be available for commitments made on or 40 before September 15, 2026. For purposes of this reappropriation, 41 commitments shall mean any new project nomination submitted to any 42 department, agency, or public authority pursuant to the appropri- 43 ation herein (71E102A3) (80593) .................................... 44 589,700,000 ...................................... (re. $59,051,000) 45 Project Schedule 46 PROJECT AMOUNT 47 -------------------------------------------- 48 Centers of Excellence, and 1239 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT - CAPITAL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Empire Opportunity Fund ...... 289,700,000 2 Gen*NY*sis, Transportation 3 Capital Projects, and the 4 Community Capital Assistance 5 Program ...................... 150,000,000 6 Rebuilding the Empire State 7 Through Opportunities in 8 Regional Economies (RESTORE) 9 New York, Transportation 10 Capital Projects, and the 11 Community Capital Assistance 12 Program ...................... 150,000,000 13 -------------- 14 Total ........................ 589,700,000 15 ============== 1240 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 42,671,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 0 42,671,000 5 ================ ================ 6 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM (CCP) 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 9 Economic Development Purpose 10 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as 11 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is hereby 12 amended and reappropriated to read: 13 The sum of $75,000,000 is hereby appropriated to the New York State 14 economic development program (CCP) out of any moneys in the state 15 treasury in the general fund to the credit of the capital projects 16 fund, not otherwise appropriated, and made immediately available, 17 for the purpose of economic development projects outside cities with 18 a population of one million or more pursuant to a memorandum of 19 understanding to be executed by the governor, the temporary presi- 20 dent of the senate and the speaker of the assembly. All or portions 21 of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated to any depart- 22 ment, agency, or public authority. All or portions of the funds 23 appropriated hereby may be transferred to any department, agency, or 24 public authority. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 25 contrary, funds appropriated herein shall only be available for 26 commitments made on or before September 15, 2026. For purposes of 27 this reappropriation, commitments shall mean any new project nomi- 28 nation submitted to any department, agency, or public authority 29 pursuant to the appropriation herein (DP000509) (80380) ............ 30 75,000,000 ....................................... (re. $40,676,000) 31 The appropriation made by chapter 3, section 29, of the laws of 2004, as 32 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is hereby 33 amended and reappropriated to read: 34 The sum of three hundred forty-five million seven hundred fifty thou- 35 sand dollars ($345,750,000), or so much thereof as may be necessary, 36 is hereby appropriated to the New York state economic development 37 program (CCP) out of any moneys in the state treasury in the general 38 fund to the credit of the capital projects fund, not otherwise 39 appropriated, and made immediately available, for the purpose of 40 economic development projects outside cities with a population of 41 one million or more pursuant to a memorandum of understanding to be 42 executed by the governor, the temporary president of the senate and 43 the speaker of the assembly, provided that the allocation made 44 available to the governor, as authorized by paragraph one of the 45 memorandum of understanding governing administration of the New York 1241 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 state economic development program, shall be reduced by $4,250,000 2 to $162,416,000. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby 3 may be suballocated to any department, agency, or public authority. 4 All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be transferred 5 to any department, agency, or public authority. Notwithstanding any 6 provision of law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein shall 7 only be available for commitments made on or before September 15, 8 2026. For purposes of this reappropriation, commitments shall mean 9 any new project nomination submitted to any department, agency, or 10 public authority pursuant to the appropriation herein (DP010409) 11 (80380) ... 345,750,000 ........................... (re. $1,995,000) 1242 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES HIGH TECHNOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 HIGH TECHNOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Regional Development Purpose 5 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as 6 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is hereby 7 amended and reappropriated to read: 8 For services and expenses of the New York state technology and devel- 9 opment program pursuant to a memorandum of understanding to be 10 executed by the governor, the temporary president of the senate, and 11 the speaker of the assembly, provided that the allocation made 12 available to the governor, as authorized by paragraphs one and three 13 of the memorandum of understanding governing administration of the 14 New York state technology and development program, shall be reduced 15 by $1,000,000 to $93,054,000. 16 All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated 17 to any department, agency, or public authority. All or a portion of 18 the funds appropriated hereby may be transferred to any department, 19 agency, or public authority. Notwithstanding any provision of law 20 to the contrary, funds appropriated herein shall only be available 21 for commitments made on or before September 15, 2026. For purposes 22 of this reappropriation, commitments shall mean any new project 23 nomination submitted to any department, agency, or public authority 24 pursuant to the appropriation herein (TD0005RD) (80595) ............ 25 249,000,000 ...................................... (re. $36,251,000) 1243 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES HIGHER EDUCATION FACILITIES CAPITAL MATCHING GRANTS PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 40,000,000 172,639,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 40,000,000 172,639,000 8 ================ ================ 9 HIGHER EDUCATION CAPITAL MATCHING GRANTS (CCP) .............. 40,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Capital Matching Grants Purpose 14 The sum of $40,000,000 is hereby appropri- 15 ated for the higher education facilities 16 capital matching grants program. Awards 17 and grants shall be administered by the 18 New York state higher education capital 19 matching grant board created pursuant to 20 part U of chapter 63 of the laws of 2005 21 as amended (MG0926MG) (42301) ............... 40,000,000 1244 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES HIGHER EDUCATION FACILITIES CAPITAL MATCHING GRANTS PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 HIGHER EDUCATION CAPITAL MATCHING GRANTS (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Capital Matching Grants Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 The sum of $40,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the higher education 7 facilities capital matching grants program. Awards and grants shall 8 be administered by the New York state higher education capital 9 matching grant board created pursuant to part U of chapter 63 of the 10 laws of 2005 as amended (MG0924MG) (42301) ......................... 11 40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $40,000,000) 12 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 The sum of $40,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the higher education 14 facilities capital matching grants program. Awards and grants shall 15 be administered by the New York state higher education capital 16 matching grant board created pursuant to part U of chapter 63 of the 17 laws of 2005 as amended (MG0923MG) (42301) ......................... 18 40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $40,000,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 20 The sum of $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the higher education 21 facilities capital matching grants program. Awards and grants shall 22 be administered by the New York state higher education capital 23 matching grant board created pursuant to part U of chapter 63 of the 24 laws of 2005 as amended (MG0922MG) (42301) ......................... 25 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $30,000,000) 26 For additional funding for the higher education facilities capital 27 matching grants program. Awards and grants shall be administered by 28 the New York state higher education capital matching grant board 29 created pursuant to part U of chapter 63 of the laws of 2005 as 30 amended (MG1022MG) (42301) ... 15,000,000 ........ (re. $15,000,000) 31 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as added by chapter 314, 32 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 33 The sum of $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the higher education 34 facilities capital matching grants program. Awards and grants shall 35 be administered by the New York state higher education capital 36 matching grant board created pursuant to part U of chapter 63 of the 37 laws of 2005 as amended (MG0919MG) (42301) ......................... 38 30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $18,992,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 40 The sum of $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the higher education 41 facilities capital matching grants program. Awards and grants shall 42 be administered by the New York state higher education capital 43 matching grant board created pursuant to part U of chapter 63 of the 1245 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES HIGHER EDUCATION FACILITIES CAPITAL MATCHING GRANTS PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 laws of 2005 as amended (MG0918MG) (42301) ......................... 2 30,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,075,000) 3 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 4 The sum of $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the higher education 5 facilities capital matching grants program. Awards and grants shall 6 be administered by the New York state higher education capital 7 matching grant board created pursuant to part U of chapter 63 of the 8 laws of 2005 as amended (MG0816MG) (42301) ......................... 9 30,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,731,000) 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 11 The sum of $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the higher education 12 facilities capital matching grants program. Awards and grants shall 13 be administered by the New York state higher education capital 14 matching grant board created pursuant to part U of chapter 63 of the 15 laws of 2005 as amended (MG0815MG) (42301) ......................... 16 30,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,095,000) 17 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 18 The sum of $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the higher education 19 facilities capital matching grants program. Awards and grants shall 20 be administered by the New York state higher education capital 21 matching grant board created pursuant to part U of chapter 63 of the 22 laws of 2005 as amended (MG0814MG) (42301) ......................... 23 30,000,000 .......................................... (re. $596,000) 24 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 54, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2013: 26 The sum of $150,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the higher educa- 27 tion facilities capital matching grants program. Awards and grants 28 shall be administered by the New York state higher education capital 29 matching grant board created pursuant to part U of chapter 63 of the 30 laws of 2005 as amended (MG0805MG) (42301) ......................... 31 150,000,000 ...................................... (re. $14,150,000) 1246 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES HUDSON RIVER VALLEY GREENWAY COMMUNITIES COUNCIL CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 5,757,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 0 5,757,000 8 ================ ================ 9 EMPIRE STATE TRAIL (CCP) 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 12 Environment and Recreation Purpose 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 14 For the costs and expenses, including personal services, nonpersonal 15 services, fringe benefits and indirect costs of projects related to 16 improvements, alterations, rehabilitation and completion of the 17 Empire State Trail network in the hudson river valley, champlain 18 valley and along the erie canal, including the payment of liabil- 19 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2017. All or a portion of the funds 20 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 21 department, agency or public authority (80ET17ER) (81112) .......... 22 123,000,000 ....................................... (re. $5,757,000) 1247 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES INFLATION REDUCTION ACT ELECTIVE PAY PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 10,000,000 0 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 10,000,000 0 8 ================ ================ 9 IRA ELECTIVE PAY (CCP) ...................................... 10,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Miscellaneous Capital Projects Fund 13 IRA Elective Pay Federal Capital Account - 32233 14 Environmental Protection or Improvements Purpose 15 For the expenditure of federal tax credit 16 refunds including but not limited to those 17 funds provided under 26 U.S.C. 6417 for 18 capital works or purposes, including the 19 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 20 April 1, 2026, as determined by the direc- 21 tor of the budget. The director of the 22 budget shall produce a report on expendi- 23 tures from this appropriation on or before 24 September 15 annually. Such report shall 25 be submitted to the chair of the senate 26 finance committee and the chair of the 27 assembly ways and means committee. All or 28 a portion of the funds appropriated hereby 29 may be suballocated or transferred to any 30 department, agency or public authority 31 (IR022606) (85118) .......................... 10,000,000 1248 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES JACOB JAVITS CONVENTION CENTER CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 350,000,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 0 350,000,000 8 ================ ================ 9 JACOB JAVITS CONVENTION CENTER (CCP) 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 12 Economic Development Purpose 13 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 14 For services and expenses of the Jacob Javits Convention Center expan- 15 sion project, as authorized pursuant to chapter 3 of the laws of 16 2004. Any disbursements made pursuant to this appropriation shall be 17 reimbursed with the proceeds of bonds authorized pursuant to chapter 18 3 of the laws of 2004 to finance the Jacob Javits Convention Center 19 expansion project. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby 20 may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or 21 public authority (CC000509) (80597) ................................ 22 350,000,000 ..................................... (re. $350,000,000) 1249 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LAKE ONTARIO RESILIENCY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 8,112,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 0 8,112,000 8 ================ ================ 9 LAKE ONTARIO RESILIENCY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT (CCP) 10 Capital Projects Funds - Other 11 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 12 Lake Ontario Resiliency and Economic Development Purpose 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as added by chapter 314, 14 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 15 The sum of $100,000,000 is hereby appropriated for Lake Ontario resi- 16 liency and economic development projects and purposes. Funds appro- 17 priated herein shall be for services and expenses, loans, grants, 18 and costs of program administration related to hardening infrastruc- 19 ture along the Lake Ontario waterfront and strengthening local econ- 20 omies within the region, including but not limited to projects or 21 priorities recommended by the Lake Ontario Resiliency and Economic 22 Development Initiative Commission. All or a portion of this appro- 23 priation may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agen- 24 cy, or public authority (02011909) (85030) ......................... 25 100,000,000 ....................................... (re. $8,112,000) 1250 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LOCAL COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 LOCAL COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Local Community Purpose 5 Funds appropriated herein shall be made 6 available by transferring and consolidat- 7 ing the following programs and uncommitted 8 balances in the approximate amounts from 9 chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025 10 - the community enhancement facilities 11 assistance program, community enhancement 12 facilities assistance (CCP), community 13 enhancement purpose; the economic develop- 14 ment - capital, regional development 15 program (CCP), regional development 16 purpose; the economic development program, 17 economic development program (CCP), 18 economic development purpose; the high 19 technology and development program, high 20 technology and development (CCP), regional 21 development purpose; the regional economic 22 development program, regional development 23 (CCP), regional development purpose; and 24 the strategic investment program, strate- 25 gic investment program (CCP), strategic 26 investment program purpose: 27 The sum of $38,096,000 is hereby appropri- 28 ated for the Statewide Local Community 29 Assistance Program. Funds appropriated 30 herein shall be for: (i) grants for the 31 acquisition of vehicles, and for payment 32 of the capital costs of acquisition, 33 design, construction, reconstruction, 34 demolition, rehabilitation and improvement 35 of an existing or proposed facility or 36 other property real and personal, and 37 other appurtenances thereto; (ii) grants 38 for the acquisition of bond eligible 39 equipment and other bond eligible capital 40 assets purchased for installation or use 41 in infrastructure that is owned or 42 controlled by the grant recipient or 43 appurtenant thereto; and (iii) grants for 44 the acquisition of bond eligible equipment 45 and other bond eligible capital assets, 46 provided that such equipment and other 47 capital assets are purchased for installa- 48 tion onto infrastructure that is owned or 1251 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LOCAL COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 controlled by the grant recipient or 2 appurtenant thereto. Eligible purposes 3 shall include but not be limited to 4 projects that support community develop- 5 ment or redevelopment, revitalization, 6 economic development, economic sustaina- 7 bility, arts and cultural development, 8 housing, public security and safety and 9 local infrastructure improvement or 10 enhancement. Eligible entities may include 11 municipal and state governmental entities, 12 public authorities and not-for-profit 13 corporations. Individual grants issued 14 pursuant to this appropriation shall be in 15 an amount no less than $50,000. Notwith- 16 standing any provision of law to the 17 contrary, funds appropriated herein may, 18 subject to the approval of the director of 19 the budget, be (i) interchanged, (ii) 20 transferred from this appropriation to any 21 other appropriation of any state depart- 22 ment, agency, public benefit corporation, 23 or public authority, or (iii) suballocated 24 to any other state department, agency or 25 public benefit corporation, to achieve 26 this purpose (LO122609) ..................... 38,096,000 27 The sum of $118,116,000 is hereby appropri- 28 ated for the Adaptive Local Community 29 Assistance Program. Funds appropriated 30 herein shall be for: (i) grants for the 31 acquisition of vehicles, and for payment 32 of the capital costs of acquisition, 33 design, construction, reconstruction, 34 demolition, rehabilitation and improvement 35 of an existing or proposed facility or 36 other property real and personal, and 37 other appurtenances thereto; (ii) grants 38 for the acquisition of bond eligible 39 equipment and other bond eligible capital 40 assets purchased for installation or use 41 in infrastructure that is owned or 42 controlled by the grant recipient or 43 appurtenant thereto; and (iii) grants for 44 the acquisition of bond eligible equipment 45 and other bond eligible capital assets, 46 provided that such equipment and other 47 capital assets are purchased for installa- 48 tion onto infrastructure that is owned or 49 controlled by the grant recipient or 50 appurtenant thereto. Eligible purposes 1252 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LOCAL COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 shall include but not be limited to 2 projects that support community develop- 3 ment or redevelopment, revitalization, 4 economic development, economic sustaina- 5 bility, arts and cultural development, 6 housing, public security and safety and 7 local infrastructure improvement or 8 enhancement. Eligible entities may include 9 municipal and state governmental entities, 10 public authorities and not-for-profit 11 corporations. Individual grants issued 12 pursuant to this appropriation shall be in 13 an amount no less than $50,000. Notwith- 14 standing any provision of law to the 15 contrary, funds appropriated herein may, 16 subject to the approval of the director of 17 the budget, be (i) interchanged, (ii) 18 transferred from this appropriation to any 19 other appropriation of any state depart- 20 ment, agency, public benefit corporation, 21 or public authority, or (iii) suballocated 22 to any other state department, agency or 23 public benefit corporation, to achieve 24 this purpose (LO132609) .................... 118,116,000 25 -------------- 1253 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LOCAL COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 LOCAL COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Local Community Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 54, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 7 The sum of $100,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Local Community 8 Assistance Program. Funds appropriated herein shall be for: (i) 9 grants for the acquisition of vehicles, and for payment of the capi- 10 tal costs of acquisition, design, construction, reconstruction, 11 demolition, rehabilitation and improvement of an existing or 12 proposed facility or other property real and personal, and other 13 appurtenances thereto; (ii) grants for the acquisition of bond 14 eligible equipment and other bond eligible capital assets purchased 15 for installation or use in infrastructure that is owned or 16 controlled by the grant recipient or appurtenant thereto; and (iii) 17 grants for the acquisition of bond eligible equipment and other bond 18 eligible capital assets, provided that such equipment and other 19 capital assets are purchased for installation onto infrastructure 20 that is owned or controlled by the grant recipient or appurtenant 21 thereto. Eligible purposes shall include but not be limited to 22 projects that support community development or redevelopment, revi- 23 talization, economic development, economic sustainability, arts and 24 cultural development, housing, public security and safety and local 25 infrastructure improvement or enhancement. Eligible entities may 26 include municipal and state governmental entities, public authori- 27 ties and not-for-profit corporations. Individual grants issued 28 pursuant to this appropriation shall be in an amount no less than 29 $50,000. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds 30 appropriated herein may, subject to the approval of the director of 31 the budget, be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred from this appro- 32 priation to any other appropriation of any state department, agency, 33 public benefit corporation, or public authority, or (iii) suballo- 34 cated to any other state department, agency or public benefit corpo- 35 ration, to achieve this purpose (LO112409) (85104) ................. 36 100,000,000 ..................................... (re. $100,000,000) 37 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 39 The sum of $185,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Local Community 40 Assistance Program. Funds appropriated herein shall be for: (i) 41 grants for the acquisition of vehicles, and for payment of the capi- 42 tal costs of acquisition, design, construction, reconstruction, 43 demolition, rehabilitation and improvement of an existing or 44 proposed facility or other property real and personal, and other 45 appurtenances thereto; (ii) grants for the acquisition of bond 46 eligible equipment and other bond eligible capital assets purchased 47 for installation or use in infrastructure that is owned or 1254 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LOCAL COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 controlled by the grant recipient or appurtenant thereto; and (iii) 2 grants for the acquisition of bond eligible equipment and other bond 3 eligible capital assets, provided that such equipment and other 4 capital assets are purchased for installation onto infrastructure 5 that is owned or controlled by the grant recipient or appurtenant 6 thereto. Eligible purposes shall include but not be limited to 7 projects that support community development or redevelopment, revi- 8 talization, economic development, economic sustainability, arts and 9 cultural development, housing, public security and safety and local 10 infrastructure improvement or enhancement. Eligible entities may 11 include municipal and state governmental entities, public authori- 12 ties and not-for-profit corporations. Individual grants issued 13 pursuant to this appropriation shall be in an amount no less than 14 $50,000. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds 15 appropriated herein may, subject to the approval of the director of 16 the budget, be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred from this appro- 17 priation to any other appropriation of any state department, agency, 18 public benefit corporation, or public authority, or (iii) suballo- 19 cated to any other state department, agency or public benefit corpo- 20 ration, to achieve this purpose (LO112209) (85104) ................. 21 185,000,000 ..................................... (re. $164,576,000) 1255 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NONPROFIT INFRASTRUCTURE CAPITAL INVESTMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 48,237,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 0 48,237,000 5 ================ ================ 6 NONPROFIT INFRASTRUCTURE CAPITAL INVESTMENT PROGRAM (CCP) 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - Authority Bonds - 30000 9 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 54, 11 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 12 The sum of $50,000,000 is hereby appropriated for payments and grants 13 to eligible nonprofit human services organizations for the nonprofit 14 infrastructure capital investment program. Such program shall 15 provide for targeted investments in capital projects for such eligi- 16 ble nonprofit human services organizations to improve the quality, 17 efficiency, and accessibility of such nonprofit human services 18 organizations that serve New Yorkers. Such investments may include, 19 but are not limited to: technology upgrades related to improving 20 electronic records, data analysis, or confidentiality; renovations 21 or expansions of non-publicly owned space owned by or leased to the 22 eligible nonprofit human services organization pursuant to a lease 23 and used for direct program services; modifications to provide for 24 sustainable, energy efficient spaces that would result in overall 25 energy and cost savings; and accessibility renovations. Eligible 26 nonprofit human services organizations are those which provide 27 direct services to New Yorkers and are prequalified by the state in 28 a manner as prescribed by the state for such grant application, 29 provided further that nothing herein shall preclude a nonprofit 30 human services organization that is otherwise eligible and that is 31 located in publicly owned property from receiving a grant as long as 32 such purpose and project would be otherwise eligible and such grant 33 is not used for building or property maintenance or improvements, 34 structural maintenance or improvements, or building systems mainte- 35 nance or improvements. Funding from this appropriation shall be made 36 available through a rolling pass-fail process outlined in a Request 37 for Grant Applications that shall include guidelines for the program 38 as determined by representatives from state agencies which shall 39 include, but not be limited to, the office of children and family 40 services, the office of temporary and disability assistance, the 41 office for people with developmental disabilities, and the office of 42 mental health. Funding will only be made available pursuant to the 43 approval of the director of the budget. Provided further that such 44 proposals submitted by eligible nonprofit human services organiza- 45 tions shall include, at a minimum, the following: the extent to 46 which the proposed project reflects a necessary improvement or 1256 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NONPROFIT INFRASTRUCTURE CAPITAL INVESTMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 upgrade to continue to serve the nonprofit human services organiza- 2 tion's target New York population, or a population they would be 3 able to serve if such improvements or upgrades were made; a state- 4 ment that as of the effective date of this chapter, construction had 5 not begun and equipment had not been purchased for such project; and 6 if applicable, a statement whether the project has received all 7 necessary regulatory approvals or can demonstrate a reasonable 8 expectation that such approvals will be secured. Notwithstanding any 9 inconsistent provision of law, the Dormitory Authority shall be 10 authorized to administer this program. All or a portion of the funds 11 appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 12 department, agency, or public authority (92NP2203) (80606) ......... 13 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $48,221,000) 14 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 54, 15 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 16 The sum of $20,000,000 is hereby appropriated for payments and grants 17 to eligible nonprofit human services organizations for the nonprofit 18 infrastructure capital investment program. Such program shall 19 provide for targeted investment for capital projects in such eligi- 20 ble nonprofit human services organizations to improve the quality, 21 efficiency, and accessibility of nonprofit human services organiza- 22 tions that serve New Yorkers. Provided that such investments 23 include, but are not limited to: technology upgrades related to 24 improving electronic records, data analysis, or confidentiality; 25 renovations or expansions of space used for direct program services; 26 modifications to provide for sustainable, energy efficient spaces 27 that would result in overall energy and cost savings; and accessi- 28 bility renovations. Provided further that such eligible nonprofit 29 human services organizations are those which provide direct services 30 to New Yorkers through state contracts, state authorized payments, 31 and/or state payment rates. Provided further that nothing herein 32 shall preclude a nonprofit human services organization that is 33 otherwise eligible and that is located in publicly owned property 34 from receiving a grant as long as such purpose and project would be 35 otherwise eligible and such grant is not used for building or prop- 36 erty maintenance or improvements, structural maintenance or improve- 37 ments, or building systems maintenance or improvements. Funding from 38 this appropriation shall be made available through a competitive 39 process that shall include representatives from multiple state agen- 40 cies to be determined by the director of the budget and the guide- 41 lines for the program and competitive process and such process shall 42 also ensure that such funding is made available for uses throughout 43 the state, and shall be subject to the approval of the director of 44 the budget. Provided further that such proposals submitted by eligi- 45 ble nonprofit human services organizations shall include, at a mini- 46 mum, the following: the amount of funds requested in relation to the 47 size and scope of the proposed project and the number of clients who 48 will benefit; a detailed description of the project, including 49 projected costs including the sources and uses of funds, project 1257 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NONPROFIT INFRASTRUCTURE CAPITAL INVESTMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 completion timeline, and funds necessary at each stage of project 2 completion; the extent to which the proposed project reflects a 3 necessary improvement or upgrade to continue to serve the nonprofit 4 human services organization's target population, or a population 5 they would be able to serve if such improvements or upgrades were 6 made; a statement that as of the effective date of this chapter, 7 construction had not begun and equipment had not been purchased for 8 such project; and if applicable, a statement whether the project has 9 received all necessary regulatory approvals or can demonstrate a 10 reasonable expectation that such approvals will be secured. Such 11 representatives from state agencies shall include, but not be limit- 12 ed to, the Office of Children and Family Services, the Office of 13 Temporary and Disability Assistance, the Office for People with 14 Developmental Disabilities, the Office of Mental Health, and for 15 purposes of this appropriation, shall also include the Dormitory 16 Authority of the State of New York and, notwithstanding any incon- 17 sistent provision of law, the Dormitory Authority shall be author- 18 ized to administer this program. Consistent with the requirements of 19 this appropriation, any funding allocated pursuant to this appropri- 20 ation that has been awarded but not claimed by an eligible applicant 21 pursuant to any grant award, may be made available by the Dormitory 22 Authority for future grant awards to eligible applicants. All or a 23 portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or 24 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 25 (92NP1703) (80606) ... 20,000,000 ..................... (re. $7,000) 26 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 28 The sum of $50,000,000 is hereby appropriated for payments and grants 29 to eligible nonprofit human services organizations for the nonprofit 30 infrastructure capital investment program. Such program shall 31 provide for targeted investment for capital projects in such eligi- 32 ble nonprofit human services organizations to improve the quality, 33 efficiency, and accessibility of nonprofit human services organiza- 34 tions that serve New Yorkers. Provided that such investments 35 include, but are not limited to: technology upgrades related to 36 improving electronic records, data analysis, or confidentiality; 37 renovations or expansions of space used for direct program services; 38 modifications to provide for sustainable, energy efficient spaces 39 that would result in overall energy and cost savings; and accessi- 40 bility renovations. Provided further that such eligible nonprofit 41 human services organizations are those which provide direct services 42 to New Yorkers through state contracts, state authorized payments, 43 and/or state payment rates. Provided further that nothing herein 44 shall preclude a nonprofit human services organization that is 45 otherwise eligible and that is located in publicly owned property 46 from receiving a grant as long as such purpose and project would be 47 otherwise eligible and such grant is not used for building or prop- 48 erty maintenance or improvements, structural maintenance or improve- 49 ments, or building systems maintenance or improvements. Funding from 1258 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NONPROFIT INFRASTRUCTURE CAPITAL INVESTMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 this appropriation shall be made available through a competitive 2 process that shall include representatives from multiple state agen- 3 cies to be determined by the director of the budget and the guide- 4 lines for the program and competitive process and such process shall 5 also ensure that such funding is made available for uses throughout 6 the state, and shall be subject to the approval of the director of 7 the budget. Provided further that such proposals submitted by eligi- 8 ble nonprofit human services organizations shall include, at a mini- 9 mum, the following: the amount of funds requested in relation to the 10 size and scope of the proposed project and the number of clients who 11 will benefit; a detailed description of the project, including 12 projected costs including the sources and uses of funds, project 13 completion timeline, and funds necessary at each stage of project 14 completion; the extent to which the proposed project reflects a 15 necessary improvement or upgrade to continue to serve the nonprofit 16 human services organization's target population, or a population 17 they would be able to serve if such improvements or upgrades were 18 made; a statement that as of the effective date of this chapter, 19 construction had not begun and equipment had not been purchased for 20 such project; and if applicable, a statement whether the project has 21 received all necessary regulatory approvals or can demonstrate a 22 reasonable expectation that such approvals will be secured. Such 23 representatives from state agencies shall include, but not be limit- 24 ed to, the Office of Children and Family Services, the Office of 25 Temporary and Disability Assistance, the Office for People with 26 Developmental Disabilities, the Office of Mental Health, and for 27 purposes of this appropriation, shall also include the Dormitory 28 Authority of the State of New York and, notwithstanding any incon- 29 sistent provision of law, the Dormitory Authority shall be author- 30 ized to administer this program. Consistent with the requirements of 31 this appropriation, any funding allocated pursuant to this appropri- 32 ation that has been awarded but not claimed by an eligible applicant 33 pursuant to any grant award, may be made available by the Dormitory 34 Authority for future grant awards to eligible applicants. All or a 35 portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or 36 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 37 (92NP1603) (80606) ................................................. 38 50,000,000 ............................................ (re. $9,000) 1259 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES PUBLIC FACILITIES SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 50,000,000 99,538,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 50,000,000 99,538,000 8 ================ ================ 9 PUBLIC FACILITIES SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM (CCP) ............ 50,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Statewide Decarbonization Purpose 14 For services and expenses of any state 15 department, agency, public authority, or 16 public benefit corporation associated with 17 emissions reductions projects or climate 18 change mitigation and adaptation, includ- 19 ing but not limited to projects undertaken 20 for compliance with executive order 22 21 directives, which may include projects or 22 priorities as recommended by the green New 23 York council, subject to a plan approved 24 by the director of the budget and submit- 25 ted to the chair of the senate finance 26 committee and the chair of the assembly 27 ways and means committee. The Green New 28 York Council, in conjunction with the 29 affected state entities, shall produce an 30 annual report on expenditures from this 31 appropriation beginning on or before 32 December 31, 2027 until all funds appro- 33 priated herein are accounted for. Such 34 report shall be submitted to the chair of 35 the senate finance committee and the chair 36 of the assembly ways and means committee. 37 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 38 of law, all or a portion of the funds 39 appropriated herein may be suballocated or 40 transferred to any state department, agen- 41 cy, public authority, or public benefit 42 corporation (EOBP26SD) (85109) .............. 50,000,000 1260 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES PUBLIC FACILITIES SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 PUBLIC FACILITIES SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Statewide Decarbonization Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For services and expenses of any state department, agency, public 7 authority, or public benefit corporation associated with emissions 8 reductions projects or climate change mitigation and adaptation, 9 including but not limited to projects undertaken for compliance with 10 executive order 22 directives, which may include projects or priori- 11 ties as recommended by the green New York council, subject to a plan 12 approved by the director of the budget and submitted to the chair of 13 the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly ways and 14 means committee. The Green New York Council, in conjunction with the 15 affected state entities, shall produce an annual report on expendi- 16 tures from this appropriation beginning on or before December thir- 17 ty-first, two thousand twenty-six until all funds appropriated here- 18 in are accounted for. Such report shall be submitted to the chair of 19 the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly ways and 20 means committee. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, 21 all or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 22 cated or transferred to any state department, agency, public author- 23 ity, or public benefit corporation (EOBP25SD) (85109) .............. 24 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,000,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For services and expenses of any state department, agency, public 27 authority, or public benefit corporation associated with emissions 28 reductions projects or climate change mitigation and adaptation, 29 including but not limited to projects undertaken for compliance with 30 executive order 22 directives, which may include projects or priori- 31 ties as recommended by the green New York council, subject to a plan 32 approved by the director of the budget and submitted to the chair of 33 the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly ways and 34 means committee. The Green New York Council, in conjunction with the 35 affected state entities, shall produce an annual report on expendi- 36 tures from this appropriation beginning on or before December thir- 37 ty-first, two thousand twenty-five, until all funds appropriated 38 herein are accounted for. Such report shall be submitted to the 39 chair of the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly 40 ways and means committee. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 41 of law, all or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be 42 suballocated or transferred to any state department, agency, public 43 authority, or public benefit corporation (EOBP24SD) (85109) ........ 44 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $49,538,000) 1261 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES REGIONAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 REGIONAL DEVELOPMENT (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Regional Development Purpose 5 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as 6 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is hereby 7 amended and reappropriated to read: 8 For services and expenses of the regional economic development program 9 pursuant to a memorandum of understanding to be executed by the 10 governor, the temporary president of the senate, and the speaker of 11 the assembly, provided that the allocation made available to the 12 governor, as authorized by paragraph one of the memorandum of under- 13 standing governing administration of the regional economic develop- 14 ment program, shall be reduced by $250,000 to $42,610,000. 15 All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated 16 to any department, agency, or public authority. All or a portion of 17 the funds appropriated hereby may be transferred to any department, 18 agency, or public authority. Notwithstanding any provision of law to 19 the contrary, funds appropriated herein shall only be available for 20 commitments made on or before September 15, 2026. For purposes of 21 this reappropriation, commitments shall mean any new project nomi- 22 nation submitted to any department, agency, or public authority 23 pursuant to the appropriation herein (ED0005RE) (80596) ............ 24 94,750,000 ........................................ (re. $3,262,000) 1262 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NEW YORK SPECIAL INFRASTRUCTURE ACCOUNT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 1,894,515,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 0 1,894,515,000 5 ================ ================ 6 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT (CCP) 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 9 Economic Development Purpose 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 54, 11 section 1, of the laws of 2025: 12 The sum of $1,300,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 13 expenses of the Empire Station Complex project, including but not 14 limited to the acquisition of all necessary land, real property, 15 easements, and leasehold interests, including any appurtenances 16 thereto and improvements thereon, preparation of plans, design, 17 demolition, construction, renovation, administration, and other 18 costs incidental thereto, including the payment of liabilities 19 incurred prior to April 1, 2021, and for the costs of the metropol- 20 itan transportation authority's 2025-2029 capital program, including 21 the costs of improvements to enhance system efficiency, installing 22 modern faregates to reduce fare evasion, crime prevention and secu- 23 rity activities, and the Interborough Express. No funds provided 24 under this appropriation shall be used directly or indirectly for 25 the formal preparation of a general project plan for the Empire 26 Station Complex. Such funds shall only be used in furtherance of the 27 Empire Penn Expansion or other transportation improvement projects 28 and not for above-grade development contemplated in the general 29 project plan. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may 30 be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 31 authority (93ES2109) (81117) ....................................... 32 1,300,000,000 ................................. (re. $1,200,000,000) 33 NEW YORK STATE SPECIAL INFRASTRUCTURE ACCOUNT (CCP) 34 Capital Projects Funds - Other 35 Dedicated Infrastructure Investment Fund 36 Infrastructure Investment Account - 33050 37 Special Infrastructure Purpose 38 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 39 For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with 40 program administration, of projects and purposes authorized by 41 section 93-b of the state finance law to receive funding from the 42 dedicated infrastructure investment fund - infrastructure investment 43 account, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 1263 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NEW YORK SPECIAL INFRASTRUCTURE ACCOUNT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 April 1, 2017; provided however, that loans or grants under this 2 appropriation to a private corporation, association or enterprise 3 shall only be made or given by a public corporation or authority. 4 All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo- 5 cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority, 6 according to the following: 7 To prepare for, prevent, deter, or respond to acts of terrorism; 8 natural or man-made disasters, including severe weather events; 9 risks to public safety, health, and/or other emergencies (93SC17SP) 10 (80620) ... 100,000,000 ........................... (re. $2,000,000) 11 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 12 section 1, of the laws of 2017: 13 Transportation infrastructure and facilities in the five-year depart- 14 ment of transportation plan for 2015-16 through 2019-20, for the 15 payment of costs, including the payment of liabilities incurred 16 prior to April 1, 2016, of transportation infrastructure projects, 17 including but not limited to, state and local roads and bridges; 18 airport, freight and passenger rail, port and transit projects or 19 multi-modal facilities, including work appurtenant and ancillary 20 thereto. Project costs funded from this appropriation may include 21 but shall not be limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 22 tioning and preservation, the acquisition of property, and engineer- 23 ing services, including personal services, nonpersonal services, 24 fringe benefits, the contract services provided by private firms, 25 and reimbursements to the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund 26 and capital projects funds, for activities including but not limited 27 to, the preparation of designs, plans, specifications and estimates; 28 construction management and supervision; and appraisals, surveys, 29 testing and environmental impact statements for transportation 30 infrastructure projects. Notwithstanding section 93 of the state 31 finance law or any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, 32 all or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be (i) inter- 33 changed, (ii) suballocated to the Department of Transportation, or 34 (iii) transferred from this appropriation to any other capital 35 projects appropriation or appropriations of the Department of Trans- 36 portation (931316SP) (79995) ... 200,000,000 ...... (re. $1,768,000) 37 The sum of $170,000,000 is hereby appropriated for additional upstate 38 revitalization initiative projects. Funds appropriated herein shall 39 be for services and expenses, loans, grants, workforce development, 40 business and tourism plan development, costs associated with program 41 administration, and the payment of personal services, nonpersonal 42 services and contract services provided by private firms to support 43 economic development projects. Funding will be pursuant to a plan 44 developed by the chief executive officer of the New York state urban 45 development corporation and will support initiatives based on antic- 46 ipated job creation and economic development benefits. Funds shall 47 not be available from this appropriation for projects within regions 48 that were Upstate Revitalization Initiative 2015 Best Plan Awardees 49 or eligible to receive funding from the Buffalo Regional Innovation 1264 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NEW YORK SPECIAL INFRASTRUCTURE ACCOUNT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Cluster Program. Such moneys will be awarded by the New York state 2 urban development corporation at its discretion (931216SP) (79996) 3 ... 170,000,000 ................................. (re. $170,000,000) 4 The sum of $85,000,000 is hereby appropriated for services and 5 expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with economic develop- 6 ment or infrastructure projects (931416SP) (79992) ................. 7 85,000,000 ....................................... (re. $31,000,000) 8 For services and expenses related to the empire state poverty 9 reduction initiative. Funds appropriated herein shall be made avail- 10 able for sixteen local anti-poverty task forces in municipalities, 11 or a borough, with high rates of poverty as determined by the U.S. 12 Census Bureau's 2010-14 American Community Survey Five-year Esti- 13 mate: Albany, the Bronx, Binghamton, Buffalo, Elmira, Hempstead, 14 Jamestown, Newburgh, Niagara Falls, Oneonta, Oswego, Rochester, 15 Syracuse, Troy, Utica and Watertown. Provided that, except in muni- 16 cipalities where a state-funded anti-poverty task force or initi- 17 ative already exists and is receiving or has received State funding 18 for such purpose, the mayor of each municipality, or in the case of 19 the Bronx, the borough president, will select a not-for-profit 20 organization that provides services in the municipality, or in the 21 case of the Bronx, the borough, to serve as the local coordinator of 22 each such local task force. Provided further that, except in munici- 23 palities where a state-funded antipoverty task force or initiative 24 already exists and is receiving or has received funding, each such 25 taskforce shall make efforts to be comprised of, but not limited to, 26 the following members: representatives from municipal, county, 27 and/or state government; individuals who have lived in or currently 28 live in households in poverty; individuals and advocates represent- 29 ing local not-for-profit and community organizations; represen- 30 tatives from local school districts; and representatives from local 31 social services districts. Of the funds appropriated herein, the 32 amount available for each local anti-poverty task force shall be 33 determined based on the number of people in each municipality, or a 34 borough, who are living in poverty as determined by the U.S. Census 35 Bureau's 2010-14 American Community Survey Five-year Estimate 36 provided that each local anti-poverty task force shall be eligible 37 to receive funding in the following amounts: municipalities with 38 fewer than 5,000 individuals in poverty shall each be eligible to 39 receive $500,000; municipalities with between 5,000 and 10,000 indi- 40 viduals in poverty shall each be eligible to receive $1,000,000; 41 municipalities with between 10,000 and 40,000 individuals in poverty 42 shall each be eligible to receive $1,500,000; and municipalities, or 43 a borough, with more than 40,000 individuals in poverty shall each 44 be eligible to receive $2,750,000. Funds appropriated herein shall 45 be available to support the work of each anti-poverty task force and 46 such work shall be divided into two phases. During the first phase, 47 the mayor of the municipality, or in the case of the Bronx, the 48 borough president, will select a not-for-profit organization that 49 has demonstrated successful performance working with community 50 stakeholders and achieving objectives specified herein, to coordi- 1265 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NEW YORK SPECIAL INFRASTRUCTURE ACCOUNT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 nate the local antipoverty task force. The not-for-profit organiza- 2 tion serving as coordinator will assemble the antipoverty task force 3 using the criteria outlined above. Provided further that, with 4 guidence and oversight of the commissioner of the office of tempo- 5 rary and disability assistance, each local anti-poverty task force 6 shall use data to identify high need issues and neighborhoods within 7 the municipality, or in the case of the Bronx, the borough; identify 8 problems that are common in neighborhoods throughout the munici- 9 pality, or in the case of the Bronx, the borough; receive input from 10 local residents; use data and resident input to select one or more 11 focus areas related to either one or more issues or one or more 12 neighborhoods; and develop a plan for how funding will be targeted 13 toward the identified issues or neighborhoods. Such focus areas may 14 include, but are not limited to childhood poverty and homelessness. 15 Activities included in such plan may include, but are not limited 16 to: providing public assistance recipients opportunities to partic- 17 ipate in enhanced work activities that either provide recognized 18 credentialing or enhanced career readiness or job training for 19 better linkage to potential employment; assisting families in pover- 20 ty through services provided to parents and children; and addressing 21 chronic homelessness or housing insecurity. Such plan must include 22 measurable objectives and a timeframe for completion and shall be 23 submitted for approval to the commissioner of the office of tempo- 24 rary and disability assistance. Of the total amount made available 25 to each anti-poverty task force, the lesser of $300,000 or 20 26 percent of the total award may be used to carry out planning and 27 administration, provided however, that the amount used for planning 28 and administration may exceed such limitation if such amount is 29 approved by the commissioner of the office of temporary and disabil- 30 ity assistance as part of the plan required herein. Upon receiving 31 approval from the commissioner of the office of temporary and disa- 32 bility assistance, each such anti-poverty task force shall commence 33 the second phase of its work, which will support the implementation 34 of the plan developed during the first phase. Funding appropriated 35 herein shall be made available to the not-for-profit organization 36 serving as coordinator and its use shall be restricted to purposes 37 or initiatives that do not necessitate ongoing state financial 38 support. Such anti-poverty task forces shall be encouraged to secure 39 match funding from private sector and foundation sources to supple- 40 ment the funds appropriated herein and provided further that any 41 funding provided from this appropriation shall not be used to 42 supplant funding for programs already in existence. Such funds may 43 be made available pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the 44 budget (931A16SP) (79994) ... 25,000,000 ............. (re. $27,000) 45 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in support of a 46 comprehensive statewide multi-year housing program to prevent and 47 address homelessness across the State, funds appropriated herein may 48 be used in conjunction with other resources made available as part 49 of the state fiscal year 2016-17 and 2017-18 local assistance, capi- 50 tal and state operations budget to support various programs to 1266 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NEW YORK SPECIAL INFRASTRUCTURE ACCOUNT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 support homeless individuals and youth or individuals and youth at 2 risk of becoming homeless, including but not limited to, a statewide 3 multiagency supportive housing program to provide housing and 4 support services for vulnerable New Yorkers including but not limit- 5 ed to seniors, veterans, victims of domestic violence, formerly 6 incarcerated individuals, individuals diagnosed with HIV/AIDS and 7 homeless individuals with copresenting health conditions, eligible 8 services to runaway and homeless youth, and for services to meet the 9 emergency needs of homeless individuals and families (931116SP) 10 (79993) ... 50,000,000 ............................ (re. $3,096,000) 11 Municipal consolidation competition, for payments for capital and 12 other expenses related to the implementation of: consolidations, 13 dissolutions, mergers, or other permanent changes in governing 14 structures; shared services, cooperation agreements, or other effi- 15 ciencies; or other actions that reduce operational costs or property 16 tax burdens on a permanent basis, as selected through a competitive 17 application process developed by the secretary of state (931016SP) 18 (79991) ... 20,000,000 ............................ (re. $8,147,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with 22 program administration, of projects and purposes authorized by 23 section 93-b of the state finance law to receive funding from the 24 dedicated infrastructure investment fund - infrastructure investment 25 account, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 26 April 1, 2015; provided however, that loans or grants under this 27 appropriation to a private corporation, association or enterprise 28 shall only be made or given by a public corporation or authority; 29 and provided further however, notwithstanding the foregoing, and 30 notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance law or any other 31 law to the contrary, grants may also be given under this appropri- 32 ation by the department of agriculture and markets to farm owners 33 and related industries, not for profit conservation organizations 34 and local governments to protect, maintain, develop and grow farm, 35 agricultural and related industries located in the southern tier and 36 hudson valley, as defined by the commissioner of agriculture and 37 markets. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 38 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 39 authority, according to the following: 40 New NY broadband initiative, to support the development of infrastruc- 41 ture to bring high-speed internet access to unserved and underserved 42 regions throughout the state, and to support the development of 43 other telecommunications infrastructure; provided however that 44 priority shall be given to projects that bring high-speed internet 45 access to unserved areas of the state, public libraries, and educa- 46 tional opportunity centers; provided further that the New York state 47 urban development corporation shall submit a report before June 30, 48 2016 to the director of the division of the budget, the temporary 49 president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority 1267 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NEW YORK SPECIAL INFRASTRUCTURE ACCOUNT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 leader of the senate and the minority leader of the assembly detail- 2 ing: (a) the total amount of public funds committed by this program 3 annually; (b) total amount of private funds committed annually and, 4 if applicable, the amount of such funds that has been invested by 5 such parties; (c) the location of each area receiving investments 6 under this program and the goals for each such area; (d) planned 7 future investments by both public and private parties; and (e) such 8 other information as the corporation deems necessary (930115SP) 9 (80617) ... 500,000,000 .......................... (re. $60,377,000) 10 Municipal restructuring, for payments to local governments, school 11 districts, and other municipal entities for capital and other 12 expenses related to the implementation of local government and 13 school district shared services, cooperation agreements, mergers, 14 regionalized delivery of services, and other actions that reduce 15 future operational costs, related property tax burdens, or provide 16 critical service improvements on a permanent basis, as selected 17 through an application process developed by the secretary of state, 18 provided, however, that school districts' expenditures of the funds 19 appropriated herein shall not be eligible for aid under any 20 provision of the education law; for payments related to a downtown 21 revitalization program designed and executed by the department of 22 state and the division of housing and community renewal for trans- 23 formative housing, economic development, transportation and communi- 24 ty projects including those designed to increase the property tax 25 base, of which up to $500,000 may be made available to fund projects 26 consistent with the purposes of the healthy food / healthy communi- 27 ties initiative pursuant to section 16-s of the urban development 28 corporation act, provided such projects are included in a strategic 29 plan submitted for funding under the downtown revitalization 30 program; and for payments of grants, awards, and aid provided 31 through the local government efficiency grant program, the citizen 32 empowerment tax credit, local government citizens reorganization 33 empowerment grant program, and the local government performance and 34 efficiency program, as authorized by section 54 of the state finance 35 law (930215SP) (80618) ... 150,000,000 ........... (re. $36,464,000) 36 Grants to essential health care providers shall be available upon 37 determination of the commissioner of health without a competitive 38 bid or request for proposal process to support debt retirement and 39 capital projects or non-capital projects that facilitate health care 40 transformation, including mergers, consolidation, acquisition or 41 other significant corporate restructuring activities intended to 42 create a financially sustainable system of care that promotes a 43 patient-centered model of health care delivery. Grants shall not be 44 available to support general operating expenses. For purposes of 45 this appropriation, an essential health care provider is a hospital 46 or hospital system that, in the discretion of the commissioner of 47 health, offers health services within a defined and isolated 48 geographic region where such services would otherwise be unavailable 49 to the population of such region. 1268 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NEW YORK SPECIAL INFRASTRUCTURE ACCOUNT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, up to 2 $83,500,000 appropriated herein may be available for the health 3 facility restructuring program pursuant to section 2815 of the 4 public health law. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of the laws to the contrary, 6 amounts appropriated herein, including the $83,500,000 which may be 7 transferred from the department to the dormitory authority, shall be 8 available net of disallowances, refunds, reimbursements and credits 9 (930315SP) (80619) ... 355,000,000 ............... (re. $57,964,000) 10 For the acquisition of information technology systems, electronic 11 health records, billing systems, or other hardware as well as any 12 other infrastructure costs associated with the inclusion of behav- 13 ioral health services in the medicaid managed care benefit package. 14 Such funds shall be available to not-for-profit agencies licensed, 15 certified or approved by the office of mental health, the office for 16 addiction services and supports, or the office for people with 17 developmental disabilities. A portion of these funds may be used to 18 support training and technical assistance during the transition 19 period (93H315SP) (80348) ... 10,000,000 ............ (re. $255,000) 20 To prepare for, prevent, deter, or respond to acts of terrorism; 21 natural or man-made disasters, including severe weather events; 22 risks to public safety, health, and/or other emergencies. Of the 23 amounts appropriated herein, $10,000,000 shall be available for 24 grants to local governments and local law enforcement agencies to 25 support the provision of safety and other related equipment. Such 26 funds shall be allocated pursuant to a plan prepared by the commis- 27 sioner of criminal justice services in consultation with the super- 28 intendent of state police and approved by the director of the budget 29 (930415SP) (80620) ... 150,000,000 ................ (re. $2,164,000) 30 Penn station access, for the payment of costs of the metropolitan 31 transportation authority or metro-north commuter railroad company 32 for capital projects to link the metro-north commuter railroad 33 directly to Penn Station and to improve transportation access along 34 its corridor, including construction of new stations in the Bronx, 35 including but not limited to planning and design, acquisition, 36 construction, reconstruction, replacement, improvement, recondition- 37 ing, rehabilitation and preservation, including the acquisition of 38 real property and interests therein required or expected to be 39 required in connection therewith, for commuter railroad facilities 40 and related equipment (930515SP) (80627) ........................... 41 250,000,000 ..................................... (re. $220,000,000) 42 For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with 43 transformative economic development projects. $150,000,000 is 44 authorized for such projects to be reviewed, evaluated and approved 45 by the New York state urban development corporation, including but 46 not limited to those listed in the schedule below. A proposed 47 project must demonstrate that the investment of public funds will 48 catalyze private investment resulting in significant economic devel- 49 opment reflected in the creation of temporary and permanent jobs, 50 the growth of the commercial and residential tax base or an enhance- 1269 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NEW YORK SPECIAL INFRASTRUCTURE ACCOUNT CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 ment of the environment and quality of life for residents of Nassau 2 or Suffolk County. The items shown in the schedule below shall be 3 for projects with a common purpose and may be interchanged without 4 limitation subject to the approval of the director of the budget 5 (930715SP) (80349) ... 150,000,000 ............... (re. $90,327,000) 6 Project Schedule 7 PROJECT AMOUNT 8 -------------------------------------------- 9 Nassau Hub ...................... 85,000,000 10 Ronkonkoma Hub .................. 50,000,000 11 Stony Brook/ Brookhaven Labs .... 15,000,000 12 -------------- 13 Total ........................ 150,000,000 14 ============== 15 Infrastructure improvements, to support transportation, upstate trans- 16 it, rail, airport, port and other infrastructure improvements or 17 economic development projects (930815SP) (80630) ................... 18 115,000,000 ....................................... (re. $8,276,000) 19 Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance law or any law to the 20 contrary, for services and expenses of the southern tier agricul- 21 tural industry enhancement and hudson valley farmland protection 22 programs, including but not limited to grants or payments to farm 23 owners and related industries, not for profit conservation organiza- 24 tions and local governments, to protect, maintain, develop and grow 25 farm, agricultural and related industries located in the southern 26 tier and hudson valley, including up to $700,000 for repairs, 27 improvements, and equipment at Cornell College of Agriculture and 28 Life Science Dyce Laboratory to the support and benefit of honey and 29 pollinator research, and up to $1,500,000 to the State University of 30 New York College of Environmental Science and Forestry, directly or 31 through its Climate and Applied Forestry Research Institute, to 32 support research and development of forestry and forest products, as 33 defined by the commissioner of agriculture and markets (930915SP) 34 (80647) ... 50,000,000 ............................ (re. $2,650,000) 1270 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES SUSTAINABLE FUTURE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 1,000,000,000 1,000,000,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 1,000,000,000 1,000,000,000 5 ================ ================ 6 SUSTAINABLE FUTURE PROGRAM (CCP) ......................... 1,000,000,000 7 -------------- 8 Capital Projects Funds - Other 9 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 10 Statewide Decarbonization Purpose 11 For services and expenses of climate miti- 12 gation and adaptation projects, and for 13 purposes consistent with the general find- 14 ings of the scoping plan prepared pursuant 15 to section 75-0103 of the environmental 16 conservation law, including the following 17 purposes and programs and corresponding 18 amounts: $500,000,000 for greenhouse gas 19 emissions reduction projects related to 20 buildings, including: $150,000,000 for 21 qualifying capital expenditures of the New 22 York state energy research and development 23 authority's EmPower Plus program; 24 $50,000,000 for the Clean Green Schools 25 program; $150,000,000 for thermal energy 26 network projects, including projects at 27 public, municipal and state owned build- 28 ings, including the state university of 29 New York and the city university of New 30 York, and for utility thermal energy 31 networks; emissions reductions and energy 32 efficiency projects at public, municipal, 33 and state owned buildings; and, 34 $150,000,000 in support of qualifying 35 emissions reductions programs administered 36 by the division of housing and community 37 renewal, including but not limited to: not 38 less than $40,000,000 for qualifying 39 expenses of the Weatherization Assistance 40 program; $50,000,000 for emissions 41 reductions projects at developments owned 42 or operated by the New York city housing 43 authority and Mitchell-Lama properties in 44 the city of New York; and, for the 45 purchase and installation of energy effi- 46 cient equipment, including heat pumps at 1271 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES SUSTAINABLE FUTURE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 single family residences and multi-unit 2 residential apartment buildings and resi- 3 dential premises owned as a residential 4 cooperative apartment or condominium unit; 5 up to $75,000,000 for zero emission trans- 6 portation, including: for the purchase or 7 conversion of zero emission school buses, 8 and supporting infrastructure pursuant to 9 section 58-0703 of the environmental 10 conservation law; for electric vehicle 11 fast charging stations and supporting 12 infrastructure for municipal, commercial, 13 medium duty, heavy duty, and fleet vehi- 14 cles; and, for the New York state energy 15 research and development authority's 16 Charge Ready NY program; $300,000,000 for 17 renewable energy projects, including: not 18 less than $200,000,000 for the New York 19 state energy research and development 20 authority's NY-Sun program; and, not less 21 than $100,000,000 for renewable energy 22 generating projects undertaken pursuant to 23 paragraph 27-a of section 1005 of public 24 authorities law, municipal renewable ener- 25 gy projects, and grid connectivity; not 26 less than $50,000,000 for projects that 27 support methane mitigation, forestry, 28 recycling and waste sector improvements 29 and investments, including but not limited 30 to qualifying expenditures of: the 31 department of agriculture and markets' 32 Climate Resilient Farming program; not 33 less than $25,000,000 for the department 34 of environmental conservation's municipal 35 waste reduction and recycling program, 36 including for recycling and organics 37 projects; and, the department of environ- 38 mental conservation's regenerate NY and 39 urban and community forestry programs; 40 notwithstanding sections 51 and 93 of the 41 state finance law and any other provision 42 of law to the contrary, $25,000,000 of 43 this appropriation may be transferred to 44 the environmental protection fund, includ- 45 ing $12,500,000 to the appropriation made 46 for land acquisition and $12,500,000 to 47 the appropriation made for stewardship; 48 and, notwithstanding any provisions to the 49 contrary contained in section 163 and 50 section 112 of the state finance law, 1272 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES SUSTAINABLE FUTURE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 subject to approval by the director of the 2 budget, up to $50,000,000 may be used for 3 any of the above programs or purposes. 4 This appropriation shall be subject to a 5 plan approved by the director of the budg- 6 et and submitted to the chair of the 7 senate finance committee and the chair of 8 the assembly ways and means committee. 9 Such plan shall prioritize disadvantaged 10 communities by supporting actions consist- 11 ent with the requirements of paragraph d 12 of subdivision three of section 75-0109 13 and of section 75-0117 of the environ- 14 mental conservation law. Qualifying 15 projects funded by this appropriation 16 shall be subject to the same standards and 17 provisions stated in section 224-f of the 18 labor law and section 66-v of the public 19 service law, and treated in the same 20 manner as if funded from section 99-qq of 21 the state finance law. The New York state 22 energy research and development authority 23 in collaboration with agencies and author- 24 ities receiving funds from this appropri- 25 ation shall produce an annual report on 26 expenditures from this appropriation 27 beginning on or before March thirty-first, 28 two thousand twenty-seven until all funds 29 appropriated herein are accounted for. 30 Such report shall be submitted to the 31 chair of the senate finance committee and 32 the chair of the assembly ways and means 33 committee. Notwithstanding any other 34 provision of law to the contrary, all or a 35 portion of this appropriation may be 36 transferred to state operations, aid to 37 localities, or capital projects, and all 38 or a portion of this appropriation may be 39 transferred or suballocated to any state 40 department, agency, public authority, or 41 public benefit corporation (SFEC26SD) .... 1,000,000,000 1273 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES SUSTAINABLE FUTURE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 SUSTAINABLE FUTURE PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Statewide Decarbonization Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For services and expenses of climate mitigation and adaptation 7 projects, and for purposes consistent with the general findings of 8 the scoping plan prepared pursuant to section 75-0103 of the envi- 9 ronmental conservation law, including the following purposes and 10 programs and corresponding amounts: not less than $450,000,000 for 11 greenhouse gas emissions reduction projects related to buildings, 12 including: not less than $50,000,000 for qualifying capital expendi- 13 tures of the New York state energy research and development authori- 14 ty's EmPower Plus program; not less than $50,000,000 for the Clean 15 Green Schools program; the purchase and installation of energy effi- 16 cient equipment, including heat pumps at single family residences 17 and multi-unit residential apartment buildings and residential prem- 18 ises owned as a residential cooperative apartment or condominium 19 unit; not less than $200,000,000 for thermal energy network 20 projects, including projects at public and state owned buildings, 21 including the state university of New York and the city university 22 of New York, and notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary 23 contained in section 163 and section 112 of the state finance law up 24 to $40,000,000 for municipal thermal energy network projects funded 25 with grants awarded directly to municipalities; emissions reductions 26 and energy efficiency projects at public and state owned buildings; 27 and, in support of qualifying emissions reductions programs adminis- 28 tered by the division of housing and community renewal; not less 29 than $250,000,000 for zero emission transportation, including: up to 30 $100,000,000 for the purchase or conversion of zero emission school 31 buses, and supporting infrastructure pursuant to section 58-0703 of 32 the environmental conservation law; not less than $50,000,000 for 33 electric vehicle fast charging stations and supporting infrastruc- 34 ture for municipal, commercial, medium duty, heavy duty, and fleet 35 vehicles; and, not less than $50,000,000 for the New York state 36 energy research and development authority's Charge Ready NY Program; 37 not less than $200,000,000 for renewable energy projects, including: 38 renewable energy generating projects undertaken pursuant to para- 39 graph 27-a of section 1005 of public authorities law; municipal 40 renewable energy projects; and, grid connectivity; and, notwith- 41 standing any provisions to the contrary contained in section 163 and 42 section 112 of the state finance law, subject to approval by the 43 director of the budget, up to $100,000,000 may be used for any of 44 the above programs or purposes. This appropriation shall be subject 45 to a plan approved by the director of the budget and submitted to 46 the chair of the senate finance committee and the chair of the 47 assembly ways and means committee. Such plan shall prioritize disad- 48 vantaged communities by supporting actions consistent with the 1274 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES SUSTAINABLE FUTURE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 requirements of paragraph d of subdivision three of section 75-0109 2 and of section 75-0117 of the environmental conservation law. Quali- 3 fying projects funded by this appropriation shall be subject to the 4 same standards and provisions stated in section 224-f of the labor 5 law and section 66-v of the public service law, and treated in the 6 same manner as if funded from section 99-qq of the state finance 7 law. The New York state energy research and development authority in 8 collaboration with agencies and authorities receiving funds from 9 this appropriation shall produce an annual report on expenditures 10 from this appropriation beginning on or before December thirty- 11 first, two thousand twenty-five until all funds appropriated herein 12 are accounted for. Such report shall be submitted to the chair of 13 the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly ways and 14 means committee. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 15 contrary, all or a portion of this appropriation may be transferred 16 to state operations, aid to localities, or capital projects, and all 17 or a portion of this appropriation may be transferred or suballo- 18 cated to any state department, agency, public authority, or public 19 benefit corporation (SFEC25SD) (85120) ............................. 20 1,000,000,000 ................................. (re. $1,000,000,000) 1275 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 0 1,583,301,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 0 1,583,301,000 5 ================ ================ 6 STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM (CCP) 7 Capital Projects Funds - Other 8 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 9 State and Municipal Facilities Purpose 10 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 11 For payment of the capital costs of construction, improvement, reha- 12 bilitation or reconstruction of facilities owned by eligible enti- 13 ties; the acquisition of capital facilities and assets by eligible 14 entities, including fixed capital assets; the acquisition by eligi- 15 ble entities of equipment and other capital assets, including vehi- 16 cles, in support of health, safety, technology, or innovation; the 17 acquisition by an eligible entity of capital assets with a useful 18 life of not less than ten years purchased for the sole purpose of 19 preserving and protecting infrastructure that is owned, controlled 20 or appurtenant to an eligible entity, including but not limited to 21 heavy duty road maintenance and construction vehicles, pavers, snow 22 plows, street sweepers and heavy duty fire, emergency response and 23 law enforcement vehicles; economic development projects sponsored by 24 the state or municipal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the 25 general municipal law, that will create or retain jobs in New York 26 state as certified by the commissioner of the department of economic 27 development; or environmental projects sponsored by the state or 28 municipal corporations as defined in section 2 of the general munic- 29 ipal law. Eligible entities shall consist of the state; municipal 30 corporations as defined in section 2 of the general municipal law; 31 sanitation districts; special districts as defined in subdivision 16 32 of section 102 of the real property tax law; water and sewer 33 districts; the Metropolitan Transportation Authority or any other 34 public benefit corporation established pursuant to titles 11, 11-A, 35 11-B, 11-C, or 11-D of the public authorities law; a public benefit 36 corporation as defined in section 4 of chapter 1016 of the laws of 37 1969; a college or university established pursuant to section 352 of 38 the education law, section 6203 of the education law or section 6302 39 of the education law; an independent not-for-profit institution of 40 higher education as defined in subdivision 2 of section 6401 of the 41 education law; public school districts; public housing authorities; 42 public libraries and library systems chartered by the regents of the 43 state of New York or established by an act of the legislature; 44 public park conservancies or not-for-profit corporations organized 45 for the purpose of investing in parks owned by the state or munici- 46 pal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the general municipal 1276 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 law; not-for-profit fire districts, fire commissions, fire compa- 2 nies, fire departments, volunteer rescue and ambulance squads; 3 special act school districts, schools for the blind and deaf and 4 other students with disabilities subject to article 85 of the educa- 5 tion law, and private schools for students with disabilities author- 6 ized pursuant to chapter 853 of the laws of 1976; and any other 7 not-for-profit corporation or other not-for-profit entity. 8 Costs may include, but shall not be limited to engineering services, 9 construction, project management, right-of-way acquisition, and work 10 appurtenant and ancillary thereto. No funds from this appropriation 11 may be used as a required match or be considered a local share to 12 other state programs or to leverage state aid or grants including 13 but not limited to the apportionment of aid under the education law. 14 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds appro- 15 priated herein may be subject to the approval of the director of the 16 budget, be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred from this appropri- 17 ation to any other appropriation or any state department, agency or 18 public benefit corporation, or (iii) suballocated to any other state 19 department, agency or public benefit corporation, to achieve this 20 purpose (SM0121SM) (80001) ... 385,000,000 ...... (re. $385,000,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as added by chapter 314, 22 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 23 For payment of the capital costs of construction, improvement, reha- 24 bilitation or reconstruction of facilities owned by eligible enti- 25 ties; the acquisition of capital facilities and assets by eligible 26 entities, including fixed capital assets; the acquisition by eligi- 27 ble entities of equipment and other capital assets, including vehi- 28 cles, in support of health, safety, technology, or innovation; the 29 acquisition by an eligible entity of capital assets with a useful 30 life of not less than ten years purchased for the sole purpose of 31 preserving and protecting infrastructure that is owned, controlled 32 or appurtenant to an eligible entity, including but not limited to 33 heavy duty road maintenance and construction vehicles, pavers, snow 34 plows, street sweepers and heavy duty fire, emergency response and 35 law enforcement vehicles; economic development projects sponsored by 36 the state or municipal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the 37 general municipal law, that will create or retain jobs in New York 38 state as certified by the commissioner of the department of economic 39 development; or environmental projects sponsored by the state or 40 municipal corporations as defined in section 2 of the general munic- 41 ipal law. Eligible entities shall consist of the state; municipal 42 corporations as defined in section 2 of the general municipal law; 43 sanitation districts; special districts as defined in subdivision 16 44 of section 102 of the real property tax law; water and sewer 45 districts; the Metropolitan Transportation Authority or any other 46 public benefit corporation established pursuant to titles 11, 11-A, 47 11-B, 11-C, or 11-D of the public authorities law; a public benefit 48 corporation as defined in section 2 of chapter 1016 of the laws of 49 1969; a college or university established pursuant to section 352 of 1277 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 the education law, section 6203 of the education law or section 6302 2 of the education law; an independent not-for-profit institution of 3 higher education as defined in subdivision 2 of section 6401 of the 4 education law; public school districts; public housing authorities; 5 entities providing affordable housing, public libraries and library 6 systems chartered by the regents of the state of New York or estab- 7 lished by an act of the legislature; public park conservancies or 8 not-for-profit corporations organized for the purpose of investing 9 in parks owned by the state or municipal corporations, as defined in 10 section 2 of the general municipal law; and not-for-profit fire 11 districts, fire commissions, fire companies, fire departments, 12 volunteer rescue and ambulance squads; and special act school 13 districts, schools for the blind and deaf and other students with 14 disabilities subject to article 85 of the education law, and private 15 schools for students with disabilities authorized pursuant to chap- 16 ter 853 of the laws of 1976. 17 Costs may include, but shall not be limited to engineering services, 18 construction, project management, right-of-way acquisition, and work 19 appurtenant and ancillary thereto. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 20 provision of this appropriation or any other provision of law, funds 21 from this appropriation may be made available for Lake Ontario resi- 22 liency and economic development projects and purposes, including 23 services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs of program adminis- 24 tration related to hardening infrastructure along the Lake Ontario 25 waterfront and strengthening local economies within the region, 26 including but not limited to projects or priorities recommended by 27 the Lake Ontario Resiliency and Economic Development Initiative 28 Commission. No funds from this appropriation may be used as a 29 required match or be considered a local share to other state 30 programs or to leverage state aid or grants including but not limit- 31 ed to the apportionment of aid under the education law. Notwith- 32 standing any provision of law to the contrary, funds appropriated 33 herein may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, 34 be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred from this appropriation to any 35 other appropriation of any state department, agency or public bene- 36 fit corporation, or (iii) suballocated to any other state depart- 37 ment, agency or public benefit corporation, to achieve this purpose 38 (SM0119SM) (80001) ... 385,000,000 .............. (re. $383,301,000) 39 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 54, 40 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 41 For payment of the capital costs of construction, improvement, reha- 42 bilitation or reconstruction of facilities owned by eligible enti- 43 ties; the acquisition of capital facilities and assets by eligible 44 entities, including fixed capital assets; the acquisition by eligi- 45 ble entities of equipment and other capital assets, including vehi- 46 cles, in support of health, safety, technology, or innovation; the 47 acquisition by an eligible entity of capital assets with a useful 48 life of not less than ten years purchased for the sole purpose of 49 preserving and protecting infrastructure that is owned, controlled 1278 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 or appurtenant to an eligible entity, including but not limited to 2 heavy duty road maintenance and construction vehicles, pavers, snow 3 plows, street sweepers and heavy duty fire, emergency response and 4 law enforcement vehicles; economic development projects sponsored by 5 the state or municipal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the 6 general municipal law, that will create or retain jobs in New York 7 state as certified by the commissioner of the department of economic 8 development; or environmental projects sponsored by the state or 9 municipal corporations as defined in section 2 of the general munic- 10 ipal law. Eligible entities shall consist of the state; municipal 11 corporations as defined in section 2 of the general municipal law; 12 sanitation districts; special districts as defined in subdivision 16 13 of section 102 of the real property tax law; water and sewer 14 districts; the Metropolitan Transportation Authority or any other 15 public benefit corporation established pursuant to titles 11, 11-A, 16 11-B, 11-C, or 11-D of the public authorities law; a public benefit 17 corporation as defined in section 4 of chapter 1016 of the laws of 18 1969; a college or university established pursuant to section 352 of 19 the education law, section 6203 of the education law or section 6302 20 of the education law; an independent not-for-profit institution of 21 higher education as defined in subdivision 2 of section 6401 of the 22 education law; public school districts; public housing authorities; 23 public libraries and library systems chartered by the regents of the 24 state of New York or established by an act of the legislature; 25 public park conservancies or not-for-profit corporations organized 26 for the purpose of investing in parks owned by the state or munici- 27 pal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the general municipal 28 law; not-for-profit fire districts, fire commissions, fire compa- 29 nies, fire departments, volunteer rescue and ambulance squads; 30 special act school districts, schools for the blind and deaf and 31 other students with disabilities subject to article 85 of the educa- 32 tion law, and private schools for students with disabilities author- 33 ized pursuant to chapter 853 of the laws of 1976; and any other 34 not-for-profit corporation or other not-for-profit entity. 35 Costs may include, but shall not be limited to engineering services, 36 construction, project management, right-of-way acquisition, and work 37 appurtenant and ancillary thereto. No funds from this appropriation 38 may be used as a required match or be considered a local share to 39 other state programs or to leverage state aid or grants including 40 but not limited to the apportionment of aid under the education law. 41 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds appro- 42 priated herein may be subject to the approval of the director of the 43 budget, be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred from this appropri- 44 ation to any other appropriation or any state department, agency or 45 public benefit corporation, or (iii) suballocated to any other state 46 department, agency or public benefit corporation, to achieve this 47 purpose (SM0118SM) (80001) ... 385,000,000 ...... (re. $385,000,000) 48 For payment of the capital costs of construction, improvement, reha- 49 bilitation or reconstruction of facilities owned by eligible enti- 50 ties; the acquisition of capital facilities and assets by eligible 1279 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 entities, including fixed capital assets; the acquisition by eligi- 2 ble entities of equipment and other capital assets, including vehi- 3 cles, in support of health, safety, technology, or innovation; the 4 acquisition by an eligible entity of capital assets with a useful 5 life of not less than ten years purchased for the sole purpose of 6 preserving and protecting infrastructure that is owned, controlled 7 or appurtenant to an eligible entity, including but not limited to 8 heavy duty road maintenance and construction vehicles, pavers, snow 9 plows, street sweepers and heavy duty fire, emergency response and 10 law enforcement vehicles; economic development projects sponsored by 11 the state or municipal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the 12 general municipal law, that will create or retain jobs in New York 13 state as certified by the commissioner of the department of economic 14 development; or environmental projects sponsored by the state or 15 municipal corporations as defined in section 2 of the general munic- 16 ipal law. Eligible entities shall consist of the state; municipal 17 corporations as defined in section 2 of the general municipal law; 18 sanitation districts; special districts as defined in subdivision 16 19 of section 102 of the real property tax law; water and sewer 20 districts; the Metropolitan Transportation Authority or any other 21 public benefit corporation established pursuant to titles 11, 11-A, 22 11-B, 11-C, or 11-D of the public authorities law; a public benefit 23 corporation as defined in section 4 of chapter 1016 of the laws of 24 1969; a college or university established pursuant to section 352 of 25 the education law, section 6203 of the education law or section 6302 26 of the education law; an independent not-for-profit institution of 27 higher education as defined in subdivision 2 of section 6401 of the 28 education law; public school districts; public housing authorities; 29 public libraries and library systems chartered by the regents of the 30 state of New York or established by an act of the legislature; 31 public park conservancies or not for profit corporations organized 32 for the purpose of investing in parks owned by the state or munici- 33 pal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the general municipal 34 law; not for profit fire districts, fire commissions, fire compa- 35 nies, fire departments, volunteer rescue and ambulance squads; 36 special act school districts, schools for the blind and deaf and 37 other students with disabilities subject to article 85 of the educa- 38 tion law, and private schools for students with disabilities author- 39 ized pursuant to chapter 853 of the laws of 1976. 40 Costs may include, but shall not be limited to engineering services, 41 construction, project management, right-of-way acquisition, and work 42 appurtenant and ancillary thereto. No funds from this appropriation 43 may be used as a required match or be considered a local share to 44 other state programs or to leverage state aid or grants including 45 but not limited to the apportionment of aid under the education law. 46 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds appro- 47 priated herein may, subject to the approval of the director of the 48 budget, be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred from this appropri- 49 ation to any other appropriation of any state department, agency or 50 public benefit corporation, or (iii) suballocated to any other state 1280 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 department, agency or public benefit corporation, to achieve this 2 purpose. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any limitations contained 3 therein or any other inconsistent provision of law, funds from this 4 appropriation shall be available, including for payment of liabil- 5 ities incurred or payments made prior to April 1, 2018, for any 6 purpose, individual, or entity authorized under the Lake Ontario-St. 7 Lawrence Seaway flood relief and recovery grant program established 8 pursuant to chapter 85 of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 61 9 of the laws of 2017, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2018, in 10 an amount equal to $40,000,000 subject to the approval of the direc- 11 tor of the budget (SM0218SM) (85063) ............................... 12 90,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,000,000) 13 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 14 314, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 15 For payment of the capital costs of construction, improvement, reha- 16 bilitation or reconstruction of facilities owned by eligible enti- 17 ties; the acquisition of capital facilities and assets by eligible 18 entities, including fixed capital assets; the acquisition by eligi- 19 ble entities of equipment and other capital assets, including vehi- 20 cles, in support of health, safety, technology, or innovation; the 21 acquisition by an eligible entity of capital assets with a useful 22 life of not less than ten years purchased for the sole purpose of 23 preserving and protecting infrastructure that is owned, controlled 24 or appurtenant to an eligible entity, including but not limited to 25 heavy duty road maintenance and construction vehicles, pavers, snow 26 plows, street sweepers and heavy duty fire, emergency response and 27 law enforcement vehicles; economic development projects sponsored by 28 the state or municipal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the 29 general municipal law, that will create or retain jobs in New York 30 state as certified by the commissioner of the department of economic 31 development; or environmental projects sponsored by the state or 32 municipal corporations as defined in section 2 of the general munic- 33 ipal law. Eligible entities shall consist of the state; municipal 34 corporations as defined in section 2 of the general municipal law; 35 sanitation districts; special districts as defined in subdivision 16 36 of section 102 of the real property tax law; water and sewer 37 districts; the Metropolitan Transportation Authority or any other 38 public benefit corporation established pursuant to titles 11, 11-A, 39 11-B, 11-C, or 11-D of the public authorities law; a public benefit 40 corporation as defined in section 4 of chapter 1016 of the laws of 41 1969; a college or university established pursuant to section 352 of 42 the education law, section 6203 of the education law or section 6302 43 of the education law; an independent not-for-profit institution of 44 higher education as defined in subdivision 2 of section 6401 of the 45 education law; public school districts; public housing authorities; 46 public libraries and library systems chartered by the regents of the 47 state of New York or established by an act of the legislature; 48 public park conservancies or not for profit corporations organized 49 for the purpose of investing in parks owned by the state or munici- 1281 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 pal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the general municipal 2 law; not for profit fire districts, fire commissions, fire compa- 3 nies, fire departments, volunteer rescue and ambulance squads; and 4 special act school districts, schools for the blind and deaf and 5 other students with disabilities subject to article 85 of the educa- 6 tion law, and private schools for students with disabilities author- 7 ized pursuant to chapter 853 of the laws of 1976. 8 Costs may include, but shall not be limited to engineering services, 9 construction, project management, right-of-way acquisition, and work 10 appurtenant and ancillary thereto. No funds from this appropriation 11 may be used as a required match or be considered a local share to 12 other state programs or to leverage state aid or grants including 13 but not limited to the apportionment of aid under the education law. 14 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds appro- 15 priated herein may, subject to the approval of the director of the 16 budget, be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred from this appropri- 17 ation to any other appropriation of any state department, agency or 18 public benefit corporation, or (iii) suballocated to any other state 19 department, agency or public benefit corporation, to achieve this 20 purpose. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any limitations contained 21 therein or any other inconsistent provision of law, funds from this 22 appropriation shall also be available, including for payment of 23 liabilities incurred or payments made prior to April 1, 2017, (i) 24 for any purpose, individual, or entity authorized under the Lake 25 Ontario-St. Lawrence Seaway flood relief and recovery grant program 26 established pursuant to a chapter of the laws of 2017, subject to 27 the approval of the director of the budget, (ii) for payment of the 28 costs of other storm recovery and mitigation projects, not to exceed 29 10,000,000 dollars in the aggregate to municipalities and special 30 districts in (a) the counties of Chautauqua, Cattaraugus and Allega- 31 ny for damages sustained as a result of a severe storm and flooding 32 which occurred July 14 and 15, 2015, in an amount not less than 33 6,800,000 dollars or (b) the county of Monroe for damages resulting 34 from a severe storm which occurred March 8 and 9, 2017, in an amount 35 not to exceed 2,000,000 dollars subject to the approval of the 36 director of the budget, (iii) for any purpose, individual, or entity 37 authorized under the Southern Tier-Finger Lakes recovery program, as 38 administered by the Housing Trust Fund Corporation, for damages 39 sustained as a result of a severe storm and flooding which occurred 40 August 13 thru 15, 2018, in an amount not to exceed $13,000,000, and 41 (iv) for any purpose, individual, or entity authorized under the 42 Lake Ontario-St. Lawrence Seaway flood relief and recovery grant 43 program established pursuant to chapter 85 of the laws of 2017, as 44 amended by chapter 61 of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 59 45 of the laws of 2018, for damages sustained as a result of severe 46 storms and flooding which occurred between January 1, 2019 and 47 December 31, 2019. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 48 the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred 49 to any state department, agency, or public authority for the 1282 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 purposes stated herein (SM0117SM) (80001) .......................... 2 398,500,000 ..................................... (re. $297,733,000) 3 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 54, 4 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 5 For payment of the capital costs of construction, improvement, reha- 6 bilitation or reconstruction of facilities owned by eligible enti- 7 ties; the acquisition of capital facilities and assets by eligible 8 entities, including fixed capital assets; the acquisition by eligi- 9 ble entities of equipment and other capital assets, including vehi- 10 cles, in support of health, safety, technology, or innovation; the 11 acquisition by an eligible entity of capital assets with a useful 12 life of not less than ten years purchased for the sole purpose of 13 preserving and protecting infrastructure that is owned, controlled 14 or appurtenant to an eligible entity, including but not limited to 15 heavy duty road maintenance and construction vehicles, pavers, snow 16 plows, street sweepers and heavy duty fire, emergency response and 17 law enforcement vehicles; economic development projects sponsored by 18 the state or municipal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the 19 general municipal law, that will create or retain jobs in New York 20 state as certified by the commissioner of the department of economic 21 development; or environmental projects sponsored by the state or 22 municipal corporations as defined in section 2 of the general munic- 23 ipal law. Eligible entities shall consist of the state; municipal 24 corporations as defined in section 2 of the general municipal law; 25 sanitation districts; special districts as defined in subdivision 16 26 of section 102 of the real property tax law; water and sewer 27 districts; the Metropolitan Transportation Authority or any other 28 public benefit corporation established pursuant to titles 11, 11-A, 29 11-B, 11-C, or 11-D of the public authorities law; a public benefit 30 corporation as defined in section 2 of chapter 1016 of the laws of 31 1969; a college or university established pursuant to section 352 of 32 the education law, section 6203 of the education law or section 6302 33 of the education law; an independent not-for-profit institution of 34 higher education as defined in subdivision 2 of section 6401 of the 35 education law; public school districts; public housing authorities; 36 public libraries and library systems chartered by the regents of the 37 state of New York or established by an act of the legislature; 38 public park conservancies or not for profit corporations organized 39 for the purpose of investing in parks owned by the state or munici- 40 pal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the general municipal 41 law; and not for profit fire districts, fire commissions, fire 42 companies, fire departments, volunteer rescue and ambulance squads; 43 and special act school districts, schools for the blind and deaf and 44 other students with disabilities subject to article 85 of the educa- 45 tion law, and private schools for students with disabilities author- 46 ized pursuant to chapter 853 of the laws of 1976. Costs may include, 47 but shall not be limited to engineering services, construction, 48 project management, right-of-way acquisition, and work appurtenant 49 and ancillary thereto. No funds from this appropriation may be used 1283 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 as a required match or be considered a local share to other state 2 programs or to leverage state aid or grants including but not limit- 3 ed to the apportionment of aid under the education law. Notwith- 4 standing any provision of law to the contrary, funds appropriated 5 herein may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, 6 be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred from this appropriation to any 7 other appropriation of any state department, agency or public bene- 8 fit corporation, or (iii) suballocated to any other state depart- 9 ment, agency or public benefit corporation, to achieve this purpose 10 (SM0116SM) (80001) ... 385,000,000 ............... (re. $20,879,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54, 12 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 13 For payment of the capital costs of construction, improvement, reha- 14 bilitation or reconstruction of facilities owned by eligible enti- 15 ties; the acquisition of capital facilities and assets by eligible 16 entities, including fixed capital assets; the acquisition by eligi- 17 ble entities of equipment and other capital assets, including vehi- 18 cles, in support of health, safety, technology, or innovation; the 19 acquisition by an eligible entity of capital assets with a useful 20 life of not less than ten years purchased for the sole purpose of 21 preserving and protecting infrastructure that is owned, controlled 22 or appurtenant to an eligible entity, including but not limited to 23 heavy duty road maintenance and construction vehicles, pavers, snow 24 plows, street sweepers and heavy duty fire, emergency response and 25 law enforcement vehicles; economic development projects sponsored by 26 the state or municipal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the 27 general municipal law, that will create or retain jobs in New York 28 state as certified by the commissioner of the department of economic 29 development; or environmental projects sponsored by the state or 30 municipal corporations as defined in section 2 of the general munic- 31 ipal law. Eligible entities shall consist of the state; municipal 32 corporations as defined in section 2 of the general municipal law; 33 sanitation districts; special districts as defined in subdivision 16 34 of section 102 of the real property tax law; water and sewer 35 districts; the Metropolitan Transportation Authority or any other 36 public benefit corporation established pursuant to titles 11, 11-A, 37 11-B, 11-C, or 11-D of the public authorities law; a public benefit 38 corporation as defined in section 2 of chapter 1016 of the laws of 39 1969; a college or university established pursuant to section 352 of 40 the education law, section 6203 of the education law or section 6302 41 of the education law; an independent not-for-profit institution of 42 higher education as defined in subdivision 2 of section 6401 of the 43 education law; public school districts; public housing authorities; 44 public libraries and library systems chartered by the regents of the 45 state of New York or established by an act of the legislature; 46 public park conservancies or not for profit corporations organized 47 for the purpose of investing in parks owned by the state or munici- 48 pal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the general municipal 49 law; and not for profit fire districts, fire commissions, fire 1284 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 companies, fire departments, volunteer rescue and ambulance squads; 2 and special act school districts, schools for the blind and deaf and 3 other students with disabilities subject to article 85 of the educa- 4 tion law, and private schools for students with disabilities author- 5 ized pursuant to chapter 853 of the laws of 1976. Costs may include, 6 but shall not be limited to engineering services, construction, 7 project management, right-of-way acquisition, and work appurtenant 8 and ancillary thereto. No funds from this appropriation may be used 9 as a required match or be considered a local share to other state 10 programs or to leverage state aid or grants including but not limit- 11 ed to the apportionment of aid under the education law. Notwith- 12 standing any provision of law to the contrary, funds appropriated 13 herein may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, 14 be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred from this appropriation to any 15 other appropriation of any state department, agency or public bene- 16 fit corporation, or (iii) suballocated to any other state depart- 17 ment, agency or public benefit corporation, to achieve this purpose 18 (SM0115SM) (80001) ... 385,000,000 ................ (re. $4,377,000) 19 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 54, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 21 For payment of the capital costs of construction, improvement, reha- 22 bilitation or reconstruction of facilities owned by eligible enti- 23 ties; the acquisition of capital facilities and assets by eligible 24 entities, including fixed capital assets; the acquisition by eligi- 25 ble entities of equipment and other capital assets, including vehi- 26 cles, in support of health, and safety, technology, or innovation; 27 the acquisition by an eligible entity of capital assets with a 28 useful life of not less than ten years purchased for the sole 29 purpose of preserving and protecting infrastructure that is owned, 30 controlled or appurtenant to an eligible entity, including but not 31 limited to heavy duty road maintenance and construction vehicles, 32 pavers, snowplows, street sweepers and heavy duty fire, emergency 33 response and law enforcement vehicles; economic development projects 34 sponsored by the state or municipal corporations, as defined in 35 section 2 of the general municipal law, that will create or retain 36 jobs in New York state as certified by the commissioner of the 37 department of economic development; or environmental projects spon- 38 sored by the state or municipal corporations as defined in section 2 39 of the general municipal law. Eligible entities shall consist of the 40 state; municipal corporations as defined in section 2 of the general 41 municipal law; sanitation districts; special districts as defined in 42 subdivision 16 of section 102 of the real property tax law; water 43 and sewer districts; the Metropolitan Transportation Authority or 44 any other public benefit corporation established pursuant to titles 45 11, 11-A, 11-B, 11-C, or 11-D of the public authorities law; a 46 public benefit corporation as defined in section 2 of chapter 1016 47 of the laws of 1969; a college or university established pursuant to 48 section 352 of the education law, section 6203 of the education law 49 or section 6302 of the education law; an independent not-for-profit 1285 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 institution of higher education as defined in subdivision 2 of 2 section 6401 of the education law; public school districts; public 3 housing authorities; public libraries and library systems chartered 4 by the regents of the state of New York or established by an act of 5 the legislature; public park conservancies or not for profit corpo- 6 rations organized for the purpose of investing in parks owned by the 7 state or municipal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the 8 general municipal law; and not for profit fire districts, fire 9 commissions, fire companies, fire departments, volunteer rescue and 10 ambulance squads; and special act school districts, schools for the 11 blind and deaf and other students with disabilities subject to arti- 12 cle 85 of the education law, and private schools for students with 13 disabilities authorized pursuant to chapter 853 of the laws of 1976. 14 Costs may include, but shall not be limited to engineering services, 15 construction, project management, right-of-way acquisition, and work 16 appurtenant and ancillary thereto. No funds from this appropriation 17 may be used as a required match or be considered a local share to 18 other state programs or to leverage state aid or grants including 19 but not limited to the apportionment of aid under the education law. 20 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds appro- 21 priated herein may, subject to the approval of the director of the 22 budget, be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred from this appropri- 23 ation to any other appropriation of any state department, agency or 24 public benefit corporation, or (iii) suballocated to any other state 25 department, agency or public benefit corporation, to achieve this 26 purpose (SM0114SM) (80001) ... 385,000,000 ....... (re. $54,159,000) 27 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 54, 28 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 29 For payment of the capital costs of construction, improvement, reha- 30 bilitation or reconstruction of facilities owned by eligible enti- 31 ties; the acquisition of capital facilities and assets by eligible 32 entities, including fixed capital assets; the acquisition by eligi- 33 ble entities of equipment and other capital assets, including vehi- 34 cles, in support of health, safety, technology, or innovation; the 35 acquisition by an eligible entity of capital assets with a useful 36 life of not less than ten years purchased for the sole purpose of 37 preserving and protecting infrastructure that is owned, controlled 38 or appurtenant to an eligible entity, including but not limited to 39 heavy duty road maintenance and construction vehicles, pavers, snow 40 plows, street sweepers and heavy duty fire, emergency response and 41 law enforcement vehicles; economic development projects sponsored by 42 the state or municipal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the 43 general municipal law, that will create or retain jobs in New York 44 state as certified by the commissioner of the department of economic 45 development; or environmental projects sponsored by the state or 46 municipal corporations as defined in section 2 of the general munic- 47 ipal law. Eligible entities shall consist of the state; municipal 48 corporations as defined in section 2 of the general municipal law; 49 sanitation districts; special districts as defined in subdivision 16 1286 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 of section 102 of the real property tax law; water and sewer 2 districts; the Metropolitan Transportation Authority or any other 3 public benefit corporation established pursuant to titles 11, 11-A, 4 11-B, 11-C, or 11-D of the public authorities law; a public benefit 5 corporation as defined in section 2 of chapter 1016 of the laws of 6 1969; a college or university established pursuant to section 352 of 7 the education law, section 6203 of the education law or section 6302 8 of the education law; an independent not-for-profit institution of 9 higher education as defined in subdivision 2 of section 6401 of the 10 education law; public school districts; public housing authorities; 11 public libraries and library systems chartered by the regents of the 12 state of New York or established by an act of the legislature; 13 public park conservancies or not for profit corporations organized 14 for the purpose of investing in parks owned by the state or munici- 15 pal corporations, as defined in section 2 of the general municipal 16 law; and not for profit fire districts, fire commissions, fire 17 companies, fire departments, volunteer rescue and ambulance squads; 18 and special act school districts, schools for the blind and deaf and 19 other students with disabilities subject to article 85 of the educa- 20 tion law, and private schools for students with disabilities author- 21 ized pursuant to chapter 853 of the laws of 1976. Costs may include, 22 but shall not be limited to engineering services, construction, 23 project management, right-of-way acquisition, and work appurtenant 24 and ancillary thereto. No funds from this appropriation may be used 25 as a required match or be considered a local share to other state 26 programs or to leverage state aid or grants including but not limit- 27 ed to the apportionment of aid under the education law. Notwith- 28 standing any provision of law to the contrary, funds appropriated 29 herein may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, 30 be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred from this appropriation to any 31 other appropriation of any state department, agency or public bene- 32 fit corporation, or (iii) suballocated to any other state depart- 33 ment, agency or public benefit corporation, to achieve this purpose 34 (SM1013SM) (80001) ... 385,000,000 ................ (re. $2,852,000) 1287 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE EQUIPMENT FINANCE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS 2026-27 1 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 2 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 3 following: 4 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 5 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 100,000,000 572,525,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 100,000,000 572,525,000 8 ================ ================ 9 EQUIPMENT ACQUISITION (CCP) ................................ 100,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Capital Projects Funds - Other 12 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 13 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 14 For expenses and grants related to the 15 acquisition of equipment, including but 16 not limited to the creation or moderniza- 17 tion of information technology systems and 18 related research and development equip- 19 ment, health and safety equipment, heavy 20 equipment and machinery, the creation or 21 improvement of security systems, and labo- 22 ratory equipment. All or a portion of the 23 funds appropriated hereby may be suballo- 24 cated or transferred to any department, 25 agency, or public authority (2PCE2608) 26 (85066) .................................... 100,000,000 1288 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE EQUIPMENT FINANCE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 EQUIPMENT ACQUISITION (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 5 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025: 6 For expenses and grants related to the acquisition of equipment, 7 including but not limited to the creation or modernization of infor- 8 mation technology systems and related research and development 9 equipment, health and safety equipment, heavy equipment and machin- 10 ery, the creation or improvement of security systems, and laboratory 11 equipment. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 12 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 13 authority (2PCE2508) (85066) ....................................... 14 100,000,000 ..................................... (re. $100,000,000) 15 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 16 For expenses and grants related to the acquisition of equipment, 17 including but not limited to the creation or modernization of infor- 18 mation technology systems and related research and development 19 equipment, health and safety equipment, heavy equipment and machin- 20 ery, the creation or improvement of security systems, and laboratory 21 equipment. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 22 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 23 authority (2PCE2408) (85066) ....................................... 24 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $82,792,000) 25 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 For expenses and grants related to the acquisition of equipment, 27 including but not limited to the creation or modernization of infor- 28 mation technology systems and related research and development 29 equipment, health and safety equipment, heavy equipment and machin- 30 ery, the creation or improvement of security systems, and laboratory 31 equipment. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 32 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 33 authority (2PCE2308) (85066) ....................................... 34 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $66,316,000) 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 36 For expenses and grants related to the acquisition of equipment, 37 including but not limited to the creation or modernization of infor- 38 mation technology systems and related research and development 39 equipment, health and safety equipment, heavy equipment and machin- 40 ery, the creation or improvement of security systems, and laboratory 41 equipment. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 42 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 43 authority (2PCE2208) (85066) ... 100,000,000 ..... (re. $59,709,000) 44 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 1289 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE EQUIPMENT FINANCE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For expenses and grants related to the acquisition of equipment, 2 including but not limited to the creation or modernization of infor- 3 mation technology systems and related research and development 4 equipment, health and safety equipment, heavy equipment and machin- 5 ery, the creation or improvement of security systems, and laboratory 6 equipment, provided that up to $10,000,000 shall be made available 7 for body-worn cameras for municipal police departments. All or a 8 portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 9 transferred to any department, agency, or public authority 10 (2PCE2108) (85066) ... 100,000,000 ............... (re. $56,354,000) 11 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 54, 12 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 13 For expenses and grants related to the acquisition of equipment, 14 including but not limited to the creation or modernization of infor- 15 mation technology systems and related research and development 16 equipment, health and safety equipment, heavy equipment and machin- 17 ery, the creation or improvement of security systems, and laboratory 18 equipment. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 19 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 20 authority (2PCE2008) (85066) ... 100,000,000 .... (re. $ 78,349,000) 21 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 54, 22 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 23 For expenses and grants related to the acquisition of equipment, 24 including but not limited to the creation or modernization of infor- 25 mation technology systems and related research and development 26 equipment, health and safety equipment, heavy equipment and machin- 27 ery, the creation or improvement of security systems, and laboratory 28 equipment. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be 29 suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public 30 authority (2PCE1908) (85066) ... 93,000,000 ...... (re. $36,622,000) 31 PROGRAM CHANGES AND EXPANSION (CCP) 32 Capital Projects Funds - Other 33 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 34 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 35 By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 36 For the costs of the purchase of equipment or the creation or improve- 37 ment of information technology systems and related research and 38 development to be financed as authorized pursuant to article 5-A of 39 the state finance law. All or a portion of the funds appropriated 40 hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, 41 or public authority (2P111108) (80469) ............................. 42 92,751,000 ....................................... (re. $17,282,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 1290 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STATE EQUIPMENT FINANCE PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 For the costs of the purchase of equipment or the creation or improve- 2 ment of information technology systems and related research and 3 development to be financed as authorized pursuant to article 5-A of 4 the state finance law. All or a portion of the funds appropriated 5 hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, 6 or public authority (2P101008) (80469) ............................. 7 187,285,000 ...................................... (re. $30,504,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 9 For the costs of the purchase of equipment or the creation or improve- 10 ment of information technology systems and related research and 11 development to be financed as authorized pursuant to article 5-A of 12 the state finance law. All or a portion of the funds appropriated 13 hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, 14 or public authority (2P090908) (80469) ............................. 15 129,800,000 ...................................... (re. $36,190,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 17 For the costs of the purchase of equipment or the creation or improve- 18 ment of information technology systems and related research and 19 development to be financed as authorized pursuant to article 5-A of 20 the state finance law. All or a portion of the funds appropriated 21 hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, 22 or public authority (2P080808) (80469) ............................. 23 141,000,000 ....................................... (re. $8,407,000) 1291 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES STRATEGIC INVESTMENT PROGRAM CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 STRATEGIC INVESTMENT PROGRAM (CCP) 2 Capital Projects Funds - Other 3 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 4 Strategic Investment Program Purpose 5 The appropriation made by chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000, as 6 amended by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is hereby 7 amended and reappropriated to read: 8 The sum of $215,650,000 is hereby appropriated for environmental 9 projects, including the preservation of historically significant 10 places in New York state, and projects to conserve, acquire, develop 11 or improve parklands, parks or public recreation areas; economic 12 development projects which will facilitate the creation or retention 13 of jobs or increase business activity within a municipality or 14 region of the state; higher education projects; projects to estab- 15 lish new or rehabilitate existing business incubator facilities to 16 accommodate emerging or small high technology companies; arts or 17 cultural projects, provided that the allocation made available to 18 the Governor as authorized by paragraph one of the memorandum of 19 understanding governing administration of the strategic investment 20 program, shall be reduced by $9,350,000 to $65,650,000. 21 Individual projects funded from this appropriation shall be for 22 $250,000 or more and funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated 23 to any department, agency, or public authority. Funds appropriated 24 hereby may be transferred to any department, agency, or public 25 authority. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 26 funds appropriated herein shall only be available for commitments 27 made on or before September 15, 2026. For purposes of this reappro- 28 priation, commitments shall mean any new project nomination submit- 29 ted to any department, agency, or public authority pursuant to the 30 appropriation herein (71SI00SI) (80589) ............................ 31 215,650,000 ...................................... (re. $11,740,000) 32 Project Schedule 33 PROJECT AMOUNT 34 -------------------------------------------- 35 Environmental ................... 63,750,000 36 Economic Development ............ 69,400,000 37 Higher Education/High Technol- 38 ogy Incubator ................. 43,750,000 39 Arts/Cultural ................... 38,750,000 40 -------------- 41 Total ...................... 215,650,000 42 ============== 1292 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES WORLD TRADE CENTER -- DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 Capital Projects Funds - Federal ... 0 145,470,000 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 0 145,470,000 5 ================ ================ 6 WORLD TRADE CENTER PROGRAM (CCP) 7 Capital Projects Funds - Federal 8 Federal Capital Projects Fund 9 Federal Capital Projects Account - 31350 10 Federal Aid Highways Purpose 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 12 To the department of transportation for the federal share of transpor- 13 tation projects related to service in Lower Manhattan related to the 14 September 11, 2001 attack on the New York City World Trade Center, 15 including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 16 tioning and preservation of highways, bridges, ferry and other 17 transportation facilities; the acquisition of property; payment for 18 engineering services including, but not limited to costs of personal 19 services, non-personal services and fringe benefits of the depart- 20 ment of transportation, and contract services provided by private 21 firms; appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact state- 22 ments for transportation projects; the payment of liabilities 23 incurred prior to April 1, 2006 and any other transportation costs 24 incurred as part of the recovery from the attack on the World Trade 25 Center. The funds appropriated hereby shall be used in accordance 26 with applicable federal transportation statutes and regulations and 27 may be suballocated for transportation purposes (2CWT0620) (80556) . 28 265,000,000 ...................................... (re. $34,935,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 30 To the department of transportation for the federal share of transpor- 31 tation projects related to service in Lower Manhattan related to the 32 September 11, 2001 attack on the New York City World Trade Center, 33 including but not limited to construction, reconstruction, recondi- 34 tioning and preservation of highways, bridges, ferry and other 35 transportation facilities; the acquisition of property; payment for 36 engineering services including, but not limited to costs of personal 37 services, non-personal services and fringe benefits of the depart- 38 ment of transportation, and contract services provided by private 39 firms; appraisals, surveys, testing, and environmental impact state- 40 ments for transportation projects; the payment of liabilities 41 incurred prior to April 1, 2002 and any other transportation costs 42 incurred as part of the recovery from the attack on the World Trade 43 Center. The funds appropriated hereby shall be used in accordance 44 with applicable federal transportation statutes and regulations and 45 may be suballocated for transportation purposes to the Metropolitan 1293 12654-09-6 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES WORLD TRADE CENTER -- DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CAPITAL PROJECTS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27 1 Transportation Authority. (17WT0220) (80556) ....................... 2 342,000,000 ..................................... (re. $110,535,000) 1294 12654-09-6 TABLE OF CONTENTS Page SECTION 1 - STATE AGENCIES ........................................... 1 ADIRONDACK PARK AGENCY ............................................. 5 AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS, DEPARTMENT OF ............................. 7 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL ........................................ 31 ARTS, COUNCIL ON THE .............................................. 32 AUDIT AND CONTROL, DEPARTMENT OF .................................. 33 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK ....................................... 35 CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION, DEPARTMENT OF ............. 120 CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES, DIVISION OF ........................... 132 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT ............................................. 138 ELECTIONS, STATE BOARD OF ........................................ 161 ENERGY RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY ........................ 163 ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION, DEPARTMENT OF ........................ 166 FAMILY ASSISTANCE, DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES, OFFICE OF ........................ 405 TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE, OFFICE OF ................. 426 FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF ................................ 436 GENERAL SERVICES, OFFICE OF ...................................... 437 HEALTH, DEPARTMENT OF ............................................ 456 HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES, DIVISION OF ............ 481 HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL, DIVISION OF ....................... 486 HUDSON RIVER PARK TRUST .......................................... 533 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES, OFFICE OF ....................... 534 LAW, DEPARTMENT OF ............................................... 537 MENTAL HYGIENE, DEPARTMENT OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS, OFFICE OF ..................... 538 1295 12654-09-6 TABLE OF CONTENTS Page MENTAL HEALTH, OFFICE OF ....................................... 563 PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES, OFFICE FOR ............. 610 METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY ............................ 650 MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS, DIVISION OF .......................... 654 MOTOR VEHICLES, DEPARTMENT OF .................................... 666 OLYMPIC REGIONAL DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY ........................... 670 PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION, OFFICE OF ........... 672 POWER AUTHORITY, NEW YORK ........................................ 700 PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS BOARD ................................ 704 STATE, DEPARTMENT OF ............................................. 705 STATE POLICE, DIVISION OF ........................................ 712 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK ..................................... 722 TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF .................................... 859 URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION, NEW YORK STATE ................... 1168 VETERANS' SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF ............................... 1215 VICTIM SERVICES, OFFICE OF ...................................... 1218 WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD ..................................... 1219 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES: ARTS AND CULTURAL FACILITIES IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM .............. 1221 COMMUNITY ENHANCEMENT FACILITIES ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ........... 1230 COMMUNITY RESILIENCY, ECONOMIC SUSTAINABILITY, AND TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM .......................................... 1231 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT - CAPITAL ................................ 1237 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM .................................. 1240 HIGH TECHNOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM ....................... 1242 HIGHER EDUCATION FACILITIES CAPITAL MATCHING GRANTS PROGRAM ..................................................... 1243 HUDSON RIVER VALLEY GREENWAY COMMUNITIES COUNCIL .............. 1246 1296 12654-09-6 TABLE OF CONTENTS Page INFLATION REDUCTION ACT ELECTIVE PAY PROGRAM .................. 1247 JACOB JAVITS CONVENTION CENTER ................................ 1248 LAKE ONTARIO RESILIENCY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT .............. 1249 LOCAL COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ............................ 1250 NONPROFIT INFRASTRUCTURE CAPITAL INVESTMENT PROGRAM ........... 1255 PUBLIC FACILITIES SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM ...................... 1259 REGIONAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM ......................... 1261 SPECIAL INFRASTRUCTURE ACCOUNT, NEW YORK ...................... 1262 SUSTAINABLE FUTURE PROGRAM .................................... 1270 STATE AND MUNICIPAL FACILITIES PROGRAM ........................ 1275 STATE EQUIPMENT FINANCE PROGRAM ............................... 1287 STRATEGIC INVESTMENT PROGRAM .................................. 1291 WORLD TRADE CENTER -- DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION ............ 1292